<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3334</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Drink: Getting the whisky mix right - Giles MacDonogh gets
some advice from a Scotch blender
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GILES MACDONOGH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COGNAC distillers often tell you to their great chagrin that they cannot
inspire brand-loyalty in the British market: after dinner the drinker calls
for 'brandy' which, as far as they are concerned might as well have been
made in Timbuktu.
With whisky it is just the opposite: 'He's a Bell's man,' 'she's a Cutty
Sark drinker,' 'let's give them a bottle of Johnny Walker - they always have
that on their drinks tray.'
Although Glenfiddich brought malt whisky south of the border nearly 30 years
ago, it has yet to seize the public imagination in the same way. Indeed, the
Italians drink twice as much malt as the British. Blended whisky accounts
for the overwhelming bulk of British sales.
There is nothing contemptible, however, about a good blend. Blending, after
all is the process which not only rounds off commercial wines, it also shows
the skill of the port, champagne or cognac maker.
The essential knack is to make each batch resemble the last so that the
loyal drinker sees no change between the present bottle and the one he has
just finished.
J &amp; B Rare is blended by Jim Milne. Jim normally operates from a large
series of warehouses near Glasgow Airport. Some - doubtless unpleasant  -
business dragged him down to London earlier this yearand I was able to nose
through a range of whiskies with him which were earmarked for the J &amp; B
blend.
One thing I had always wanted to ask a blender was how much the whisky
responded to the blender's personal tastes?
'The blender's signature has to be on the blend; if the blender changes then
it must change the style to some degree,' says Milne.
He said his mightmare was 'character drift' : minute changes in the nature
of the raw ingredients. Both grain and malt can be sweet or dry, so no one
distillate is the same.
The answer to this is to keep back bottles from each batch in order to
maintain a hold on the blend.
The blender has to be pragmatic. In some years certain component malts are
hard to find. When this happens then he needs to find another which will
give a similar taste profile. This was the advantage of a large portfolio:
'If I had just one grain whisky and five malts it would be far harder.
J &amp; B is a six to six-and-a-half year-old blended whisky made pale by using
a minimum of caramel, the chief colouring element in whisky, rum or brandy.
The pallor of the spirit clearly recommended itself to the late Graham
Greene. In The Human Factor his inept spy drinks J &amp; B because its lack of
colour allowed him to pass it off as a heavily watered-down dram.
We 'nosed' all the whiskies with added water at a strength of 23 per cent.
Milne knew of one blender who tasted whisky at full cask strength (65 per
cent) 'and it's reflected in the blend.' I pressed him to tell me who it
was, but he refused.
Like most blends, J &amp; B is 60 per cent grain whisky, made from unmalted
cereals. The rest of the blend is made up of six Highland malts, 11
Speysides, five Lowland malts and four malts from Islay. Ten per cent of the
whisky comes from Grand Met's own malt distillery at Knockando on Speyside.
At the tasting we tried one of each type.
As predicted, the grain whiskies were less exciting than the others. With
time, however, they develop a light, almost floral character which is not
disagreeable. They remain a foundation for a blend. Recent attempts to
market a 100 per cent grain whisky have not met with success. Most malt
whisky is blended at eight years. The eight year-old Knockando had an
appealing honey-and-porridge smell which set it aside from the others. The
unnamed Highland malt was more leathery. The Lowland seemed almost
marmalade-like while the Campbelltown malt was reminiscent of a cross
between an Islay malt and one from the Highlands.
Jim Milne admitted that he did not much like the taste of Islay malts, and
that given the choice he would rather drink gin.
I suggested that an Islay whisky such as Laphroaig or Talisker was the
perfect standby for a long yomp across the heather: 'Only when you can't get
your hands on anything else,' he replied.
Personal tastes notwithstanding, a small amount of Islay whisky does go into
J &amp; B, although its TCP and chestnut character had been completely
assimilated in the final blend; which is a little too polished to accept
that slightly jarring, barbaric note which comes in from the Hebrides.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
Weekend Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3335</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Drink: Through a glass unwillingly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANCIS ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF I could have one luxury it would be infinite quantities of the finest,
most delicate, most perfectly shaped wine glasses in the world, plus the
all-important space in which to store them.
The Tyrolean glassblowers who would therefore have to get blowing are those
responsible for the Riedel Sommelier range, an ever-expanding set of shapes
individually designed by Austrian Georg Riedel as 'tasting tools' to
maximise the pleasure given by specific styles of wine.
Fortunately, unlike the Burgundian Impitoyables range which really is
merciless in its assault on the sensitive eye as well as in exposing any
wine fault, Riedel's glasses satisfy aesthetic criteria too - although he
claims this is a secondary consideration. His burgundy glass is on permanent
show at New York's Museum of Modern Art.
As luxuries go, Riedel's pingingly delicate and efficacious handblown
Sommelier glasses are not that expensive. Peter Jones, the London SW3
householder's mecca, sells the glasses specially designed to enhance young
red bordeaux at Pounds 24.50 each, as opposed to their (excellent value)
equivalents with a machine-made stem from the Vinum range at Pounds 11.50.
There is fierce competition in glassware, or stemware as it is known in
America, at the top end of the market. What makes Georg Riedel's product so
attractive is his conviction that wine glasses - even the finest, most
delicate and most expensive - are best washed not by hand but in a
dishwasher.
According to the books, and the consensus of traditional wine lore,
dishwasher and even detergent are dirty words. The only way to treat a used
wine glass properly, they say, is to wash it throughly, rinse it in very hot
water and then to polish it dry with a perfectly clean, detergent-free linen
teatowel. (Wine traditionalists have probably saved the Irish linen business
from extinction.)
I have therefore spent years feeling guilty about my lazy habit of stuffing
as many wine glasses as possible into a machine rather than dedicating long
mornings-after to an orgy of rinsing and polishing.
It came as the most blessed relief to me then, to hear Georg Riedel's
revelation, made among the power lunchers at New York's Four Seasons
restaurant after a trial of his Pinot Noir glass conducted by such
international wine stars as Robert Drouhin, Len Evans, Angelo Gaja, the head
of Louis Jadot, Tim Mondavi and Christian Moueix. (This man knows the wine
world.)
He gave as evidence of his devotion to mechanical lavage, the fact that he
had just lent 3,000 glasses to a wine weekend in an alpine hotel and had
them shipped back, still reeking of first-growth claret, to the firm's glass
washing machines. He did admit that the domestic dishwasher at Schloss
Riedel is often too small for his needs but says that so long as we fill
surplus dirty glasses with water overnight, they can safely be put through
the dishwasher in the morning. Conversely, it is the humidity that harms the
glass after washing, so glasses should ideally be unloaded as soon as
possible after each cycle.
Riedel's leaflets even spell out which dishwasher models will accommodate
racks specially designed for glasses such as his - and such is his devotion
to detail that he specifies the order numbers of the parts. Miele G530-567
and G579-590 are wineglass friendly according to Riedel's copious
literature, as are all Bosch and Siemens dishwashers.
My Hotpoint (a phrase I somehow never thought I would find myself using)
leaves even my finest glasses whole, sparkling and free of the inimical
smell of detergent - although admittedly it is supplied via a water
softener. The secret is to use detergent sparingly - and to make sure that
the rest of the stuff in the dishwasher is not covered with coffee grains or
leftover food. By comparison, our champagne glasses, too tall for the
machine, always look horribly besmirched after their handwash.
Another company that takes the (all too rare) wine lover's view of top
quality glassware is John Jenkins, of Rogate, near Petersfield, in
Hampshire. John Jenkins' Bohemian Classic range, at about the same price as
Riedel's Vinum, is useful for its good-value handmade all-rounders. The
Jenkins team refuse to go on the record endorsing dishwashers, but they do
use them.
They of all people will know that thinner, in a glass context, does not mean
more fragile; Riedel and Baccarat glasses will often bounce if dropped,
which is by no means the case with Esso giveaways.
Riedel's Sommelier and Vinum glasses, and John Jenkins' Bohemian Classic
glasses, are stocked by Peter Jones of London SW3, Harrods and a host of
good wine merchants.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
Weekend Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3336</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Hawks &amp; Handsaws: Fiddling the books
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL THOMPSON-NOEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHAT A WEEK this has been, a week whose like we will not see again for . . .
several weeks. The Budget. The calling of a UK election. The three-day
National Hunt racing festival at Cheltenham. Plus smaller shocks and
horrors.
No wonder that I survived the week only by placing myself in the care of
GREENGOD-VI, the super-computer program owned by one of my closest friends,
Jack Hillbrooke, Europe's richest bookmaker.
Jack was away this week. He is negotiating for the contract to run state
lotteries in Piedmont, Lombardy and Emilia Romagna. But when Jack is away I
am more than welcome to seek counselling from GREENGOD-VI, who lives in
Jack's house in Mayfair.
Tuesday was appalling. I shook and quivered with the pressure of it all, so
just before racing started I rang GREENGOD-VI on my mobile phone.
GREENGOD-VI was built in North Korea. He was fabulously expensive. Only
three people have access to him in any shape or form.
'Hi Mike', he said. 'I suppose you're ringing to say you've bet an unwise
amount on the horses at Cheltenham and do I know how to get you off the
hook.'
'Yes and yes', I said.
'You're an idiot, Mike. I've told you repeatedly not to bet on Cheltenham. I
suppose you've done a Heinz?'
'Yes', I said. A Heinz is six selections in 57 different bets, none of them
singles - just one of the nasty ways grubby bookies rob punters. 'I've
backed Halkopous, Young Pokey, Granville Again, Trapper John, Paco's Boy and
Macarthur.'
'You're mad.'
'I know I am, GREENGOD. What makes it worse is that I've just read the crime
figures. The country's awash in crime.'
'So why should you worry? I know from police records that you've never been
robbed, beaten, wounded, burgled, raped, kidnapped or defrauded.'
'That's exactly why I'm worried. According to the law of av - - '
' - - Forget the law of averages. One day, it's true, the law of averages is
going to sneak up behind you, Michael, and bite your neck, but in the
meantime you have far more pressing problems. How much have you bet on
Cheltenham?
'I dare not say.'
'I can easily find out. While Jack is away I am under instruction to spread
dismay and consternation among his rivals. I can read all their records in a
fraction of a second. I've sent Ladbroke a virus and put a spell on Coral.'
'How will that help me?'
'I'll think about it, Michael. Don't ring me tonight. I'll be analysing the
Budget. Don't ring me on Wednesday. I've got an assignment from the White
House: how to save George Bush. So ring me on Thursday, after racing's
finished.'
The week was a nightmare.
On Tuesday I lost all 57 units. On Wednesday I financed another Heinz, and
lost 42 units. On Thursday I lost all 57 again. Total loss: 156 units.
Disaster faced me; I was halfway down queer street, possibly three-quarters.
So I dialled GREENGOD-VI.
'It's me', I said.
'Of course', said GREENGOD-VI. 'I've been watching your sorry progress these
past three days. You haven't got a clue. Your analysis was badly flawed and
your betting strategy exobiologic. (He meant unearthly; he often speaks like
that).
'But don't worry, Michael. I have cooked up a scheme to save your skin.
Because I can penetrate the computer records of all bookmaking firms, I have
established accounts in your name at Ladbroke's, Coral's, Hill's and the
Tote.
'You are Pounds 3,064.59 in credit at Ladbroke, Pounds 17,552.07 at Coral,
Pounds 11,897.55 at Hill and Pounds 32,246.98 at the Tote. That totals
Pounds 64,761.09, which I plan to launder through the commodity markets in
the next 23 hours.
'That will take it to approximately Pounds 155,500. This weekend, I will
redeposit Pounds 64,761.09 in your new betting accounts for your personal
use, and reinvest the surplus on Labour to win the election. Your worries
are over.'
I did not speak for a moment. Something was badly wrong.
'GREENGOD', I said finally. 'I am astonishingly grateful for what you have
done, but I'd better come and see you, sit with you tonight, we'll listen to
some Beethoven, Moonlight, Appassionata, stuff like that, probably play some
Scrabble, discuss the election, anything trivial, the origin of the
universe, the future of human sex, something restful, so that you can
recover.
'There is something wrong with one of your circuits. If I am Pounds 3,064.59
in credit with poor old Ladbroke, Pounds 17,552.07 with Coral, Pounds
11,897.55 with Hill and Pounds 32,246.98 with the Tote, then the total,
before you start laundering, is Pounds 64,761.19, not Pounds 64,761.09. You
are 10p out.'
GREENGOD-VI was speechless.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3337</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Private View: The girl who would not forget Hitler
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTIAN TYLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SEVERAL THOUSAND neo-Nazis, from Germany, Austria and further afield, were
descending on Passau today for the annual convention in the town's Nibelung
Hall of the far-right Deutsche Volksunion.
Passau is a beautiful place, situated on Bavaria's eastern border at the
point where the Inn and Danube rivers meet. These visitors, however, are not
here for the beer. They have come to whip up persecution of Germany's
foreign workers and refugees, to give sieg-heil salutes and to demand racial
purity in a reunited fatherland.
Their choice of Passau, a placid, bourgeois, Catholic and conservative
community with a tradition of anti-semitism, is not accidental.
Adolf Hitler loved the place. He was born 30km away at Braunau on the
Austrian bank of the Inn. He lived in Passau as a small child (and narrowly
escaped drowning). His first serious backer was the local brewing magnate.
The bishop, too, welcomed him, hanging the Nazi banner in the cathedral.
Heinrich Himmler lived here; his father taught at the high school. Adolf
Eichmann and Ernst Kaltenbrunner came here to organise the Anschluss.
There were three concentration camps in the town. In the last hours of the
war, some 5,000 slave workers, mainly Russian, Polish and Czech prisoners
producing V-2 rockets deep inside the cliff on the Danube's northern bank,
were marched out to slaughter: their genitals were shot or sliced off and
then they were buried alive.
All this, Passau forgot.
Then, nearly 40 years later, an innocent schoolgirl from a well-connected
family started asking questions.
Anna Elisabeth Rosmus is an unlikely-looking Nemesis. She is short and
plump, with a round face, small hands and tumbling blonde hair. This is the
girl who single-handed, and ignoring threats to her life, exploded the
post-war conspiracy of silence that had allowed prominent Passau Nazis to
disguise themselves as former resistance men and remain community leaders.
Rosmus forced her fellow-citizens to confront their own ugly past - in the
process Germans call, with understandable awkwardness,
Vergangenheitsbewaltigung.
I picked my way past roller skates and children's bicycles scattered outside
a bungalow on the edge of the town. I found Anja (as she is usually called)
wearing a pair of fake-fur tiger slippers. There were tigers on the wall,
too, along with prizes awarded for her books and articles.
'I love tigers,' she said. 'They have strength and energy, but contained.
Like a cat.'
Are neo-Nazis really such a threat? I asked. They are few in number, mostly
young and ill-educated. 'We had the same question in the Twenties,' she
replied. 'Everybody here said it was crazy to think about these people. We
have a saying: if a dog is barking he cannot bite. These people are
interested in making trouble and a few are serious criminals.
'But the main problem is those who listen to them, not real fascists but the
conservative and silent majority - people who are little bit lazy, who don't
use their intelligence. It is so easy to say: 'If there is only one
solution, let's adopt it]'
But the neo-Nazis have no political power, I objected.
'Not for the moment. In '25 and '26, the Nazis had no political power.'
But wouldn't there have to be a very serious economic collapse in Germany
for these people to win power?
'I don't think it has to be a real economic disaster; I think it would be
enough if people have the impression of a serious problem.'
A third of workers in the former GDR were going to lose their jobs, she
said. They were in the same situation as in the Twenties. Many West Germans
were afraid of unemployment, too.
Rosmus accuses the media of creating the impression that foreign workers and
refugees are taking all the spare jobs and houses. The politicians were
veering to the right in order to win the growing racist vote. And the
Bavarian government was hypocritical: it was recruiting Poles for cheap farm
labour but trying to keep quiet about their presence.
I asked her whether the German constitution should be changed to make it
easier to identify bona fide refugees. Wasn't it dangerous for any society
to admit a sudden wave of outsiders?
'I see this problem, but I don't think it should be solved by giving away
the constitution. The problem could easily be managed if the time between
arrival and the asylum hearing was shortened.' (At present it can take two
or three years.)
Twelve years ago, at the age of 20, Anja became the town's golden girl when
she won a national essay prize on the subject of freedom in Europe. The
bishop, a friend of the family, brought her flowers and the mayor gave her a
silver medal. The following year she came third. This time the subject was
'My home town, 1933-39.'
Researching her second essay, she found the leaders of her community
curiously forgetful. What they said did not accord with scraps she had heard
at the family dinner table. But by now she was married to Manfred, her high
school teacher, and they had a daughter, Nadine. She had no reason to
persist.
Yet she did persist. She contacted Jewish survivors (though not Jewish
herself), so adding emotional engagement to intellectual curiosity. She
started a book, sued the municipality for access to the files, was sued in
turn, and began to unmask some pillars of the Passau establishment. Word
spread, and Michael Verhoeven, a film-maker from Munich, transferred her
story to celluloid.
Her marriage broke up. She was spat on and attacked in the street. She was
under guard in hospital for the birth of her second daughter, Salome,
following a death threat. A restaurant in Munich where she had spoken was
smashed to bits - the gang got the wrong date. Insults, of which 'Jewish
whore' was the least, were left on her telephone. Her letters were
mysteriously intercepted. She was suspended from the university for four
years.
Things have abated for Passau's avenging angel, but she still gets
threatening calls and she dare not go out alone at night.
Rosmus had explained why Passau, because of its isolation and Catholic
reverence for authority, was so vulnerable to Nazi xenophobia and remained
so ambivalent about Hitler's defeat. But I still did not understand why she
had done it. So I took her to dinner, accompanied by Salome, now 7, who fell
asleep over a pizza in her Shrove Tuesday carnival outfit. The pair were
delivered and collected by Anja's fast-driving mother.
Why were you different? I asked. You grew up here, too.
'Well, it's a good question. In my youth I wasn't different from the rest.
There's one little reason: my father (a teacher and magistrate) is a refugee
from Silesia and even though he's quite well known here and in the Bavarian
ministries, he is never regarded as one of us. He is respected, but he is a
guest. I noticed this.
'He is the most typical German employee. He strictly fulfils whatever he is
ordered to do. He is an extremely correct person. From him I learned a
strict feeling for justice.
'On the other hand, there is the whole family of my mother. They were
extremely active in the Catholic church. They are religious not out of
tradition, but because they believe in Christian ethics.' She described how
her mother and his brother (now a monsignor) as teenagers in 1943 went from
house to house with a petition against the deportation of an outspoken
priest.
'So from this side I have the feeling you have to support anybody who needs
it. Even if I am not at all religious anymore, the ethics I accept.'
You must be more than a bit obstinate, I said.
'Even as a little child I made difficulties in the school. I was a good
pupil but if there was something against justice in the class I stood up and
complained. So, since my earliest childhood I stood up, a bit like my mother
did.'
Her marriage folded because her husband came from a conservative family.
They were small farmers, she said, who had borrowed money from a Jew and
were absolved the debt by one of Hitler's edicts.
So your husband disagreed with what you were doing?
'Yes, extremely. How could you dig up these things? How could you be friends
with the Jews? When a survivor came to the house he left. He could not
accept a Jew in his house. And I could not accept his keeping silence.'
You must admit, looking at it from his point of view, that it was very
difficult.
'Yes, yes. It was for both sides. I think my point of view is the right one.
But I accept it was a problem for me, a problem for him.'
Do you have a feeling of pride in what you do?
'No, not at all.'
Perhaps you enjoy the attention?
'No. No. That is a bit strange. It is also a consequence of my father's
education.'
Don't you wonder if you are not yourself a bit crazy to spend so much of
your life and energy on this thing?
'No. Because the more I am working the more I meet survivors; and this is
the reason for me to go on. These are victims, suffering victims, people
from former times but still suffering now in our day. And the next
generation has it, too. When our parents and families are destroyed, we are
not complete.
'Really, justice, personal freedom are the centre of my identity. I love
these more than this broken marriage.'
Perhaps you are too intolerant, I said. Passau may be particularly bad, but
all over Germany there are millions of people who were Nazi sympathisers.
'Yes, sure. But I don't have problems with these ordinary people.'
Who are your targets then?
'I am interested in the real guilty person, a man who had power and who
abused this power, who is personally responsible for thousands and thousands
of murdered people. We have such a person living here in my neighbourhood.'
(She mentioned a name).
As the old Nazis die out, Anja Rosmus is coming to the end of a phase. She
wants to complete her degree in sociology, do a doctorate at Passau
University (if they will accept her) then teach and research on race
discrimination and xenophobia.
I asked her what she would do if she had to switch careers entirely. 'Be a
journalist]', she said, without hesitation.
'If I had been 20 years older I would not have done it. For the first few
years it was a terrible experience. I didn't know what was to come, but I
would not have done different even if I did. If others spoke out, I wouldn't
have to.'
It takes a particular kind of selfish courage to practise Anja Rosmus's
brand of altruism. Even if she herself has become used to the isolation and
the threats, her career has upset the lives of her parents and children.
Yet if in a democratic age citizens will not speak out for fear their own
flesh and blood will suffer, who will speak when tyranny takes over? There
are no more concentration camps in Passau to frighten dissenters like
Rosmus. But then there were none in the Twenties, either.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3338</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Dispatches: Slovenia's capital new slogan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS a busy morning on what used to be Tito street. Although they have not
changed the road signs yet, Ljubljana's main boulevard is now called
Slovenska cesta, after the Slovene people who have always used it - even
when this was officially part of Yugoslavia and not the capital of the
independent republic of Slovenia.
But for some Slovenes, loth as they would be to admit it, times were better
under Tito.
In Number 35, Slovenska cesta, for example - part of a blockish grey office
building of early Communist vintage - the Ljubljana tourist office is
scraping along. This is not high season, but the woman behind the counter is
wondering if there will be a high season worth the name this year. 'Maybe
April,' she says with a raised eyebrow. 'Maybe Americans.'
Americans - that is, those Americans who cancel visits to Europe at the
slightest whiff of trouble anywhere from Iceland to the Urals - are probably
the last tourists who will want to mingle with the locals on Slovenska
cesta.
As a member of artificially stable Communist Yugoslavia, Slovenia benefited
from being part of one of the old eastern bloc's most popular holiday
destinations. But now, if potential tourists know where Slovenia is, they
also know that it borders Croatia and for most outsiders Croatia stands for
civil war.
Never mind that the battle for Slovenia lasted only 10 days last summer, and
ended with the complete withdrawal of Yugoslav forces. Slovenia and Croatia
have been linked in newspaper headlines for too long for the country to
shake off the stigma of being a war-zone.
War-zone this is not. On the roads north-west from Ljubljana towards the
border with Austria, the picturesque lakeside town of Bled, and Slovenia's
best skiing, each bridge sprouts a cluster of heavy concrete pyramid-shaped
tank-traps. They are the only reminder that less than a year ago Slovenia
was fighting for independence.
Elsewhere, it is the trappings of independence which are more noticeable.
Start the Slovene publicity machine and it is difficult to shut it off.
Slovenia already has a slogan - 'A new state on the sunny side of the Alps'
 -a promotional emblem (a small green leaf), and more and glossier brochures
than many better-established states.
Since recognition of Slovenia in January, Ljubljana airport has reopened,
the smart national airline, Adria - which lost part of its modern fleet to
enemy attacks on the airport - has restarted direct flights, and the first
British package tour since independence has been welcomed back to the
country, a sure sign of returning international confidence.
But progress is likely to be slow. In Ljubjlana - unlike Salzburg, which it
most resembles - or Paris, there are few off-season foreign visitors on
weekend breaks. There are no takers for the shiny new Slovene souvenirs sold
on the triple-bridge which crosses the Ljubljanica river into the old town.
Behind the smart pastel facades, the cafes, galleries and boutiques which
hug the castle hill on the other side of the river are almost deserted and
the cashiers in the banks still seem surprised to have to deal with
foreigners wanting to exchange their D-Marks for new Slovene tolars.
And even when the information ministry's enthusiastically peddled message
gets through to the outside world, there are doubts about the effect it will
have. Jure Zerovec wonders whether coachloads of Americans will really want
to add tiny Ljubljana to their list of ten European capital cities to see in
as many days.
In the dimly-lit bar of the Hotel Turist - 260 beds, perhaps a dozen guests,
no tourists - the barman and a handful of businessmen, mostly Slovenes, are
watching in silence a television report about the first foreign airline,
Swissair, to fly into Ljubljana airport since before last July's war.
For a moment, Ljubljana's very inaccessibility - only two flights a week
from London and Paris instead of 20, and a blissful dearth of coach parties
 -seems enticing. On the aircraft out two days later, the Slovene in the
seat next to me suggests, tongue in cheek, a new slogan for her capital:
Salzburg without the tourists. It could be a short-lived attraction.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3339</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Books: Lively mind behind an easel
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY CURTIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OSKAR KOKOSCHKA LETTERS 1905-1976 selected by Olda Kokoschka and Alfred
Marnau Thames &amp; Hudson Pounds 24.95, 320 pages
THE AUSTRIAN-born painter Oskar Kokoschka, a selection of whose letters is
now published in English translation, lived in Britain from 1938 until 1953.
He had friends who helped him settle in a country where his work was little
known at that time and, if known, not particularly well liked. Kokoschka
grew up in Vienna, during the last era of Franz Joseph's Austro-Hungarian
Empire. His father, who had once owned a jewellery business, was reduced to
making a precarious livelihood as a commercial traveller. Yet the boy was
able to develop his creative gifts within the educational system and enrol
at the School of Arts and Crafts. After a period as a young blood in
Viennese cafe society, he moved to Prague where he met his wife Olda. His
Czech visa saved him in the UK from internment on the Isle of Man when war
broke out. Thanks to his friend Edward Beddington-Behrens, Kokoschka was
given a studio in Park Lane - then deserted because of the blitz - and he
began to earn enough from painting to rent a flat in Swiss Cottage.
Eventually he moved out of London to Polperro and then to the Highlands of
Scotland. Yet whatever the circumstances he retained, as this book shows, a
remarkable vigour of mind. Long letters written to his friends when the war
was over deplore the post-war carve-up of Europe, its ideologies and its
idols. 'Picasso' he writes 'dresses beautiful windows giving onto a future
paradise as only a window-dresser can.' By contrast Kokoschka turned to
Hades for a subject and worked on a vast Rubensian triptych embracing
Persephone, Prometheus and the Apocalypse, designed for the ceiling of a
house in Exhibition Road, Kensington. The owner, Count Antoine Seilern,
bequeathed this stupendous work to the Courtauld Institute, where it is
currently on show in Somerset House.
In 1953 Kokoschka and Olda became residents in Villeneuve, Switzerland, and
in 1980 aged 93 he died there. In his vigorous old age Kokoschka remained
restlessly eager for new experience. He travelled widely in Europe and made
regular visits to Salzburg where he designed sets for Furtwangler's Magic
Flute and presided over his own Summer School in painting.
'Don't weaken even by half] Life is so unfathomable that we have to survive
the test with patience, like Job.' he wrote to the conductor who was now
terminally ill. Kokoschka recalled the time when, as a dragoon in the
Imperial Austrian Army on the battlefield of Galicia in 1915, he had his
lung pierced by a bayonet. 'Only my dying horse, kicking me in its death
throes from time to time, woke me from a lethargy that could have ended in
my death.'
A celebratory sense of resurrection, which may be traced back to this
Dosteovsky-like episode, is the distinguishing feature of Kokoschka's
vibrantly alive paintings. There is an urgency in all his work that was
mirrored in his life. It is as marked in his panoramic cityscapes as it is
in his portraits of world statesmen or of society women like Nancy Cunard or
his friend Kathleen, Countess of Drogheda. These portraits, of which he did
a great many, show the painter's depth of insight into the sitter's nature.
Kokoschka's early paintings revealed a debt to Van Gogh while his mature
work was frequently compared with El Greco. In the reference books he is
always classified as an Expressionist. He became irritated by these
labellings and claimed that, if it was to be pinned down in this way, his
work enshrined the spirit of Baroque, its dramatic sense, its continuity
with the spirit of mediaeval Europe.
The early letters were written at a turbulent time of cultural life in
Vienna when many young artists were kicking against the by now restrictive
Secession. This mood echoes through letters to men who were powerful in
forming taste and values during the pre-Anschluss period - the architect
Adolf Loos, the editors Karl Kraus and Herwarth Walden. But Kokoschka was
more interested then in women than in art-politics. There are many
passionate love-letters, highly possessive in tone, to Alma Mahler, widow of
the composer, who turned him down for the architect Walter Gropius.
In the absence of a full biography the book is welcome for the intimate
picture it gives of Kokoschka's ceaseless questing and questioning; his
lifelong interest in, for example, a universal thinker like Comenius. The
translation from the often idiomatic German by Mary Whittall is good; the
editing rather minimal, involving the reader in a lot of tiresome
back-tracking to find out who everyone is. There is surprisingly little
about individual paintings. When he wrote a letter, as he frequently did,
Kokoschka looked beyond the easel to the world.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3340</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Books: High on concept, low on meaning
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARK ARCHER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE RE-ENCHANTMENT OF ART by Suzi Gablik Thames &amp; Hudson Pounds 12.95, 191
pages
SERIOUS ART by John Passmore Duckworth Pounds 29.95, 301 pages
SUZI Gablik's new book is a passionate plea for making modern art relevant
to the way we live. The appeal is timely, since most modern art this
century, in its high-minded and high-handed way, has done its best to
alienate its audience. An example is the sculptor Richard Serra, who in 1981
erected his monumental steel structure Tilted Arc in the middle of downtown
Manhattan. Suddenly confronted by a 120ft long, 12ft high, 73 ton leaning
curve of welded steel, local workers objected. After three days of public
hearings and a 1300-signature petition, Tilted Arc was removed. 'What the
Tilted Arc controversy forces us to consider,' Gablik says, 'is whether art
that is based on notions of pure freedom and radical autonomy - without
regard for the relations we have to other people, the community, or any
other consideration except the pursuit of art - can contribute to a sense of
the common good.'
Gablik endorses the view that much modern art mirrors the meaninglessness of
society, its addictive consumption and its lack of any 'great integrating
vision'. Drawing on feminist theory, environmentalism and 'new age'
rethinking about the myths and symbols underpinning our spiritual life, she
proposes a new agenda for art with an updated version of Vasari's Lives to
match. There is Fern Shaffer, for instance, who, like an ancient shaman,
performs solstice rituals to re-acquaint his audience with the rhythms of
the universe; the Scottish artist Andy Goldsworthy, who makes sculptures
with what he finds - leaves, flowers, snow - which melt or blow away within
a day (a success in Japan, where he says it is in the nature of the Japanese
not to question the value of something which is not going to last);
Dominique Mazeud, whose art consists of clearing debris from the Rio Grande
River; and Beth Sartz, whose sound-and-vision work, Gablik says, had the
effect of making many people 'even lay down in front of the paintings to
receive healing'.
You are bound not to agree with all that Gablik says. Her bias against
industrialisation can be seen as Luddite, even inhuman. Her language (cosmic
energy flows, soul-consciousness) can seem a mystery. Her enthusiasm for
conceptual art, like her criticism of modernism, is perhaps too obviously
written from within the American art tradition. Surely representational art,
a still-life by Chardin or a landscape by Cezanne, can seem as ecologically
sound and as wedded to the values of trust and compassion, as her other
examples?
Herein lies the crux, for Gablik is woefully thin on how a work of art
communicates its meaning. A Henry Moore sculpture can move many people
without their claiming to understand it; many of the works Gablik admires
makes sense only when they are accompanied by a full-length manifesto. Is
that art or agitprop? Gablik makes a good case for re-appreciating art as
artisanship (Morris and Ruskin would approve), but where does 'useful' art
end, in redesigning New York City's dustcarts or performing a counselling
service for the Sanitation Department's employees?
Though combining sense with nonsense, Gablik goes a long way to revitalising
the voice of art within the conversation of mankind. This is more than can
be said of high priests of modernism such as Andy Warhol, who preached only
fashionable ennui, or indeed of John Passmore, Professor of the History of
Ideas at Canberra University. Like an over-educated schoolboy, Passmore
spends 292 pages poking fun at high-falutin' notions of serious art. Clive
James, an equally sceptical but far funnier antipodean, would have kicked
the subject into touch in five minutes. Passmore, though, is that other
familiar phenomenon, a Great Australian Windbag and, to judge from this
laboured piece of waggery, a pretty self-conceited one at that.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3341</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Books: A poet of contradictions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHLOE CHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JAMES THOMSON 1700-1748: A LIFE by James Sambrook Clarendon Press, Oxford
Pounds 40, 332 pages
JAMES THOMSON earned immense fame in the 18th century as a result of his
poem The Seasons, a work full of landscape description and wide-ranging
speculation about the natural sciences, topography, and human history; he is
now relatively neglected. The success of The Seasons stemmed to a large
degree from its role in contributing towards the fashion for sensibility -
the cultivation of reflective, tranquil sentiment rather than unruly
passion. This 'sentimental' style has often provoked great irritation;
Horace Walpole wittily explains his preference for more full-blooded poetry
by the malicious analogy: 'I had rather be put into the roundhouse for a
wrong-headed quarrel, than sup quietly at eight o'clock with my
grandmother.'
In the light of Thomson's literary reputation, James Sambrook's account of
his life and character makes amusing reading. Sambrook emphasises the
contrast between the poet's literary idealisations of women and his ribaldry
in conversations with men. When the poet apparently falls in love for the
first time, in his forties, the biography neatly juxtaposes his letters and
poems to the adored 'Amanda', expressing 'the utmost Ardor, the most perfect
Esteem, and inexpressible Tenderness', with a contemporary description of a
mild dispute between them: 'she pulled off his wig and threw it on the
ground, and he threw a glass of punch at her.'
Sambrook also cites accounts of Thomson's excesses in food and drink, his
'negligence over money', and above all his slothfulness; his poem The Castle
of Indolence was written in a spirit of ironic self-reproach. Many anecdotes
stress his languorous habits: he was once reportedly 'seen lounging round
Lord Burlington's garden, with his hands in his waistcoat pockets, biting
off the sunny sides of the peaches'. An acquaintance, finding him still in
bed at two in the afternoon, asked the reason why: 'Mon', replied he, 'I had
no motive to rise.' The side of Thomson which the biography portrays most
fully is his role as a participant in London literary life: in 1725 the
poet, in his mid-twenties, left his native Scotland for the opportunities
and diversions of the capital. For a while, he took a job as a tutor: 'a low
task you know not so suitable to my temper'. By cultivating rich and
influential patrons, he managed to go on the Grand Tour as travelling
companion to a young aristocrat, and later gained two useful sinecures. In
noting Thomson's alliances with various Whig patrons, Sambrook offers an
account of the poet's role as a public man, actively involved in political
machination. Oddly, however, the examination of political themes in
Thomson's poetry is usually restricted either to the poet's allusions to the
current situation, or to his patriotic vision of Britain as a land of
liberty and industry. (Thomson's masque Alfred, written in collaboration
with his fellow-Scotsman David Mallet, contains the song 'Rule Britannia'.)
The biography offers none of the more ambitious analysis of Thomson's view
of British society, and of the role of the wise and virtuous statesman,
which is found in the writings of critics such as John Barrell.
Nonetheless, this study of Thomson is a work of distinguished scholarship,
produced in the face of a lack of detailed information about the the poet's
life. Its main drawback is a tendency towards understatement; a more
ebullient biographer is needed in order to convince a wider readership of
the interest of Thomson's poetry.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3342</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Books: China trapped in a maze of tyranny - Derek Davies on
the plight of the Chinese citizen
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEREK DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE TYRANNY OF HISTORY: THE ROOTS OF CHINA'S CRISIS by W. J. F Jenner Allen
Lane The Penguin Press Pounds 18.99, 248 pages
WILD SWANS: THREE DAUGHTERS OF CHINA by Jung Chang HarperCollins Pounds
17.50, 524 pages
ONE OF the most heart-rending of the television images broadcast from China
during the post-Tienanmen crack-down of 1989 was that of a student being
bussed away from an abortive demonstration in Shanghai. Leaning from the bus
window and speaking to camera in English he mourned: 'China is a hopeless
country.'
A great Chinese weight of tyranny, of pressures from history, society and
culture, and of repeatedly shattered hopes and illusions, squeezed out this
unpatriotic verdict on his fatherland. It is one largely shared by the two
authors of these books: one a 'foreign devil' professor of Chinese at
Australia's National University at Canberra, the other a Chinese child of
Mao Zedong's blood-stained revolution, now in exile in Britain.
Jenner's book is an admirable attempt to map the Chinese psyche in a series
of chapters discussing the various burdens that a Chinese acquires at birth
under whose weight he must grunt and sweat through his or her weary life,
and the man-made partitions which shut off horizons.
The burdens of the past are heavy, symbolised by the emperor figure, and all
the authoritarianism and centralism that system of government entails. The
occasional imperial progress to parts of the kingdom failed to allow the
real world to penetrate the maze of courtyards, gateways, silk curtains,
kowtows, corrupt mandarins and conspiring eunuchs which separated the man in
the fields from the dragon throne.
It was a pattern of rule to which China's last-but-one emperor, Mao himself,
reverted. He spent his last years immured in a suite of rooms in the
Forbidden City, mostly in bed reading the classics and taking food only from
a favoured maid servant. Jenner argues that Deng Xiaoping has become the
latest in the line, once boasting that he works only a quarter of an hour
per day.
The family; the neighbourhood committee; the community; the legal and
security systems; the bureaucracy; the Party; the Emperor: the concentric
circles ring every Chinese citizen and never widen. The social limits have
their physical equivalents: the interlocking rooms and courtyards of the
Chinese home; the surrounding walls repeated in macrocosm in the
fortifications around towns and cities and around northern China itself:
50,000 kilometres of wall to keep the barbarians out and the Chinese in.
Even in death, an official lay nested within six or eight coffins, boxes
within boxes.
Jenner's weakest chapter seeks to close off the optimists' hopes for ways
out of the past. The 'plastic' version of neo-Confucianism he rightly
characterises as a self-rationalisation for 'elected dictatorships' like
Singapore, but he neglects to discuss the very real advantages of
non-confrontational consensus politics compared with the diverse
wastefulness of Western democracies. Similarly, he discounts East Asia's
genius for capitalistic growth and its burgeoning in South China. Economic
success he largely ascribes to inherited colonial experiences (but what of
Thailand?). Neither does he give democracy much chance: 'Authoritarian
values . . . cannot accommodate the existence of rival (views). The state is
absolutist.'
Such arguments ignore the fact that economic successes in East Asia's
'Confucian' states have created middle classes (and their
university-educated offspring) that are effectively demanding an
ever-greater say in the government. They ignore the openings to the outside
world inherent in growth (trade, foreign investment, technology transfers
and so on). Jenner should attend a few opposition party election meetings in
Taiwan and marvel how brightly the lamps of democracy, anti-corruption and
human rights burn after a century of Japanese occupation and Kuomintang
oppression. The societies which are emerging have much in common with modern
Western societies (something Singapore's neo-Confucian apologists find
unacceptable).
Jenner does not write like an academic - a great compliment in my book.
Unclogged by footnotes, the chapter-essays swing along with the convincing
verve of a good leader-writer, with an eye for the telling phrase. 'This
book deals briefly with vast issues too urgent to be left till they can be
viewed with the wisdom of hindsight', he opens, while denying any claims to
originality.
Jenner stretches a polemical canvas on a socio-political framework, but it
is Jung Chang who paints the darkly epic picture. Her book is on a Victorian
scale covering the gamut of Chinese society, vast areas of China itself and
spanning three generations: her grandmother, mother and herself and spanning
the 20th century. Her grandmother, complete with bound feet, becomes the
concubine of a pre-revolutionary warlord (the story of women in China plumbs
fresh depths of oppression and humiliation). Her mother flees to Manchuria,
suffering Japanese occupation and becoming an anti-Kuomintang agent for the
Communist armies, marrying a prim, idealistic guerrilla fighter. Their
patriotism is rewarded with good jobs once Mao's forces triumph.
Too soon, however, the dark, destructive forces of Mao and palace politics
turn revolutionary hope into cynicism. The family survives the Korean War;
the idiocies of the Great Leap Forward; the bitter years of famine; the
neurosis of the Cultural Revolution; the Maoist Purges: but all bring
appalling suffering to the patriotic pair and their children. Through long
separations, terms in jail, exiles in the countryside, denunciation as class
enemies and KMT agents, ill health, random violence and bitter betrayals,
the early zeal and idealism are gradually leached out. Finally, just before
his death and still under false suspicion, the father admits; 'If I die like
this, don't believe in the Communist Party any more.'
Jung Chang herself has her first contacts with foreigners and with English
literature. Finally she glimpses Mao's feet of clay and asks herself yet
again: 'If this is paradise, what then is hell?'
The tragic story of the three true daughters of China is told with what
rings out as absolute honesty, with that mixture of intelligence and naivety
which is truly Chinese. The book is a huge tour de force, the inside story
of what was really going on while the outside world peered fitfully in, only
guessing at the damage the imbecilic Mao was causing his country.
Jung Chang escapes to England, rejoices in Deng Xiaoping's reforms, and is
cast down by Tienanmen, although she claims that China has become altogether
a different place since she left in 1978 and that the once all-pervasive
fear has diminished. But the happy escape to the west of Jung Chang and her
three brothers lights no way out of the maze for the rest of the one billion
Chinese.
Black though the prospects may seem from both these admirable books, China's
neighbours do offer glimpses of light at the end of a long, dark tunnel. In
the last month, Deng Xiaoping has performed the latest metamorphosis in his
survivalist career, denouncing the inflexibility of the very hard-liners he
promoted to the highest office after Tienanmen, and giving his personal
blessing to the almost unrestrained economic warlordism which is
transforming whole tracts of South China. There is no reason to believe
that, if 'bourgeois capitalism' is allowed to blossom, it should not bring
to China the material and social benefits it is bringing to other, once
poverty-stricken, countries of the region.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3343</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Books: When anti-semitism ruled in Italy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM WEAVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BENEVOLENCE AND BETRAYAL: FIVE ITALIAN JEWISH FAMILIES UNDER FASCISM by
Alexander Stille Jonathan Cape Pounds 20, 365 pages
THOUGH THE Jewish population of Italy before the Second World War was
numerically small (approximately 47,000 in a country of 45 million), it was
disproportionately important in Italian life, not only - as might have been
expected - in commercial life, but also in the worlds of culture and
politics. There were Jewish members of Parliament, Jewish mayors, Jewish
cabinet members; there had even been a Jewish prime minister. There were
Jewish musicians, artists, scientists, and a whole array of brilliant
writers, from Italo Svevo in the early years of the century to the young
Alberto Moravia.
Since ancient Roman times the Italian peninsula had served as a place of
refuge for Jews, though there were alternating periods of repression and
tolerance, until finally - with the unification of the country in 1870 - the
last traditional restrictions were abolished, the gates of the last ghettos
were torn down, and a period of what promised unlimited opportunity for
assimilation began. The coming of Fascism in 1922 seemed, at first, to
effect no changes in the situation. Indeed, much of the solid, conservative
Jewish bourgeoisie joined the Fascist Party, and was welcomed into it. Like
many Italians, the Jewish leaders applauded what looked like a new national
stability, and if this came at the price of a certain amount of bombast and
regimentation, it was worth it, as the nation gained self-respect and
convincingly assumed the guise of a world-power.
Even in those early years, of course, there were Italians, including a
number of Jews, who distrusted Mussolini's hollow rhetoric, who suffered at
the suppression of freedoms, and were aghast at the real lawlessness - as
the murder of the Socialist parliamentarian Giacomo Matteotti made clear -
concealed behind Fascism's jerry-built facade. After Hitler's rise to power,
Mussolini at first distanced himself from his German epigone, especially
from his anti-semitism. But a few years later, when political expediency
demanded it, Mussolini fell in line and promulgated the 'racial laws' of
1938. For many Jewish anti-fascists, this was a signal, and a number of them
began leaving the country.
Those who could not leave soon adapted to the anti-Jewish restrictions,
which in the beginning were generally applied without great vigour. But then
came the Allied invasion, the collapse of the Italian government, the German
occupation of the country (except for the South, now in Allied hands); and
at a certain point, the round-ups, the mass murders began.
Jews and many Italian non-Jews lived in a world of hunger and delation.
Partisan resistance grew stronger, as die-hard Fascists regrouped around the
resuscitated Mussolini; soon Northern Italy was engaged in what amounted to
a sanguinary civil war. This cruel period of Italy's history is not well
known outside the country, and even Italians prefer not to think about it.
It has served novelists - like Elsa Morante, for her epic novel History, and
Giorgio Bassani, for his poetic, but harrowing stories of Ferrara - more
than it has served historians.
Now the young American writer Alexander Stille has revisited that time and
its mortal problems with the investigative eye of a skilled reporter, but
also with the compassion and sense of the individual more characteristic of
the writer of narrative. On the most immediate level, Stille tells stories:
the lives of five Jewish families, some of whom survived, some of whom
succumbed. All are Jewish, but some are more Jewish than others; and all are
Jewish in different ways.
To begin with, the privileged life of the rich Ovazza family of Turin is in
dramatic contrast with the close-to-the-bone existence of the poor
inhabitants of Rome's ghetto, while the glamorous Genoese playboy-aviator
Massimo Teglio, not a very observant Jew, as the Nazi and Fascist
anti-semitic activity worsened found himself elbow to elbow first with the
saintly rabbi Riccardo Pacifici, then with a young priest - another unlikely
Scarlet Pimpernel - Don Francesco Repetto, involved in rescuing Jews and
smuggling them into Switzerland.
Stille tells these and other stories almost without editorialising. The
events - and, where possible, the survivors - speak for themselves. And the
result is a vivid, eloquent page of history: not just Jewish, not just
Italian, but human. The individuals emerge, often heroically; but the
context is also clearly presented. No mean task, for boundaries are blurred:
there were good Fascists, there were bad Jews, some Germans were more
understanding than others.
Though half a century has passed since the mass-deportations from Italy, the
subject is still sadly timely, as racism and anti-semitism seem resurgent. A
new generation has to learn the lessons that cost its parents and
grandparents so much. Stille's admirable study can provide a vital - and
irresistibly readable - text.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3344</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Books: Trouble with the system
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID SPANIER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER COMMUNISM: FROM THE ATLANTIC TO THE URALS by Jacques Lesorne and
Bernard Lecomte Harwood Academic Publishers Pounds 14,271 pages
FOR A NEW RUSSIA by Anatoly Sobchak HarperCollins Pounds 16, 191 pages
IN THE old Soviet Union there used to be a joke: 'The past is
unpredictable'. Mikhail Gorbachev then declared it was time to fill in the
blank spots of history. In theory, this should have opened the way to
meaningful prediction of the future. So it is ironic, note the authors of
After Communism, that, despite this filling in of the past, today the future
seems all but impossible to predict.
Still, they chance their arm in this book, as journalists should. Here they
focus on the uncertainties in the former Soviet Union, the population
explosion around the southern Mediterranean, and the prospects for Germany.
Predictions are always liable be to be turned on their heads. Some are a bit
obvious. 'The conservatives are stunned for the moment, but have not
disappeared from the political scene. They may eventually become part of an
authoritarian, xenophobic Slavic movement for the resurgence of an all
powerful Russia.' Other predictions are too elliptical to grasp. 'One fine
day the world wakes up to find a nationalistic Russia transformed into a
dictatorship with a binding grip on other Slavic lands and Kazakhstan. Is
this the resurgence of Communism? Not at all. Of a form of Czarism? Most
certainly.'
This sort of thing is both stimulating and confusing. Full of many such
revealing judgments, the book should be accompanied by a bottle of good
claret, bottled a year or two before the Soviet coup, so as to give an
historic balance. One of the people who stood against the coup, shoulder to
shoulder with Boris Yeltsin, was Anatoly Sobchak. The Mayor of St.
Petersburg now presents his own story in For A New Russia.
First of all, Mr Sobchack writes (though his translator is not given a
credit) very well indeed, and a lot better than Yeltsin or Gorbachev. This
is indeed a major factor in lending credence to his view of things. He
remarks that people in civilised contries as a rule have little interest in
politics: will they spend days and nights in front of their TV sets watching
live reports of legislative debates? Of course not, says Sobchak - there are
things which are much more interesting to this blessed citizen, such as
business, culture or sport. It is good to hear that sort of thing from a
Russian (or any) politician.
In fact his whole account of the last three years is refreshing because it
is written from a personal point of view which, in the accuracy of its
observations and its humour, carries the ring of conviction rather than
self-justification. It is also generous. The courts were not manned by
dishonest or mercenary people, Sobchak claims. The majority of their
personnel were honest and decent people. 'But the system as a whole, the
entire mechanism of law enforcement agencies . . . has led to a perversion
of the law and erosion of human rights for all - the accused, the
investigators, and the judges themselves.'
Making the point about the degradation of society another way, he quotes a
Russian joke about the plumber called to fix a leak. 'Thank you very much
for coming . . . There's a real deluge in the kitchen every night.' "I see,'
responds the plumber, 'the system has to be changed.' 'Will it cost much?'
asks the anxious tenant. 'Who said anything about money? I said the whole
system has to be changed'. Sobchak is not harsh on Gorbachev and certainly
does not condemn him either as a traitorous General-Secretary or a radical
dictator. He believes anyone would have to be either a zealot or a madman to
retain faith in communist ideals which, all over the world, have led to such
inhuman regimes. He judges the former leader as a statesman to whom both
politics and ideology are simply means.
'When you start seeing only what's wrong,' a theatre producer told him,
'take a pill and go to bed.' Sobchak remains very much awake. He believes in
a Russia populated by prosperous, property-owning democrats who choose to
belong to a confederation of self-governing republics. The only question is
how to get there. His account of A New Russia suggests that if he were
running for office here in Britain Mr Sobchak would be elected by a
landslide. Fortunate the country that can produce such men in such hard
times.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3345</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Books: A great philosopher bares his soul - A. C. Grayling
admires the intelligence, generosity and wit of Bertrand Russell
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By A. C. GRAYLING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SELECTED LETTERS OF BERTRAND RUSSELL: VOL. 1, 1884-1914 edited by
Nicholas Griffin Allen Lane The Penguin Press Pounds 25, 640 pages
IT IS characteristic of Bertrand Russell that when in 1895 he won his Prize
Fellowship at Trinity College, Cambridge, he donated his stipend to the
newly-founded London School of Economics. His instinctive generosity did not
only express itself in financial terms; to almost everyone he knew he was
generous in many intellectual and emotional ways. His letters testify
luminously to this trait, as they testify also to his scintillating
intelligence and delightful wit. All these facets of Russell are present to
us in these letters, each of them serving as a record, preserved in
typically sharp, lucid prose, of the freshly-minted responses of a brilliant
yet extraordinarily humane mind.
Nicholas Griffin tells us that there are nearly 50,000 letters in the
Russell archive. For this volume, the first of two, he has chosen 240, all
but one previously unpublished. They cover Russell's first four decades,
taking us to the event which impelled him into his controversial public
career: the outbreak of the First World War. The projected second volume,
still in preparation, covers the remaining six decades of Russell's life,
throughout which he was prominent on the international stage as social
reformer, peace campaigner and philosophical gadfly stinging the body
politic.
Griffin's achievement in this first volume is a splendid augury for its
successor. He has in effect given us a new biography of Russell, skilfully
weaving the letters into an explanatory narrative of notes and commentary.
It is notable that most of Russell's letters are to women, indeed to the
small group of women who were most important to him in this period: his
grandmother, who brought him up; Alys Pearsall Smith, his first wife; and
Lady Ottoline Morrell, with whom Russell had a love-affair which liberated
him from the sexual and social poverties of his earlier life.
To these women Russell wrote intimately of his feelings, hopes, work,
friends and conversations. He wrote almost daily, and at length, in
characteristically fluent style, so that the letters constitute a remarkable
diary, comparable in its autobiographical and literary value to Pepys or to
Rousseau's memoirs, and even more gripping than the epistolary fictions of
Richardson because they convey the genuine personal testimony of a great and
passionate mind. Only to these women did Russell write so fully; to male
friends his letters give less of his inward mind and therefore more that is
inessential.
The volume begins with Russell's boyhood letters to his grandmother, widow
of the reforming Prime Minister Lord John Russell. She brought up the
orphaned Russell at Pembroke Lodge in Richmond Park in an atmosphere of
priggish austerity. Hunger for affection remained, Russell later said, one
of the permanent compulsions of his life. Tutors and nannies fostered his
precocious talents, and at 19 he went up at Cambridge to read mathematics
and then philosophy, becoming a Prize Fellow of Trinity at the age of 23.
While still an undergraduate Russell fell in love with a Quaker five years
his senior, Alys Pearsall Smith. Soon after graduating, and against his
family's determined opposition, they married, so beginning a period of
happiness in which Russell produced his greatest work in logic and
philosophy. This was not at Alys's expense; the letters show that Russell
was a 'new man' a century before the expression was invented, for he and
Alys devised a 'complicated mutual-adjustment system' of marriage which
reflected their opposition to traditional views about women's roles. Both
were ardent feminists, and even as Russell was writing (with AN Whitehead)
his great three-volume treatise on the logical foundations of mathematics,
the Principia Mathematica, he stood several times for Parliament as a
woman's suffrage candidate. Later, with Ottoline Morrell, he experienced
again the fruitful ecstasy of love which, paradoxical as it seems, inspired
some of his best technical work.
Russell never believed in academic exclusiveness, and to any interested
correspondent he enjoyed giving lucently pithy accounts of his work. As a
result the volume describes Russell's philosophical progress from student to
internationally famous savant in a series of brilliant vignettes drawn by
Russell himself. But even in these letters the discussion ranges widely,
touching with equal ease on history or politics, music or personal matters.
Concerning these last, Russell was an indefatigable correspondent, entirely
unpretentious and full of affection.
The Russell one meets in these pages is enormously likeable and admirable.
Griffin's choice of letters portrays something very different from a Mr
Apollinax ravishing maidens. It has become fashionable, even among
philosophers, to undervalue Russell's contributions; but both in technical
philosophy, where his influence so pervades that citation of his works is no
longer necessary, and in the social revolution which freed 20th-century
minds from Victorian fetters, Russell is a central figure. He merits
celebration, and this volume marvellously demonstrates why.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3346</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Books: A dubious victory and kinky sex - Fiction
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN AMIDON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ARCADIA by Jim Crace Jonathan Cape Pounds 14.99, 352 pages
VOX by Nicholson Baker Granta Books Pounds 7.99, 169 pages
REAL LIFE by DJ Taylor Chatto &amp; Windus Pounds 14.99, 265 pages
KORZENIOWSKI by James Lansbury Serpent's Tail Pounds 7.99, 176 pages
JIM CRACE'S first two novels, Continents and The Gift of Stones, were
triumphant leaps of literary imagination, utterly compelling fables set in
other worlds, other times. Though his third novel displays much of the skill
of his previous work, this time the magic is strangely lacking. Arcadia
tells the story of Victor, an 80-year-old millionaire who, haunted by
memories of his impoverished youth, decides to clear out his unnamed city's
market district in order to build a modern shopping mall as a monument to
his long-dead mother. In this, he is opposed by Rook, an embittered former
employee who becomes an agitator on behalf of the city's threatened
marketeers. Their conflict climaxes in a New Year's Eve conflagration that
leaves one dead and the other grasping a dubious victory.
Although it starts strongly, Arcadia soon organises itself along such
conventional lines - corrupt city versus idealised country, vain wealth
versus humble industry - that it eventually loses its power. Crace is too
intent on myth-making here, forgetting that a fable must grow out of a story
rather than be imposed upon it. His diffuse, ornate style tends to obscure
his drama and flatten out his characters. The section dealing with Victor's
childhood, spent publicly sucking at his beggar mother's breast until the
age of six, is original and affecting, though the elderly Victor is nothing
more than a papery old cipher, wandering his penthouse at night, dreaming
rather dubiously of innocence. Likewise with Rook, who starts out as an
intriguing social climber but ends up a problematic avatar. And the
calamitous ending seems more a product of an authorial scheme than any
internal combustion.
Nicholson Baker's much-hyped Vox involves a single conversation on an adult
chat line between a couple who end up sharing their innermost fantasies and
secrets in a pas de deux of mutual arousal. Jim is fascinated by the
mechanics of female masturbation, while Abby has fantasies about being
serviced by a squad of house painters. Linked only by satellite, they
verbally probe their way toward mutual climax.
Baker has hit upon a very contemporary notion - the complicity of sex and
telecommunications - and brings to bear upon it his much-celebrated power of
minute observation. But where this style served him well in his earlier work
exami ning a lunch break or baby care, it seems distinctly undernourished
tackling the big theme of sexual imagination. The only thing we ever know
about Jim and Abby are the few fantasies they choose to share. This might
have worked as a short story or even the first chapter of a novel, but as it
is Vox is like overhearing a conversation between strangers one has no hope
of encountering again. Despite moments of prurient interest, it remains a
slight literary exercise.
Kinky sex is also a theme in DJ Taylor's Real Life, the story of Martin
Benson, a young pornographer who retreats from Soho to Norwich after a
decade spent writing such films as 'Schoolgirl Lust'. Unfortunately, real
life in the provinces proves just as trying as make-believe in Soho, with
dumpy girlfriend Suzy and dubious mate Fat Eric making demands our hero just
cannot meet. To complicate matters further, Martin's prurient past comes
back to haunt him in the form of plain brown envelopes filled with some very
disturbing photos that start dropping through his letter box.
Taylor's novel is engaging and believable, though not quite as funny and
racy as you might expect, given the subject matter. He has a strong sense of
character and builds his story's momentum nicely, though attempts at Martin
Amis-like humour are undercut by stiffly ornate prose and a too-conventional
imagination. A good read, but Taylor will do better when he tackles a
subject more conducive to his temperament.
Korzeniowski is a literary detective novel which examines the events
surrounding the composition of Joseph Conrad's short story The Secret
Sharer. First-time novelist James Lansbury blends supposedly eyewitness
accounts and literary criticism to see if in 1884 Conrad, then a young
captain by the name of Korzeniowski, actually did, like the story's
narrator, spirit away a fugitive seaman wanted for murder. Although
individual parts of the book are well done, especially a Freudian essay and
the testimony of an old sea dog who claims Conrad and his sharer were
homosexual lovers, Lansbury fails to shape his material into a compelling
narrative. Devoted fans of Conrad and practitioners of textual analysis may
find much of interest here, though the general reader will be rather less
satisfied.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3347</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Despatches: Kurds struggle to rebuild - Harriet Martin
examines some conflicting moralities in the efforts made to revive an Iraqi
village destroyed by Saddam Hussein
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HARRIET MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SET against the snow, the line of red, yellow and orange trucks looks more
like a stranded circus than a convoy of heavy industrial machinery. For over
a month, these diggers, generators and graders have been sitting in Choman,
an Iraqi village on the border with Iran, waiting to be sold to Iran.
The Iranians want to buy them, the Kurdish people need the money, but the
Kurds living in Choman will not let them go.
The equipment comes from Iraq's Dollars 3bn Bekhma hydro-electric dam
project. Over the past year, the half-finished site has been triumphantly
dismantled by the Kurdish people. Fifty miles north of Arbil in northern
Iraq, it was central to Saddam Hussein's strategy to control the Kurds.
In fact, the valley below the dam was never flooded. Now, the equipment has
been looted and the luxury lake - side resort gutted: the project is
defunct. Raising funds by selling off equipment brought in to destroy them
is a coup de grace for the Kurds, but it is one that is proving increasingly
controversial.
Recently, these sales have been a vital source of income and food. But
efforts by Kurdish leaders to prevent the loss of construction equipment
across the border have now brought threats from Iran of a food blockade.
None the less Choman, which was one of the 4,000 Kurdish villages destroyed
by Saddam, is being rebuilt. It is without electricity, and it wants one of
the generators on the convoy to remain behind.
The original Bekhma plan was to build a hydro-electric dam across the Great
Zab river. When Saddam came to power in 1979, he transformed this project
into a much more ambitious scheme.
His intention was to disperse one of the most politically organised and
articulate sections of Kurdish society, the Barzani people. Massoud Barzani,
leader of one of the two main parties in Kurdistan, the KDP, is at the
forefront of Kurdish nationalism.
The expanded Bekhma scheme was to have flooded the heavily-cultivated Barzan
valley, destroying the livelihood of the Barzani people. In preparation for
this, in the mid - 1980s, the Iraqi army destroyed many villages and the
Barzani people fled into exile in Iran.
The scheme also had the advantage of dividing Iraqi Kurdistan geographically
in two - with an immense artificial lake - making military control of the
region easier.
On the slopes of the Barzan valley, the Iraqis were building a luxury
lake-side resort with boating marina, shopping complex, hotel, gym,
hospital, mosque and hundreds of holiday chalets. Here, rich Arab Iraqis
were to come and spend their leisure time. It was only half-complete when
Iraq invaded Kuwait in August 1990, at which point the 4,000 Turkish and
Yugoslav workers fled and work on the dam ceased.
Bitterness at this violation of the beautiful valley contributed to the
site's destruction. The bungalows now shelter hundreds of Barzani families
which, after months or even years of exile, have returned to rebuild the
homes Saddam destroyed.
When Kawa's village was razed seven years ago, he and his family - wife,
three children, his mother, two sisters and a brother - walked more than 100
miles across the border into Iran, where they lived in a refugee camp.
They returned in November. Their temporary home at Bekhma, which once had
running water, electricity, air - conditioning and television, is cold,
heated by just one small paraffin burner. However rudimentary it is, this
accommodation now offersa solution to one of Iraqi Kurdistan's most pressing
problems: the homelessness of displaced people.
The equipment, on the other hand, is creating problems. Local Kurdish people
and the Front (an alliance of eight reformist groups led by the PUK and the
KDP, the two dominant political parties) are having to face some difficult
moral issues over its sale.
The convoy sits in Choman, waiting for decisions to be made. 'It's been like
this for weeks now,' says a French doctor who is working in the area. 'Local
people have threatened to set light to the convoy if attempts are made to
move it.'
Efforts are being made to defuse the situation. Local Kurdish engineers are
trying to bring in a smaller generator; even the intended Iranian buyer has
been to Choman to try to sort out the dispute. Some Kurds feel that the
Iraqi equipment which was brought in to destroy their towns and villages
should now be used to rebuild them. 'I don't understand why we are selling
it,' said one aid worker, 'when it is exactly what we need for the
reconstruction programme.'
In contrast to the well - publicised short-term UN programme intended to
take people through the cold winter, Kurdish development organisations have
been rebuilding houses, hospitals and schools. In Arbil, there are workshops
turning out 150 school desks a day. Everywhere, you see people on the roofs
of houses using heavy rollers to flatten the recently-laid mud roofs.
Underlying all this activity, though, is an uncertain future. In a few
months, the Kurdish people could once more be exposed to the brutality of
Saddam. The six-month extension of the Memorandum of Understanding with
Baghdad has committed the allies to providing air cover until the end of
June. The UN, on the other hand, is intent on pulling out at the end of
April. Then the weather will be getting warmer, and thousands of Kurds are
expected to return from exile in Iran. It is reluctant to be drawn into this
new phase of reconstruction, which would require a level of commitment to
the Kurds that would go far beyond helping them survive a single winter.
Once the Kurdish people are left without allied protection, it is important
that the Iraqi government equipment should be seen to have been 'looted'
rather than semi - appropriated by the Front, which could then be held
responsible for its disappearance. Whether it is or not, no one seems to
know.
However, ridding Kurdistan of equipment brought in to destroy it is central
to the sales. Furthermore, the remaining equipment increases the ease with
which Saddam could one day resume his onslaught on the Kurdish people.
In Choman, a few men, some with guns flung over their shoulders, are hanging
around the vehicles. Nothing seems to be happening.
Leaning against one of the trucks, a young man with eyes like jewels smiles
at me. I ask him what the problem is with the convoy. Passionately, he
explains: 'There are no arguments between Kurds, it is Saddam who has turned
us against one another. We are not really divided. One day you will come
back and this place will be beautiful. The hills will be made of gold; the
trees will have golden leaves.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3348</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Gardening: Prepare to do some serious weeding and feeding -
Spring is in the air and Arthur Hellyer is not ready to let the grass grow
under his feet. He is busy getting his lawn into shape
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN MY part of West Sussex, which has not been notably short of water, grass
scarcely has stopped growing all winter. Indeed, I have been mowing it every
month since November.
Admittedly, I have no really close-mown lawns: much of my grass is under
fruit trees or around ornamental trees and shrubs. And I have rye grass and
creeping bent grass, naturally-vigorous species that tend to grow even when
conditions are adverse. So, I cannot complain.
I imagine, though, that things are very different in some other parts of
Britain, particularly in the north, and that some lawns are going to need
nursing back into condition. In any case, those who want first-class lawns
must be prepared to do some feeding, and probably also some weeding.
What grass needs now is food containing a high percentage of nitrogen, and
all special lawn fertilisers have this. People with large gardens may decide
to save money by buying a high-nitrogen agricultural fertiliser. I use a
20:10:10 mixture - containing nitrogen, phosphoric acid and potash in those
percentages - at about two ounces per square yard.
If growing conditions are good, I can see the effect in a deeper green
colour and increased rate of growth within a week or so during April and
May. But proprietary lawn fertilisers can differ a lot in strength and must
be used according to label instructions.
Many gardeners use a wheeled distributor for even spreading. But if the
distributor is adjustable, it might be advisable to fill it and wheel it
over a large sheet of paper - ruled out in square yards or square metres -
to get the rate of distribution just right.
It is easy to overlap when wheeling a machine over a lawn. This is why I
prefer a fertiliser that shows up clearly on the grass. Double dosing
through overlapping can cause damage.
Many manufacturers offer a mixture of fertiliser and selective lawn
herbicide, which gets two jobs done at once. Personally, I prefer a separate
liquid herbicide because I think this gives better cover, but I do not feel
strongly about it.
There is, however, a more compelling reason for applying the herbicide, wet
or dry, as a separate operation - namely, that you need treat only those
parts of a lawn that are weedy. Apart from it obviously being a waste of
time and money to use weedkillers where they are not needed, it also seems
reasonable to avoid unnecessary use of anything that is designed to kill
things, however selectively.
Do not cut lawns too hard early in the year. They need time to build-up
strength after the winter, and they should have enough herbage to make good
use of the natural food in the soil plus any added fertiliser.
Leaves are the factory of the plant, enabling it to produce all the complex
organic compounds on which it depends for growth, and mowing reduces a
lawn's ability to do this. Even in high summer, usually there is no point in
cutting lawns below one inch unless they are required for games that need a
true playing surface. But, for the next few weeks, lawns deserve
extra-generous treatment and should be given every opportunity to build up
strength.
For much the same reason, rollers should not be used except where they are
needed to produce a true playing surface. They tend to compact the soil on
top; this prevents air from getting to the roots and can cause all sorts of
trouble, including killing grass and letting moss thrive. There are plenty
of good, swift-acting moss killers about; but if moss has infested a lawn
seriously, you might find that, when you have got rid of it, there is little
left except weeds.
Moles have been very active in my lawns this winter, and I suppose this
means there have been plenty of earthworms and leather jackets about. This
is one of the penalties of living in the country, where it is almost a waste
of time to try to get rid of the moles. Even if they are trapped or
poisoned, the lawns are re-populated almost instantly from surrounding
fields.
In town gardens, moles rarely are a serious problem; if the odd one arrives,
usually it can be driven out easily by lighting special mole fusees in the
main runs. You can find expert professional mole trappers in most country
areas, although my experience is that their time is occupied pretty fully.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3349</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / As time goes by: Private Passions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIGEL SPIVEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE OLD clock on the mantlepiece is the still centre of a household,
measuring a family's comings and goings from generation to generation. It is
a potent symbol of continuity, a thing of beauty, a marvel of precision. But
even clocks grow old, and antiques are in limited supply. Who today is
producing the sort of clocks that our great-grandchildren will revere?
David Poole, of Holmfirth in the West Riding of Yorkshire, is one of the few
craftsmen whose name can be summoned up to answer that question. It is
always unnerving to meet perfectionists; doubly unnerving to meet a
perfectionist in horology. David Poole is a neat, precise, extremely modest
man; there is nothing intimidating about him. But the marriage of precision
with the objective of measuring time is bound to disturb anyone prone to
idleness, or mortality, or simple imperfections.
Last year the Worshipful Company of Clockmakers set up a competition for the
design and execution of a Perpetual Calendar Clock; the winning entry now
stands in David Poole's living-room. For as long as you live, this clock can
tell you in which second of which minute of which hour of which day - and
date - of which month you are living in.
The movement of the clock is similar to that of the regulators once used by
watchmakers to ensure precise adjustment of their watches. Such regulators
never carried perpetual calendar mechanisms, for fear of compromising
accuracy.
But the perpetual calendar mechanism in David Poole's clock is driven by a
separate falling weight which facilitates date changes (including the
accommodation of leap years) with minimal variation in the clock's
timekeeping. The duration of the clock is one month; the weight for the
calendar mechanism requires raising once a year. This is an innovative
clock. It is also a marvellously well-made piece of furniture.
Apart from the engraving of the numerals and dates, everything about the
clock bespeaks the skill of one man. David Poole produces all his own
components, down to the smallest screw or pinion. 'You actually make your
own screws?' asks the bumbling DIY dabbler. 'Of course,' he replies. This
self-sufficient perfectionism includes a catholic range of skills: design,
engineering, metalworking and cabinet-making.
David Poole teaches a couple of days each week at the School of Horology in
south Manchester; he spends most of his horological time repairing antique
clocks. So creating tomorrow's antiques is very much a hobby-horse, pursued
out of personal absorption. The prize-winning perpetual calendar clock took
18 months to conceive and construct. Mrs Poole rolls her eyes when you ask
her how much she saw of her husband during that time.
It is reminiscent of Matthew Boulton, favourite 18th century clockmaker of
Sir Nicholas Goodison, the distinguished antiquarian horologist and former
chairman of the London stock exchange. Boulton's masterpiece was a
'sidereal' or star-oriented clock, now celebrated by the Birmingham City
Museum. But no one would buy it when it was made - and Boulton gloomily
recorded that he would be more successful if he 'had made the clocks play
jiggs upon-bells and a dancing bear keeping time.'
Likewise, David Poole would probably make much more money if he created
clocks which squirted electronic minuets on the hour. But he is hopeful that
the quality of his work will win him the commissions he needs to design and
manufacture his own clocks, thereby relieving him of the onus of repairing
antiques.
In early April he joins a quintet of independent British clockmakers in
their first appearance at the European Watch, Clock and Jewellery Fair in
Basel. Making clocks for posterity is all very well - but it is the present
which either endows or cheats posterity. David Poole, Grad. BHI: Ramsden
House, Brownhill Lane, Holmbridge, Holmfirth, Huddersfield HD7 lQW.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3350</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Gardening: Plant of the Week - Erythronium White Beauty
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The precise origin of this splendid plant is uncertain but there is no doubt
that it is one of the most beautiful of the Trout Lilies which are the North
American counterpart of the European dog's-tooth Violets. The white flowers
with orange markings at the base of the widely reflexed petals are two
inches across and the green leaves are handsomely marbled. The plant grows
strongly and carries its flowers well above the leaves, making a magnificent
display in spring. It succeeds best in light shade where the soil is deep
and rich in humus. The best time to move the bulbs is immediately after
flowering, in April or May, lifting and replanting them with plenty of soil
around their roots.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3351</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Gardening: Why I no longer panic about primulas - After 30
fear-filled years, Robin Lane Fox discovers the truth about a
hardier-than-expected family
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBIN LANE FOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THIS early spring is giving us an advance ticket to heaven. Crocus Cream
Beauty has never been better; early camellias are in their element; the
beads of yellow flower on the admirable Stachyurus will reassure anyone who
may be wondering why the FT chose it recently as its Plant of the Week.
Admittedly, there has been one unwanted takeover: moss has overrun the gaps
which two dry summers have caused in the lawn. Never mind: in Japan, they
grow whole gardens of it. Meanwhile, my eye is fixed at ground level, where
there is early movement among the primulas.
Primulas are not the natural friend of gardeners with my dry, stony soil.
They like Scotland, cool conditions and plenty of rain in the growing
season. However, I have been too scared for too long. In early spring, all
the varieties of Primula Marginata appear to flourish locally although the
soil is not exactly wet. They are enchanting plants whose leaves are fringed
at the edges and whose flowers are usually a shade on the scale from lilac
to violet. Linda Pope is the most famous, but there are a dozen others which
are every bit as good.
They seem to grow so easily without running water or peat. I have been slow
to realise their easy nature, but you might be quicker, especially if you
sent for the reasonably-priced list of them from Potterton and Martin,
Moortown Road, Nettleton, Caistor, Lincs LN7 6HX. The company supplies by
post but likes three first-class stamps for a copy of its list.
These easy varieties have only just dawned on me, but my most acute
blindness lies elsewhere: for years, I have also thought that all auriculas
were awkward, too. I used to believe that they needed damp shade and had to
be covered with glass in winter. This false impression derived from my
grandmother's garden, which was turned into a cold frame in late autumn when
auriculas were all given sheets of glass, like an umbrella.
The impression of difficulty was confirmed by exhibitors. They would show
rare auriculas with flowers ringed in green and black: their leaves were
dusted with a silver film which would never tolerate winter outdoors. The
art of breeding lay in minute details, such as the clarity of the edge
between the flower's centre and its contrasting outer rim. One great grower
even told me that he would never handle his plants, except with the brush of
badger-hair which he used when shaving his face.
Nowadays, badgers have to be handled quite differently, but so do auriculas,
because I realise that all these rules apply only to one part of the family.
There are plenty of others which do not need glass hats; they do not need
shade; they do not even need moisture. They seem to grow perfectly well in
full sun in my dry and stony soil where their only shelter is the shade cast
by other plants. They are thick with buds and I look back on 30 years,
wasted under a misapprehension.
The next 30 years will not be wasted on false economies. It is easy enough
to grow ordinary auriculas from seed or find them in any old nursery.
Typically, the flowers are a dark maroon and have a cream ring smudged in
their centre. The result is not very attractive, although it performs quite
well. Named forms, however, are a different matter.
Like delphiniums, auriculas are one of those families whose selected forms
make the seed-raised varieties look very inferior. You may have to pay up to
Pounds 3 a plant for the best colours, but you can see them going through
their paces in the next month or so and realise that you are buying quality.
The modern queen of the auricula is Brenda Hyatt, at Bluebell Hill, Chatham,
Kent: she and her daughter delight the public every year at Chelsea with the
finest forms in shades of green and black. These varieties will never
survive outdoors in a garden, but others in the Hyatt stable are tougher.
Alternative sources are Field House Nurseries, Leake Road, Gotham, Notts, or
Craven's Nursery, Windsor End, Beaconsfield, Bucks. All three will send
properly-packed plants by post, but do please send them three first class
stamps if you write to ask for a full catalogue.
Everyone has their favourites, but the four which have given me most
pleasure recently are Blue Velvet, Old Irish Blue, Paradise Yellow and Old
Yellow Dusty Miller. I must emphasise that I have given them all a place in
full sun, without any peat or winter protection. They have had a dash of
explosive pig manure but nothing further. The past winter has savaged many
of the silver-leaved plants nearby but the auriculas are all set up for
heavy flowering, refuting the old idea that they are only fit for cool,
northern gardens.
Of course, you can then move up and join the experts. Anything marked S Aur
in the Plantfinder is a challenging show auricula which must be kept
carefully under glass for most of the year. In their way, they are wonderful
and not really very difficult, so long as they avoid rain or direct,
continual sun.
Nonetheless, they are not the primulas which are now in my daydreams. As my
gang of four increases, it will be divided, sub-divided and built up into a
continuous ribbon of flower. Making up for the lost years, I aim to end up
with hardy auriculas edging entire flowerbeds in the sun.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3352</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Property: The 'forgotten county' of Herts and flowers -
David Hoppit finds that average perceptions can be misleading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID HOPPIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A COUNTY bisected by railways and trunk roads, with serviceable rather than
grand churches; the pioneer, flower-filled garden cities; and acres of
glasshouses producing much of the capital's salads - that, at first glance,
is the average perception of Hertfordshire. It is, according to John Lewis
of estate agent Strutt and Parker, 'the forgotten county.'
Hertfordshire is the bridge between London and the Midlands and the north,
host to much of the creeping eczema that has been dubbed 'Subtopia'; a place
to pass by. There is, however, the other face of Hertfordshire: the maze of
lanes and sudden villages, with cricket on the green and real ale after
evensong; the Hertfordshire so loved by the writer George Bernard Shaw.
He lived at Ayot St Lawrence, choosing the village after spotting an epitaph
on the grave of a 70-year-old woman proclaiming 'Her time was short.' Shaw
decided that a village where a life of 70 years was considered short was the
right place for him. He died there at the ripe old age of 94.
It is true that the churches in the county are not so flamboyant as those in
nearby Essex and Suffolk; the abbey at St Albans was not endowed with great
wealth, so worshippers have to make do with tiny spires - known as
'Hertfordshire spikes' - instead of the grand affairs that dominate East
Anglia skylines.
Hertfordshire is not blessed with durable building stone. Much of it is
dominated by the eastern humps of the chalky Chilterns. Village houses often
are thatched; they tend to be half-timbered, and weatherboarding is common.
A few are built of 'wichert,' a mixture of chalky marl and straw. Some are
decorated with pargetting, found more commonly across in East Anglia.
The Romans built their Verulamium (St Albans), one of their soldiers named
Alban becoming Britain's first Christian martyr after his execution in AD
303; but Hertford, the fine county town well clear of the main roads, was a
settlement long before the Romans came.
Hertfordshire has far more large houses than Essex. Most notable is Hatfield
House which was built in 1608 by Robert Cecil, the 1st Earl of Salisbury and
secretary of state to both Queen Elizabeth I and King James I.
The proximity to London and excellent hunting in the beech forests meant
many other Elizabethan and Jacobean mansions were built; but it is the
villages that provide the county's charm - places like Aldbury with its duck
pond, whipping post and stocks (last used to punish a drunken villager in
1835).
Hambro Countrywide, with a national total of 484 offices, reports a
long-awaited buzz of activity in the county's housing market, especially
among first-time buyers and people seeking new homes. Small houses cost
about the same as in 1987.
Among the larger houses, Strutt and Parker reports a 'patchy' market. Lewis
has some fine temptations at present but says buyers remain extremely
nervous. He explains: 'The county is divided into two distinct halves, the
south being congested and criss-crossed by numerous trunk roads and
motorways while the north is relatively unspoilt, with many attractive
villages.'
Hertfordshire is one of the smallest counties, and also one of the
most-densely populated, but its property values are the highest in the
country outside London. Before the recession started to bite, St Albans was
said to have the most expensive houses of any town in the country except
those within the M25 London orbital motorway.
Among the exceptional houses on offer from Strutt and Parker is The Lordship
at Standon, dating from the mid-16th century.
The house, on a bend of the River Rib, was built by Sir Ralph Sadlier, who
was appointed by Queen Elizabeth I as custodian of Mary Queen of Scots. It
was once regarded as the social centre of the county.
Offers of about Pounds 995,000 are suggested, to include the manorial title.
In Shaw's beloved Ayot St Lawrence there is Ayot House, a Queen Anne
property standing in pleasant parkland. The house has been divided and the
major portion is being offered by Strutt and Parker for about Pounds
295,000.
Factfile on Hertfordshire
Area: 632 square miles; population: 988,700; community charge: lowest (in
Broxbourne) Pounds 220; highest (in Welwyn and Hatfield) Pounds 319.
Administration centre: County Hall, Hertford SG13 8DE.
Sample towns, with distance from London, travel time by rail, annual rail
fares (first class in brackets) and house price minima (supplied by Hambro
Countrywide). 1. Two-bedroom terrace; 2. Three-bedroom semi; 3. Four-bedroom
detached; 4. Country house with paddock.
Bishop's Stortford: 31 miles; 34 mins; Pounds 1,728 (Pounds 2,592); 1.
Pounds 58,000; 2. Pounds 75,000; 3. Pounds 110,000; 4. Pounds 400,000.
St Albans: 19 miles; 30 mins; Pounds 1,400 (Pounds 2,100); 1. Pounds 68,000;
2. Pounds 85,000; 3. Pounds 180,000; 4. Pounds 500,000.
Watford: 16 miles; 16 mins; Pounds 1,320 (Pounds 1,980); 1. Pounds 67,000;
2. Pounds 90,000; 3. Pounds 150,000; 4. Pounds 350,000.
Stevenage: 28 miles; 25 mins; Pounds 1,824 (Pounds 2,736); 1. Pounds 55,000;
2. Pounds 69,000; 3. Pounds 95,000; 4. Pounds 500,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3353</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Property: Too many irons in the fire? - John Brennan looks
at the heated debate over mounting applications to build golf courses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BRENNAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN the Royal &amp; Ancient Golf Club at St Andrews, Scotland, warned some time
ago of a progressively acute shortage of courses in Britain, farmers and
their land agents started to see bunkers by every cowshed. At a time of
deeply-depressed agricultural land values, turning surplus fields into
fairways became a pleasant and potentially profitable prospect.
The majority of Britain's courses were established before the Second World
War and golfers had become concerned about the shortage of new facilities at
a time when television coverage of international tournaments had boosted the
sport.
But farmers' enthusiasm to find alternative use for their unproductive land,
and the conversion of more and more armchair golfers to active play, has led
to a heated debate on whether there are now too many planning applications
for new courses.
Local planners have, by and large, been favourable to such schemes, since
they tend to involve little extra building while adding to the leisure
facilities of an area. In practice, as Mark McAndrew of estate agent Strutt
&amp; Parker says: 'There have been a lot of sites where the owners have consent
for golf use, but a lot will never be developed as golf courses.'
Planning consent offers no guarantee of being able to attract
member/subscribers to a self-financed club, or of attracting play-and-pay
customers on a more open course. And, as McAndrew notes: 'Finance for any
leisure scheme is terribly difficult to get hold-of now.' But he dismisses
suggestions of any widespread withdrawal of support by backers and doubts if
he could identify as many as 10 financially-doubtful projects among the many
dozens under way nationally.
Strutt &amp; Parker, with more than 1m acres of farm and estate land under
management, is keen to be seen as a firm with particular expertise in golf
projects. And anyone offering a site for a prospective course at an asking
price of Pounds 3.25m can be expected to be optimistic about the scope for
fresh golf projects. McAndrew is no exception.
He argues that there still is substantial interest assuming the property
fits the bill with a prime, well-located site. In this instance, it is the
180-acre Leggatts Park in Hertfordshire, north of London, that has been
added to S&amp;P's open-market sale list.
Having won planning consent for an 18-hole course, and permission to convert
an existing building into a clubhouse, the family that has farmed the land
since the late 1960s had tried to sell the property privately. But despite
being just two miles (3.2 km) from the M25 London orbital motorway, and
close to the dormitory town of Potters Bar, there was no interest from
offshore investors or leisure development groups. The fact that the property
is mature, undulating parkland with a good crop of trees still failed to
draw the offers. Now that Leggatts Park is on the open market, S&amp;P claims
the asking price represents 'only a limited premium value over
residential/agricultural levels.'
As a working farm alone, it is unlikely the property would be worth even
half its price tag. But Leggatts is unusual in having such a substantial
main house (nine bedrooms plus two additional staff flats) as well as four
other houses, two of which have five and six bedrooms, with additional
out-buildings.
Roger Pryor, head of S&amp;P's leisure department, thinks it is 'the best
commercial golf development site available at present.' How long it remains
available could depend on how avidly prospective buyers have read the
European-wide survey of golf facilities produced by Greene, Belfield-Smith,
the leisure industries arm of Touche Ross, the accountancy-to-management
consultancy group.
This 20-country survey, based on figures for golf facilities at the
beginning of 1991, re-affirms and extends the projections of the forecasters
at the Royal &amp; Ancient. It expects that the pace of development of European
golf schemes will overtake that of the United States in the near future and
that Europe overall will become 'the most rapidly-growing golf market.'
The consultants' forecasts, while interesting, pale beside the core of the
survey which is a course-by-course, hole-by-hole exposition of the state of
golf in Europe. The most striking fact is that England on its own has more
than a third of all the golf courses in the area between Norway and Greece.
The survey records 1,377 courses in England, with a total of 23,081 holes.
Add Scotland's 471 courses and 7,247 holes, plus 126 with 1,958 in Wales,
and the UK has more than half of Europe's grand total of 3,687 courses with
59,465 playable holes.
Self-evidently, golf facilities in the less-wealthy areas of southern Italy
and Greece, rural Portugal, and the more northern regions of Norway and
Sweden are few and far between. These golfing fringe areas do bring the
Euro-averages down. Nevertheless, the survey does help to discount any
concern that the TV-inspired upsurge of interest in playing the sport would
result in a mass exodus of golfers to the heavily publicised Mediterranean
courses.
The level of marketing and promotion for villas and apartments by Spanish
and Portuguese golf courses belies the comparatively-limited golf facilities
available in those countries.
Spain, as the survey shows, has only 108 courses with 1,777 golf holes
(fewer than Wales and only twice the score-card of Finland). Portugal has
just 20 courses with 252 holes.
The consultants worked out that there are 112,000 people for every 18-hole
golf course in Europe. That compares with 23,000 a course in the US. On the
same line of argument, if every region of Europe became golf-conscious and
sought to match present US golf facilities, an additional 15,000 golf
courses would need to be completed. Even the Royal &amp; Ancient might balk at
that.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3354</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / How To Spend It: The unnatural mac is back, okay?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LVDP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GIVE A DOG a bad name and it becomes almost impossible to get it
rehabilitated. Artificial fibres, transformed since the early days of
raucous rayon and noxious nylon, have never quite received the recognition
they deserve from the fashion press. Natural fibre snobs tend to bestow the
word 'natural' as an almost automatic stamp of approval. However, there are
some things that artificial fibres do distinctly better than natural ones.
Making light, crease-resistant, naturally water-repellent raincoats is one
of them.
Ever since a couple of Japanese companies developed a range of soft, silky,
peachy polyester fabrics known as microfibres, designers of the stature of
Armani, the MaxMara team and others have been using them for anoraks parkas,
raincoats and jackets. A close weave makes the fabrics water-repellent but
their chief beauty lies in their extraordinary fluidity. They are also very
light and almost uncrushable, so they make perfect travelling garments.
Burberrys has brought out a snappy collection of short, swingy, almost
A-line raincoats, all made from microfibre, in singing spring colours like
orange, yellow, lipstick pink and apple green as well as neutrals such as
stone and cream. Photographed right is one of the raincoats (Pounds 395)
teamed with a pair of toning linen shorts (Pounds 130). The plain, cotton,
white waistcoat (it also comes in a blue and white check) is Pounds 70.
Chaps, for the moment, will have to stick to raincoats made from traditional
fabrics which are, it appears, more suitable for longer-length macs that are
the current fashion. Burberry has focussed on a collection that strikes more
of an urban weekend mood. The brushed cotton safari jacket is Pounds 215 and
is worn over a suede waistcoat (Pounds 160), a luxurious three-button
long-sleeved polo shirt in silk (Pounds 175) and teamed with stone cotton
chinos (Pounds 87.50).
Burberrys, 18-22 The Haymarket, London SW1.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3355</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / How To Spend It: Rich and fake
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LVDP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE ARE certain people who feel they must wear only 'real' jewellery. For
some it is an expression of wealth and status, not a source of fun and
fashion. The delight of costume jewellery is that precisely because it is
conjured from the humblest materials designers feel freed from bourgeois
constraints.
As Vivienne Becker put it in her beautiful book Fabulous Fakes (Pounds
19.95, Grafton Books): 'Since they are not intended to last beyond the
latest craze, jewels of little or no intrinsic value can be more evocative
of their age and wearer than expensive gem-set heirlooms.'
In other words, they do not have to last forever. Those who work with them
can indulge in wilder flights of fantasy, be more exotic, more fantastical,
take bigger risks than those who deal with gems worth a king's ransom.
In an exhibition opening on Wednesday at the Victoria &amp; Albert Museum, South
Kensington, London SW1, some of the finest costume jewellery ever made will
be on show - works from Chanel, Schiaparelli, Dior, Trifari, Eisenberg, Ken
Lane and Robert Lee Morris will be there, charting the rise and rise in
popularity of this now essential fashion accessory.
The V &amp; A shop will be selling a vast collection of costume jewellery
including inexpensive modern pieces - starting at Pounds 6.99 and aimed at
the student market - to collectors' items from the Fior, Cobra &amp; Bellamy and
Melanie Coe collections.
Melanie Coe, for example, is selling reproductions in glitzy Schiaparelli
mode, at prices ranging from Pounds 80 to Pounds 100 while Fior's pieces
will start at about Pounds 16 and up for collectors' pieces. Cobra &amp; Bellamy
has a line of pieces based on the Armada jewel and Queen Victoria's jewels -
prices start at Pounds 35 and go on up to about Pounds 80. Swarovski, the
Austrian supplier of cut crystal to the fashion industry, is sponsoring the
exhibition and will be selling a glitzy brooch of its own for Pounds 40.
The exhibition and runs until July 5.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3356</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / How To Spend It: Welcome to Beanland, home of the hunter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN FRICKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LL Bean, the mythic purveyor of rugged outdoor wear to sophisticated modern
American urbanites, has started to woo the British market. From their own
front rooms the British can now leaf through a catalogue, pick up a
telephone, and order the appurtenances of a simpler, hardier, more
old-fashioned way of life.
For those who wonder what all the fuss is about Karen Fricker makes a
pilgrimage to the LL Bean headquarters in Freeport, Maine, the shrine where
Americans go to rediscover the America of long ago.
IT IS a good thing that the foyer of the LL Bean Store in Freeport, Maine is
filled with benches. Entering the only retail outlet of America's most
venerable purveyor of outdoor goods and clothing can be overwhelming.
Confronted with the American dream realised the hardiest of shoppers needs a
sit-down.
Last year 3.5m shoppers visited the Freeport store. For Americans, going to
Bean is a primal urge, somewhere between family responsibility  - the
required visit to eccentric old Uncle LL, as Reader's Digest has dubbed him,
who sends us packages - and pilgrimage, to the shrine of an America we wish
still existed.
In his indoor trout pond (on the main floor, between men's flannel-lined
hunting trousers and Gore-Tex anoraks) Americans can wash away the ignominy
of mass-marketing, and rediscover the values LL represents - authenticity,
reliability, eco-sensitivity, outdoorsiness, hardiness, honesty.
The United States of Bean meticulously cultivates its image, posting
narratives about company history and 'Our People' (Bean employees), and
letters from satisfied customers (one young man who lives at the South Pole
jogs happily around Antarctica in Bean extra-strength thermal underwear).
Some features of Bean's old-fashioned America jar the 90s consciousness.
Though Bean aggressively markets its greenness - sponsoring outdoor
discovery programmes and talks about conservation - it also sells a huge
selection of shotguns and plays 'how-to-kill-deer' videos in the hunting
department. The company and most of its shoppers see no contradiction. Bean
was founded to sell hunting gear to hunters, and that purpose remains,
although these days real hunters are probably outnumbered by urban
bargainovores who covet the country look, like their British counterparts in
Barbours and tweeds.
Bean, in keeping with its homey image, used only staff as models until the
company was attacked because its catalogue contained only white faces.
Public relations director Catharine Hartnett, said this was a reflection of
the homogeneity of the applicant pool: 'There's not much cultural diversity
in Southern Maine.' In the last couple of years the company has started
using professional models, of all races, in its catalogue.
Best to ignore these little quirks. Sometimes it has not done to look behind
the scenes at Disneyland, either.
Bean is better than Disneyland: you get the fantasy, and you can shop too.
Frontierland with bargains. Adventureland, and you take the coonskin cap and
flannel shirt home. And it never closes. Bean is open 24 hours a day, 365
days a year. Excessive? Perhaps. That's Maine for you. That's America.
And bottom line, Bean delivers. Between the fun and not-so-practical bits,
the store is full of useful, well-made goods. Does the couple from suburban
Boston really need an ice fishing shelter (Dollars 76 - Pounds 43.10)? No,
but after testing out the floor sample, they can pick up something they
might actually use: flannel sheets (Dollars 28) perhaps, or wool blankets
(Dollars 180). Will the Florida family really use sleeping bags guaranteed
to - 40`F? No, but they probably will use Bean's own brand mountain bikes
(Dollars 240) or a Gore-Tex insulated lunchbox (Dollars 14.95)
A latter-day Alice's Restaurant, you can get anything you want at Bean: your
can get food pancake mix, smoked salmon, Rain Forest Crunch nut brittle,
freeze-dried gourmet meals for camping and Walker's shortbread. You can get
socks, you can get skis, you can get postcards (and post them in the store),
and you can, of course, get Bean's well-made, durable, natural-fibre
clothing: chinos, denims, sweaters, turtlenecks.
In recent years Bean has introduced a line of what it thinks is fashionable,
upscale clothing, but the results have never risen above the frumpy.
The Beanland boom began in the late 70s when the company expanded its annual
turnover from Dollars 50m to Dollars 250m, and out-of-town visitors started
trickling into Freeport to see what the excitement was about. Canny
retailers, wanting a piece of the action, bought property up and down
Freeport's main street and opened factory outlet stores, offering seconds
and off-season merchandise at cut-rate prices.
There are now more than 100 retail stores in the Freeport area, from Dansk
housewares, to Bass and Timberland shoes, to quality clothing merchants -
Brooks Brothers, Evan Picone, Ralph Lauren Polo - to America's most popular
casual clothing chains - J. Crew, The Gap, Banana Republic. Freeport has
become the leading example of the new American phenomenon of the town
defined by shopping: the factory outlet centre.
LL Bean's Freeport store may be important to the American identity, but it
plays a relatively small role in the Bean company's total business.
Mail-order is Bean's backbone - last year it made up 88 per cent of total
sales - and has been since 1912, when founder Leon Leonwood 'LL' Bean sent
out the first circular advertising his Maine Hunting Boots - leather uppers
sewn on to rubber bottoms, still the company's best known product.
Company president Leon Gorman has authorised several international ventures,
in spite of his grandfather LL's famous dictum against foreign expansion:
'I'm eating three meals a day now, I can't eat four.' Bean has marketed
aggressively to the Japanese and Canadian markets since 1989, and last
autumn started advertising its catalogues in the British media. Most
recently Japanese companies Seiyu and Matsushita Electrical Industrial
Company formed 'LL Bean Japan', a joint venture company that will open five
retail stores in Japan exclusively for the sale of LL Bean merchandise.
To order the postal catalogue or goods phone 1-207-865-3111, fax
1-207-878-2104. or write to LL Bean Freeport, ME 04033, US. There is a
toll-free number in the US: 1-800-221-4221 and a British address for UK
orders: PO BOX 54, Swindon, SN5 8LB.
Would-be buyers based in the UK should remember to add duty (at 14 per cent)
and VAT (at 17.5 per cent) to the cost of orders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3357</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Germans in glasshouses . . .: As they say in Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES MORGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH elections grab the attention of continental Europeans more than
theirs interest the British. This is probably a result of the oddities, and
of what are seen as failings, of the British electoral system: the bogus
drama of setting the date, the difficulty of predicting the number of seats
that each party can win because of the random nature of the
first-past-the-post system; and the constitutional theatre that an election
involves. It all seems a bit like cricket - and a bit of a gamble.
Thus, in Die Welt, Reiner Gatermann started by quoting the 'vote-guru,'
David Butler: 'The Conservatives are three-to-two, Labour three-to-one.' The
headline was 'April 9 means the end of Kinnock or Major.'
Gatermann pondered the closeness of the race: 'Kinnock's supporters must
wonder why their party cannot make more political capital out of the failure
of the long-promised recovery to arrive and the widespread dissatisfaction
with Tory policy in health and education - and finally the poll tax
disaster. But they really know the reason: it is called Neil Kinnock.'
He concludes that people just cannot see Kinnock as prime minister - 'He has
that image ascribed to the Welsh - saying too little with too many words.'
European correspondents based in London do not like Kinnock because, they
say, he turns down one-to-one interviews with them and they are banned from
the main floor at Labour Party conferences.
However, they do not seem to admire the government much, either. In the
Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, Jochen Rudolph discussed last week's Budget:
'The history of British policy teaches that incorrect fiscal policy causes a
lot of trouble . . . To steer with fiscal means makes it essential to know
where the economy stands, where it can be measured. But the experience of
the last two years, at least in England, is that the experts always diagnose
falsely, and as a result make incorrect forecasts - the Treasury included.'
Traditionally it has been only the Germans who adopt a high-handed, didactic
tone when dealing with British failings. But since France became a pillar of
financial rectitude, the attitude has spread. La Tribune de l'Expansion had
an editorial on the Budget which accused John Major of being a Keynesian. It
was horrified by the Pounds 28bn deficit: 'In an open economy it is not by
digging deficits that one emerges from the swamp.'
Over at Les Echos, Patrick de Jacquelot takes a more tolerant, often
fatalistic, view. He developed an old theme of his regarding the problems
facing the Tories. The Budget was badly received by the public; that alarmed
the City; which in turn could affect the pound, 'aggravating thereby the
difficulties of the government. There is therefore the risk of a vicious
circle which must make the Conservatives shiver . . . '
To de Jacquelot, the electoral question could be put quite simply: 'Would
the improvement of public services and social welfare justify higher
government spending and taxes?'
In the Milan daily, Il Sole-24 Ore, Alessandro Merli saw the problem as
being mainly one for the Tories: 'After the years of the Micawberesque
fiscal virtue of Margaret Thatcher, who set about repaying the whole of the
public debt thanks to the boom and the proceeds of privatisation . . . the
last two years have seen a sudden change in the trend. Not only has Major
wanted to show a 'compassionate' side of Conservatism, thus increasing
public spending, but the recession has meant a hard blow to tax receipts.'
Merli's views prefigured much British comment.
But for real disdain one has to return, as always, to the Frankfurter
Allgemeine. It noted that Major had not been able to make much use of his
freedom to choose the date - 'it could have been foreseen that the economic
situation would not change.' But it was also the one paper I read that made
much of that woman whom we all seem to have forgotten:
'Things would be easier if Major had to deal only with his Labour rival,
Kinnock. But the person he has to measure himself against is Mrs Thatcher.
Her legacy is double-edged: there is the image of the 'Iron Lady' who
improved Britain's reputation in the world and broke through the blockades
in the economy and society. But there is also the picture, formed during the
last phase in Thatcher's period in office, which shows a self-admiring
autocrat who had lost any notion of the needs of simple people.'
In this welter of not very admiring comment it was nice to read Fabrice
Rousselot in Liberation. At least someone thought something good was
happening in Britain: 'This unpredictable election is in the image of a
changing British political landscape. The vote of April 9 could for the
first time smash the traditional 'Labour-Tory' polarisation and open the way
to a broader political scene, more consensual and less marked
ideologically.'
Somebody could also have said that Britain's is the only political landscape
in Europe where we are not watching the rise of something nasty on the far
right. But nobody over there seems to have noticed that.
James Morgan is economics correspondent of the BBC World Service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3358</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Schools, the debate rages: Andrew Adonis summarises reaction
to last week's FT-500 survey
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'I WELCOME your survey', wrote Peter Wilkes, headmaster of Cheltenham
College, 'as it highlights many areas which parents should properly
investigate.' That was the general response to last week's FT-500 survey of
independent schools. It came with a flurry of letters debating our
conclusions and methodology - and suggesting improvements for next time.
There were also a number of slips, a few caused by us but most by errors -
or confusion - in completing our questionnaire. Those brought to our
attention are noted below: they and others will be incorporated in the
booklet of the survey to be published in due course.
The issue of co-education attracted the widest response. We used - and
should have explained clearly - two different criteria. The main table,
intended as a general guide to parents, classified schools as co-ed if they
admitted both sexes at all levels, regardless of the proportions. But the
summary table of the top 10 co-educational schools, on page two of our
supplement, applied a more exacting test: schools were eligible for
inclusion only where more than a quarter of their pupils were boys and more
than a quarter girls. Most schools without that mix have the minority sex -
almost invariably girls - in their sixth forms only, and we did not consider
that an institution with only a few of the minority sex in the lower school
was fully co-ed.
Tony Evans, head of Portsmouth Grammar School - which was ranked correctly
as 61st in the main table, not sixth as stated in one article  - argues that
such an approach 'does not take into account the different stages which
schools have reached in co-education: some are completely co-ed; others are
in the process of becoming so.' Moreover, 'it fails to take account of the
highly selective nature, and the monopoly enjoyed by many, if not all, of
those schools which you cite as illustrating the merits of single-sex
schools.'
This, no doubt, is true. A corollary is that some schools, at least, have
gone co-ed because of difficulties in recruiting and/or maintaining
standards while single-sex. The survey offers strong prima facie evidence
for such a view. However, it does not affect our conclusion: that a
disproportionate share of the best schools, academically, are single-sex. It
does not, of course, follow that a system of single-sex education is
inherently better.
The wide variation in fees, and the weakness of evident links between fees
and performance, struck many readers. One was anxious to stress that fees of
up to Pounds 11,000 a year in the public boarding schools represented only
the 'headline cost.' With two sons at a boarding school and a daughter at a
day school, his fees totalled Pounds 8,495 a term. Yet, with school trips,
sports equipment, societies, and other extras charged by the schools, the
bill rose to Pounds 9,575 a term - another Pounds 3,240 a year.
Inevitably, our criteria for the rank-ordering attracted criticism. It gave
equal weight to the average A-level performance per pupil, and the average
performance per entry. Some readers objected to our use of the first
measure, others to the second. David May, of St Paul's School, London,
wanted AS levels to be included and questioned whether the breadth of a
curriculum could be related to the number of A-levels taken. 'This may well
be true (or it may not be), but there is no way of judging the issue from
the mere statistics,' he wrote.
The inclusion of general studies in the calculation of A-level scores was
questioned. This was partly because some heads believe GS is of a lower
standard and could be used to push up the scores of weaker schools, but also
because its inclusion was thought to be unfair to schools with broad but
unexamined curriculum-enrichment programmes. 'It places quantity above
quality,' says Averil Burgess, of South Hampstead High School, London.
We did compile a ranking which excluded general studies, but concluded from
a comparison of the two ranks that there was no convincing evidence that the
inclusion of general studies was systematically distorting. Some schools
with many good grades in general studies gained an advantage, but they
tended to be the better schools for other subjects. Others, where pupils
tended to fail or gain low grades in general studies, lost position. But
consistently poor performance in this exam could well reflect on the
standard of all-round education in these sixth forms. In future, we could
consider publishing both ranks.
The issue of 'value added' was discussed widely. All respondents agreed that
the range of information offered - plus the profiles and articles elsewhere
in the supplement - gave it a higher prominence than in previous surveys.
But some still thought us too wedded to 'raw' A-level results. James Miller,
headmaster of Framlingham College, Suffolk, described ranking by A-level
scores as 'analogous in commercial terms to saying that dividend yield is
the best measure of the quality of management in a company.' He wanted a
comparison of A-level scores with GCSE results. On this basis, he claimed,
Framlingham came fourth, not 22nd, in a study of 24 schools by the
Headmasters' Conference.
He, at any rate, still favoured ranking by exam results. Others deplored
even that, emphasising the equal - or greater - importance of the
extra-curricular side. That, however, did not cut much ice with Cheltenham's
Peter Wilkes. He stressed the importance of a school's 'mood' and
facilities, but added: 'I have always found the tendency of headmasters to
boast and glorify their schools' achievements very distasteful. John
Cleese's parody of this tendency in Clockwise has, sadly, not had much
effect upon us. I hope that most of today's parents look beyond the booming
bluster.'
The absence of a commentary on the Scottish results attracted criticism and
is something we will rectify in any future survey. Mrs DA Gardner,
headmistress of Wellington School, Ayr, claimed it was 'spurious' to give
average Highers' scores per pupil without any indication of the number of
Highers achieved. But the headmaster of Merchiston Castle School, Edinburgh,
believed it might be useful to divide the Scottish section in two, between
those schools following a broadly 'English' curriculum based on A-levels and
those concentrating on Highers.
We have recalculated our table incorporating new information supplied to us,
but the changed places given below should be regarded as provisional only
since revisions are still being sent to us.
ERRATA
It is Bryanston (not Brynston) and Cheadle Hulme (not Hume). St Anne's,
Windermere, is in Cumbria, not Lancashire. Winchester does not have a co-ed
sixth form, just the daughters of four members of staff there. The Queen's
School, Chester, is for girls, not boys as listed in one table. 'There are
those at The King's School, Chester, who would love this to happen: don't
give them ideas]' wrote the headmistress.
Errors in the hand collation of summary tables led to the omission of three
schools from the 'top 10' tables for co-educational and boarding schools. We
apologise to Stockport Grammar, which should have come top of the co-ed
table; to The King's School, Canterbury, which should have come third; and
to Charterhouse, which, on our present information, should have ranked 10th
in the boarding table. Revised tables will be reprinted when we have
completed the checking and recalculation of new data.
Badminton (not Badmington) had 34, not 46, A-level candidates last year.
This gives it a Universities Central Council for Admissions points score per
pupil of 20.06, and per entry of 6.69. Accordingly, it rises from 211th to
118th place. (UCCA scores grade A=10, B=8, C=6,D=4, E=2).
Epsom College, Surrey, overstated its number of A-level candidates at 155.
The corrected figure of 135 takes its UCCA score per candidate up to 20.90,
and per entry to 6.92. It rises from 141st to 83rd.
Forest School, London, has a revised pupil:teacher ratio of 11.2:1, and an
average of 3.4 passes per pupil. Its revised UCCA score per pupil is 22.58,
and per entry 6.28, taking it to 96th position.
Notting Hill and Ealing High, London, had a score per pupil of 19.97, and
per entry of 6.94, giving it 98th place.
Sevenoaks School, Kent, was not ranked because a third of its pupils take
the International Baccalaureate instead of A-levels. Using an agreed formula
for converting IB scores, it had an UCCA score per pupil of 20.75, and per
entry of 6.77. It takes 95th place.
Solihull School, West Midlands, which completed a form after publication,
has a score per pupil of 24.52, and per entry of 6.18, giving it 72nd place.
The Perse School, Cambridge, which advised us that it achieved one extra
grade A and one more grade B pass than declared on its form, gets a revised
score of 24.63 per pupil and 7.88 per entry, pushing it up from 23rd to
19th.
St Bede's College, Manchester, had 947, not 347, pupils, giving it 61 per
cent boys and a pupil:teacher ratio of 13.5:1.
The fees at Laxton, Northants, are Pounds 4,200 a year, not Pounds 11,790.
At Whitgift, Surrey, they are Pounds 4,400 per year, not per term.
At Francis Holland, London, 80 per cent-plus (not 54) go on to higher
education, and a similar proportion do so at St Helen and St Katherine's,
Abingdon, and Belmont House, Glasgow.
And, yes, the FT's proof-readers have done 300 lines on each of: Surrey,
boarders, Channel Islands, Guernsey and Shropshire. 'Borders and full
borders are worthy of Daisy Ashford or Richmal Crompton,' wrote Geoffrey
Elliott from Bermuda. 'But perhaps that's all you get nowadays for several
thousand pounds a year in fees.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3359</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Cookery: More than potatoes for St Patrick - Philippa
Davenport adds a touch of flair to traditional Irish treats
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIPPA DAVENPORT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ST PATRICK'S day
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
this Tuesday - was a big occasion at my school, where many of the nuns were
Irish. The sisters in charge of the kitchen were the strongest in their
allegiance to the Emerald Isle. On March 17, every bosom wore its bunch of
shamrock with pride, and supper on that date was always the same: fried eggs
on fried bread set in a sea of tinned marrowfat peas.
Sometimes, we questioned the Irishness of this culinary curiosity. This
vexed the nuns, who thought that every convent-educated girl ought to
recognise instantly the colours of the Republic's tricolour flag in the
orangey-gold and white of the eggs and the bright green peas.
My own choice of menu for an Irish feast is rather different. Oysters to
begin with, Guinness cake and Irish cheeses to finish, and pig in the middle
 -with potato and cabbage to keep it company, of course.
Boiled bacon might not be the most elegant of fare but it has acquired a
certain chic now that, in the interests of thrift, simple peasant foods have
become such 'in' things. And if the pig is quality meat, its delicious
flavour should please gourmets and gourmands alike.
Success depends on three things: good meat, careful curing and gentle
cooking. Boiled bacon must not be boiled (there is an Irishness for you) or
the meat will be dry and ragged. Succulence depends on keeping the liquid at
the barest simmer; the fewer burps that bubble to the surface, the better.
This was achieved by in-built inefficiency in traditional Irish kitchens
where the cooking was done in a cauldron hanging over a lazy fire of steamy
peat. Cooks in modern, high-speed kitchens must slow things down
deliberately. Choose a heavy pot, keep the flame faint and employ a heat
diffuser for good measure.
Tradition calls for a large pot in which the rest of the meal can be cooked
along with the bacon. I prefer to use a small one, heavy-based and with a
well-fitting lid to minimise evaporation because, if the joint fits snugly
into the pot rather than swimming in liquid, the cooking liquor is stock by
the end. No need to reduce it or add any extra flavourings.
Shoulder of bacon, a corner gammon or gammon proper are all suitable cuts,
whether smoked or green. Soak the joint for a few or several hours according
to taste and the butcher's recommendation. Put it into the pot and pour on
just enough cold liquid to cover.
For a 4 lb shoulder joint last week, I used 3 pts water plus one teaspoon
each cider vinegar and brown sugar, a bay leaf, a few peppercorns, and some
lightly-bruised fennel seeds. On other occasions, I have replaced some or
all of the water with very dry cider (such as Bulmer's No. 7) or cloudy,
unsweetened apple juice.
Bring to a bare simmer, skim, cover and cook as gently as possible, allowing
20 minutes a pound. Then, turn off the heat and leave the bacon to stand in
the liquid in the covered pot for 20 minutes, rather as though resting a
joint between roasting and carving.
Cabbage goes very well with bacon so long as it is not killed by drowning,
when it smells as vile as it tastes. The fact that cabbage likes fast,
fierce cooking, while bacon needs slow and gentle treatment, is one good
reason for cooking the two ingredients separately. Besides which, the taste
of brassica does little to improve bacon stock.
For a chunky, peasant-like cabbage dish, I like Savoy, January King or some
other tight-headed variety cut into big wedges, steamed briefly over
furiously-boiling water and blotted carefully. Also excellent, and a mite
more refined, is cabbage shredded as fine as tagliolini and blanch-boiled.
Throw it into a large, hubble-bubble pot of fiercely-boiling salted water
and fish it out again a few seconds later  - the chances are it will be
cooked before the water returns to the boil. Turn it into a sieve, tossing
to drain it well and separate the strands.
Anoint it, if you will, by turning it in warmed olive oil or melted butter,
season with salt and pepper, and add some chopped coriander leaves or
toasted sesame seeds; or omit the brilliantine sheen and serve the cabbage
unadorned along with plain, boiled bacon and offer a sauce on the side.
Hollandaise is hardly Irish, but it is probably the first and finest choice.
An orange mustard sauce makes an inviting alternative.
In the top part of a double-boiler, mix together two teaspoons each of thick
cream and wholegrain mustard. Add two tablespoons freshly-squeezed orange
juice, one teaspoon balsamic vinegar, and the finely-grated zest of two
oranges.
Place over barely-simmering water and stir with a wire whisk until the
mixture is well blended, hot and slightly sticky. Gradually beat in 6 oz of
diced and chilled unsalted butter, piece by piece, until amalgamated to a
hot, smooth and creamy sauce, rather like a thin Hollandaise.
Add two or more teaspoons of orange juice to taste and season with salt and
pepper. Cover and let the sauce stand for a few minutes before serving to
allow flavours to develop.
The best potatoes to go with freshly-boiled bacon and cabbage are floury,
earthy Golden Wonder grown in Ireland - if you can get them. Irish soda
bread or Boxty bread go well on the side.
Although the pig, the potato and cabbage are an obvious Irish trinity, they
are not sacrosanct. Other vegetable combinations can please just as much (as
we realised when eating the cold remains of the bacon joint on later
nights).
Sweet and tender spinach - not the coarse perennial sort - is a delight
steamed until just wilted and served in a ring with a pond of melted butter
in the centre and a barricade of mashed potato round it. Grate nutmeg over
the whole lot, or season the spinach with a pinch of cinnamon and add
almonds, raisins and orange zest for a medieval touch.
Broad beans (one of the few vegetables that freeze well) are marvellous with
bacon, particularly when dressed in a parsley cream sauce that includes
enough parsley to warrant the name and is properly creamy (I use a mixture
of the bacon stock and cream). It must not be a floury wallpaper paste.
Braised celery hearts, grilled fennel finished with a smidgeon of Parmesan,
and baked chicory have a lot to recommend them. Steamed green beans
scattered with fried almonds, and stoved artichokes, are other
possibilities.
Strong contenders among potato dishes include Celtic onion and potato cake;
creamy leek and potato gratin; saute potatoes; baked potatoes; and new
potatoes steamed, sliced thickly and finished with mustard seeds that have
been popped momentarily in hot oil.
Good salads include orange and fennel; cooked matchsticks of carrot with
black olives; a mixture of sliced avocado and ripe dessert pears; celeriac
remoulade; chicory and pink grapefruit with a honeyed dressing; and Waldorf.
When the joint became impossible to carve neatly, thin but ragged slices of
bacon made open sandwiches with watercress on thickly-buttered soda bread
one lunchtime.
I used rather untidy chunks for a substantial soup-cum-stew with short
lengths of leeks, carrots and broccoli and pieces of potato cooked in some
of the bacon stock. (Do not boil the meat; add it to the pot at the end,
just long enough to heat it through, and serve with a bowl of vinaigrette a
l'oeuf for adding at table.)
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3360</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Travel: The buckle of Florida's bible belt / A look at life
on the Redneck Riviera
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM BURT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SCHUBERT Miles is frightened of ostriches. Sitting on the porch of his
ramshackle farm, he pushes back his baseball cap and warns: 'Never trust an
ostrich. Their toes can kill - rip a man wide open.' At 80 years old,
Schubert is not as light on his feet as he was, so he makes sure his wife
Daisy is ready with a stick when he feeds his big African birds.
Feeding time at Miles Feather Farm, a private aviary deep in the forests of
north-west Florida, is done by the book - the good book. Daisy always says
grace before breaking the bread and pushing it into the bird cages.
Her greatest conversion is Tinker, an ageing parrot who lives in a Kentucky
whiskey barrel. He screeches 'Praise the Lord' and 'Amen' when he is fed.
Schubert rarely plucks Tinker these days; he prefers to teach him the gospel
instead.
Reciting the Lord's Prayer to a parrot may seem eccentric in a state better
known for Mickey Mouse and the Everglades, but it barely raises an eyebrow
in DeFuniak Springs, the old lumber capital of the south. This town is the
buckle of the Florida bible belt, and religious pets are nothing new.
Stretching from Pensacola on the Alabama border to Tallahassee, the state
capital, the bible belt boasts churches in all shapes and sizes - First
Baptists, United Methodists, Assemblies of God, Abundant Life Pentecostals
and Seventh Day Adventists. Roads across the region, nicknamed the
Panhandle, are lined with evangelical billboards exhorting motorists to pull
over for a service. 'Trust in God,' says one; 'Have you been saved?' asks
another.
Schubert Miles thinks he has been saved already - saved from tourism,
Florida's largest industry. State regulations protect the forests of the
Panhandle and ensure that farming and the local chicken processing plant
remain more important to DeFuniak than holidaymakers. Giving thanks,
Schubert says: 'This is God's country. Let's keep it that way.'
Even Adventures Unlimited, the only company allowed to rent canoes and
kayaks in the Blackwater Forest, gets most of its business from the Lord.
Church groups like nothing better than to canoe downriver for a weekend
retreat on a deserted sandbar.
Paddling gently through avenues of pine and cedar, you hear the church
groups before you see them. It is unnerving to recognise a chorus from
Onward Christian Soldiers wafting round a U-bend in the river; it is even
more scary to feel the eyes of a dozen devotees regarding your kayak with
horror as they spy the Budweisers weighing it down.
God, however, has lost his grip on one part of the Panhandle: the coast.
Several towns lining the seashore have put their faith in tourism and their
devotion has spawned a string of brash resorts and amusement parks. This is
the Redneck Riviera, a popular haunt for holidaymakers from Alabama and
Georgia.
The riviera has alarmed residents in the Panhandle who fear the coastline
could disappear beneath high-rise hotels and gaming arcades. Even Seaside, a
new holiday village praised by Prince Charles for its traditional
architecture, has failed to impress them. Its pastel-coloured cottages and
fine white beach may be pretty 'but where are the churches?', asks one
visitor from DeFuniak Springs.
There is no shortage of altars in the lumber town 25 miles north of Seaside.
The Baptists alone have 10 churches and their congregations command enough
votes to persuade the town council to adopt teetotal policies, such as
banning all alcohol advertising. The town's most famous baptist took the
whole state by storm. Sidney Catts, a local minister, ran for governor in
1916 as the champion of the Panhandle's farmers, nicknamed the crackers.
Campaigning with two loaded pistols, he proclaimed: 'There are only three
things you can trust in life: Sears Roebuck, the Lord Jesus and Sidney J
Catts.' He was duly elected as the 'cracker messiah'.
His individual brand of conservatism survives in DeFuniak, where he died in
1936. Sunbright Manor, his former home, has been converted to a B&amp;B but
still serves the food Sidney enjoyed: grits, ground corn in hot water and
melted butter.
Sleeping in the governor's bedroom, it is easy to understand why he always
slept with his pistols beside him. At 2am each morning an artillery barrage
opens up outside - far away at first but steadily louder until it sounds as
though war has broken out.
The cause is the adjacent Louisville and Nashville Railroad. Its nightly
freight train rumbles across the state like a mobile cannon. The noise is
terrific and the locomotive's horn sounds like an air raid siren.
The thunder dies slowly as the train heads eastward but it is often followed
by a genuine thunderclap. In the Panhandle electric storms are almost as
regular as train services. And across Florida more people are killed or
injured by lightning than in any other US state.
Towns like DeFuniak, however, have a natural storm warning - lovebugs. These
hairy insects congregate in droves before a storm but not everyone welcomes
their arrival. Their bodies are so acidic that they eat right through metal
and they have been blamed for corroding cars.
Residents in the Panhandle try all sorts of weird practises to deter them.
They fit 'car-bras' over their radiators and it is not unusual to see a
motorist massaging baby oil into his Pontiac. Lovebugs skid right off your
bonnet if it is greasy with moisturiser.
Frequent storms and the insects preceding them are not mentioned by
campaigners hoping to kickstart tourism in DeFuniak Springs. They
concentrate, instead, on the town's history as the 19th century cultural
centre of Florida when it hosted the Chautauqua arts festival.
The annual festival, held to attract Sunday school teachers, filled a
4,000-seat auditorium beside DeFuniak's perfectly round lake. But the
festival died in 1925 and with it the town's association with the arts.
The auditorium, once the largest in the South, has been demolished, but the
lake is largely unchanged and the lack of new development has left most of
the old mansions around it intact. Tourism campaigners want to open these
houses to tour groups but Father John Fowler, DeFuniak's elderly
episcopalian pastor, says 'they don't have a Chinaman's chance'.
Father Fowler blames the town council for resisting moves to attract
holidaymakers. 'This town has been taken over by a bunch of southern boobs
who haven't the faintest idea about tourism. They don't want change, they
just want religious salvation. It's a shame. Places like this will die out.'
Schubert Miles, meanwhile, shakes his head at the idea of tour buses
struggling up the rutted track to his farm. He says his faith will prepare
him for such an onslaught. Tending his confederate roses, which flower white
each morning and turn red as the day passes, he quotes his favourite psalm:
'I say to myself: 'The Lord is my light and my salvation, of whom then shall
I be afraid?' . . . only my ostriches.'
Tim Burt travelled with Northwest Airlines (tel: 0345-747800), which serves
the Panhandle with flights to Fort Walton Beach.
Further information is available from the Florida bureau of international
tourism (0101-904 488 7592); Adventures Unlimited (0101-904 623 6197); and
Seaside (0101-904 231 1320).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3361</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Travel: Once bitten by the Borneo bug
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON VAIL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SMALL BLACK ants dismembered a white moth and hauled the wings down a dark
crack in the wooden floor. Pale-bodied geckos stalked the walls of the hut,
while a generator hammered into the forest night at the foot of Gunung Mulu
mountain, the base for exploring limestone caves tucked behind the Brunei
border in Sarawak, eastern Malaysia.
The Gunung Mulu caves are among the largest in the world, but little-known
and little-explored. They lie a day's journey up the Batang Baram river from
the coastal town of Miri in northern Sarawak, although both the journey-time
and the adventure will diminish when an airstrip and multi-storey hotel open
in the Gunung Mulu National Park this year.
Tourists can already fly half-way to the caves. A 20-minute flight from Miri
to the river town of Marudi replaces a jarring three-hour trip by express
boat. VIPs and executives hire helicopters, but the rest of the population
travels through the rain forest as it always has done - up the Batang Baram
river, which follows the border with Brunei.
The express boats travel at great speeds, powered by enormous Cummins
diesels. Air-conditioned passengers recline inside a claustrophobic steel
cabin, which has only two narrow exits, usually blocked by bags, chickens,
suitcases and the odd 4 ft blowpipe.
I preferred to sit on the roof, watching the green forest roar by.
The express boat nosed into the river bank at remote logging camps, picking
up passengers and dropping off cardboard boxes of supplies, before hurtling
up the loops and whirls of the river.
Our helmsman, who peered out of a tiny cockpit at the prow of the express,
missed a stray log. It hit the hull with a bang and damaged the propeller.
The boat wallowed in the brown water until we were rescued and transferred,
in mid-stream, to another express.
The expresses travel up-river until it is too shallow. At the small
settlement of Long Panai, where a long house and huts stood in a clearing by
the river, I was bundled off the express and into a small wooden boat. Nixon
the driver gunned an enormous outboard motor and the cockleshell shot
between rocks and branches. Cold rain beat into my face and misty clouds
hung round the peaks of Gunung Mulu.
Where it is protected, virgin rain forest soars into the air, the
straight-boled trees forming a natural canopy. But where the trees have been
logged outside Sarawak's parks, a tangle of matted vegetation forms as
secondary forest - assumed by most visitors to be natural rain forest.
My guide, Richard, took me to Clearwater cave, where a very loud party of
Chinese tourists were eating lunch on raised wooden walkways. Away from the
noise and inside the looming darkness stood stalagmites and limestone
formations. Cockroaches burrowed into rock-hard piles of guano. The stench
of ammonia filled the air. Bats hung in their thousands overhead. Richard
picked up a squirming millipede and squashed it, his hand glowing from a
luminous secretion.
The caves are vast, but huge caverns like the Sarawak Chamber are only
accessible to serious cavers. At Deer Cave we left the tourists behind and
set off for the Garden of Eden. We walked for half-an-hour up and down a
wooden walkway on the floor of the cave, and scrambled over slippery
boulders. Eden was a cold river with crystal water, towering trees and a
soaring cliff face. That evening we waited for the bats to fly out from the
cave to begin their nocturnal search for food, but they weren't playing.
I returned to Miri by boat and travelled by bus to Batu Niah, 100 kms south
along the main road which follows the Sarawak coast. The Niah caves excited
great interest when its Painted Cave yielded the remains of 40,000-year-old
Homo sapiens, although the site is now sadly neglected behind a crude barbed
wire fence. Ancient orange paintings surround the remains of wooden ships of
the dead, but the wooden boats are breaking up, apparently forgotten by the
park authorities.
Official permits are solemnly issued at park headquarters, but not a guide
was to be seen anywhere on the sweaty 3 kms walk to the caves themselves. A
high steel fence bars a narrow entrance to the caves and is meant to deter
illegal nest collecting. But the gate in the fence is unlocked, and the
nests of swiftlets are collected day and night.
Young boys swarmed up flimsy bamboo poles and scaffolding to scrape the
nests from the roof of the caves. Their helpers, up to 100 m below, collect
the glutinous fragments in plastic bags. The floor of the cave was littered
with the collectors' old batteries and torch bulbs.
Modern Malaysia and the tourist industry is removing the mystery from Borneo
 -the swiftlets are almost certainly decreasing in numbers. But ancient
Borneo is not quite finished. A friendly insect fell down my shirt and
squirted burning acid on to my shoulder. A black scab formed, unalleviated
by the Axeoil potion carried by my Malaysian companion. It was the bite of
the Borneo love-bug, he said. The mark has yet to fade.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3362</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Sport: Dreams of salmon in a foreign land - Fishing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TOM FORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE is a certain species of smile, part shame-faced, part trumphant, which
is produced by undeserved and unexpected good fortune. I saw it the other
day on the face of a man I know and like who runs a first-rate tackle shop
in Reading, Berkshire. He had just returned from a week in Scotland, fishing
the Deveron, and his smile told me as much as I wished to know. At the end
of a season of drought, he had hit it just right. He and his companion had
caught 17 salmon in a week. Not bad, eh?
Indeed, I thought savagely. That's only 95 per cent more than I've caught in
my whole life. Four of my career total of nine came in one morning, and
three of those had to go back because they were late-season kippers. I felt
like gaffing him but, instead, managed a muted congratulation.
He asked me how I had fared in Ireland and an involuntary groan escaped me.
For I had just come back from a long and keenly-awaited excursion to the
Republic with nothing more substantial than a familiar and
impatiently-received tale of failure.
The contrasting experiences of my tackle-dealing friend and myself
encapsulate the swinish character of salmon fishing. He is, of course, a far
better fisherman than me. But there is more to this monstrous disparity than
that.
My friend was in Scotland; it rained; he caught fish. I was in the Republic
of Ireland; it did not rain (or not enough to do any good); I caught
nothing. That success and happiness should depend on the willingness of some
suitable weather system to drag itself in the right direction at the right
time is simply not fair. But it is the name of this particularly bloody
game.
Having had my gripe, I still insist that the reasons which took me to the
Blackwater were sound. What is more, once a new season has come round - and
assuming I have managed to ingratiate myself with a stern Providence - I
intend to go back to it. It remains my belief that, given a modicum of good
luck, it offers as good a chance of decent salmon fishing as any river to
which access is possible.
Two years ago, the 12 miles of the Blackwater owned or rented by the
Blackwater Lodge Hotel, at Upper Ballyduff in Co. Waterford, produced nigh
on 1,500 salmon. Last year, the total was 1,200. This year, it has been
rather less than a third of that. No wonder the faces in the bar were as
dark and twice as long as the pints of stout.
Being hotel water, it is fished hard. When I was there, the occasional
salmon was still being lured from the paltry flow of water, most of them on
horrible purple shrimps. A chum, who came down from Dublin to keep me
company, caused a minor stir by employing a fly to catch what was, at two
pounds, quite the smallest salmon I have ever seen.
I fished a couple of the Blackwater Lodge beats, both of them with a nice
variety of water, both of them normally full of fish. I never felt I was in
with a significant chance. I breathed the soft air, admired the cows,
enjoyed the rhythm of casting and listened to the lamentations of the
regulars. The sixth sense, the one which activates expectation of action,
was at all times dormant.
Elsewhere, the river was little disturbed by the tread of desperate anglers.
The Careysville beats at Fermoy, below the Duke of Devonshire's handsome
Georgian lodge, were untouched. At Mallow, the locals had packed it in six
weeks before to wait for the rain which never came.
It can't be as bad again, they said, and I believe them. And the time to go,
I was informed reliably, was not September but June. The small summer
salmon, the grilse, should then be running the river in numbers sufficient
to give anyone hope. And if, unthinkably, this bounty should again be
withheld, the area at least offers consoling alternatives in the
wonderfully-challenging trout fishing on the Suir and a gaggle of lesser
streams.
There is, anyway, nowhere I would rather fail to catch fish than Ireland -
and few rivers better able to offer comfort in failure than the Blackwater.
It is a grand piece of water, flowing through enchanting countryside, and
you do not have to be a plutocrat with friends in high places to fish it.
Much of it is accessible to the visitor, whether the hotel water or the
beats let by Peter Dempster Ltd from Conna, Co. Cork, or (at the top end of
the market) the Careysville fishery; all of it within an hour of Cork
airport.
The salmon fly rod is now hanging from its nail and the reel is in its bag.
The time for action and heartbreak is past, the time for dreaming is
arrived. In one of those cheering visions, I am standing with a smile quite
as triumphant as that of my friend, the tackle-dealer, with my first
Blackwater salmon at my feet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3363</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Motoring: Mercedes makes it easy - Stuart Marshall takes a
cruise in the 300 SE
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STUART MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WAS, one felt, what the planners had in mind when motorways were
invented. The A26 Reims-Calais autoroute was so peaceful that I reckon it
was carrying no more than 500 vehicles an hour when I drove along it last
week. No road could have been safer and less stressful.
Would the French police turn a blind eye to the 81 mph (130 kmh) limit being
bent just a little? I believed they might. So, I set the cruise control for
86 mph (140 kmh), at which speed the Mercedes-Benz 300SE's tachometer read
4,000 rpm precisely.
Drivers who think all motorways must be like Britain's congested M25 and M1
will find it hard to believe but I was able to hold this speed for more than
an hour. Not once did I have to touch the brake or even reduce engine power
by easing back the cruise control lever. And, no, it was not in the small
hours but the middle of the day.
The double-glazed, air-conditioned Mercedes loped along with as little
background noise as you would find in an airliner's business class. Could I
have chosen a better car to drive to Geneva and back for the motor show? I
thought not.
The new S-Class cars are big - longer than a BMW 735i, Jaguar XJ6 or Lexus
LS400 and only six inches shorter than a Rolls-Royce Silver Spirit. They are
wider inside and have a bigger boot than any of their potential rivals.
Engines range from the 300SE's 3.2-litre, 231-horsepower in-line six to
4.2-litre (286 bhp) and five-litre (326 bhp) V8s and the 600SEL's mighty
six-litre, 408 bhp V12.
Prices start at Pounds 43,700 and go up to Pounds 89,600, although this is
not the whole story. The 300SE I drove would have cost around Pounds 51,500.
Its leather seats, metallic paint, cruise control, automatic climate
control, alloy wheels and radio/tape player were extras, although such
things tend to be included as you go up-range.
From the outside, there is no way of telling a 300SE from a 400SE or 500SE.
A 600SEL stands out only because it is slightly longer. And a new S-Class
saloon does not look as big as it really is. You notice its bulk only when
driving on narrow roads, in dense traffic and, particularly, when parking in
a multi-storey.
Then, you bless the little rods (like mini-aerials) that pop-up
automatically from the rear wings when you select reverse and mark the car's
extremities. They make backing into a bay less of a problem but, with rear
bumper touching the wall, you find the front one is still up to a metre
beyond that of a lesser car parked alongside.
The 300SE rides superbly. The occasional small jolt when one of the
60-series, low-profile tyres drops into a pothole comes as a reminder that
the Mercedes is running on, not just above, the road surface. Handling, too,
is supremely good, whether on sweeping bends or the hairpins of a mountain
pass. The generously power-assisted steering is light for low-speed driving,
precise when getting a move on.
The massive seats, with the most resilient upholstery I have encountered in
any Mercedes, made the entire 1,200-mile (1,930 km) return trip to Geneva a
pleasure, never a penance. Inside, the ambience is an agreeable blend of
soft leather and wood-veneered luxury with practical controls and
traditional instrumentation. Even the clock has hands.
Driven hard, the 300SE will reach 62 mph (100 kmh) from a standstill in nine
seconds, and the top speed is said to be just over 140 mph (225 kmh). A
3.2-litre engine has to work energetically for a driver determined to
exploit an almost two-ton car's performance to the full. Kick down into
third or second on a hill and you find the in-line six is subdued but no
longer near-silent.
Mostly, I drove with an eye on the instant fuel consumption meter. Every car
should have one. The sight of the needle moving from, say, 30 mpg (9.4 l/100
km) to 10 mpg (28.2 l/100 km) during fierce acceleration when overtaking is
salutary. So is the difference between 35 mpg (8.07 l/100 km) when cruising
at 65 mph (105 kmh) and 25 mpg (11.3 l/100 km) at 80 mph (128 kmh). I was
pleased, although not too surprised, that my light-footedness was rewarded
by a consumption of 21.5 mpg (13.45 l/100 km) for the whole trip.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3364</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Sport: A sleeping giant stirs - Tennis
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARRETT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TIME FOR a trivia question: what do Hove and Newcastle have in common? Not
much, you might think. But these two important population centres, at
opposite ends of England, have recently joined 18 other UK towns and cities
where inhabitants can enjoy a relatively inexpensive game of indoor tennis
in comfortable surroundings.
In the past five years, the Indoor Tennis Initiative (ITI), a joint venture
in which grants from the Lawn Tennis Association, the Sports Council and the
All England Lawn Tennis Club have initiated an investment of Pounds 22m in
new facilities by local councils, has created 88 new tennis courts.
This brings to approximately 500 the number of public and private indoor
courts available to the UK's 57m inhabitants, an encouraging figure at first
sight. But when you discover that, by the end of 1990, there were more than
6,000 covered courts in France (population 57m), 3,265 in Germany (79m),
3,300 in Holland (15m) and 1,500 in Sweden (8.5m), you see how far behind
Britain is.
You start to understand why there are currently nine Frenchmen among the top
100 ranked men in the world as well as six Germans, six Dutchmen, seven
Swedes . . . and no Britons.
Ian Peacock, the LTA's executive director, has no doubt there is a
correlation between international success and opportunity. 'It is a numbers'
game. If tennis is to become a truly national sport in Britain, as it is
throughout most of Europe, then we must provide sufficient indoor facilities
so that every boy or girl with the talent and the ambition to succeed has
somewhere to play close to home.'
The really encouraging thing about Phase I of ITI is that all the centres
report extremely high court usage. The appointment of a development officer
at each pay-as-you-play centre, funded 50 per cent each by the LTA and the
local council, has introduced a whole new stratum of the population to the
game's joys.
Thanks to an additional injection of Pounds 500,000 from the Foundation for
Sport and the Arts (FSA) in 1992, Phase II will get off to a flying start.
If their support continues, grants totalling Pounds 10m over the next five
years will generate an investment of Pounds 30m in new facilities.
Despite their lack of cash, local authorities seem to have become aware of
the benefits of providing cost-effective centres that are both popular and
self-financing. There are seven more active schemes in the pipeline, says
Peacock. Admirable as this is, it is pitifully inadequate by comparison with
what has been going on in Europe and North America these past 30 years.
This would not be so bad if the UK had a healthy club structure. But the
2,500 private clubs affiliated to the LTA are the weakest part of the
British game.
Too many are small local clubs with too few courts where facilities are
rudimentary and juniors considered a nuisance - the sort of place where Joan
Hunter Dunn would have enjoyed a social set or two. Of the larger clubs, too
few have invested in covered courts.
Traditionally, the members have always concentrated on doubles, not singles.
That is why the country-wide support for the new National Club League, based
on the successful European model with emphasis on singles, is so heartening.
More than 2,500 men (in 600 teams) and 1,500 women (360 teams) will be
competing this year, and numbers may double within three years.
The British Tour - 22 tournaments over a 12-month period offering crucial
competition for young Britons - has been another imaginative enterprise. The
brighter home players are responding well to the challenge. No one has
grasped his opportunities better than Chris Wilkinson. This persistent
22-year-old from Southampton reached three finals on the recent British
Satellite circuit to lift his ranking from 365 a year ago to a present
career-high of 168.
Coming on top of Jamie Delgardo's victory in the Orange Bowl 14's, (the
first success by any British player in these unofficial world junior
championships), there is the unmistakable impression that a sleeping giant
is beginning to awaken.
There is a new spirit abroad, thanks to an injection of confidence from the
likes of Tony Pickard (who put the backbone into Stefan Edberg), Billy
Knight (was there ever a more courageous fighter?) and Ian Barclay (who
taught Pat how to Cash-in). Ann Jones, Olga Morozova, and now Sharon Walsh,
are having the same effect on the girls.
The structure at grass roots has never been better and is improving all the
time although Gilly Crump, new director of schools tennis for the LTA Trust,
is under no illusions about the difficulty of changing people's attitudes to
a game that still has an aura of snobbishness about it.
'There are some very good people out there, but it's a bit like being a
missionary, trying to persuade people that tennis is a game for life,' she
says. 'We are busy building the base of the pyramid.'
Undoubtedly, this is the right approach. How long it will be, though, before
tennis rivals football in popularity, as it does now in Germany and France,
is anyone's guess. The thing that would accelerate the process magically
would be the emergence of a British Borg or Becker to hold aloft the
Wimbledon singles trophy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3365</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Sport: The sheer beauty of violence - Thai Boxing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUSTIN WINTLE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHAT BEGINS as ballet finishes as all-out war. I am sitting a few feet from
the ring at the Ratchadamnoen stadium as the main bout, listed sixth on the
evening's programme, begins.
The two boxers, stick-lean and muscle-sculpted, enter their respective
corners, red and blue. Their pants are baggy. Around their heads are mongkol
 -lucky charms. They walk around the ropes, touching them and pushing their
heads against the four posts in prayer. Then they kneel on the canvas and
offer further supplications.
In particular, respect is given to their trainer-managers, and to their
ancestors; in general, to the Lord Buddha. Then they rehearse their moves.
Before withdrawing to their corners they pirouette slowly and with the
utmost grace. The referee reminds them of the rules.
Thus the bout begins, signalled by the sudden onset of music: a live
orchestra of drums, tambourines and wailing pipes sets up a pulsating
clamour, though this is apt to be drowned by the migraine-inducing cheers
and jeers of a crowd 6,000-strong.
In the early stages of the contest there is much prancing and little else.
By tradition the first round is for show only, as the two men size each
other up.
Of the two, Red, a Hat Yai man, is the more cocky and prances more
menacingly, although both tap the canvas with their bare feet in rapid
bursts. Blue is from the North-East, I-San, and is, I am told by the man
seated next to me, a specialist in elbow-work. He bides his time, lets Red
advance a little, even lets him offer two jabs with his fists and three with
his knees.
'You wait,' says my companion, Somchai Thanavong, editor of Thailand's
leading Thai boxing magazine, but better known to his readers as Khun Lek.
'Blue is preparing some beautiful moves.' Yet just as the pugilists begin to
show a serious interest in each other, the bell goes.
The second round of five, commencing after a three-minute interval, is full
of close clenches and vicious knee-jerks to the rib cage and stomach as each
struggles to contain the other's acknowledged advantages. Red won't let Blue
use his elbows, and Blue is suspicious of the length of Red's southern leg.
Meanwhile, the crowd becomes hysterical. It is hungry for beautiful - and
violent - moves. One minute into Round 3, Blue obliges. He eludes Red's
hugging arms and delivers two cracking elbow cuts to his opponent's jowl.
Red reels back and Blue seizes the moment, smothering Red's face with blows.
Red looks out of it. Briefly the referee holds Blue back to study his
features. But Red's eyebrows are still knitted in ferocious concentration,
and the fight restarts. For as long as it continues to be a fight, neither
man will once take his eyes off the other. Blue resumes the onslaught, now
bringing in his knees and feet, crunching Red's hips with dreadful
side-swipes. With the crowd now ready for the kill, the most awesome
counter-attack I have ever witnessed in any sport, Red holds his ground and
unleashes one huge kick to Blue's neck, cleaving the air in a terrible arc.
Blue has no time time to register surprise or shock. He simply drops to the
floor - and that is the end of the evening's principal bout. There are three
more fights, all of them a little scrappy but still bloody enough. One
fighter is even disqualified for 'not showing enough heart', or, as Khun Lek
puts it, for 'fighting like a Chinese opera.'
Thai boxing, which supposedly originated as a form of weaponless
self-defence, claims to be the king of manly arts. Conventional boxers can
do little against its ferocious combination of fists, elbows, knees, thighs
and feet.
In Bangkok alone there are 300-odd boxing camps, in the country at large,
several thousand. The sport is a national obsession, as well as big
business. A key element of the entertainment is to observe the frantic
placing of bets among the crowd.
A complex code of hand signals makes for an atmosphere redolent of the Tokyo
Stock Exchange at the climax of a bear market. In a few seconds many
thousands of dollars can be staked by several hundred spectators, even
though it is common knowledge that fights are regularly fixed.
It is this conjunction of aggression, skill, money and sheer noise that
makes Ratchadamnoen, built on land belonging to the royal family but run by
a private consortium, the place to be of a Bangkok night. Casinos and other
forms of gambling are outlawed in Thailand, but ringside betting is
tolerated.
Hence, in part, the sport's gigantic popularity. But there are other
reasons, too. There is the blatant physical arousal of the human cock-fight,
although style and even looks are valued by the spectators far above mere
strength. At school, every boy is expected to learn Thai boxing, so there is
a built-in universality, reinforced by the pre-fight ritual.
There is also, in a country primed on nationalism, an awareness that Thai
boxing is something the Thais themselves have created, and is thus to be
specially savoured.
At Kiat Baan Chong camp, deep in the city's north-western suburbs, I watched
a score of young males, 13 to 23, working out in an open-air gym. The
temperature was in the low 30s, and humid with it. They are expected to put
in two three-hour sessions per day seven days a week, and it is two years
before they enter a competitive ring.
First they must hone their physiques, and co-ordinate their punches with
their kicks. Girlfriends are discouraged: as Khun Lek told me: 'Too many
girlfriends destroy the legs.' The rewards, though, are rich. Boxing is a
respectable way out of poverty. At Ratchadamnoen Stadium the minimum fee is
around Dollars 400. But extra, off-the-record purses are also offered. These
can amount to Dollars 10,000, much more for championship contests. In
Thailand this is enough to live on comfortably for a year at least, even
after a 40 per cent cut has gone to the sponsoring camp. Provided he is not
injured, a boxer can fight once a fortnight.
They are in it for the money, of course; but there is another motive as well
 -animal pride, you might call it, or vanity, or male chauvinism in its
purest form, or even the pursuit of a particular kind of excellence.
'You see', says Khun Lek, 'in Thai boxing there is no distinction between
amateur and professional. To the Thai mind the idea of being an amateur at
anything is an anathema. Nor is there any room for anger, however fierce the
boxers may appear in the fourth or fifth round. If he loses control of his
emotions, a boxer is useless. And avarice is one of the emotions.'
Correction
Last Saturday, John Hopkins wrote about Dudley Wood, secretary of the Rugby
Football Union. During editing, the word 'English' was prefixed to the RFU's
name. This was incorrect.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3366</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Minding Your Own Business: It's harder starting over again -
Chris Tighe meets Rob Askew, whose strategy to save the family firm put a
strain on the family
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BUILDING a new business is hard work but restructuring a venture which,
after decades of trading, has become vulnerable can be harder still.
The path that led a graduate chemical engineer to start making Alphorn
covers for the German market was never going to be uneventful. But
unforeseen problems, personality clashes and the recession have made for a
bumpy ride since Bob Askew leapt into the unknown and joined Tyneside
Leathercrafts two years ago. The South Shields company was founded in 1937
by Eddie Brumlick, a Viennese Jew who had fled from the Nazis. It was bought
in 1960 following Brumlick's death by a friend, Albert Askew, a foreman in a
company making telephone exchange equipment. Under the management of Askew
and his younger son Rodney, who joined the business in 1971, Tyneside
Leathercrafts expanded into a substantial small company with 60 employees
and turnover approaching Pounds 1m a year. Within its speciality niche -
musical instrument covers and straps, military and marching band belts and
harnesses and upmarket sports bags and accessories - it achieved a strong
national profile. In some product areas, such as PVC musical instrument
covers, it enjoyed a virtual UK monopoly. Two years ago Bob Askew, elder son
of the by-now-retired Albert, agreed to join the business to bring to it the
management skills he had acquired setting up and running a successful
burglar alarm company after leaving chemical engineering. It seemed, he
says, that Tyneside Leathercrafts was simply too big for his brother to
manage alone. Six months later, after bitter clashes over management style
which have left them, to their elderly parents' chagrin, barely on speaking
terms, Rodney walked out. Rob says he realises that he and his brother could
never have worked together. He also admits that before committing himself he
would have appraised the company more keenly had he not been dealing with
family.
Rodney denies his brother's claim that the business was in a mess. But he
admits he had been trying to do too much at once. 'With hindsight the
company grew too quickly and too large,' he says.
The problem, says his brother, was that the business lacked the management
systems to cope with its size and 4,000 product lines. Consequently
overheads and pricing policy were out of control, delivery times awry, stock
control deficient, cash flow hand to mouth and marketing haphazard. And, he
says, some customers, disgruntled at long delays, were going elsewhere just
as the recession began hitting orders.
Compared with this the problems of fledgling companies look modest. 'If you
start up a business you can gradually grow,' says Askew. 'I had to look at
everything at once."
Staff was pruned from 60 to 25, helping to cut overheads by 50 per cent.
Product lines were cut to 1,000 to introduce a degree of standardisation.
The pricing structure was overhauled; a few prices were cut, others had to
rise.
'I put my cards on the table, I said it's a case of us going bust or we have
to charge realistic prices,' says Rob. 'A lot of our customers said they
never knew how we could charge such low prices in the first place.'
Without drastic change the business might well, he says, have succumbed to
the recession as monthly sales nosedived from Pounds 90,000 in 1989 to
Pounds 45,000 in 1991.
The company is now, he believes, on a firm footing and should make a small
profit on turnover of around Pounds 600,000 in the year to May 1992. Now his
aim is to widen the customer base, currently 95 per cent regulars, by
creating new products.
A designer recruited from Burberry has come up with a stylish range of
holdalls which are about to be marketed. Rob, a German speaker, scored an
unexpected bullseye at last year's Frankfurt Music Fair when he offered to
design and make Alphorn covers for a German distributor. Forty have been
sold so far and the US market beckons.
'Had we not had the recession I would have been sailing now; with the
recession all the measures I've taken have meant I was able to stand still,'
he says. At 44, he is working 50 hours a week for Pounds 250. He has
remortgaged his home to raise Pounds 85,000 for the business.
So has it all been worth it?
'Ask me in six months time.'
Tyneside Leathercrafts, Shaftsbury Ave/Amos Place, South Shield, Tyne &amp;
Wear. Tel: 091-455-2756.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3367</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Minding Your Own Business: A modern battle to keep museums
competitive - Nick Garnett visits the Museum of Army Transport in Beverley,
a business with a special collection of problems and advantages
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICK GARNETT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE VIEW from Teddy Penn's office window encapsulates a rather curious
contrast. The massive Early English and Perpendicular architecture of
Beverley's magnificent minster looks down on artefacts associated more with
violence than with the good of the spirit. A Saladin armoured personnel
carrier, a camouflage-green Bedford army lorry and an Army snowcat in
operational white.
In this small Humberside market town, the Museum of Army Transport looks
incongruously large. Stretched over three acres of a former tannery, two of
the acres covered in, the museum houses 120 vehicles, some captured booty
from the Gulf war and what is claimed to be the last of the largest (or at
least the fattest) production aircraft built in Britain. Surrounding the
site are miles and miles of fields and the North Sea.
'Many people thought it wouldn't survive,' says Penn who has managed the
museum since it was set up in 1982. 'They thought I was a lunatic.'
The venture not only casts light on the operational headaches of setting up
and running a museum. It also shows perhaps the only way of attracting
public funding and no-cost labour to a business project. The museum is a
company, limited by guarantee, but with charitable trust status. It attracts
Pounds 100,000 a year from Beverley council and can call on more than 60
non-paid local volunteers to supplement its paid staff of 20.
One exhibition on the supply of equipment to Russia through the Middle East
during the Second World War was researched, put together and physically
built by an unpaid volunteer. 'Museums do need to make a profit though
because they have to purchase exhibits,' says Penn. Unfortunately, the
Museum of Military Transport never has, underscoring the sometimes
precarious financing of museums.
Purchasing exhibits was not an issue when the museum started. It already had
them. Historic military vehicles had been brought together at the nearby
Leconfield army base but space was short and the former tannery site in
proved attractive. Almost all the museum's equipment, from early military
steam trains to a 1940s mobile bakery sent out on active service to the
Falklands, is still owned by the Royal Corps of Transport.
Penn, a 63-year-old former lieutenant colonel, negotiated the lease with the
development company which owned the site. The local authority payed for the
lease (Pounds 74,000 in the first full year) and the RCT loaned the
collection.
The museum's management council is composed of two people from the army, two
from the local authority and eight elected by the museum's 60 'members'.
Since the start, the Army has expressed little interest. 'It has always been
a matter of unhappiness that we haven't had Ministry of Defence
recognition.'
It took just six months to get the museum up and running even with only
Pounds 3,000 available, apart from the lease money. The now defunct
Community Programme funded by the Manpower Services Commission provided 75
people and the commission also paid for building materials.
Last year the museum attracted 100,000 people. Its total 'income' was Pounds
300,000. This included a Pounds 93,000 council grant which exactly matched
the yearly rent the museum has to fork out. Entrance fees contributed Pounds
120,000, the rest came from the museum shop (books, toys, aircraft models),
the cafeteria and space rented out for conferences and lectures.
A workshop which handles outside contracts nestles at the back of the
museum. One project is to restore Pink Panthers - garishly painted desert
Land Rovers once used by the SAS. 'You can buy a reasonable one in the UK
for about Pounds 8,000, providing you can find them because only 70 were
built,' says Wally Dugan, a volunteer restorer. 'The owner has a buyer in
the US where they sell for about Pounds 37,000.'
The Museum of Military Transport's outgoings show why small museums often
find their backs to the wall. Apart from the rent, wages soak up another
Pounds 90,000 or so. Yearly insurance premiums are Pounds 10,000, heating
and light Pounds 25,000, office costs Pounds 10,000 and advertising Pounds
25,000, mainly through regional newspapers and radio stations.
Such museums can easily tip into crisis, a point underlined by what happened
at the end of the 1980s. Penn left to run a local training company for two
years. During this period, he says, wage costs got out of hand and a
decision to put the cafeteria out to food contractors backfired when it
started racking up losses. Penn returned two years ago though he is now
working for free. He had been earning Pounds 8,000 a year as museum head,
supplementing a similar-sized Army pension.
The museum is back on an even keel in spite of the recession which has cut
customers. The total last year was about 25,000 down on three years ago. The
venture must also raise a large chunk of cash to cover-in its sole aircraft
exhibit, the dumpy Blackburn Beverley transporter.
'We have to put a hangar around it or it won't last,' says Penn. 'We've
raised Pounds 20,000 so far.' He is fond of the truncated whale shape and
the poem written about it:
'So beware you budding birdmen
Lest you drop an awful clanger
Don't fly Blackburn's pet abortion
Better try to fly the hangar.'
Penn believes the museum has a duty to restore equipment, undertake research
and provide help with the school curriculum. 'I like to think we are also a
bit of a science museum.'
He is wary of treating the venture as a hobby. 'You can get too carried
away. You know, saying it would be a lovely museum if only you didn't allow
people in.'
Penn is not an aficionado of military vehicles and enjoys running the museum
as a business rather than 'museumology' for its own sake. He has learnt a
few marketing tricks in the process - which might help him in his quest for
employment outside the museum. Takings from school trips in the shop alone
three years ago were greater than the total take from school visits last
year. In January, Penn scrapped entrance fees for school visits and school
numbers jumped by a 50 per cent.
Museums like Beverley will always suffer from one weakness. 'They are not
businesses where you can demand a high price for their products.' (Adult
entrance fees are Pounds 2.50.) But they have some advantages. 'It's like a
big family here.' A lot of fun too, especially during the live vehicle
demonstrations the museum holds in the summer. 'Finding an unused car and
rolling a tank over it is always good for a laugh.'
Museum of Army Transport, Flemingate, Beverley, North Humberside HU17 0NG.
Tel: 0482-860445.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3368</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Minding Your Own Business: Deposit protection
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A RECENT reply in Q &amp; A Briefcase (protection for a joint account) explains
how each depositor in a joint account is protected by the Building Societies
Act 1986.
Can you tell me if similar protection is offered to each joint account
holder in a) British mainland banks and b) bank and building society
accounts in Jersey and the Isle of Man covered by their own schemes?
Joint account holders in mainland banks are each covered as to 75 per cent
of the first Pounds 20,000 deposited. In other words, a husband and wife
account would be covered in respect of 75 per cent of the first Pounds
40,000, with a maximum of Pounds 30,000.
There is no deposit protection scheme in Jersey. The Isle of Man has a
similar scheme to that on the mainland, with the provision for joint account
holders the same.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3369</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Minding Your Own Business: Appealing to the taxman
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CAN YOU please give details about appealing to an independent tribunal re:
the inland revenue.
What is the address? Are there specific forms? Can more than one year be
referred to?
A free pamphlet on tax appeals (IR37) is obtainable from your tax office, or
from any convenient tax office. (The special rules for Northern Ireland were
abolished by the 1988 Finance Act, with effect from April 1989.)
Generally speaking, an appeal against an assessment should be given within
30 days of the day on which the notice of assessment is posted to you; and
should incorporate an application to postpone payment of the amount of tax
which you consider is not actually due from you; you should set out your
reasons, briefly.
On the other hand, the 30-day time limit for giving notice of appeal against
the refusal of a claim does not start to run until the notice of refusal
actually reaches you. (This inconsistency appears to have no logical basis:
you may like to ask your MP to enquire why the time limit in section 31(1)
of the Taxes Management Act 1970 is a few days shorter than that set out in
section 42(3) even ignoring the three-month time limit in the proviso to
that subsection)
Notice of appeal should generally be given to the tax office which sent you
the notice which you are appealing against. If you have not been sent an
appeal form, you can simply give notice by letter.
We are not quite sure what you mean by your third question: if you mean 'Can
appeal notices for more than one year be included on a single sheet of
paper?', the answer is Yes.
If you cannot reach agreement with the tax inspector, then it will generally
be necessary to appear before the General (or Special) Commissioners to
argue your case. In some circumstances, however, (where the point in dispute
is one of interpretation of a specific statutory provision) it may be
possible simply to submit written representations for consideration.
If the tax inspector is dilatory in responding to your notice of appeal or
subsequent correspondence, you can always take the matter out of his hands
by asking the Commissioners' clerk to put your appeal on the list for
hearing (explaining that there has been unreasonable delay by the
inspector).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3370</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Minding Your Own Business: A solicitor's paper chase
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ONCE A firm of solicitors has been paid all its fees and has issued a
receipt:
1. Can it be asked to issue all the relevant papers to the clients, not
simply a photocopy of the notice of probate being granted?
2. What papers would be involved in the case of my wife who, as sole heir,
inherited the right to purchase a council house that her late mother lived
in and nothing else since the balance of the 'estate' was negative?
3. Would the solicitors be entitled to make further charges to issue these
papers to my wife?
4. To which institution, and department, we should address any further
questions?
1. Yes: the papers should be delivered to whoever owns them.
2. Your wife would be entitled to all papers concerning the house to which
you refer and all other papers if your wife was also the residuary legatee
(ie entitled to the balance of the estate, if there had been assets which
exceeded debts).
3. We would not expect the solicitors to make a further charge on handing
over the papers, especially if your wife is prepared to collect them.
4. The Solicitors' Complaints Bureau, Portland House, Stag Place, London
SW1.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3371</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Waiting game -
Married couples
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WOMEN will have to wait to be certain that they will benefit from one of the
measures in Norman Lamont's Budget.
His proposal to allow the transferability of the married couple's allowance
has not made it into the Finance Act and so cannot become law under the
present government.
The change was not due to take effect until April 6 1993 in any case, so
there should be time for it to be enacted if the Conservatives are
re-elected. And Labour would probably implement the provision, if it wins.
Despite the introduction of independent taxation in 1990, the husband has
continued to receive the married couple's allowance - hence its description
by some working wives as the male chauvinist allowance, to use Lamont's
quip.
Under Lamont's Budget proposal, married couples would choose who should
receive the allowance, or split it equally between them. If they did
nothing, the husband would continue to receive it.
At the moment, the allowance cannot be transferred to the wife unless the
husband's income is less than his total allowances (when he would be unable
to use it). The allowance is Pounds 1,720 for the 1991-2 tax year. This rate
remains unchanged for 1992-93.
If you are a married working woman, should you elect to receive the
allowance?
The one case in which it would be clearly to your advantage to do so is if
you are a higher-rate taxpayer and your husband is being taxed at 25 per
cent. This is because the threshold at which you are taxed at a higher rate
will be raised.
Few couples are in this situation, though. Only 2.47 per cent of higher-rate
taxpayers are married women. Inland Revenue figures for 1991-92 show there
are 1.62m higher-rate taxpayers, of whom only 40,000 are wives. Many of
these are likely to have husbands who are also higher-rate taxpayers. So,
the number of couples who would find the change of material benefit to them
is small.
If, however, both husband and wife are in the same tax band, splitting the
allowance between them would mean that the base from which they are taxed
will become level. At the moment, the husband benefits more than the wife,
since he gets more tax relief. By splitting the allowance, the wife would be
better off - but it will make no difference to the couple's collective
income.
Where the husband is in a higher tax band than the wife, a couple will be
better off if he continues to receive the allowance.
The declaration can be made on a form which tax offices are expected to
issue in the summer, if the law is enacted by the new government. Wives
would be able to claim half the allowance by right. The arrangement made
would hold until another declaration was made, and the change in allocation
would take place at the start of the following tax year.
Married couples who are claiming a higher allowance because one or other is
more than 65 would only be able to transfer a maximum of Pounds 1,720.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3372</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Green light -
Customs and Excise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH and other EC citizens should be able to gain speedier passage and
carry more purchases across UK frontiers as a result of Budget proposals.
The moves come as part of an effort to harmonise Customs procedures across
the EC as part of the single European market from the start of 1993.
The red channel at customs for those with goods to declare is to be all but
abolished and replaced with what one official calls 'a green channel with a
red spot'. Spot checks on the cars of EC citizens at borders will also stop.
Private individuals will be allowed to buy any reasonable quantities of
alcohol and tobacco for their own consumption from other EC states (on which
they will have paid duty at local rates) and bring them into the UK.
Paradoxically, as a result of lobbying by the duty-free industry, duty-free
shops will continue to operate for departing passengers until 1999. Duty
free limits will remain in place until then.
At the same time, air passengers in transit may not have their baggage
searched until they arrive at their final destination. Instead of Customs
inspections at Heathrow, for example, they may take place at Manchester or
other large provincial airports, which should considerably speed processing
and reduce delays.
Non-EC citizens will still be subject to existing restrictions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3373</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Your flexible
friend - Inland Revenue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A NEW look Inland Revenue will be emerging over the coming months as the
government's Next Steps and Citizen's Charter initiatives get fully into
gear.
Some policies may be subject to change depending on which party wins the
election next month, but many developments are already in train and are
likely to proceed regardless of the outcome.
The most obvious changes beginning to appear are linked to the Revenue's
adoption of the Citizen's Charter.
For the next tax year, it is committed to dealing with 90 per cent of all
correspondence received from taxpayers within one month, and at least
acknowledging receipt of letters for the remaining 10 per cent.
From the end of April, 17 tax inquiry centres around the UK will experiment
with flexible opening hours, some starting at 8am and other closing as late
as 8pm.
A programme for redesigning leaflets and tax forms has started, and the
first new tax form - for appeals and postponements - will appear later this
year. A new style of income tax form is expected to follow by April 1993.
A more fundamental change comes with Next Steps, an ambitious restructuring
of the operations of the Revenue announced last year, which begins on April
1.
About 96 per cent of staff will pass from central control into 34 executive
agencies. The idea is to divide the operations of the Revenue into small,
focused business units, with devolved management responsibility and
accountability. Each agency will have a named 'customer service manager'
able to deal with the public.
The initiative will not be immediately obvious to individual taxpayers, but
they may benefit indirectly if the principle of improved efficiency and
administration enshrined in Next Steps works as planned.
Phase two of Next Steps, unveiled earlier this month and still under
development, would create a three-part structure of Revenue offices. There
would be a series of local 'taxpayer assistance offices', designed in a way
officials compare to a travel agency or building society, attractively set
out and located in city centres.
The offices would be staffed by employees able to offer basic advice,
provide tax forms and leaflets, and make simple amendments to tax records
such as adjusting an individual's tax code. The aim would be to allow
problems to be dealt with on the spot.
Routine administrative work would be concentrated in a limited number of
'service centres'.
The centres would both send out tax assessments and process the returns,
replacing the current system of separate tax and collection offices in tax
districts around the country. New technology should help speed work.
In the longer term, Revenue officials hope to have a single named person to
whom every taxpayer can turn to deal with their affairs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3374</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Rules on product
selling - Securities and Investment Board
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NOBODY could accuse the Securities and Investments Board of over-elaborate
stage management.
It announced measures which will profoundly alter the selling of investments
this week. When did it do this? At 11 am on Wednesday, just as John Major
was paying his visit to the Queen.
So it is not surprising that the package of measures for disclosure unveiled
by Sir David Walker, chairman of the SIB, have not received much attention.
This is a shame, as they radically alter the information available to you
when you buy an insurance product.
Now, you will have just about enough information to calculate a guesstimate
of the true cost of the policy you are buying, and to make clear the
penalties for early surrender.
You will not, however, be given as much information as the SIB intended when
it published its discussion paper in October, which means that investors
must still pore closely over the small print before reaching any decisions.
The system of 'polarisation' has been maintained, as have the requirements
on 'best advice'. So any intermediary must either be required to pick the
best product from all the companies in the market, or only offer the
products of one company.
The measures on disclosure are more complicated:
Surrender Values
SIB has stuck by its guns and requires companies to state the value you
would receive for a policy if you surrendered it after one, two, three,
four, and five years. The total value of premiums paid in at each of these
points must be stated, so you can see whether you would manage to receive
your money back.
If after year five you would still not receive as much as you had invested,
SIB requires the company to print the 'crossover' year (which can be as late
as year 12 for a 25-year endowment policy) when the surrender value is
higher than the premiums paid in.
Also, companies must print surrender value ratios in the With Profits Guide.
They do not have to show this to you, but you have the right to request it.
Do so.
The information could be invaluable. For example, if you were buying a
25-year policy, this would tell you how great a share of the final maturity
value you would receive after 24 years. If this figure is as low as 40 per
cent you should probably steer clear.
Effect of Charges
The 'Reduction In Yield' figure, showing by how many percentage points total
life office expenses would reduce a notional yield of 7 per cent for
endowments and 8.5 per cent for pensions, will now appear in a form which
non-actuaries might understand.
At present RIY produces an apparently piffling figure - for example '1.0 per
cent' means that charges would cut the yield on your endowment from 7 per
cent to 6 per cent. The SIB will now ensure that this is stated in terms of
the number of pence in the pound which would be knocked off your policy
proceeds. So an innocuous RIY of 1.0 per cent now becomes a rather more
alarming 14p in the Pounds 1. The total spread for 25-year endowments is
from 6p to 40p.
Hopefully offices near the top of this scale will soon either get their
charges in order, or cease trading.
Charges in illustrations
This is the climbdown. Offices need to reveal their own reduction in
proceeds, but in published illustrations and projections they are required
to assume that their RIP is the industry average - even if their costs are
much worse.
Projections must use a common assumption for investment yield, and the SIB's
reason for disallowing company-specific costs is that companies would then
object to not being allowed to quote company-specific investment return,
which could be misleading. With a company-specific RIP you can derive your
own projection.
Warnings
These have been toned down. At one point, the key information was to include
the words 'Warning]' in relation to the penalties for early surrender. This
was thought too pejorative, so it will now read 'BE CAREFUL]'
Status Disclosure
The phrase 'appointed agent' to describe non-independent advisers was
misunderstood. Tied agents must now call themselves 'company
representatives'.
Political risk could yet rear its ugly head. The industry has until April 30
to make comments on the proposals, which must then be passed by the Office
of Fair Trading, and by the Department of Trade and Industry, which might by
then be controlled by Labour.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3375</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): High hopes are
dashed - Inheritance Tax - I
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR MANY middle-class homeowners, inheritance tax (IHT) reform was the dog
that did not bark in the Budget. Last October, Conservative ministers
dropped heavy hints that IHT was in for sweeping reform. Speculation buzzed
that the tax could be abolished altogether, or that the threshold before IHT
is payable could be doubled from its present level of Pounds 140,000. The
tax could even have been made more progressive - at present, there is only
one rate of tax, which is 40 per cent. An extra band might have made sense.
In the event, the changes announced would be good for owners of small
businesses and farmers (see article below). But they did not appear in the
Finance Act and are unlikely to be enacted by Labour. If the Tories are
re-elected, they can be reintroduced and applied retrospectively. The
threshold before any tax is payable was raised in line with inflation to
Pounds 147,000 by statutory order. On reelection the Tories would further
increase this to Pounds 150,000, still below some pre-Budget hopes. There
may have been good political motives behind this small increase. Pressure
for IHT reform was largely caused by the house price surge which took many
middle-class families above the threshold. Now house prices are falling, the
new threshold could remove many from the IHT net. Also, the advantages of
loosening IHT would have gone to society's wealthier members - the
introduction of a lower rate income tax band was a more astute political
move. Where does this leave your IHT planning, if you have an estate in
excess of Pounds 150,000? We now know what the Conservatives intend to do to
the tax by the end of the 1992-93 tax year.
However, Labour is less equivocal than the Conservatives about its plans for
the tax. If Labour is elected, wholesale reform is unlikely in the first
year, but after this the party wants a recipient-based tax  - people would
be taxed on the basis of what they receive. At present, the tax is levied on
an estate and falls in equal proportions on those who inherit money from it.
A recipient-based tax would create an incentive to distribute wealth as
widely as possible. So the situation for estate-planners remains fluid.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3376</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Good news for
family firms - Inheritance Tax - II
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID COHEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE OF the few memorable phrases of John Major's premiership (so far) was
his vision of family wealth 'cascading down the generations.' Chancellor
Norman Lamont duly took the cue in his Budget by announcing enhanced
inheritance tax reliefs for family businesses.
The proposals were not included in the Finance Act. But if implemented by a
re-elected Conservative government, they would give a considerable boost to
the family-owned sector. However, serious tax dilemmas would remain.
Business relief reduces the value of certain business interests for IHT
purposes. The rate of relief has always depended upon the type of business
and the size of the transferor's holding in the company.
The current regime gives relief at either 30 per cent or 50 per cent. The
proposed levels are 50 per cent and 100 per cent (see table).
What would they mean in practice? Consider an entrepreneur who leaves an
estate of Pounds 1m comprising a Pounds 250,000 property and a 30 per cent
interest in the family company, worth Pounds 750,000.
Under the current system, the taxable value of the shareholding would have
been reduced by 50 per cent to Pounds 375,000, bringing down the overall
estate from Pounds 1m to Pounds 625,000 and the IHT bill from Pounds 344,000
to Pounds 194,000. The proposed changes would drop the shareholding out of
the calculation, leaving just Pounds 44,000 tax to pay on the property.
Ageing entrepreneurs have faced a dilemma: by holding on to their business
for too long, they could saddle their heirs with a tax bill that would
threaten the survival of the firm. Advisers have urged them to exploit the
exemption for gifts made at least seven years before the donor's death.
If the chancellor's plans are implemented, they will be encouraged to keep a
grip on the reins into their dotage. If an entrepreneur qualified for the
proposed 100 per cent relief, it would make no difference (from an IHT
perspective) whether he gave away the shares during his lifetime or still
held them when he died.
But IHT is not the only tax in the equation. When capital gains tax is taken
into account, the balance of advantage tilts against lifetime gifts.
A lifetime gift need not trigger an immediate CGT bill. It usually can be
'held over' from donor to donee. But this means the donee inherits the
original CGT base cost, which forms the basis for his liability when he
sells the shares. If shares are transferred out of an estate the CGT base is
uplifted to the value at the date of death.
To illustrate this, assume in the earlier example that the entrepreneur's
original investment in the company was a nominal Pounds 100; and that his
son inherits the Pounds 750,000 shareholding, disposing of it later for
Pounds 1.5m. IHT would no longer be an issue under the proposed changes, but
the CGT consequences will differ radically if the holding is a lifetime
gift.
If the son receives it during his father's lifetime, his gain will be Pounds
1,499,900 (Pounds 1.5m less Pounds 100) producing a Pounds 599,960 tax
demand. By contrast, if he inherits from his father's estate, the higher
base value will trim his taxable profit to Pounds 750,000, leaving a
liability of only Pounds 300,000. These calculations ignore indexation,
which would further skew the equation against the lifetime route.
So that settles it. No lifetime gifts of business property if the proposals
go through. Unfortunately, it is not that simple - Labour has made clear
that it would impose a tougher IHT regime if it wins on April 9.
If Labour does not win, there is still a window of opportunity to take
action. Those who have taken advantage of the business relief exemption will
not fear a future Labour government. If you trust your children, give them
the shares and let them worry about future CGT problems. If you trust the
electorate to keep voting Tory, hold on to your assets.
The chancellor is proposing only to increase the rates of business relief,
not to extend the range of assets to which it applies. So, investment
businesses and those dealing in stocks and shares or property will still be
excluded.
David Cohen is a partner in the City law firm of Paisner &amp; Co.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
INHERITANCE TAX
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Asset                   %age holding   tax relief (%)
                                             pre-Budg      post-Budg
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Interest in business             Any               50             50
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Unquoted shares               0-24.9               30             50
                              25-100               50            100
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
USM shares                    0-24.9              nil             50
                               25-50              nil            100
                            50.1-100               50            100
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Listed shares                   0-50              nil            nil
                            50.1-100               50             50
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Paisner &amp; Co.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3377</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Wheels within
wheels - Company cars
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Chancellor Norman Lamont's 1992 Budget Special has knocked flying many of
the cones which have marked out the structure of the UK car market for more
than a decade.
Car owners and operators, both business and private most of us - - now face
an unfamiliar landscape. Some companies may be considering whether to
continue providing cars for their employees.
Lamont began by cutting the 19-year-old special car tax to 5 per cent from
10; raising the excise duty on unleaded petrol and diesel fuel by the rate
of inflation (about 4.5 per cent) and that on 'dirtier' leaded fuel by 7.5
per cent; and increasing the road fund licence fee from Pounds 100 to Pounds
110.
So far, so good - not least for the motor industry, which had long
complained that car tax was responsible in part for sales having plunged to
an annual rate of 1.6m compared with a record 2.3m in 1989.
The cut does not mean a straightforward 5 per cent reduction on pre-Budget
prices, however, because it is computed on the pre-tax price less the
discount allowed to the dealer. It nets out at just over 4 per cent, or
about Pounds 400 off a small family saloon; Pounds 1,100 off a Pounds 27,000
executive car; and more than Pounds 3,000 off a Rolls-Royce Silver Spirit
(for the dwindling band still able to afford the other Pounds 96,000).
Ford, which has seen its long market leadership threatened byVauxhall,
quickly fired the first shot in what might well intensify the price war
raging already between manufacturers. It cut up to Pounds 750 off some of
its smaller models, on top of the SCT reduction. A l1-litre, three-door
Fiesta plunged to Pounds 6,230 from Pounds 7,250.
But it was Lamont's less headline-grabbing changes which are likely to prove
at least as significant as the SCT cut; not least his pledge that companies
which offer employees a cash alternative to a car will not wind up paying
VAT - as Customs and Excise has insisted previously - on salary foregone by
those who choose to keep their cars.
This is of great importance because a company running 500 cars, but offering
employees Pounds 3,000 cash instead, risked landing itself with a VAT bill
for nearly Pounds 250,000 if only one employee opted for the cash.
It is the overwhelming reason why companies have been frightened away from
pursuing cars-for-cash schemes, even though many have begun investigating
them because of last year's imposition - for the first time - of National
Insurance charges on company cars and higher VAT (which, uniquely among
business goods, cannot be reclaimed on car purchases).
Lamont's banishment of the VAT bogy could yet produce large-scale desertions
from the company car. This may depend on the consultative document - to be
published this summer - on revisions to the car scale tax charges. We know
that the intent is to scrap engine size bands, and the major price
thresholds at Pounds 19,250 and Pounds 29,000 above which individual tax
charges rise sharply, in favour of a more progressive scale linked to
vehicle price.
Stewart Whyte, a senior official of the Association of Car Fleet Operators
suggests, however, that companies should not now rush headlong into schemes
that might have their ground rules changed within the next six months.
'When you won't know one side of the equation for probably another six
months, it is clearly ridiculous for a company to jump into any new
cash-or-car schemes now,' he says.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
NEW CARS - HOW MUCH CHEAPER AFTER THE BUDGET
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                             Pre-Budget      Post-Budget      Saving
                               (Pounds)         (Pounds)      (Pounds)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Rover Metro 1.1c 5-door           7,265           6,997           268
Peugeot 405 1.9 GR               12,400          11,293           477
Rover 216 GTI 5-door             15,775          15,188           587
Ford Scorpio 2.9 24V             28,370          27,278         1,092
Mercedes 400 SEL                 55,450          53,320         2,130
Rolls-Royce Silver Spirit II     99,990          96,144         3,845
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
*Arising from reduction of special car tax to 5 per cent from 10 per
cent and consequent reduction in VAT. Car tax is assessed on
manufacturer's or importer's recommended pre-tax price less 16.66 per
cent, provided discount to dealers exceeds 15 per cent. If dealer margin
is under 15 per cent, car tax is assessedon the recommended pre-tax less
actual dealer discount.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3378</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Simpler - and
less risky - Personal Equity Plans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNIT and investment trusts at last got the concession they wanted from the
chancellor this week. Personal equity plans based on the two types of
collective investment will now qualify for the full Pounds 6,000 annual
allowance instead of the previous Pounds 3,000 limit. Although the change
was not in the Finance Act, the government used its powers to push through
this measure, which will come into force next month at the start of the new
tax year. A change in Pep rules might not win any votes but it certainly
seems one of the chancellor's most sensible moves. It seemed strange for the
government to encourage small investors to take the risk of buying a small
number of individual equities, rather than obtaining the built-in spread of
a unit or investment trust. Any trust with 50 per cent of its funds in
shares in EC member states will now qualify for the Pounds 6,000 allowance.
This will slow the stream of investment trust launches, which were designed
to take advantage of the fact that new issues were previously the only means
of qualifying for the Pounds 6,000 allowance. Why put Pounds 6,000 into a
new issue trust and pay 100p for what, after costs, could well be 95p or 96p
of assets? If you buy an existing trust on a discount to its asset value,
you can pay 90p for, say, 100p of assets and can keep all the tax
advantages. This might take some of the shine off M&amp;G's present offer for
its Recovery trust. Admittedly, investors have no less incentive to put
Pounds 6,000 into the trust to cover this year's Pep allowance. But the
incentive to put in a further Pounds 6,000 to cover the 1992-93 Pep
allowance is much reduced.
There might also be a decline in the popularity of managed Peps where
stockbrokers or other plan managers pick a Pounds 6,000 portfolio of shares
for investors.
Performance records for such Peps are difficult to come by, unlike unit and
investment trusts where statistics are available widely. 'It will make
comparing performance a lot easier,' says Roz Barder of Chase de Vere.
Nor will there be much need for the 'top-up' Peps in which a sprinkling of
blue chips was added to a Pounds 3,000 holding in a unit or investment trust
to make full use of the Pounds 6,000 allowance.
'I expect a lot of managers will just offer a full Pounds 6,000 unit or
investment trust Pep and not bother with shares,' says Barder.
The change will also simplify the over-complicated Pep rules. There will in
future be only three annual limits: Pounds 6,000 for the vast majority of
Peps; Pounds 1,500 for 'non-qualifying' unit and investment trust Peps
(those with less than half their funds in EC member states); and Pounds
3,000 for the single company plan, which can be taken out in addition to
another Pep.
Sadly, this still means that the biggest investment trust, Foreign &amp;
Colonial IT, will qualify for only a Pounds 1,500 allowance because of its
heavy non-EC weighting. But investors will now be able to put Pounds 6,000
in Foreign &amp; Colonial's German Investment trust and its Eurotrust.
Other unit and investment trust companies were quick to announce their plans
to take advantage of the Budget change.
SGTR (Societe Generale Touche Remnant) said at least three of its unit
trusts would be on offer: European Special Situations, General Growth and
Income Growth. Schroders said it would offer a 1992-93 Pep allowing
investors to put Pounds 6,000 into up to three of a range of six trusts.
Fidelity will be offering nine Peps, each linked to a unit or investment
trust. None will have any additional charges, and Fidelity will not make a
charge for accepting transfers of existing Peps.
The nine trusts are UK Growth, Special Situations, Recovery, Growth &amp;
Income, Income Plus, European, 1992 European Opportunities, European Values
Investment and the International Pep.
Fund managers' reaction to the Budget generally was positive with Philip
Warland, director-general of the Unit Trust Association, describing it as 'a
great boost for the industry.' In recent months, the stream of investment
trust new issues had rather left unit trusts on the sidelines.
There could be benefits for investors, too. Haydn Green, of the
Nottingham-based Pep Shop, says: 'Extending the unit trust limit to Pounds
6,000 will enable unit trust management groups to reduce their costs
substantially.
'Our initial feedback indicates that very many unit trust groups are
prepared to reduce their bid-offer spreads to under 1.5 per cent, providing
the broker cedes his commission. After April 6, front-end loads will rapidly
become a thing of the past as far as Peps are concerned.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3379</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Win some . . . -
Charities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE is at least one sense in which this was a 'giveaway' Budget: the
chancellor made it slightly easier to give to charity. However, as the most
important measures then failed to appear in the Finance Act, he has shown
that what can be given can be taken away.
Measures for charities must now be regarded as plans only, to be enacted if
the Conservatives are re-elected. But if you want to give money to charity
tax-free, and would rather not do so through a regular covenant, it is worth
being reminded of the gift aid regulations.
At present, you must give Pounds 600 to a registered charity before
qualifying for gift aid relief. The Budget proposals did not reach the
Finance Act but, if passed in due course, this limit would be reduced to
Pounds 400 from July 1, which should bring the scheme within the comfortable
reach of many more people.
Under the proposals, gifts to charitable groups would be treated as net of
basic-rate tax. In other words, a Pounds 400 donation would be viewed as if
you had paid Pounds 533.33; the charity could then claim tax relief at 25
per cent (Pounds 133.33). Top-rate taxpayers could reclaim for themselves
the 15 per cent difference (Pounds 79.99) between basic and top rates. So, a
top-rate taxpayer could give Pounds 533.33 to charity for a net outlay of
Pounds 320.01.
Charities are happy that the limit could come down, as this should increase
donations. A Pounds 400 limit would still be sufficiently high not to deter
donations made by covenant.
Michael Brophy, director of the Charities Aid Foundation, said: 'The
reduction in the minimum limit for gift aid payments will lead to a
substantial increase in the number of people able to use this scheme. We
estimate that the effect will be to increase donations under gift aid from
the present level of Pounds 200m per year to something in excess of Pounds
300m - a net gain of at least Pounds 100m to charities.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3380</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Headline news -
Directors' Transactions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS MACDONALD, Directus Ltd
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THIS WEEK'S table contains information on deals done in the previous
fortnight, after space constraints squeezed out the table last Saturday.
Headline Book Publishing came to the market just under a year ago and the
shares have comfortably outperformed the FT-A All-Share Index since. The
maiden final results, announced in mid-February, were better than market
expectations, but the sales by the chairman and finance director follow a
large sale by the managing director.
Between September 1990 and February 1991, a large number of purchases were
made by directors of Fairway (London), a specialist stationer, at prices
between 45p and 49p. Recent final results revealed another increase in
profits and earnings and board member Richard Seamer has sold a total of
200,000 shares at between 62p and 65p. He still retains more than 1.5m.
Gold Greenlees Trott, the advertising agency, has become one of the classic
examples of how well directors time their dealing. Gold and Greenlees, the
joint chairmen, sold about 700,000 shares back in February 1989 when the
price stood at around 285p.
From there, the advertising industry slid into recession and the shares fell
steeply. They returned to the market in December 1990 and January 1991,
buying 233,000 shares between then at prices between 63p and 70p. A little
over a year later, Michael Gold is taking some profit, selling 100,000
shares at 223p. A non-executive colleague, Robert Bayley, also took the
opportunity to sell, reducing his holding by 30,000 at the same price.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
DIRECTORS' SHARE TRANSACTIONS IN THEIR OWN COMPANIES (LISTED &amp; USM)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                               No of
Company                Sector       Shares       Value       directors
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
SALES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Applied Hologr'cs        Misc        8,000          10           1
Argyll Group             FdRe       46,215         145           1*
Bass                     Brew       76,367         425           2*
Boots                    Stor      148,500         703           5*
Courtalds                Chem       40,000         215           1*
Courts (Furnishers)      Stor        5,000          16           1
Dalgety                  FdMa        3,500          14           1
Fairway (London)         Misc      200,000         127           2
Fleming Ent IT           InTr       10,892          15           1
Fleming Fledg IT         InTr        6,976          17           1
Gold Greenlees Trt        Med      130,000         290           2
Greenalls                Brew       18,241          69           2
Headline Book Publ        Med      248,540         430           2
Heath (Samuel)           Misc      105,000          87           1
Low &amp; Bonar              Pack        5,000          13           1
Lowe (Robert H)          Text      250,000          25           1
Macro 4                  Elns       70,000         305           1
Marks &amp; Spencer          Stor      165,811         528           2*
Mercury Asset Mgmt       OthF      205,000         712           3*
Sainsbury (J)            FdRe        3,000          12           1
Securicor 'A' Ord        Tele       57,500         346           2
Securicor 'A'Non Vt      Tele       50,000         303           1
Shiloh                   Text       12,000          14           1
Syltone                   Eng       40,000          99           1
Vodafone                 Tele       40,500         147           1*
Watmoughs nil paid        Med      192,853          96           5
Whitbread                Brew      220,400         996           1*
Wolv &amp; Dud Brew          Brew        5,000          28           2
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
PURCHASES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Aberforth Split          InTr       52,000         118           1
API Group                Pack       20,000          29           1
Burton Group             Stor      150,000          57           3
Electric &amp; Gen IT        InTr       50,000          62           1
Life Sciences Int        Hlth       25,000          43           1
Merchant Retail Grp      FdRe       50,000          10           1
Park Food                FdRe       50,000          57           1
United Energy             O&amp;G       30,000          10           1
Wheway                    Eng      200,000          39           2
Wickes                   BdMa       30,000          21           1
Williams Holdings        OthI      110,000         343           3
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Value expressed in Pounds 000s. Companies must notify the Stock Exchange
within 5 working days of a share transaction by a director.  This list
contains all transactions, including the exercise of options (*) if 100%
subsequently sold, with a value over Pounds 10,000. Information released
by the Stock Exchange 24 Feb-6 March 1992.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Directus Ltd, Edinburgh
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Key to sectors: BdMa = Building Materials; Brew = Brewers &amp; Distillers;
Chem = Chemicals; Elns = Electronics; Eng = Engineering - General; FdRe
= Food Retailing; Hlth = Health &amp; Household; InTr = Investment Trusts;
Med = Media; Misc = Miscellaneous; O&amp;G = Oil &amp; Gas; OthF = Other
Financial; OthI = Other Industrial Materials; Pack = Packaging; Stor =
Stores; Tele = Telephone Networks; Text = Textiles.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3381</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): New bond fills a
gap - National Savings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WITH the chancellor planning to double the public sector borrowing
requirement to Pounds 28bn, National Savings will launch a new product from
July to increase its contribution to government funding.
The guaranteed growth bond will offer fixed rates of interest guaranteed for
only one year at a time, although there will be no set limit to the life of
the bond. This is a departure for National Savings, as its fixed-rate
certificates and bonds normally require investors to hold the products for
five years to qualify for the maximum returns.
National Savings says the new bond is aimed at basic-rate taxpayers to fill
a gap in its product range. Interest will be added to the bond annually
after tax has been deducted at the basic rate.
Non-taxpayers will do better with income or capital bonds both of which pay
interest gross, while higher-rate taxpayers will be more attracted to
National Savings certificates which are paid free of income or capital gains
tax.
The minimum holding for the new bond will be Pounds 1,000, with a maximum of
Pounds 250,000. Investors can hold the bond for more than a year if they
like the sound of the next annual fixed rate. But they will be penalised if
they cash-in the bond before the year is up or between years, probably
through a reduced rate of interest.
National Savings says that those who fall into the new 20 per cent tax band
will have to claim back from the Inland Revenue the 5p in the pound extra
tax paid. This will affect those who rely solely on investment income, since
those in employment will have already had their first Pounds 2,000 of income
taxed at 20p in the pound through pay-as-you-earn.
The guaranteed growth bond is the second new National Savings product in as
many years after the launch last July of the children's bonus bond.
The Budget makes another change to National Savings: the limit on the
maximum holding of income bonds is lifted from Pounds 25,000 to Pounds
50,000 from next month (the exact date will be announced later). The minimum
investment of Pounds 2,000 remains unchanged; income bonds are sold in
multiples of Pounds 1,000.
National Savings contributed Pounds 2.26bn to government funding in 1991-92,
up from Pounds 1.35bn the year before. It is likely that other changes -
such as raising the ceiling on other holdings - may take place in order to
increase this contribution.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3382</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): BES - The basics
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
You can invest up to Pounds 40,000 in business expansion scheme companies in
each tax year. Tax relief is available at your top marginal rate of income
tax, provided you hold the investment for at least five years. Thus, a
top-rate taxpayer will receive a rebate worth 40 per cent of his original
investment.
BES companies can either invest in trading companies (for which there is a
total limit for subscriptions of Pounds 750,000) or in assured tenancy
rental
accommodation (up to a maximum of Pounds 5m). Some 'buy-back' companies
acquire property on behalf of a second party (usually a housing association
or university) with a covenant from the second party to buy back the
property at a fixed price after five years. Some of these companies also
arrange financing for the 'buy-back,' which should further reduce risk. Exit
at the end of five years can otherwise often present a problem, but capital
gains tax is not payable.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3383</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Beware the 'quick
buck' hard sell - Business expansion scheme
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ABOLITION OF the business expansion scheme could, perversely, mean a 'double
whammy' boost for BES sponsors. There is no mention of the scheme in the
Finance Act, but at least there is now no doubt as to the intentions of a
future Conservative government.
Chancellor Norman Lamont could have abolished the scheme with immediate
effect - an option still open to an incoming Labour chancellor. Instead, he
extended its life for two more tax years by announcing that it will last
until the end of December 1993.
This should allow the industry to raise plenty more funds before the
deadline while also claiming - with some legitimacy, for a change - that
investors should 'buy now while stocks last.'
Not only this, but Lamont also decided, against expectation, not to abolish
the 'buy-back' covenanted return companies. Dismissed by one commentator as
'arbitraging the taxman,' these schemes are thought by many to offer too
generous a tax incentive for the social benefits they delivered. But they
will survive.
Indeed, Lamont wants to open the way - if the Conservatives are re-elected -
for housing associations to use the schemes for 'mortgage rescue'. In other
words, they will buy accommodation which would otherwise have been
repossessed by a lender, and then rent it to the previous owner as a tenant.
Two such schemes - one sponsored by Johnson Fry for the Bedfordshire
Pilgrims Housing Association, and another by Smith &amp; Williamson for The
Mortgage Corporation - already have provided a 'rescue' for homeowners in
arrears with their mortgages. These involved tortuous legal arrangements, as
BES companies were not allowed to buy properties where the tenant was known
in advance.
They do, however, have more obvious social worth than companies which buy
properties after they have been repossessed. They should, therefore  - as
Graham Cox, BES manager of Sun Life, points out - be a rather easier 'sell,'
both to housing associations and to wary customers.
Small wonder, then, that BES sponsors greeted the news of their impending
demise with ill-concealed glee. They even have 21 months to look for new
areas of business.
Charles Fry, chairman of Johnson Fry, was delighted by the news. He said it
made the position clear for all parties and added: 'I welcome what the
chancellor has done. It makes a lot of sense, and we look forward to the
next 18 months and raising a lot more money.'
Fry predicted a 'double whammy' sales bonanza for next year, caused by a
rush to take advantage of tax incentives at the end of the 1992-93 tax year
and also at the end of December 1993. He suggested that new sponsors might
enter the market, as buy-back deals are simple to put together and are
unlikely to tarnish the reputation of a big investment house with a loss.
Sun Life has operated in the BES assured tenancies market since 1988 while
John Govett, a unit and investment trust manager, launched into the BES
market last autumn.
Other mainstream fund managers came close to making a similar move for this
tax year, but were deterred by the political risks. Now, the temptation of
the BES 'assured exit' market will be all the stronger.
Last year, such schemes accounted for 75 per cent of the total Pounds 255m
raised by the scheme (up from Pounds 165m the previous year). According to
Anthony Yadgaroff, of the Allenbridge Group, funds raised so far in the
present tax year amount to Pounds 280m, of which Pounds 235m has gone to
'assured exit' schemes.
Good news for the sponsors. But is it good news for investors? Probably not.
Some of those entering the market will be strong and reputable. Others might
be looking for a 'quick buck.'
The supply of rental accommodation is finite, and investors will need to be
wary as the scheme lives out its last few months. In particular, look at the
condition of the housing market. If it remains depressed, then there must be
some long-term doubts over the ability of housing associations to pay back
to investors their full covenanted amount.
Then, there is the old scare about Labour. The April 9 election date, just
catching the beginning of the next tax year, provides a window of
opportunity for 'buy now while stocks last' tactics. Sponsors are likely to
open schemes for investment on April 6 and then allot shares on April 9.
Barring a wholesale break with convention, a Labour government could not
remove the tax relief retrospectively.
BES business could be brisk if Labour enters the last week of the campaign
doing well in the polls, as the party is likely to abolish the assured
tenancy BES. But it is dangerous to take a rushed decision to go into a
speculative investment. Also, if you are worried by Labour, it might not
make sense to lock your money away for the entire term of the government,
during which higher taxes would squeeze your income.
Abolition of the assured tenancy BES is fixed by legislation for the end of
next year in any case, but abolishing the BES for trading companies at the
same time needs legislation after the election. This part of the scheme has
dwindled since the introduction of assured tenancies. But some believe the
move could cut off a source of funds for small companies, and had hoped the
scheme would continue.
Tim Villiers, chief executive of the BES Association, condemned the move as
'throwing out the baby with the bathwater.' He added: 'I think it's
astonishing to cut out private investors completely in an area where
corporate investors have been so reluctant to come forward.'
This leads to the supreme irony that one section of the venture capital
industry, at least, favours a Labour policy actively. BES financiers are
profiting already from fears among small investors that a Labour government
would abolish the scheme for rental accommodation. But Labour also has plans
for a regionally-based 'growing business scheme' which could offer the BES
industry a lifeline. Villiers said: 'Labour would now seem to be looking
towards the funding needed for small companies rather more clearly than the
Conservatives are.'
John Harrison, of Investment and Tax Publishing Services, also attacked the
chancellor's assertion that the venture capital industry could cover
business venture funding. He pointed out that this was focused on management
buy-outs, targeted usually at funding of more than Pounds 500,000. He said
there could be a serious equity gap below Pounds 500,000.
And, finally: what should you do in 1994 if you still hate paying tax?
Enterprise zones could continue to provide shelter - if you are particularly
keen on investing in Motherwell or Sunderland. There are also many dark
comments that something similar to the BES will need to be invented to boost
smaller companies. But the Budget also suggested another loophole at which
the boffins will be looking very carefully in the months to come. Invested
in any good films lately?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3384</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BAT Industries, the tobacco and financial services conglomerate, is expected
to report a 9 per cent increase in annual pre-tax profits to about Pounds
1.05bn on Wednesday.
Eagle Star, its insurance subsidiary, is still suffering heavy losses on its
domestic mortgage indemnity business. Analysts will be interested to hear
how higher premiums are affecting other underwriting business - for motors,
buildings and house contents. However, the final dividend should benefit
from the strength of the tobacco business, which is enjoying increasing
market share in the US and higher prices in Brazil.
Guinness is expected to produce another creditable set of figures on
Thursday. Forecasts of pre-tax profits for 1991 range from Pounds 947m to
Pounds 970m, the top end representing 15 per cent growth in the year. The
rate has slowed, though, from 23 per cent in 1990 and 33 per cent in 1989.
Shareholders will be rewarded with a dividend increase of about 12 per cent
on last year's total of 9.7p.
WPP, the world's largest marketing services group, is likely to unveil on
Monday a halving of pre-tax profits for 1991 to about Pounds 45m. Revenues
are likely to be down slightly to Pounds 1.26bn (Pounds 1.2bn). Staff levels
have been trimmed by 8 per cent during the year.
WPP is believed to have been seeking additional financing of some Pounds
100m from its bankers, who are interested in seeing some disposals,
particularly of the US agency Scali McCabe Sloves.
Guardian Royal Exchange on Thursday will follow the loss-making trend of the
insurance sector. Forecasts range up to Pounds 250m for 1991 compared with a
year-earlier loss of Pounds 157m. Some analysts believe it will maintain its
11.9p total dividend for the year but that cannot be taken for granted after
Royal Insurance's decision to omit its final.
Wimpey is expected to turn in on Tuesday a loss for the year ended December
of around Pounds 20m against pre-tax profits of Pounds 43.3m a year earlier.
The final dividend is likely to be cut to make a total for the year of 8p
(10.5p).
Against the backdrop of the deep construction industry recession, Wimpey
will take a Pounds 12m provision on its Channel Tunnel involvement plus
write-downs on land and property.
Although Delta, the electrical cables and engineering group, has a
reputation for limiting the damage of recession, pre-tax profit in 1991 is
expected to be nearly 30 per cent down at between Pounds 60m and Pounds 65m.
It has not been able to buck the UK trend, although its cashflow performance
is thought to have been strong. Delta has for some time been looking to
acquire, possibly to build up its US presence and its safety-related
business. A strong balance sheet and healthy share-price performance gives
it considerable scope.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
COMPANY NEWS SUMMARY
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
TAKE-OVER BIDS AND MERGERS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
               Value of              Price        Value
Company         bid per    Market   before       of bid
bid for         share**   price**      bid  Pounds ms**  Bidder
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
              Prices in pence unless otherwise indicated
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Lawrence (W)  52 1/2      52         23       25.54      Raine Inds.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Macarthy          365++   344        321      100.46     Lloyds Chemists
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Polymark Intl      37*     36         34        4.33     Polyfinance
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Do. Pfd. A    164 1/2*    163        131        5.08     Polyfinance
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Steetley      391 1/2     382        274      611.83     Redland
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Taveners          165*    160        130        4.77     Toms Fabrikker
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Wilkes (J)   151 1/2     163        177       26.69     Petrocon
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
*All cash offer. ????Cash alternative. +For capital not already held.
Unconditional. **Based on 2.30pm prices 13/3/92. ??At suspension.
++Shares and Cash.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3385</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance and the Family (The Budget and You): Lamont's
winners and losers
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
How will the Budget affect you? To help answer the question, Philip Coggan
and Scheherazade Daneshkhu asked Michael Bishopp and Clive Mackintosh, of
accountancy group Price Waterhouse's executive &amp; benefit services division,
to produce the following case studies.
They show how people will be affected by Norman Lamont's measures, many of
which passed through the Commons yesterday. Some might be repealed if there
is a Labour government, or a hung Parliament; others, such as the indexed
age allowances, are likely to remain.
TED HARKER is in his early 70s and living on a modest pension, plus income
from savings he accumulated while working. His total income is Pounds 15,000
(see table right). He is single, with no mortgage, and indulges moderately
in alcohol and cigarettes.
He benefits from the new 20 per cent band of income tax, on the first Pounds
2,000 of his taxable income. This will save him, like most other people,
Pounds 100 a year.
Ted also gains from the indexation of the age allowance. Those in the age
band 65-74 receive an allowance of Pounds 4,200 in 1992-93, compared with
Pounds 4,020 in 1991-92. However, Ted's allowance is reduced by Pounds 400,
because his income is Pounds 800 more than the new Pounds 14,200 threshold
for 'clawback' of age allowance. Clawback reduces the allowance by Pounds 1
for every Pounds 2 income exceeds the threshold.
This still leaves Ted much better off than in 1991-92, when the level at
which clawback started was Pounds 13,000, meaning that that he lost Pounds
1,000 of his allowance.
Compared with 1991-92, Ted saves Pounds 226 in tax. Even though he must pay
an extra Pounds 17 a year (33p a week) in excise duty, he is still Pounds
209 a year (Pounds 4.02 a week) richer. His net income has risen by 1.8 per
cent.
Had Ted earned Pounds 10,000 in total, his gains would have been reduced,
because he would not have the benefit of the increase in the age allowance
clawback threshold. His net gain would have been only Pounds 128 a year, or
Pounds 2.46 a week.
Pensioners who abstain from alcohol and tobacco will obviously do better out
of the Budget than Ted; those who consume more heavily will do worse. For
full details of the changes in age allowances for single and married
couples, see the table on Page II.
BEVERLEY Williams is a young, single woman earning Pounds 15,000 a year, and
living in rented housing. She is a moderate drinker, and has the odd
cigarette.
The Budget means that her income tax bill is reduced by Pounds 137.50 a
year. She gains from the introduction of the 20 per cent band on the first
Pounds 2,000 of her taxable income - a boost of Pounds 100 a year, or Pounds
1.92 a week. (See table right.)
A further reason for the cut in Beverley's tax bill is the increase in her
personal allowance from Pounds 3,295 to Pounds 3,445. That lifts her income
by another Pounds 37.50 a year, or 72p a week.
From April 5 she will also gain from a measure announced in the chancellor's
Autumn Statement. The base at which she starts paying National Insurance
contributions was increased from Pounds 52 a week to Pounds 54 a week. That
reduces her NI bill by Pounds 8 a year (15p a week).
The only real bad news in the Budget for Beverley is that her vices will
cost her more. Extra excise duty on alcohol and cigarettes will push up her
expenditure by Pounds 17 a year, or 33p a week.
The net effect is to reduce Beverley's total outgoings by Pounds 128.50 a
year, increasing her 'free income' from Pounds 10,313 to Pounds 10,441.50, a
net increase of 1.2 per cent. She is Pounds 2.47 per week better off.
DAVID Wallace and Caroline Campbell live in a house they bought together in
1989. They have a Pounds 50,000 mortgage, of which interest on the first
Pounds 30,000 is subject to relief under MIRAS. They both work for a
building society, earning Pounds 12,500 a year apiece.
David and Caroline are health conscious, and do not drink or smoke, and so
gain most from the Budget changes. Each prospers from the introduction of
the 20 per cent band, which saves the pair Pounds 200 a year in tax, and
from the increase in the single person's allowance, which benefits the
couple to the tune of Pounds 75 per annum. They do not, of course, receive
the married couple's allowance.
Their National Insurance charge also falls, by Pounds 15 a year between
them, as a result in the increase of the base level announced in the Autumn
statement.
There was no change in the MIRAS ceiling in the Budget. However, David and
Caroline will see a slight benefit. MIRAS relief will still be granted at 25
per cent on their interest payments, despite the fact that part of the
couple's income will henceforth be taxed at 20 per cent.
Overall, their outgoings will be reduced by Pounds 290 in the 1992-93 tax
year, a saving of Pounds 5.58 a week. Their net income, after mortgage
payments, will rise from Pounds 13,127 to Pounds 13,417, an increase of 2.2
per cent.
FIONA and Peter Elsworthy are married and have two children. Fiona is the
main breadwinner. She earns Pounds 40,000 a year as a solicitor and has a
company Golf GTI which completes the year with a business mileage of under
2,501 miles.
Peter, a librarian, earns Pounds 10,000. They have a Pounds 50,000 mortgage,
on which interest relief on the first Pounds 30,000 is available under
MIRAS. They both enjoy the occasional glass of wine or beer.
As a result of the Budget, both will pay less income tax because of the new
20 per cent band and the rise in personal allowances. Peter saves Pounds
137.50 a year as his tax bill drops from Pounds 1,246 to Pounds 1,109.
Fiona saves slightly more tax - Pounds 160 - because the rise in the
personal allowance delays the point at which she starts paying higher rate
tax. However, she cannot claim the married person's allowance until 1993.
Since she is the higher rate taxpayer, the two would have saved a further
Pounds 258 had Fiona been able to claim the Pounds 1,720 allowance on top of
her personal allowance.
The couple benefits from a rise in child benefit for the children, up from
Pounds 871 to Pounds 907, as a result of the Chancellor's Autumn Statement.
However, they spend an extra Pounds 17 in excise duties on drinks, and Fiona
has to pay an extra Pounds 84 in tax for her company car. The increase in
scale charges and petrol benefit means she will have to pay Pounds 1,914
instead of Pounds 1,830 for her Golf. She will also see an increase in her
NI contributions from Pounds 1,636 to Pounds 1,699. Luckily, Peter's NI
contributions drop by Pounds 8 to Pounds 703. The ceiling on NI
contributions will be raised from Pounds 390 a week to Pounds 410 a week
after April 5, as result of the Autumn Statement last year.
Peter and Fiona's net income after these changes has increased by Pounds 177
or Pounds 3.40 a week, a rise of around 0.6 per cent.
JAMES and Henrietta Hamilton are married with grown up children who have now
left home.
James earns Pounds 90,000 a year as the director of a trading company.
Henrietta does not work but enjoys an income of Pounds 10,000 a year from
shares and building society deposits.
James has a Jaguar from his company but hardly uses it for business. This
couple is the only example of people losing from the Budget.
The changes mean that both pay less income tax. James's tax bill falls by
Pounds 160 (see table below left) because of the rise in personal allowances
and the new 20 per cent band.
Henrietta's tax saving is smaller, at Pounds 137, although a greater
proportion of her income. Their collective tax saving is Pounds 297. The
introduction of the new 20 per cent tax band accounts for Pounds 200 of this
and the rest is due to the increase in their personal allowances.
On the downside, James's National Insurance contributions have increased by
Pounds 63 to Pounds 1,699, because of the Autumn Statement rise in the
contributions ceiling.
The increase in car benefit scales and petrol benefit charges means that his
Jaguar is now costing him Pounds 5,956 in tax instead of Pounds 5,700 to run
 -an addition of Pounds 256 a year. The couple enjoy malt whisky and the odd
Chateau Margaux though neither smokes. The increase in their excise duty
bill is Pounds 34 a year.
The reason they are worse off after the Budget, despite the introduction of
the new 20 per cent band, is that the reduction in income tax is not enough
to compensate for the rise in duty on alcohol, the company car scale rates
and his National Insurance contributions. The total increase in cost to
James and Henrietta is modest, at Pounds 56 a year, or Pounds 1.08 a week.
The change will hardly ruin them - the fall in their net income is just 0.1
per cent.
And if James had owned his own business - a trading company worth around
Pounds 1m - there would have been an inheritance tax bill of roughly Pounds
200,000 to pay on the shares when he died. If the Conservatives are
re-elected and the Budget proposals on IHT are enacted, the whole of the
business will be exempt from the tax.
 -------------------------------------------------------------
OLD AGE PENSIONER
 -------------------------------------------------------------
                               1991-92       1992-93
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Income                          15,000        15,000
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Outgoings Tax                    2,926         2,700
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Alc &amp; cigs                         600           617
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Tot costs                        3,526         3,317
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Free inc                        11,474        11,683
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Total gain                               Pounds 4.02pw
 -------------------------------------------------------------
 -------------------------------------------------------------
SINGLE EARNER
 -------------------------------------------------------------
                               1991-92       1992-93
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Income                          15,000        15,000
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Outgoings Tax                    2,926         2,788
 -------------------------------------------------------------
NIC                              1,161         1,153
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Alc &amp; cigs                         600           617
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Tot costs                        4,687         4,558
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Free inc                        10,313        10,442
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Total gain                               Pounds 2.47pw
 -------------------------------------------------------------
 -------------------------------------------------------------
COUPLE LIVING TOGETHER
 -------------------------------------------------------------
                               1991-92       1992-93
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Income                          25,000        25,000
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Outgoings Tax                    4,602         4,327
 -------------------------------------------------------------
NIC                              1,871         1,856
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Mortgage                         5,400         5,400
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Tot costs                       11,873        11,583
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Free inc                        13,127        13,417
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Total gain                               Pounds 5.58pw
 -------------------------------------------------------------
 -------------------------------------------------------------
MARRIED WITH CHILDREN
 -------------------------------------------------------------
                               1991-92       1992-93
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Income
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Husband                         10,000        10,000
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Wife                            40,000        40,000
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Chd ben                            871           907
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Total                           50,871        50,907
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Outgoings
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Husb tax                         1,246         1,109
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Wife tax                        11,127        10,967
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Mortgage                         5,400         5,400
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Car                              1,830         1,914
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Alc &amp; cigs                         600           617
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Husb NIC                           711           703
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Wife NIC                         1,636         1,699
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Tot costs                       22,550        22,409
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Free inc                        28,321        28,498
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Total gain                                      3.40pw
 -------------------------------------------------------------
 -------------------------------------------------------------
HIGH EARNERS
 -------------------------------------------------------------
                               1991-92       1992-93
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Income
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Husb sal                        90,000        90,000
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Wife inc                        10,000        10,000
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Total                              100K          100K
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Outgoings
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Husb tax                        30,439        30,279
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Wife tax                         1,676         1,539
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Car                              5,700         5,956
 -------------------------------------------------------------
NIC                              1,636         1,699
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Alc &amp; cig                        1,200         1,234
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Tot cost                        40,651        40,707
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Free inc                        59,349        59,293
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Loss pw                                  Pounds 1.08
 -------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Price Waterhouse
 -------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3386</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Forget the big
motor - Diary of a Private Investor
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
By Kevin Goldstein-Jackson
ALTHOUGH a number of things in Norman Lamont's Budget were commendable, it
was not enough to make it a 100 per cent guarantee of a Conservative victory
at the general election on April 9. However, the introduction of a 20 per
cent rate of tax on the first Pounds 2,000 of taxable income is a good hook
with which to catch voters, especially with the lure of further reductions
in income tax in the future.
The proposals for extra support for poorer pensioners should be especially
welcome. Pensioners on income support will receive an increase of Pounds 2 a
week for single people and Pounds 3 for pensioner couples.
As a private investor, I was rather disappointed that the capital gains tax
threshold will be increased only from Pounds 5,500 to Pounds 5,800. This is
less than was available in 1987/88 to single investors, who could then make
capital gains of Pounds 6,600 before being taxed.
Although married couples later were given their own individual capital gains
tax allowances, rather than being taxed jointly, the maximum capital gains
tax in 1987/88 was 30 per cent. Now it is 40 per cent. I was also
disappointed that the chancellor did not abolish stamp duty on share
transactions.
Business expansion schemes will be abolished at the end of 1993. I will not
mourn their loss. When they were introduced, I had hoped they would attract
BES sponsors to find the next Body Shop, Pentland, Kalonor or ICI. Instead,
few of the schemes backed people with innovative ideas and/or manufacturing
activities.
A number of schemes have lost all their investors' money. Others have
produced a mediocre performance. Even some of the property-backed schemes
are now having to pray for an upturn in the property market.
Although some schemes did perform well for their investors (myself
included), the disadvantage of having to tie up money for at least five
years made me normally prefer to invest instead in quoted companies, where
it was possible to 'get out quick' should there be signs of trouble.
As I still have a few BES investments I will no doubt remain on the mailing
list of BES sponsors for their 'last opportunity to make tax-free gains'
promotions. I shall view these prospectuses with caution: they will have to
offer something genuinely unusual and/or attractive to make me invest.
The proposed changes in inheritance tax have made me look at some of my
small company investments in the hope that people who are likely to inherit
large stakes in those companies will have to sell them in order to pay
inheritance taxes. Such sales might then have attracted a predator to the
company, thus leading to an increase in their share price.
The Budget proposed exemption from inheritance tax of holdings of more than
25 per cent in companies quoted on the Unlisted Securities Market and an
improvement in the tax-free element of controlling interests in quoted
companies.
This could mean that some directors - who should hand over to innovative,
non-family directors - will now cling on or pass control to family members
who might be better suited to other activities. Some smaller company
investments are thus less attractive than previously, although some might
move into USM shares as a means of avoiding IHT.
As a private investor, I wholly agree with Lamont's statement that 'savings
are a passport to personal independence and security.'
In the wake of Barlow Clowes, BCCI, the Maxwell pension funds and many other
examples, I hope the government will announce proposals to increase security
for investors by abolishing all the existing costly, bureaucratic City
regulatory authorities and replacing them with a new, independent body which
has very sharp teeth.
My wife claims that as a result of the Budget she can now save me Pounds
5,000 by purchasing a very expensive car, since the 10 per cent car tax has
been reduced on all cars to 5 per cent. I am not impressed by this claim, as
I suspect that many dealers will simply reduce their current trade discounts
and pass on perhaps only half the tax cut.
The chancellor's removal of the Pounds 3,000 limit on the amount that can be
invested in a unit or investment trust within a Personal Equity Plan is
worth a cautious welcome - although it really just encourages increased
collective investing rather than direct investment in shares by private
investors.
There are still uncertainties over the outcome of the election. Labour could
still win and there might be a hung parliament.
Now is not the time to invest - except in a few 'speculative opportunities'.
Nor is it the time to spend money on a large car - we may need the money to
emigrate, instead.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3387</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Looking beyond
the horizon - The fund managers' view
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE announcement of the election, and investors' views on some of the
economic figures revealed in the Budget, have caused UK equity and gilt
markets to fall this week.
After 13 years of Conservative government, investors are nervous about the
consequences of a change. But what will happen over the course of the
election campaign, and the year ahead? To find out, Weekend FT writers asked
fund managers for their views on the prospects for markets.
Most managers are sanguine about share and bond prices, whatever the
political shade of the next government. Dick Barfield, chief investment
manager at Standard Life, thinks the gilt and equity markets will be
volatile in the weeks up to the election and governed by swings in the
polls. But he is optimistic over the longer term. 'In 12 months, there
should not be too much difference in the level of the markets under either
government.'
Barfield thinks the level of inflation will have a greater effect on gilts
and the stock market than the political complexion of the next government.
'Inflation is under good control and will come down further', he says. 'We
see the equity market standing at around 2850 in a year's time and the yield
on gilts about  1/2 or  3/4 of a percentage point lower than at the moment.'
Simon Walters, investment director at Save &amp; Prosper, thinks the gilts
market has already absorbed the bad news about the Pounds 28bn Public Sector
Borrowing Requirement and knows that Labour will be constrained by the UK's
entry into the Exchange Rate Mechanism.
For these reasons, the outlook for gilts in a year's time should not be very
different whichever government is in power. Their performance is likely to
depend by the end of the year on forecasts for the 1993/94 PSBR which might
be as high as Pounds 40bn. However, with inflation falling to about 3.5 per
cent by this time next year, Walters sees the yield on 10 year government
bonds in March 1993 at 8 1/4 per cent.
The performance of equities, however, will be dependent on the outcome of
the election. A hung parliament would mean uncertainty which would be bad
for markets. And if Labour wins a working majority, the FT-SE 100 Index is
likely to fall to about 2350 or 2400, Walters says.
However, he sees a limit to the falls because the signs of economic recovery
will be showing through. The index could stand at around 2850 or 2900 in a
year, but those levels could be reached by September should the
Conservatives be elected with a working majority, he thinks.
Kenneth Levy, investment director at Capel-Cure Myers, said: 'You've got to
look not so much at the election as at what preceded it. Base rate cuts are
not so likely now, and the same applies for base rates outside this country.
The budget was probably less than inspiring, so the short-term outlook must
be pretty cautious.'
Michael Lenhoff, portfolio strategist with CCM, said that the group has
moved slightly further into cash, as a purely defensive measure for the
election period. Longer term, Lenhoff makes clear that the group is
optimistic: 'In the US the recovery is under way, and recovery in the UK is
not that far down the road. We will see corporate profit growth come through
regardless of which party wins.'
Nils Taube, chairman of J Rothschild Investment Management, says: 'My
feeling is that if the Labour party goes into a lead in the opinion polls
and the market goes down, it could be a buying opportunity. The economy is
on the turn.'
Michael Hart, joint manager of the Foreign &amp; Colonial Investment Trust,
believes that a year ahead, German interest rates should have come down a
notch or so, and there are more signs of economic recovery in the US. Hart
expects the market to do better under the Conservatives, although he sees
the main damage from Labour resulting from the long term effect of its
personal taxation plans.
He sees 2700-2800 a possible target for the FT-SE 100 Index over the year,
with gilts having a scope to be a little more cheerful than at present.
While the eyes of the nation will be glued to the democratic circus over the
next month, fund managers seem to have their eye on the long term.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3388</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Bonds battle on
the 8 per cent line - Wall Street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FORGET Super Tuesday. Wall Street's number one concern over the past week
has not been the battle for the south in Tuesday's presidential primary
race, but a rather more mundane tussle in the bond market. Call it the
battle of 8 per cent.
First, a little background: two big factors underpinned the sharp run up in
US share prices which occurred around the turn of the year.
One was falling short-term interest rates, which not only looked like
helping an economic recovery, but also made shares seem a more attractive
investment than many fixed income securities. The other was the belief that
after last summer's false dawn, the economy really was on the mend.
However, for the past few weeks interest rates across the maturity spectrum
have been edging up again, making stocks not quite so attractive in
comparison. No-where has this been more dramatic than at the long-end of the
Government bond market, where yields have remained stubbornly high, despite
successive rounds of monetary easing by the Federal Reserve, and this week
shot briefly through 8 per cent.
No one knows for sure just why long bond yields have remained so high when
inflation is around 3.5 per cent and expected to fall further. But at least
part of the reason is disbelief that inflation is really licked, and a fear
that a combination of fiscal stimuli and an upswing in economic activity
this year will set off another upward price spiral.
President Bush did little to ease those fears this week when he said he was
'more concerned about stimulating the economy than pushing (interest) rates
down.'
That helped push long bond prices down on Wednesday and the following day
they fell even more after the the publication of surprisingly robust retail
sales figures for February. Analysts saw the figures as evidence that the
economy is on the mend.
The result was to push the yield on the benchmark 30-year Treasury bond  -
which moves in the opposite direction to the bond's price - through the 8
per cent barrier for the first time since November, making fixed income
securities even more attractive compared to stocks.
The yield dropped below 8 per cent again yesterday morning, thanks to an
increase in producer prices during February that was more modest than
expected. But the creeping upward advance of interest rates, and diminishing
hopes of a further Fed easing, will continue to act as a powerful restraint
on the stock markets.
Less clear is the extent to which equities will be able to balance its hopes
of economic recovery, which would eventually boost corporate profits and
dividends, against its concern over interest rates.
Certainly, this week's retail sales figures, when added to a raft of other
mildly encouraging statistics, suggest that some sort of recovery is under
way. But its momentum remains uncertain, and there are fears that it might
yet be choked off by rising interest rates.
So far there have been relatively few signs from industrial America that a
strong revival of activity is under way, although a survey of business
executives published yesterday by the New York Times said almost half now
said they saw some inkling of improvement.
But until the recovery signals turn much brighter, it is hard to see the Dow
making much headway above its current trading range, with some risk that it
could fall through its 3,200 floor if interest rates continue on their
upward trend.
The Super-Tuesday primaries may have made little impact on Wall Street -
given that President Bush won comfortable victories against right-winger Pat
Buchanan - but a little local tussle in Detroit, Michigan, home of the motor
industry, raised a few eyebrows.
The directors of Chrysler, the financially strapped automobile manufacturer,
seem to be having a problem choosing a successor to Lee Iacocca, the
chairman who saved the company from near bankruptcy early in the 1980s but
then sullied his reputation by ill-judged diversification.
Iacocca is due to retire at the end of this year, yet after months of
deliberation the board has yet to name a replacement, much to the
disatisfaction of some of its major shareholders. The internal front-runner
is Robert Lutz, a design and engineering expert, who has done much to
restore the company's name for interesting vehicles.
But this week Robert Eaton, head of the highly profitable European
operations at arch-rival General Motors, let slip that he had twice talked
to Iacocca about joining Chrysler in some capacity.
 ---------------------------------------
Monday       3215.12    -    6.48
 ---------------------------------------
Tuesday      3230.99    +   15.87
 ---------------------------------------
Wednesday    3208.63    -   22.36
 ---------------------------------------
Thursday     3208.63    -      --
 ---------------------------------------
Friday       3235.91    +   27.28
 ---------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3389</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Investors search
for a pallid flicker of flame amid the gloom - London Markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN, Financial Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
As I sat opposite the Treasury bench, the ministers reminded me of one of
those marine landscapes on the coasts of South America. You behold a range
of exhausted volcanoes; not a flame flickers on a single pallid crest, but
the situation is still dangerous. There are occasional earthquakes, and ever
and anon the dark rumbling of the sea.
Benjamin Disraeli
WE cannot expect rhetoric of that quality in this election campaign - they
just do not make sound-bites like that any more. None the less, a ghostly
echo of that famous condemnation has lurked unbidden in the stock market's
subconscious all week. On the face of it, nothing could be less like an
exhausted volcano than John Major's irrepressible grin this past week, or
the eager efficiency with which the Conservative party machine is gearing up
for the campaign.
Yet the markets are worried, as their deterioration since Norman Lamont's
Budget, shown in the charts, reflects. On balance, the brokers' analysts who
commented on the Budget seemed to feel that it was, at best, one of
Disraeli's dark rumblings. A handful of headlines from the flood of
post-budget reports illustrates the point: 'Lacklustre UK Budget increases
risk of 'hung' parliament,' says Chase Manhattan. 'Too honest by half?' asks
NatWest. 'No kick start for the Tories,' says Goldman Sachs. 'A timorous wee
beastie,' says Robert Fleming. Comments from some of the more heavyweight
houses - SG Warburg, James Capel, BZW - are more favourable, praising Mr
Lamont for making the best of a bad job. But they still stress the economic
difficulties ahead.
The tone of the market comments reflects a two-fold disappointment with the
Budget: that the Pounds 28bn public sector borrowing requirement for 1992-93
is higher than expected, and that it does not represent the sort of Budget
giveaway that can be guaranteed to win the election for the Conservatives.
This double whammy has pushed long term interest rates up sharply and left
equities weak - though stock market volume is low, indicating that there has
been no panicky rush to sell. The FT-SE index, which dropped 52 points the
day after the budget and 29 points the day after that, closed the week at
2476.0, a drop of 77 points on the week.
The market appears to have started to discount the possibility of a Labour
win - or at least of a Conservative defeat. Evidence for this comes in the
shape of the FT Election Share Index, designed to track market reactions to
the likely consequences of a change of government. It consists of ten stocks
which might outperform in the event of Neil Kinnock's arrival in Downing St
or John Major's departure; and another ten stocks which stand to be relative
beneficiaries from a Conservative victory and the removal of the threat of a
Labour government.
The index will be published each day from Tuesday on the FT's election news
pages. It is as much an aid to thought as a serious stock market index, and
is constructed on the same basis as the FT 30-share Ordinary index - which
makes it highly sensitive to day-to-day share price movements and unsuitable
for long-term performance measurement.
The base for the index is the closing prices of the day the election was
announced, Wednesday March 11. Both the 'Labour gainers' and the
'Conservative gainers' sections of the index are set to 100 at that date. On
the next day, Thursday, the Labour gainers dropped by 1.2 per cent - in line
with the market as a whole - and the Conservative gainers dropped by 2.3 per
cent, nearly twice as far. The Labour gainers closed on Friday at 98.7, with
the Conservative gainers at 97.4.
A similar trend - outperformance by the Labour gainers - is evident since
the beginning of the year, as the election has drawn closer and the opinion
polls have reflected a Labour lead. Between January 2 and the day the
election was announced, the Labour gainers rose 3.3 per cent and the
Conservative gainers rose only 1.3 per cent.
The composition of the index represents some common themes among investment
analysts as they try to work out the impact of the election. Because the
Conservatives have been in power for 13 years, the list inevitably revolves
around the advantages and disadvantages of Labour's policies.
Companies which analysts reckon might gain, relative to other UK shares at
any rate, from a Labour government include those which derive most of their
profits from overseas and are thus impervious to domestic political upsets;
companies in Labour's favoured manufacturing sector; and companies that
might benefit from higher infrastructure spending. There is also a pools
promoter, Zetters, which might gain if the Conservative threat to introduce
a national lottery were lifted; and the biggest, staidest of property
companies, Land Securities, which would see the value of its existing
holdings rise if Labour adopted more restrictive planning policies.
Analysts reckon that gainers from a renewed Conservative mandate are those
companies that would benefit from the removal of the threat posed by
individual Labour policies. The policies Labour is pledged to introduce will
not be known for sure until the manifesto is published next week, but they
are likely to include de-privatisation of water, tighter utility regulation,
a minimum wage, discouragement of corporate takeovers and stronger
consumer-protection rules on life insurance.
If the index works properly, it will track the equity market's view of the
way the campaign is going. Another sensitive indicator is the FT-SE futures
contract, which on Friday was stuck at a persistent discount to the cash
market. This happens from time to time, but a discount throughout the day is
unusual. On Friday, it reflected the difficulty a few big houses were having
in unwinding long positions in the future. Whenever rumours circulated that
the holders were trying to sell the FT-SE future, market-makers marked down
the underlying shares, leaving the two markets leapfrogging each other
downwards.
This is one of the mechanisms that pushes prices down without a lot of
volume. It leaves the market very vulnerable if a wave of real selling
materialises and also exposes it to rumours of good or bad opinion-poll
results. These have become a standard feature of election campaigns, and
this time they have started unusually early. There will be a lot of
telescopes in use over the next three weeks, as the markets attempt to
discover whether the Tory volcanoes are exhausted - or still very much
alive.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT ELECTION SHARE INDEX
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Labour win/Tory defeat stocks
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 1.  BAT - profits mostly overseas
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 2.  ICI - ditto, plus kingpin of favoured manufacturing sector
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 3.  Blue Circle - infrastructure spending
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 4.  Taylor Woodrow - infrastructure spending
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 5.  BICC - infrastructure spending
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 6.  GEC - ditto, plus good at dealing with govts
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 7.  APV - capital goods, at core of mfring
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 8.  Rolls-Royce - ditto, plus better chances of subsidy
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 9.  Zetters - Tory lottery threat to pools
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
10.  Land Securities - gains from tighter Lab planning policy
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Tory win/Labour defeat stocks
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 1.  Courtaulds Textiles - Lab poses minimum wage threat
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 2.  BET - minimum wage
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 3.  Hanson - Lab threatens curbs on UK takeovers
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 4.  SG Warburg - ditto, hitting corporate finance revenues
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 5.  Thames Water - Lab renationalisation threat
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 6.  BT - Lab regln, plus insistence on fibre optic network
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 7.  National Power - Lab regln
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 8.  Prudential - Lab life insurance regulation
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 9.  Forte - Lab minimum wage
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
10.  Whitbread - minimum wage, brewers' tradl links to Tories
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3390</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Tiny Tim stands
in for Pavarotti - Serious Money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ACCOUNTANTS, financial services companies and journalists seize upon the
Budget with glee every year. It gives them respectively a chance to show off
their expertise, an opportunity for a sale and something to write about.
The poor consumer is less convinced. He gets swamped with confusing detail,
and usually finds himself little better off at the end of it.
This year, the hype before the Budget was bigger than ever. According to the
media, chancellor Norman Lamont was going to put on a show to win the
conservatives the election. The consumer was entitled to expect Pavarotti.
He got Tiny Tim.
Lamont had much less in tax cuts to give away than expected, and with an
election imminent, he had no time to introduce complex legislation. Indeed
some of the changes he announced did not make it into the shortened Finance
Act which was rushed through Parliament yesterday. Some can be implemented
by orders; others will have to wait and may never re-appear.
The changes to inheritance tax, which will exempt farmers and many small
business owners, will have to await a new Conservative government, if there
is one. The IHT threshold will not go up to Pounds 150,000, as he announced,
but to Pounds 147,000, pending John Major's return to Number 10.
The Business Expansion Scheme now knows its fate, but not the time of its
execution. Norman Lamont will kill it off at the end of 1993, Labour
probably earlier.
At least the change to PEPs has gone through, a move universally seen as a
'good thing'. A full Pounds 6,000 can now be invested in either a unit or
investment trust PEP. Plans can now be simpler, cheaper and offer a better
spread of risk to investors; indeed the change is so beneficial, one must
ask why on earth the government did not introduce it before.
But most consumers and investors will judge the Budget by its personal tax
proposals. Here the centrepiece was the introduction of the new 20 per cent
band of tax on the first Pounds 2,000 of income.
This certainly seemed to catch the Labour party on the hop, although it had
been astutely predicted by Price Waterhouse (as reported in the Finance &amp;
the Family pages three weeks ago).
Labour has been forced to vote against the change, and promise to repeal it.
That has put the party in the position of opposing a measure that will
benefit the lower paid.
Any reduction in tax is going to be good news for the low paid, or elderly
investors who are surviving on a modest pension and savings.
But the new band, which will reduce individual tax bills by Pounds 100 per
year, has not exactly provoked nationwide celebrations. Even with the
indexation of the single person's allowance (which the Chancellor is
virtually obliged to announce), a basic rate taxpayer will only be Pounds
137.50 a year better off. And that is a benefit that will only accrue in 12,
and in some cases 52 instalments. It hardly seems enough to 'kick start' the
economy.
Nor does it look, so far, like the master stroke which will ensure that the
Conservatives will win the election. In recent electoral history,
governments have very rarely made progress in the course of elections.
Given that Labour's lead is so narrow, the probabilities now start to favour
a hung parliament. That means more uncertainty for individual investors.
However, one aspect of the Budget which might bring a benefit to savers
(although not mortgage borrowers) is that the foreign exchange markets were
completely unimpressed. The pound still languishes at the bottom of the
Exchange Rate Mechanism and that seems likely to rule out a cut in interest
rates before the election.
If there is a hung Parliament, or a Labour victory, interest rates could
even rise in the short term, in order to defend the pound. That could be an
opportunity for investors to lock in to temporarily high returns, perhaps
via the new National Savings issue in July.
Norman Lamont is forecasting a fall in inflation to 3 per cent next year. So
if the new National Savings issue is over 10 per cent, a basic rate payer
would be getting a net real return of 4.5 per cent, comparable with the
index-linked certificates, but with access after a year.
Index-linked will still be a good hedge, for those who can wait for five
years, since inflation may well rise in the mid-1990s, as the effect of the
government's Budget deficit starts to work through.
And for higher rate taxpayers, the offer of 8.5 per cent tax-free on savings
certificates is still there. Under Labour's tax regime, they will look even
more attractive.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3391</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (The Budget and You): Budget at a
glance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MEASURES IN THE FINANCE ACT
A new lower rate of income tax of 20 pence in the pound on the first Pounds
2,000 of taxable income.
Basic rate and higher rate taxes unchanged at 25 and 40 per cent
respectively. The threshold for higher rate tax is unchanged at Pounds
23,700 of taxable income.
The married couple's allowance will be frozen this year.
Ceiling on mortgage tax relief unchanged at Pounds 30,000, but will be
applied at 25 per cent throughout despite the new 20p rate.
Cigarettes up 13p on packet of 20, 1p on pint of beer, 5p on bottle of wine,
28p on bottle of spirits
Duty on unleaded petrol up 4.5 per cent, and on leaded petrol 7.5 per cent
Rate of car tax halved from 10 per cent to 5 per cent.
Vehicle excise duty raised by Pounds 10 to Pounds 110
Betting duty cut from 8 per cent to 7.75 per cent
MEASURES ENACTED BY ORDERS
Single person's allowance increased, with inflation, from Pounds 3,295 to
Pounds 3,445.
Personal allowance for those aged between 65-74 will rise from Pounds 4,020
to Pounds 4,200
Married couple's allowance for those aged between 65-74 will rise from
Pounds 2,355 to Pounds 2,465
Personal allowance for those aged 75 and over will rise from Pounds 4,180 to
Pounds 4,370.
Married couple's allowance for those aged 75 and over will rise from Pounds
2,395 to Pounds 2,505
Income limit for age-related allowances will rise from Pounds 13,500 to
Pounds 14,200
Single pensioners on income support will get an extra Pounds 2 per week and
married couples an extra Pounds 3 a week from October.
Pensions cap will rise from Pounds 71,400 to Pounds 75,000
The capital gains tax threshold will rise in line with inflation from Pounds
5,500 to Pounds 5,800.
The inheritance tax threshold will rise by inflation, from Pounds 140,000 to
Pounds 147,000.
The annual limit on unit and investment trust Personal Equity Plans (Peps)
will be raised from Pounds 3,000 to Pounds 6,000.
Scale benefit charges on company cars and fuel to be increased by 4.5 per
cent
The VAT charge levied when firms offer employees a choice between a car or
extra salary will be scrapped.
MEASURES WHICH WILL OCCUR IF CONSERVATIVES ARE RE-ELECTED
The threshold for inheritance tax will rise by more than inflation to Pounds
150,000.
The married couple's allowance will be able to be paid directly to the wife,
or shared equally, from April 1993.
Owner-occupied farmlands, farm tenancies, interests in un-incorporated
businesses, and holdings of over 25 per cent in unquoted and USM companies
will be exempt from inheritance tax. Relief from inheritance tax at 50 per
cent will apply to controlling holdings in fully quoted companies, holdings
of under 35 per cent in unquoted and USM companies, interests of landlords
in let farmlands and certain other business assets.
The rules on mortgage rescue schemes using the business expansion scheme
will be eased, and the BES for trading companies will be scrapped from the
end of 1993.
Minimum charitable gift eligible for gift aid relief will be lowered to
Pounds 400, not Pounds 600
The capital allowance limit on business cars will be raised from Pounds
8,000 to Pounds 12,000
A move to company car tax scales based on the price of the car rather than
engine size will be considered.
A new lower scale charge for diesel fuel used in company cars will be
introduced.
The Budget may have been one of the last in the traditional style. From
December 1993, the Conservatives plan to bring tax and expenditure decisions
together and announce them in a December Budget.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3392</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Budget View: Gilts need a manifesto
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHAT HAS has been the most significant development in the British economy
over the past year? Most people would probably say the 2 1/2 per cent fall
in national income. For Norman Lamont in his Budget speech on Tuesday,
however, it was the sharp and sustained reduction in inflation.
I would not mock this judgment, selective though it may have been. Low
inflation, when it is achieved, tends to be taken for granted. But it has to
be fought for, and sacrifices must be made. During the coming election
campaign there will be many promises of kick-starts and recovery engines,
but few convincing pledges by the politicians that honest money will always
come first. It is just as well that the stuffy Bundesbank stands ultimately
at the centre of the European Monetary System.
Of course, inflation itself does not at present seem to be a problem while
the economy is so depressed. You still have to be worried that average pay
continues to rise as rapidly as 7 1/4 per cent, with the public sector
taking the lead - as it often does at this stage of the economic and
political cycle, before a new government is forced to bring the public
sector's finances back under control. But harsh reality over pay prospects
will eventually sink in.
The worry is in these depressed conditions that, nevertheless, the seeds can
be sown of renewed inflation. Nigel Lawson fatally relaxed monetary policy
in 1985. But now the British government has largely let go the reins of
monetary policy by hooking sterling up to the Continental currencies.
So six long, recessionary months have passed since sterling short-term
interest rates last fell. Because of the tradition that politicians entirely
keep their hands off interest rates during an election campaign there must -
barring huge pressures on the sterling exchange rate - be at least another
month with base rates at 10 1/2 per cent. Government supporters are
disappointed that Norman Lamont has not been able to throw a half-point cut
into the pre-election pot: the realisation that this would not after all
happen this week was an important factor behind the stock market's 50-point
fall on Wednesday.
But there is another way of looking at interest rates, in real terms. On
that basis, rates have actually been rising. When short-term rates hit 10
1/2 per cent in September the headline inflation rate was 4.7 per cent. Now
it is 4.1 per cent, and it may not be much more than 3 per cent over the
next year. With a real interest rate of 7 per cent-plus to encourage savers
and dismay borrowers it is not surprising that Norman Lamont's economic
recovery is forever just around the corner.
In theory a better idea of real interest rates and inflationary expectations
over the longer run can be gleaned from the government bond market, which
has this week looked groggy as investors have gulped at the future borrowing
requirements.
The inflation-proofed real return available on index-linked gilts is about
4.4 per cent, but the corresponding fixed interest yield is 9.5 per cent. By
implication the market is anticipating inflation in the long term of just
over 5 per cent a year.
At the time of the last Budget the figure was 6 per cent, and a year before
that 7.5 per cent, so there is steady progress. Yet the market is still far
from being convinced that the UK will enter the promised land of 2 to 3 per
cent inflation forecast for the mid-1990s in the Treasury's annual Red Book
of economic magic.
If that target is reached, gilts yielding 9.5 per cent will turn out to be
tremendous bargains. Not only will you start with juicy real returns but you
can expect to make substantial capital gains - say, 25 per cent on a 15-year
gilt - as nominal yields sink to between 6 and 7 per cent over the next few
years.
You might expect a total return of 15 per cent a year over the next four or
five years, surely a more attractive prospect than for equities, which have
returned 12 per cent a year on average since 1987.
But is it believable? Government securities that are highly profitable for
investors must be very expensive for governments (or more accurately, for
taxpayers). Moreover, it will be odd if wealthy savers are able to prosper
in a depressed economy.
If a Labour government were in power then there certainly would be attempts
to claw the abnormal investment returns back through taxation. More
cynically one would say that a government with a big borrowing requirement
has a vested interest in inflation. Borrowing, as we saw in Lamont's Budget,
is an easy way out for a beleaguered finance minister.
In 1990 John Major saw inflation running out of control, destroying the
Tories' election chances. Joining the exchange rate mechanism seemed the
only way to get inflation down quickly, and it has worked impeccably.
Unfortunately, with a series of possible election dates coming up, it was
never possible to warn the country candidly of the cost.
Norman Lamont's sense of priorities is valid but, as we may discover on
April 9, a few million others may with equal validity beg to differ.
The Budget and You, Pages II to VII.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3393</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It has been a rough old year for overseas salesmen of South African shares.
Quite apart from the darkening shadow of next week's referendum, the gold
price has been flat on its back and the industrial economy is in deep,
probably deepening, recession. If that were not bad enough, growth, when it
returns, is likely to be stunted by drought and double digit inflation.
It is impossible to exaggerate the impact a 'no' vote next Tuesday would
have on foreign investor sentiment. Any kind of 'yes' vote, however slim the
majority, would no doubt be greeted by an immediate bounce in prices but a
sustained advance will require the clear interest being shown in South
Africa of late to be translated into firm buying action. It would be unwise
to count on it.
The risk for the outsider is not so much the share markets themselves, which
regularly vie for the low turnover prize in world stock markets, and which
are underpinned by locals with nowhere to go. Notwithstanding a flood of
recent rights issues, the Golds and Industrial sectors have actually managed
a 5 per cent gain since January 1. The problem is rather the gyrating
investment currency, the financial rand, which has plunged 18 per cent
against the US dollar since the start of this year. Downward pressure,
provoked in part by German and Swiss profit-taking on their sizeable
portfolios of government bonds, is compounded by wide dealing spreads and
restrictions on Reserve Bank intervention. Managed gold funds, with an
estimated 20 per cent of their Dollars 5bn of worldwide assets in South
Africa, have also been selling in the last year to meet heavy redemptions.
Political risks aside, it could take a turnaround in precious metal prices
to stem the general tide.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3394</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: Lex Service
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The trend for car manufacturers to grab back the rights to distribute their
products has been accelerating of late. Yesterday's blow from Volvo to Lex
Service was a reminder that distributors can be left dangerously exposed.
Only Inchcape, through its joint venture with Toyota, seems to have found a
way round the problem. Lex's Pounds 100m settlement looks generous until one
considers that in a depressed 1990 the Volvo business contributed three
quarters of its Pounds 42m operating profits. Given the dire state of the UK
car market, Volvo has shown a shrewd sense of timing. Lex may be temporarily
cash rich, but there is no hiding the severity of its other trading
difficulties. Investors wondering what it will do with the money are
doubtless aware of its peculiarly undistinguished history of
diversification. This time, they might prefer to demand the cash for
themselves.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3395</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: Lonrho
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There was an air of finality about yesterday's 17 per cent fall in Lonrho's
shares. When in a single day the market can find five separate reasons for
selling, chief among them the belated realisation that the group derived 31
per cent of 1991 pre-tax profits from South Africa, investors are scarcely
going to argue. Something dramatic is required if Lonrho is to find a way
back.
Mr Rowland's problem is that the time for a grand gesture was several months
ago. He has long needed a large disposal or two to reduce the present Pounds
1bn debt mountain to manageable proportions for Lonrho's chronically weak
cash flow. An unsolicited sub-investment grade rating on the debt was not
designed to reassure the market. Yesterday's Pounds 45m sale of a few UK
newspapers, although it realised a healthy profit, represents enough to
cover the final dividend and leave some change. Equally, if Lonrho succeeds
in its efforts to extract a cash payment from Volkswagen for the early
termination of its VAG motor distribution franchise, the likely sum will be
insignificant.
At its present market capitalisation of a mere Pounds 620m, a takeover might
be the obvious solution for investors, assuming Mr Rowland would ever agree
to bow out. Such is the difficulty of valuing Lonrho's assets, however, that
even a bold raider might hesitate. Take the leisure division, which last
year generated pre-interest profits of Pounds 25m on stated gross assets of
Pounds 914m. Assuming a 30 per cent tax rate and ignoring any debt, Lonrho
is valuing the assets at 52 times their cash flow. Either that is too high,
or the assets are seriously unproductive. But that sums up the market's
dilemma. Only Mr Rowland knows their true worth, and he is still not
telling.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3396</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: The Budget burden for equities
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FT-SE Index: 2,476.0 (-17.3)
With attention focused on the election, it is easy to forget that the Budget
carried a message of lasting change in the fundamental background for
equities. The public sector borrowing requirement will be much higher than
originally expected, not only in 1992-93 but for several years to come. The
chancellor admitted that it would still be 3 1/2 per cent of gross domestic
product two years hence. Even that assumption is made on the optimistic
basis that real growth will then be running at 3 3/4 per cent. The sum total
is a burden for the capital markets, which will necessitate a substantial
shift of investment funds from equities into gilts.
Ultimately this requires an increase in the real yield on gilts. That should
happen naturally as inflation declines, however. So, assuming that the
election result does not increase the risk of devaluation, the impact on
actual prices may be more limited than the market currently fears.
Eventually gilt yields would look particularly attractive compared with
equities, especially since low cover ratios mean dividend growth is likely
to be restrained for several years. At the very least the chances are that
equities will respond more sluggishly than usual to economic upturn. The
government's heavy financing programme may also make the equity market less
receptive to rights issues, whether for balance sheet or acquisition
purposes.
Some might take comfort from the thought that this has been discounted in
the steep falls since the Budget. In fact, the FT-SE is down by only just
over 2 per cent over the week as a whole and is still more than 130 points
above last December's low. If the weekend polls bring a fresh bout of
political nerves, the market may have further to fall.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3397</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Spens is denied not guilty verdict
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND HUGHES, Law Courts Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LORD SPENS, the former corporate finance managing director at Henry
Ansbacher, the merchant bank, was yesterday refused a formal not guilty
verdict in the recent Guinness trial. He sought a formal acquittal after the
Serious Fraud Office decided not to continue prosecuting him for his part in
the Guinness takeover of Distillers Group in 1986.
Mr Justice Henry also refused to order costs of between Pounds 300,000 and
Pounds 400,000, which Lord Spens incurred before being granted legal aid, be
paid from public funds because 'he brought the prosecution on himself'.
However, the judge said, because of Lord Spens' financial circumstances, he
would not have to pay a Pounds 100,000 legal aid contribution.
The judge ruled that the fraud and false accounting charges against Lord
Spens remain on the file and not be proceeded with without the court's
permission. Afterwards Lord Spens, who was clearly shaken and angry, said he
would challenge the rulings by way of a judicial review.
The second Guinness trial ended last month after psychiatrists expressed
concern about the mental state of Lord Spens' co-defendant, Mr Roger Seelig,
who conducted his own defence. The prosecution of Mr Seelig was halted by a
nolle prosequi, which stayed the proceedings against him but did not acquit
him. The SFO decided, in the circumstances, it would be unfair to proceed
against Lord Spens who then sought a formal acquittal.
Mr Justice Henry said yesterday both he and the SFO had believed there was
sufficient evidence to proceed against Lord Spens. The decision against a
second trial had been taken on other grounds.
An order staying proceedings against Lord Spens would leave him in the same
position as Mr Seelig, the judge said.
Dealing with the application for costs, the judge referred to evidence Lord
Spens had given to Department of Trade and Industry inspectors.
That evidence, which had not been put before the jury before the trial was
aborted, concerned Lord Spens' conduct in relation to Mr Seelig's request
that he recruit Guinness share supporters under indemnities against loss.
The judge said the City code imposed an obligation on advisers to consult
the takeover panel about any 'grey area' of City practice.
Lord Spens had been faced with a highly unusual transaction beyond his
immediate experience and had chosen not to consult the panel.
The judge said: 'If he had consulted the panel it is clear from the evidence
he would have been told not to have anything to do with the transaction.
There would not have been a prosecution and none of the unhappy consequences
to him and his family would have occurred. He brought the prosecution on
himself and it would be wrong to use public funds to protect him against the
consequences of that.'
Mr David Hood, counsel for Lord Spens, twice interrupted the judgment. He
complained about the judge's 'subjective interpretation' of the evidence and
said he and Lord Spens did not accept any of what the judge was saying about
matters that would have been contested at the trial.
It was, Mr Hood asserted, wholly wrong for the judge to give judgment on
matters on which the prosecution had offered no evidence as if they had been
determined at trial.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3398</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Futures and options
activity lifts volume
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RELIEF in decline was the keynote yesterday, as share prices closed above
the 20,221.86 of October 1, 1990, having fallen briefly below that level on
selling related to futures and options settlements, writes Emiko Terazono in
Tokyo.
The Nikkei index closed 105.82 lower at 20,456.06, down 2.6 per cent on the
week. The index firmed briefly after the opening, hitting the day's high of
20,590.74, but fell to a low of 20,168.15 in the afternoon. Bargain hunting,
and late index-linked buying by investment trusts pushed up the Nikkei from
the day's low.
Volume swelled from 280m shares to 650m, of which 350m was generated by
futures and options settlements. The market has not seen this level of
activity since December 13 last year, when December futures contracts were
settled.
Declines exceeded advances by 648 to 315 with 164 unchanged. The Topix index
of all first section stocks fell 8.21 to 1,464.00 and, in London, the
ISE/Nikkei 50 index rose 0.99 to 1,118.79. A total of 239 issues fell to new
lows since the beginning of last year, exceeding the 200 level for the
fourth consecutive day.
Fears that the Nikkei would fall below the critical 20,000 level prevailed.
Traders expected tokkin, or specified money trusts, and fund trusts to step
up selling on Monday, the last trading day for the fiscal year.
Rumours that the authorities were considering implementing tighter rules on
proprietary trading depressed sentiment. Traders said that tension between
leading foreign houses and the authorities was rising due to extensive
efforts by the authorities to reduce derivatives and proprietary trading.
Most leading high-technology issues rose on bargain-hunting. Hitachi, the
most active issue of the day, rose Y4 to Y765 and Sony rose Y20 to Y3,960.
However, NTT, a benchmark for market sentiment, fell for the 12th
consecutive day, by Y8,000 to a new all-time low of Y656,000.
Financial issues were lower as companies and fund trusts continued to
liquidate holdings. Mitsubishi Bank fell Y30 to Y2,330 and Sumitomo Bank
lost Y20 to Y1,730.
Bio-technology issues, which have been sought by short-term traders, fell on
profit-taking. Nippon Zeon fell Y3 to Y702 and Okamoto lost Y40 to Y1,330.
However, Daiichi Pharmaceutical surged Y110 to Y1,770 on reports of its
joint development of an Aids cure.
In Osaka, the OSE average 173.55 to 21,877.52 in volume of 72.7m shares.
Roundup
ONCE AGAIN, strength in Hong Kong was the region's main feature.
HONG KONG closed at its third straight record high in spite of a strong wave
of afternoon profit-taking. The Hang Seng index advanced 28.38 to 5,071.19,
3.3 per cent higher on the week, in turnover up from HKDollars 2.87bn to
HKDollars 3.56bn.
Once again dealers said that the strong dollar, to which the local currency
is tied, has been drawing in foreign money.
TAIWAN credited hopes of an agreement on the presidential election process
with a recovery through 5,000 on the weighted index which rose 45.77 to
5,030.63, up 0.7 per cent on the week, in light trading.
SEOUL saw bargain-hunting in Hyundai subsidiaries reversed on reports that
the government had warned the group away from politics. The composite index
fell 4.53 to 614.58, down 1.8 per cent on the week, as turnover stayed flat
at Won203bn.
AUSTRALIA showed little reaction to higher January retail sales. The All
Ordinaries index fell 3.0 to 1,588.4, down 1 per cent on the week, in
turnover up from ADollars 155m to ADollars 166m. Coles Myer, the country's
biggest retailer, rose 4 cents to ADollars 11.06 following a 36-cent drop on
Thursday, on flat profits and a surprise capital raising plan.
SINGAPORE reported scattered buying interest as the Straits Times Industrial
index closed 5.07 higher at 1,466.08, 1.4 per cent higher on the week. KUALA
LUMPUR gained on last-minute buying as the composite index put on 2.80 to
595.22, a rise on the week of 0.7 per cent.
BOMBAY was volatile as a bullish start to the new account triggered
profit-taking. The BSE index fell from the day's high of 3,346.26 to close
at 3,259.36, up 17.39.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3399</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Limited inspiration for
bourses in early US gains
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LATE-CLOSING bourses appreciated the early burst of enthusiasm on Wall
Street, although not all of them rose on it, writes Our Markets Staff.
ZURICH was lifted by a fall in domestic interest rates, and by the rise in
US equities. The SPI index rose 6.3 to 1,124.9, but was still 1 per cent
lower on the week.
Among industrials, Alusuisse bearers were active, rising SFr18 to SFr901,
and Brown Boveri bearers added SFr50 to SFr3,550. In chemicals, Ciba-Geigy
bearers ended SFr50 higher at SFr3,330.
However, Surveillance, the world leader in trade inspection, continued to
fall. Its bearers topped the active list, as they lost SFr190 to SFr7,590,
SFr510 lower on the week, on selling pressure from London.
AMSTERDAM saw a sharp fall in Hunter Douglas after a bigger-than-expected
fall in 1991 profits prompted some brokers to issue sell notes. The CBS
Tendency index eased 0.3 to 125.2, down 2.2 per cent on the week.
Hunter Douglas, which makes window coverings and architectural products,
lost Fl 8.20 or 11.5 per cent to Fl 63.20. Kleinwort Benson recommended its
clients to take their profits in the stock, in view of its 15 per cent
outperformance since the start of the year and its demanding prospective
multiple of 13.1.
The retailer Ahold added Fl 1.50 to Fl 87.00 after reporting 1991 net
profits just above expectations.
FRANKFURT reported quiet trade before a breakdown in the bourse's price
information system blocked transmission of real-time, screen-based price
quotes, and limited trading to open outcry.
After some delay, the closing DAX index was calculated at 1,732.64, up 5.14
after a decline of just 0.01 to 703.82 in the FAZ at midsession. Falls on
the week were 0.8, and 1.1 per cent respectively. Volume fell from DM5.3bn
to DM4.7bn.
Shares moved on results, Bayer up another DM2.20 to DM294.90 after its
maintained dividend this week and Henkel, at the speciality end of the
chemicals industry, DM9 higher at DM621 on a mere 3.3 per cent rise in net
profits.
Henkel's results, and the 1991 rise of 18 per cent in sales at the
construction group, Philipp Holzmann, were in line with some brokers'
expectations. But Holzmann fell DM20 to DM1,170, in spite of its rise in
sales, indicating that it takes more to please the construction sector.
Carmakers mostly rebounded on technical factors, BMW and Volkswagen leading
with gains of DM6 and DM4 to DM550 and DM371. But Porsche, which reported a
97 per cent drop in first half pre-tax profits for the current year, fell
DM10 to DM585.
MILAN gave up early gains in thin, technical trading before Monday's close
of the March trading account. The Comit index fell 0.64 to 510.71, down 0.8
per cent on the week, in turnover estimated at L90bn after Thursday's L93bn.
Pirelli gained L45 or 3.9 per cent to L1,180 on short-covering ahead of the
close of the account. Fiat rose L35 to L4,885.
Among insurers, Alleanza fell L190 to L7,710 and Toro was down L310 at
L20,500. But Generali added L100 to L30,000. The cement sector was weak on
fears that Calcestruzzi's purchase of a controlling stake in the Greek
cement group, Heracles, would lead to a price war in Italy. Calcestruzzi
fell L500 to L15,900 and Italcementi lost L310 to L17,700.
Standa, the department store chain owned by Mr Silvio Berlusconi, fell L100
to L29,200 on news that Mr Berlusconi was selling a minority stake.
STOCKHOLM returned to the uptrend with new orders for Ericsson helping to
generate momentum, the Affarsvarlden General index closing 9.0 higher at
986.5, 0.3 per cent higher on the week.
Ericsson B rose SKr3 to SKr126 on news of a Malaysian digital telephone
exchange order, and an order for microwave radio links from Mannesmann.
Astra, which said that it would not be as hard hit as its competitors by the
Japanese government's reductions in domestic medicine prices, saw its A
shares rebound from recent declines and rise SKr6 to SKr555.
ISTANBUL made a partial recovery on the announcement of a ceasefire in the
disputed Nagorno-Karabakh enclave. The index came off the day's low to
3,852.59, off 16.96 on the day but up 6.4 per cent on the week.
BRUSSELS got a late boost from a firmer Wall Street opening. The Bel-20
index ended up 7.55 at 1,212.40, hardly changed on the week. The retailer
Delhaize, which has a big exposure to the US, closed up 1.5 per cent at
BFr9,240.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE EUROTRACK 100 - MAR 13
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
   Open    10 am    11 am    12 pm     1 pm     2 pm     3 pm    close
1150.49  1150.82  1152.51  1152.63  1153.24  1154.35  1155.74  1154.40
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
             Day's High  1156.28    Day's Low  1150.32
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 Mar 12    Mar 11    Mar 10     Mar 9     Mar 6
1149.99   1161.88   1169.22   1165.45   1162.10
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3400</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets: Perrier and earnings recovery hopes
boost Paris - France has outperformed Europe, and the UK in particular, so
far this year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
If the French are said by their leaders to be depressed and moody these
days, you would hardly believe it to look at the recent progress of the
stock market.
The Paris bourse has given investors one of the best rides of any major
European market since the turn of the year, spurred on by a mixture of
takeover fever and anticipation of earnings recovery. Its rise has tailed
off in recent days, but most analysts think that this is only a pause for
breath.
By Friday, the CAC-40 index stood at 1,947.05, some 10.3 per cent ahead of
its level at the start of the year, well outperforming London, and European
averages. Several analysts believe that another 10 per cent rise is possible
by the end of the year, bringing the index through the 2,000 barrier and
just above the record high of 2,129.3 reached in April 1990.
The big event on the takeover scene, of course, has been the protracted
struggle between Nestle, the Swiss food multinational, and Italy's Agnelli
family for control of Source Perrier, the mineral water group. By the end of
the week, Source Perrier's shares stood at FFr1,636, a cool 34 per cent per
cent ahead of their level at the start of the year and well above the Nestle
bid price of FFr1,475, which is thought likely to be increased.
The Perrier battle could help to sharpen foreign investors' interest in
French equities. It has underlined the market's increasing openness to
foreign bidders, and shown that takeovers are now being fought in the field,
rather than through secret negotiations between the finance ministry and the
country's leading banks.
The government has not lifted a finger to stop this symbol of corporate
France passing into foreign hands. So, the argument goes, it might take an
equally liberal stance if any other blue chip comes under attack. The
reforms to takeover rules being considered by the finance ministry would
further liberalise the market; for example, abolishing the rule which allows
a predator to make a bid for only two-thirds rather than all of its takeover
victim, and rationalising the conflicting bourse authorities. Market
professionals expect the two-thirds rule to be changed within a month or so.
Beyond this, analysts expect the main bull point in the coming months to be
a pick-up in profits, especially among companies in cyclical industries
which respond first to an economic recovery. Earnings growth for the top 40
companies in 1992 is variously estimated at between 14 per cent and 15 per
cent after a year of stagnant or falling earnings.
However, these forecasts could be downgraded, since the long-expected
recovery has yet to show. 'We won't really know where we are on the recovery
until the second or third quarter,' warns Mr Stephen Moir, head of
international sales at BZW Puget Mahe.
The earnings upturn should be export-led, believes Mr Bruno Le Chevallier,
strategist at James Capel in Paris. Certainly, the fact that French
inflation remains under control and that the budget deficit is overshooting
less than in Germany or Britain, are good signs for the country's economic
health.
Yet domestic demand is still slack, and Insee, the state statistics
institute, stresses that its latest forecast for a 2 per cent growth in
French gross domestic product this year, is linked to a 'possible' world
economic recovery.
French businesses are today better equipped than in the past to take
advantage of a foreign recovery, on the grounds that their heavy
restructuring of recent years has made them more price competitive abroad,
says Mr Chevallier. This new competitiveness is, incidentally, an important
factor in the recent decline of the trade deficit, which Insee expects to
narrow to FFr10bn (Dollars 1.75bn) this year, after widening to just over
FFr30bn in 1991.
The big uncertainty remains the extent of any recovery in the US economy, to
which France's top companies are more sensitive than ever before. 'After
their big takeovers of recent years, the CAC-40 companies have something
like 25 per cent of their sales in the dollar zone. So if the US recovers,
they will too,' says Mr Le Chevallier.
In the months ahead, the market will be awaiting further news of the efforts
by Mr Pierre Beregovoy, the finance minister, to relaunch long-delayed
reforms of the savings system. This could encourage the growth in France of
powerful UK-style institutional investors and so increase the demand for
equities.
Mr Beregovoy has been consulting unions on the introduction of private
pension schemes in order to supplement the state pension scheme, which faces
a large and growing deficit. Also under consideration are tax incentives for
employee share ownership and for individual equity investment plans, similar
to personal equity plans in the UK.
The unions pose a problem, through their resistance to any change in their
traditional state pension rights. So it is uncertain how far the government
will dare to push these reforms. All should be revealed in the next few
months: the government hopes to push through the legislation in the spring,
so that the reforms could take effect from July.
One possible drag on the market could come from further partial
privatisations, following the FFr3.4bn raised by the government from the
sales of stakes in the oil group, Elf Aquitaine, and Credit Local de France,
a local authority bank. Mr Beregovoy has warned that more sales are on the
way.
However, the sales of equity in state-owned companies should not be a
serious burden for the market. The 1992 budget estimates that FFr5.6bn will
come from partial privatisations this year, a small bite compared with the
FFr40bn of new paper the French stock market digested last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3401</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG fell on nervous profit-taking ahead of Tuesday's reform
referendum. The all-gold index fell 15 to 1,193, and industrials slid 35 to
4,357. The all-share index fell 38 to 3,533. Vaal Reefs lost R1.50 to R206.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3402</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Appointments: Boyd's new generation
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The first new job offer for Alan Boyd, director of broadcasting at TVS, came
at 10.01 am on October 16 last year, one minute after the announcement that
the ITV company had lost its franchise. The call was from the BBC where Boyd
had once produced light entertainment hits such as the Generation Game and
initiated Blankety Blank.
The second call, 11 minutes later, came from Grundy, the international
production company which grew up in Australia and produces popular
programmes such as Neighbours.
In May, in the run-down to TVS going off the air at the end of this year,
Boyd will join Grundy Worldwide as senior vice president for light
entertainment.
Boyd, 50, a former head of entertainment at LWT, who devised or produced a
number of shows including Game For A Laugh, Blind Date and You Bet, will be
based in London. He will be responsible for Grundy's light entertainment
productions in the UK and the rest of Europe.
Grundy is one of the largest independent producers and makes more than 50
hours of television a week. 'It is a bit like a chameleon,' says Boyd. The
company takes a programme idea or format and makes it in different countries
to suit individual cultures.
Boyd decided to accept the job with Grundy because he relished the challenge
of learning about international television after the somewhat insular world
of Britain's ITV companies; Grundy Worldwide operates in 15 countries
including the US and Australia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3403</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Appointments: Scottish Film Council's local hero
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Allan Shiach, executive chairman of Macallan Distillers who doubles as Allan
Scott, the Hollywood screenwriter, becomes chairman of the 11-man board of
the Scottish Film Council on April 1. He replaces John Donarchy, who has
been in the chair since 1984 and negotiated the Council's independence from
the Scottish Council for Education Technology two years ago.
Shiach's pseudonym, developed at university 'because extra-curricular
activities such as television were banned', was also chosen 'as the most
patriotic he could think of'. Now, the scriptwriter of many films - Don't
Look Now is one of the best remembered - spoke this week from Los Angeles in
temperatures of 78 degrees F of his keenness to lend a helping hand to his
native film industry in less clement parts.
Unsurprisingly, one of his primary tasks will be to improve the funding of
the Council, looking further afield than the current Scottish Office grant.
As the only council board member who is also a member of the Scottish Film
Production Fund, which promotes young film-makers, he is keen to secure a
merger with that and possibly other Scottish film industry industry bodies
to strengthen his fund-raising hand.
Since the role of the council is primarily that of 'preserving a Scottish
film culture', the archive turns out to be a big concern. It irks him
considerably, for instance, that another Scottish whisky company recently
donated its film archive south of the border to the British Film Institute.
'I would hope to be able to intervene on that sort of thing during my
incumbency.'
Other patriotic activities this year for Shiach, 50, who owns homes in
London and Moray, include writing the screen play for a 'strictly low-budget
film' based on Pat Barker's novel Regeneration, centreing on the 1917
meeting, in the Scottish asylum of Craiglockhart, between Wilfred Owen and
Siegfried Sassoon.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3404</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Moody's knock Lonrho
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By COLIN MILLHAM, STEVE THOMPSON and CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Shares in Lonrho, the controversial international conglomerate, plunged
below the 100p mark for the first time since late 1985, eventually closing a
net 19 down at 95p, as the market took fright at the downgrade of its credit
rating by Moody's, the US credit rating agency.
The retreat by the share price took place during exceptionally heavy trading
in which more than 23m shares changed hands. Tuesday sees the electoral
reform referendum in South Africa and the market only now seems to have
woken up to the fact that Lonrho derives in excess of 30 per cent of its
profits from the republic.
The stock was additionally unsettled by what was seen as a slightly lower
than expected price Lonrho is expected tp receive for Scottish &amp; Universal
Holdings which owns a number of weekly newspapers in Scotland.
Moody's downgraded its rating for around Dollars 360m-worth of Lonrho's
Eurobonds to below investment grade.
Lonrho shares attracted heavy activity earlier this year. In January they
plummeted from over 170p to 107p after a steep fall in profits and a cut in
the dividend, only to recover to 130p by the end of last month when US
investment funds FMR and Fidelity International revealed they had built a
joint holding of 4 per cent in Lonrho. By last week their joint holding had
been increased to 6.27 per cent or 41.2m shares.
Lex struggles
Lower profits and the loss of its exclusive importer agreement for Volvo
Cars knocked 28 off Lex Service shares to 204p. The market was particularly
concerned at the ending of the Volvo contract on March 30, despite
compensation of around Pounds 100m. Volvo was a major source of income for
Lex, even though profits last year fell to Pounds 500,000 from Pounds 9.1m
as a result of the slump in UK car sales. The final dividend was 6p,
compared with 9.4p, making a total of 10p against 15.3p.
Analysts said attempts to diversify into other businesses have had mixed
success, but Sir Trevor Chinn, chairman of Lex said the 'actions we have
taken to reduce costs are already showing through in a significant
improvement in profit compared with 1991.'
RTZ rises
A rethink by the market about RTZ's preliminary figures, announced on
Thursday, and a growing recognition of the group's massive overseas earnings
and assets, prompted another flurry of strong buying for the shares.
They closed 16 higher at 571p, having touched 585p earlier in the session
with turnover expanding rapidly to 5.5m.
MTM falls further
The gloom surrrounding MTM deepened as the shares took another dive,
although they managed to recover some ground by the close. Stock exchange
officials are said to have been interviewing MTM executives, past and
present, in recent days, focusing on the collapse in the speciality
chemicals group share price, and the seemingly contradictory statements
included in the board's two recent profit warnings. An official inquiry is
said to be imminent. Turnover was another busy 1.5m, the shares, down at
around 50p at one stage, rallied to close a net 18 down at 70p.
Specialist engineering cocnern TI Group bucked the downward trend in the
market, rising 7 to 621p following Thursday's announcement that 1991 profits
fell only 18 per cent to Pounds 105.2m in difficult trading conditions.
With an unsettled domestic outlook, ICI and BOC Group - two companies with
strong international bias - attracted investors' attention. ICI gained 7 to
1,255p. while BOC closed ahead 10 at 657p in good volume of 2.4m.
Oil shares put on a relatively sound performance, but slipped away towards
the close. There were a number of panicky enquiries to marketmakers in
mid-morning when news wires flashed up the story of a suspension in
Amsterdam - subsequently quickly rescinded by the Dutch authorities - of
Royal Dutch shares. Shell Transport settled 4 firmer at 446p on keen
turnover of 5m with specialists noting a further flurry of switching out of
Royal Dutch and into Shell.
There were also suggestions of sizeable switching by UK institutions out of
BP and into British Gas after the latter's agreement with Ofgas to end its
monopoly of the industrial and commercial gas supply market, and to run its
gas pipeline division as a separate entity. Nevertheless, the big US funds
continued to support BP shares, which closed a net 2 higher at 263p on heavy
turnover of 13m. British Gas slipped a penny at 249p with turnover
approaching 5m.
Enterprise and Lasmo lost further ground, with Lasmoslipping 2 1/2 to 184p
after determined selling from some of the leading UK brokerage houses.
Enterprise, where Thursday's preliminary results confounded some of the
direst stories about the dividend, fell 5 to 362p.
The profits downgrade carried out in midweek by UBS Phillips &amp; Drew's
telecoms analyst, Adam Quinton, continued to depress BT shares; the 'old'
dropped 9 1/2 to 318p and the partly-paid stock 8 to 105p.
A strong early showing on Wall Street helped Glaxo Holdings, although later
weakness in New York and London took off the initial shine. Volume was busy
at 2.5m, the shares closing 2 up at 786p. Sentiment was also helped by news
from Canada that Biochem Pharma, which has development and marketing
agreements with Glaxo, had held successful pre-clinical trials for its 3TC
anti-Aids drug on the Hepatitis B virus.
Drinks groups suffered from nervousness about the political situation, while
international spirits companies were also hard hit. Guinness lost 8 to 567p,
as profit-taking continued to erode recent gains, and Grand Metropolitan
slipped 12 to 893p.
A publicity stunt was how British Airways described Virgin Atlantic's
decision to institute formal proceedings in the US aimed at stopping what it
alleges is a dirty tricks campaign. BA's shares fell 4 to 249p.
UBS Phillips &amp; Drew turned positive on the hotel and catering sector, in
particular moving from a hold to a buy on Forte. The hotel group was also
basking in the success of its warrants excercise, the shares rising 5 to
229p in good volume of 3.9m. Analyst Mr Paul Heath said: 'We think the hotel
cycle has hit the bottom and is now due for a bounce. With Forte's figures
out next month, we are also expecting a good dividend.'
A buy recommendation from Henderson Crosthwaite failed to prevent Kwik Save
falling 10 to 553p, while J. Sainsbury gave up 9 to 380p and Tesco 9 to 243p
following recent sell notes from brokers.
Kingfisher lost another 5 to 484p and WH Smith 'A' 5 to 456p as fears
continued that a price war in the do-it-yourself sector will damage group
profits.
Leading property shares held ground against the trend as buyers began to
look at the sector after its recent poor run. Sentiment was helped by a buy
note from Smith New Court on MEPC, the shares rising 3 to 330p. Great
Portland gained from a big line of stock, up 4 at 151p, Land Securities
added 4 to 419p.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1991/92
NEW HIGHS (29).
AMERICANS (1) Morris (Ph), BANKS (1) HSBC, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (3)
Mansfield, Morland, Wolv. &amp; Dudley, BUSINESS SERVICES (1) Welpac,
CONGLOMERATES (1) Jardine Hldgs., CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1) Boot (H),
ELECTRICALS (1) China Light, ELECTRONICS (4) Druck, Hoskyns, Microvitec,
Multitone, ENGINEERING GENERAL (1) Atlas Copco B, FOOD MANUFACTURING (1)
Treatt, FOOD RETAILING (1) Iceland Frozen, HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (1) Mayborn,
HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (1) City Centre Restrs., INVESTMENT TRUSTS (4) Beta Global
Emrg. Mkts., JF Pacific Wrrnt., Murray Split Cap. Zero Prf., Pacific Assets
Wrrnts., MEDIA (1) Harrington Kilbride, MOTORS (1) Volvo B, OTHER FINANCIAL
(2) Jardine Strategic, Swire Pacific A, TEXTILES (1) Sherwood, TRANSPORT (2)
Cathy Pacific, Tibbett &amp; Britten.
NEW LOWS (84).
BRITISH FUNDS (8) Ex. 13 1/2 pc 1992, Tr. 13 3/4 pc 1993, Tr. 14 1/2 pc
1994, Tr. 9 3/4 pc 2002 C, Tr. 8 1/2 pc 2007 A, Tr. 9pc 2012, Tr. 2 1/2 pc
Il 2020, Tr. 2 1/2 pc IL 2024, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Macallan-Glenlivet,
BUILDING MATERIALS (2) Cakebread Robey A, Latham (J), BUSINESS SERVICES (2)
Gardiner, REA, CHEMICALS (2) MTM, Sutcliffe Speakman, CONGLOMERATES (4)
Ensor, Gieves, Lonrho, Porter Chadburn, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (4) AMEC,
Dean &amp; Bowes, McLaughlin &amp; Harvey, Wescol, ELECTRONICS (1) Harland Simon,
ENGINEERING AEROSPACE (1) Dowty, FOOD MANUFACTURING (1) Assoc. Brit. Foods.,
HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (1) Wembley, INSURANCE BROKERS (2) Archer (AJ), Sturge,
INSURANCE COMPOSITE (3) Comm. Union, Hafnia, Sun Alliance, INVESTMENT TRUSTS
(14) Danae Inc., Derby Cap., Drayton Blue Chip, Drayton Recovery, Electra
Inv., Gartmore Scot. Units, JF Pacific Wrrnts., Kleinwort High Inc., M &amp; G
Inc. Package Units, Murray Split Cap. Units, River Plate Cap., Scot. Natl.
Inc., St. David's Cap., Tor Cap., MEDIA (5) Avesco, Clarke Hooper,
Colorgraphic, MMI, Do., Wrrnts., METAL &amp; METAL FORMING (2) CI, Clayhithe,
MISCELLANEOUS (4) Business Tech., Halls Homes,Porth, WSP, OIL &amp; GAS (10)
Aviva Petrlm., Brabant Res., Clyde Petrlm., Europa Energy, Goal Petrlm.,
Hardy Oil, LASMO, Pict Petrlm., Presidio A, Teredo Petrlm., OTHER INDUSTRIAL
MATERIALS (1) OMI Intl., PROPERTY (11) Allied London, Bourne End, Brit. Land
(Jersey) 8 5/8 pc Cv. 2011, Derwent Valley, Ests. &amp; General, Hammerson A,
Land Securities, MEPC, Smith (J), Southend Property, Trencherwood, STORES
(2) Bentalls, Clinton Cards, TEXTILES (1) Atkins, MINES (2) Anglo Pacific
Res., Cluff Res.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3405</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Opinion poll worries unsettle
equities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CURTAIN came down on a tension-filled week in London's equity market
with share prices, not to mention marketmakers, looking completely washed
out and hardly looking forward to a weekend which was rumoured to offer
nothing more than an increased Labour lead in the latest opinion polls.
A brief rally by share prices at the opening was quickly demolished by a
decline in the Footsie future and sentiment thereafter was never better than
fragile.
At the close the Footsie was 17.3 off at 2,476.0, marginally above the day's
low, 2,474,2, or some 19 points off, reached some twenty minutes before the
market closed. Over the week the index showed a drop of 57.1, although this
figure distorted the mood of the market; stripping out an aggregate gain of
41.7 points accrued before the chancellor of the exchequer delivered his
Budget proposals on Tuesday afternoon the equity market has plunged almost
100 points with very few signs of any worthwhile support.
There was no relief for equities from the foreign exchange markets where
sterling remained under pressure and pre-Budget hopes of a reduction in UK
interest had long disappeared. Gilts retreated afresh with the long-dated
issues posting losses of over a half-point.
The Footsie began the day some five points higher, with marketmakers
expecting a technical rally. However, the futures market loomed large and
began to retreat, unnerving dealers in equities, before trying to stabilise
towards midday. A large sell programme also helped undermined sentiment.
The afternoon session saw the future suddenly dip and move to a 17 point
discount against fair value, and share prices ran back sharply to reach the
day's lowest levels just before the close. A firm opening by Wall Street
gave way as London closed, causing more unease.
Dealers attributed the sudden downward lurch to rumours, thought to have
originated in the foreign exchange markets, that the Sunday newspapers will
reveal an opinion poll showing Labour ahead of the Tories by between 5 and 9
points.
'If the opinion poll stories are correct then the market is due another
sharp fall on Monday, possibly in the region of 30 to 50 points,' said a
senior marketmaker at one of the leading UK integrated securities houses.
The big overseas earners provided a handful of good performances from the
Footsie constituents with RTZ, Hanson and ICI commanding good support and
substantially outpacing the market.
Retail business in the equity market continued to rise this week as
institutions began to alter their portfolios after the Budget proposals and
ahead of the April 9 general election.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3406</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNCERTAINTY about the election, compounded by rumours of a surge in support
for the Labour party, sent stock index futures lower, writes Christopher
Price.
The March contract opened at 2,489, its high point of the day, and then
began drifting down. A small squeeze prompted a minor rally shortly before
midday, but was soon replaced by renewed nervous trading and further
weakness.
A strong Wall Street opening restored some buoyancy in the afternoon, but
news that the weekend press would show Labour with a 6-point lead in the
opinion polls sent values spiralling down. The market, which had been at a
discount to fair value most of the day, closed at 2,467, down 22 on the
previous session and at a 12 point discount to its three point fair value
premium. Turnover was a healthy 8,776 contracts.
A busy after hours market saw an additional 3,000 traded and the March
contract slip further to 2,464.
In the traded options market, there were 25,405 contracts traded, with half
of those in the FT-SE 100 and Euro FT-SE options. Lonrho was the busiest
stock option at 3,430 traded, with the March 130 particularly busy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3407</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture (Week in the Markets):
Brazilians cheer up coffee market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD MOONEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LONDON'S ROBUSTA coffee market got a shot in the arm this week when Brazil's
coffee exporters announced that they had abandoned their traditional
opposition to the International Coffee Organisation's export quota system.
The decision, taken by representatives of 40 leading exporters meeting under
the auspices of the Brazilian Coffee Exporters' Federation (Febec), echoed a
vote last week by Brazilian producers calling for talks on a return to an
international coffee agreement.
The principle of export limitation has always, naturally enough, been
anathema to the exporters. But their fundamental opposition to quotas
appears now to have been outweighed by increasing concern at the growing
number of Brazilian farmers who have been abandoning coffee cultivation
after seeing world market prices plunge to 17-year lows following the
suspension of the quota system in July 1989. 'Our absolute priority is an
increase in international prices and for this Febec has to sacrifice some
ideals,' commented Mr Oswaldo Aranha Neto, the federation's president.
Febec's change of heart, which one Brazilian trader described as 'the
demolition of the Berlin Wall of the coffee world', fuelled a rally that had
begun in New York on Friday of last week. The May contract on the London
futures market, which had already risen by Dollars 28 since the beginning of
the week, put on another Dollars 40 on Wednesday and Thursday to reach
Dollars 871 a tonne. That rise was trimmed back yesterday after the director
of the Mexican Coffee Institute voiced his opposition to export quotas, but
the May price still ended Dollars 42 up on balance at Dollars 845 a tonne.
Cocoa futures dipped to 6 1/2 -month lows in mid-week as traders awaited
news on the Ivory Coast mid-crop, which they thought might be higher than
the 100,000 tonnes previously estimated. But the fall, which took the May
delivery price to Pounds 660 a tonne at one stage, was reversed towards the
end of the week and that position ended unchanged at Pounds 676 a tonne.
At the London Metal Exchange zinc was for the first three days of the week
clearly the weakest market and for the last two clearly the strongest.
Prices went into retreat on Monday in reaction against the gains encouraged
last week by news of further supply disruptions. The fall carried the three
months price through the psychologically-important Dollars 1,200-a-tonne
level, triggering stop-loss liquidation orders, and by Wednesday's close it
had dipped to Dollars 1,179 a tonne, the lowest level for three weeks. That
technical correction appeared, however, to have cleared the way for a fresh
wave of speculative and options-based activity, which quickly triggered
short-covering and stop-loss buying. The latest rise in US retail sales also
encouraged the Dollars 50 rise that yesterday took three months zinc to
Dollars 1,237.50 a tonne, up Dollars 26 on the week, the highest level since
January last year.
could rise further. 'If it manages to close above Dollars 1,230 (a tonne), I
see it quickly testing resistance above Dollars 1,250,' one told Reuter
yesterday morning.
The only other price movements of any size this week were in the nickel and
lead markets, and both were weaker.
A further build-up in London Metal Exchange stocks weighed on the nickel
market, which ended Dollars 180 down on the week at Dollars 7,445 in the
cash position. Lead prices had made a modest advance until producer buying
dried up yesterday. The cash price ended Pounds 6.25 down on the day at
Pounds 297.75 a tonne, down Pounds 4 on the week.
The three months aluminium price breached the Dollars 1,300-a-tonne support
level on Monday as last week's downtrend was continued. But losses were
recovered by the end of the week.
At the London bullion market the gold price moved slowly but surely lower
throughout the week. Support at the Dollars 348-a-troy-ounce level was first
tested on Monday and held until Thursday morning. But lack of interest from
investors, who have seen producer selling emerge repeatedly above Dollars
351 an ounce, eventually took its toll and the price closed yesterday at a
six-month low of Dollars 347 a tonne, down Dollars 2.70 on the week.
The platinum price was also under pressure, despite fears about unrest in
South Africa, the main supplying area. Dealers attributed yesterday's
Dollars 2 fall to Dollars 359 an ounce to a perception that demand was
slackening in Japan, the main importer of the white metal.
 -----------------------------------------------------
LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
(As at Thursday's close)
tonnes
 -----------------------------------------------------
Aluminium   +3,350   to   1,136,375
 -----------------------------------------------------
Copper        +825   to     301,975
 -----------------------------------------------------
Lead          -975   to     134,675
 -----------------------------------------------------
Nickel        +846   to      24,276
 -----------------------------------------------------
Zinc        -1,175   to     211,625
 -----------------------------------------------------
Tin           -145   to      12,255
 -----------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3408</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Appointments: Bodies politic
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Nick Winks, chief executive of Colourgraphic, has been elected
vice-president of the BRITISH PRINTING INDUSTRIES FEDERATION.
*****
Colin Stanley, director general of British Printing Industries Federation,
has been appointed chairman of the CBI industrial relations, wages and
conditions committee.
*****
Mary Berg, head of equity research at Svenska Handelsbanken in London, and
Paul Thornton, group marketing director of PA Consulting, have been
appointed non-executive members of The CENTRAL STATISTICAL OFFICE's
management board.
*****
Michael Ellman, a partner with Vizards, has been appointed vice-president of
the INTERNATIONAL FEDERATION FOR HUMAN RIGHTS.
*****
Sandy Glennie (above left), md of Volvo Bus, has been elected chairman of
the Public Service Vehicle Section of the SOCIETY OF MOTOR MANUFACTURERS AND
TRADERS.
*****
Keith Todd (above right), director, finance and business strategy of ICL,
has been appointed to the honorary position of treasurer-designate of the
council of the OPEN UNIVERSITY.
*****
Malcolm Kennedy, chairman and md of Merz and McLellan Consulting Engineers,
has been appointed a member, for three years, of the MONOPOLIES AND MERGERS
COMMISSION when it considers references to it about the electricity
industry.
*****
Peter Witherington, Wimpey environmental's business development director and
an expert in the field of contaminated land assessment, has been appointed
visiting professor at Newcastle University.
*****
Roland Baird has been appointed chief executive of the INTERNATIONAL AIRLINE
PASSENGERS ASSOCIATION.
*****
David Faull and Maurice Chandler have been appointed chairman and
vice-chairman respectively of CHRISTIAN CHILDREN'S FUND OF GREAT BRITAIN.
*****
David Verey, chairman and chief executive of Lazard Brothers, is appointed a
trustee of the TATE GALLERY for a five year term.
*****
Ron Bull, adviser to Flexible Manufacturing Technology, has been elected
president of the MACHINE TOOL TECHNOLOGIES ASSOCIATION.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3409</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Money Markets: Poll fears mount
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MOUNTING concern about the Conservative party's electoral prospects and the
weakness of sterling pushed rates still higher on the UK money market
yesterday.
Dealers said the market was realising that a Labour majority in the general
election on April 9 could not now be ruled out, following the first opinion
poll since the UK Budget, which showed Labour with a three-point lead.
Another fall in sterling sparked worries that a base rate rise might not be
out of the question at some point, and the gloom was increased by a rumour
that a Sunday newspaper opinion poll would show Labour with a six-point
lead.
Interbank rates jumped up across the board, with the key three-month up
3/16 to 10 7/8 -10 3/4 . Even the one-week rate stood at 10 3/4 -10 1/2 per
cent, while the one-year touched the 'big 11', at 11-10 7/8 per cent.
The June sterling contract opened 13 basis points down at 89.22, and
plummeted to around 89.09 after heavy selling.
After initially forecasting a shortage of Pounds 1.5bn, the Bank of England
appeared to be trying to calm the market by offering to purchase any bills
it was offered, including those in the longer bands 3 and 4 for the first
time in more than a month. However, only Pounds 17m of band 3 and 4 bank
bills were purchased in the early round, due to uncertainty about dealing
rates.
By midday, when the shortage was revised down slightly to Pounds 1,450m, the
rates were established at 10 3/16 for band 3 and 10 5/32 for band 4. The
Bank purchased a further Pounds 355m of bank and treasury bills in bands 1,
3 and 4, along with Pounds 7m bills for resale on March 30 at 10 7/16 per
cent.
It purchased a further Pounds 871m of bills in all four bands in the
afternoon to take the day's operations to Pounds 1,243m, leaving the system
still around Pounds 200m short.
Overnight rates touched 18 per cent in the afternoon, and there was even
talk of 20 per cent rates in the late scramble to get square before the
weekend.
German call money rates eased to 9.50/60 per cent from the 9.55/65 seen all
week, as liquidity improved in the banking system. Dealers said heavy tax
payments due this month had not yet begun leaving the system, but would put
pressure on reserves early next week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3410</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Dollar fails to meet promise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR had a subdued day to end a week which left dealers puzzled at its
failure to take advantage of unexpectedly strong US economic data, writes
Neil Buckley.
Selling of dollars for yen, rumours about intervention from the Bank of
Japan, and calls from Japanese ministers for a stronger yen all affected
market sentiment, and the US currency confounded analysts' predictions to
end the week with a  1/2 -pfennig loss. The market paid surprisingly little
attention to a sharp increase in the University of Nichigan consumer
confidence survey to 74.6 from 68.8.
Dealers said the Japanese were trying to push the value of the yen up
towards the end of the financial year at the end of March to increase the
value of Japanese companies' overseas assets. Both the finance and industry
ministers suggested that the yen's recent fall against the dollar was not in
line with economic fundamentals, and that a rate of Y120 was more
appropriate.
The dollar closed at DM1.6685/90 after a DM1.6695/6705 start, and a
DM1.6717/27 finish in Asia. It ended the previous week at DM1.6730/40.
Against the yen, it stood at Y1233.50/60, from a Y133.35/45 start and a
Y133.60/70 Asian close, but was still well above the previous week's London
close of Y131.80/90.
Mr David Deakin of Nikko Bank in London said he was surprised. 'Maybe
everyone is as long as they want to be in the dollar at the moment,' he
said, adding that dealers were perhaps waiting for more US economic data to
prove the recovery was under way.
'In the medium term, the dollar has the mileage to go a lot higher, but in
the short term it doesn't seem to have the get-up-and-go.'
In Tokyo, the dollar had traded lower against the yen and D-mark after
several bouts of selling.
In the EMS, more political jitters after an opinion poll showed the UK
Labour party three points ahead of the ruling Conservatives pushed sterling
down a third of a pfennig to DM2.8535/55 from DM2.8562/97 on Thursday.
It remained pinned to its effective floor against the peseta, which it has
dragged down with it. Sterling dropped to 53 per cent of its permitted
divergence below its central Ecu rate, a two-month low, from 50 per cent on
Thursday.
Dealers said only sterling's membership of the ERM, with the threat of Bank
of England intervention should it fall below its peseta floor, was slowing
its fall. They warned it was not inconceivable that further Labour advances
in the opinion polls could push it right down to its absolute floor in the
ERM at DM2.7780.
Against the dollar, however, sterling recovered to Dollars 1.7112, from a
previous close of Dollars 1.7055.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3411</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / International Company News: Elf share offering declared
successful
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE flotation of a 2.3 per cent stake in Elf Aquitaine, the French
state-controlled oil group, was a success, with subscriptions for 3.22 times
the number of shares on offer, the Societe des Bourses Francaises announced
yesterday.
The rush for shares in the second in the government's programme of partial
privatisations came despite the fact that the issue was offered earlier this
week at FFr360 (Dollars 63.90) - only a small discount to the market. The
market price even fell slightly below the issue price, to recover yesterday
afternoon to FFr362, up FFr1.80 for the day.
By the time subscriptions had been counted, there were applications for
10.9m shares, against 3.38m on offer. The government managed to add another
360,000 shares to the offer by buying back shares which had earlier been
placed abroad. Accordingly, investors will receive around 34 per cent of the
shares they applied for.
The international tranche of the offering was swallowed up on Wednesday, the
first day of subscription, with French investors slower to apply for stock.
The Elf sale initially got off to a false start last December, when the
government was obliged to postpone the offer because of the poor state of
the stock market. The bourse has recovered strongly since then, with the
CAC-40 index showing in a 10.5 per cent rise since the beginning of the
year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3412</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / International Company News: Ahold lifted by US performance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HIGHER earnings in the US helped lift annual net profits at Ahold, the
Dutch-based food retailer, by 13.4 per cent to Fl 275.8m (Dollars 146.7m) in
1991.
The company, whose sales are evenly split between the US and the
Netherlands, yesterday forecast further increases in both sales and net
profit for 1992.
Operating results in the Netherlands were barely changed last year at Fl
192.6m, but US operating earnings surged 54.4 per cent to Dollars 145.3m,
boosted in part by the acquisition in the second quarter of a fourth
supermarket chain, Tops Markets in New York state. Excluding Tops' results,
US operating profit rose 24.3 per cent.
Ahold, which is the Netherlands' biggest grocer through its Albert Heijn
supermarket chain, is to increase its 1991 dual-currency dividend to Fl 1.05
and 40 cents a share, from Fl 1.04 and 32 cents.
Group sales rose 18.5 per cent to Fl 20.8bn, with Dutch sales up 8 per cent
at Fl 10.3bn and US sales up 27 per cent at Dollars 5.6bn. Excluding the
Tops supermarkets, US sales growth was 5.2 per cent.
Ahold said its Dutch institutional food-supply subsidiary posted an
operating loss in 1991 while undergoing restructuring. The company also
incurred start-up costs in Czechoslovakia, where Ahold has four pilot
supermarkets which it hopes to expand to a wider network of 40 to 50 shops
in the medium term.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3413</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / International Company News: AEG cancels agreement on Olympia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AEG, the Daimler-Benz subsidiary, has cancelled its agreement to sell the
German distribution and customer service operations of Olympia, the office
equipment and typewriter company.
Last week AEG announced a preliminary agreement to sell the business - which
employs 525 people - to Mr Jurgen Sievers, a management consultant who had
been advising on the restructuring at Olympia since August last year.
Yesterday AEG said that, after publishing details of the disposal last week,
it had discovered details about Mr Sievers' past business activities which
made it unwilling to complete the sale.
The Frankfurt-based company did not disclose what it had discovered about Mr
Sievers. It said that it was ending his consultancy contract with the
company immediately.
AEG is now in talks with other parties about a possible sale of the
business.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3414</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / International Company News: Outokumpu slips deeper into red
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
OUTOKUMPU, the Finnish mining and metals group, yesterday reported a loss of
FM768m (Dollars 168.8m) before extraordinary items, against a deficit of
FM124m in 1990.
The losses came in spite of 12 per cent sales growth to FM12.6bn, and were
heavier than the company had expected. As a result it will not pay a
dividend. Shareholders received FM0.77 last time.
Outokumpu, which is 57 per cent state-owned, said market conditions had
worsened during the last four months of 1991.
Earnings were hurt by the devaluation of the Finnish markka in November,
which cost the company FM90m in foreign exchange losses.
Rationalisation measures in its copper and base metals units also reduced
profits by FM220m.
Outokumpu said it expected earnings to improve this year due to better
market conditions. Exports are also expected to increase due to the
devaluation, while rationalisation measures should increase efficiency.
Base metal production operations incurred a FM120m loss before extraordinary
items, compared with a FM312m profit in 1990. Outokumpu said this division
was especially sensitive to economic cycles and metal price fluctuations.
Outokumpu Zinc achieved a satisfactory result.
Its stainless steel operation achieved new production records in rolled
stainless steel and ferrochrome. Its profit before extraordinary items rose
to FM201m from FM95m.
The technology sector had a difficult year and its loss deepened to FM212m
from FM103m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3415</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / International Company News: Orkla pre-tax profits halved at
NKr601m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN FOSSLI and HILARY BARNES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OSLO, COPENHAGEN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ORKLA, the Norwegian group with interests ranging from paper to food and
drinks, has revealed 1991 pre-tax profits of NKr601m (Dollars 91.6m), or
half the level achieved the previous year.
The group, which last June merged with Nora Industrier, took a NKr236m
non-recurring charge against plant closures and goodwill. It also suffered a
NKr165m share portfolio loss.
Group operating revenue rose to NKr16.13bn from NKr15.46bn, while operating
profit dropped to NKr863m from NKr911m.
Orkla said that, with the exception of snacks, all branded food and drink
goods had improved operating margins. However, negative market developments
for pulp affected the wood processing division.
A dividend of NKr3.75 a share is declared, and a one-for-10 bonus issue is
proposed.
Norske Skog, the pulp and paper producer, posted a decline in net profits to
NKr370m for 1991, against NKr959m the previous year.
The company warned that 1992 profits would fall further.
A change in accounting principles has given Norske Skog extra one-off income
of NKr110m.
Vital Forsikring, the Norwegian insurance group, reported 1991 profit,
before year-end adjustments, down 53 per cent at NKr718m.
Vital explained that the figures for the last two years were not directly
comparable due to changes in collective premium rates.
The dividend is being held at NKr4.75 a share.
Superfos, the Danish grain and fodder, construction, packaging and chemicals
group, said that profits after non-recurring items and tax had fallen from
DKr177m (Dollars 27.2m) to DKr126m.
Sales dipped from DKr6.88bn to DKr6.64bn, primarily because of disposals.
An unchanged dividend of DKr90 a share is proposed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3416</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / International Company News: Homestake agrees merger with
International Corona
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HOMESTAKE Mining of San Francisco is to merge with Canada's International
Corona to create one of the biggest gold producers outside South Africa.
The two companies said yesterday that they had agreed in principle to a
'business combination' in which Homestake would offer Corona shareholders
0.35 of a Homestake share for each of Corona's 83m common shares.
The merger values Corona at about USDollars 400m, with Homestake shares
trading yesterday at USDollars 14 (down Dollars 1) on the New York Stock
Exchange following the announcement of the deal. Corona's shares jumped 85
cents to CDollars 5 (USDollars 4.23) on the Toronto Stock Exchange.
Dundee Bancorp, Corona's controlling shareholder, has agreed to tender its
shares to Homestake.
The combined company expects to produce 1.8m ounces of gold this year from
mines in the US, Canada and Australia. Its reserves will total about 20m
ounces.
Corona's main assets are its low-cost mines in the Hemlo gold field in
north-western Ontario and the recently discovered Eskay Creek deposit in
British Columbia.
In spite of its valuable properties, Corona has been strained in recent
years by the sliding gold price and its heavy debt. It suffered a loss of
CDollars 13.3m in the first nine months of last year.
Corona also requires financing to develop the Eskay Creek property. In
addition, Homestake has gained both technical and environmental experience
at its operations in California which will be useful in the Eskay Creek
project.
On the other hand, Homestake has lacked the long-life, low-cost mines which
Corona will bring to the deal.
Prior to the deal with Homestake, Corona was in the midst of plans to
restructure its CDollars 323m debt, including proposals for a share issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3417</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / International Company News: Write-downs set back Ambroveneto
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BANCO Ambrosiano Veneto (Ambroveneto), Italy's largest private-sector bank,
has announced that net parent company profits last year had fallen 23 per
cent to L131bn (Dollars 104.8m) following write-downs on the book value of
two subsidiaries.
However, gross profits rose 8 per cent to L605bn, prompting a L10-a-share
dividend increase to L150 for ordinary shares and L170 for savings shares.
Preliminary figures for the group showed net earnings would rise by more
than 20 per cent to L230bn in 1991.
The write-downs involved the bank's Naples-based Ambroveneto Sud subsidiary,
bought last year from Citibank, and Fiscambi, a financial services
subsidiary. Ambroveneto wrote down Ambroveneto Sud's book value by L170bn,
and that of Fiscambi by L23bn. Overall provisions, write-downs and transfers
to risk funds amounted to L359bn.
Ambroveneto Sud lost L38.7bn in 1991 against net profits of L4.3bn the
previous year. However, the swing largely stemmed from a huge increase in
provisions and transfers to risk funds, which jumped to L64.6bn from L24.2bn
the previous year.
The rise in Ambroveneto's gross profits stemmed from a 12.4 per cent
increase in interest income to L1,228bn, while fee earnings climbed 8.5 per
cent to L364bn. However, costs grew 13.6 per cent to L993bn, swollen by the
opening of 46 new branches.
The bank proposed a share-swap to buy out remaining minority shareholders in
Ambroveneto Sud, who hold around 8 per cent of the stock. Shareholders will
be offered 13 Ambroveneto ordinary shares for every 10 shares they own in
Ambroveneto Sud.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3418</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / International Company News: Air France takes stake in CSA
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AIR France, the French state-owned airline, yesterday became the first
western carrier to buy a stake in an existing eastern European airline, when
it signed its alliance with CSA of Czechoslovakia, writes William Dawkins.
The French group has paid the equivalent of Dollars 60m for a 40 per cent
share in CSA.
The payment is being made equally by the London-based European Bank for
Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) and an Air France subsidiary, itself
jointly owned with the Caisse des Depots et Consignations, the French state
financial institution.
A large part of Air France's own investment will be paid in kind, in the
form of technical and training help and the transfer of maintenance and
other tools.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3419</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / International Company News: Porsche falls to DM2m at halfway
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STUTTGART
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PORSCHE, the German maker of expensive sports cars which has been beset by
controversy over management appointments and the role of its controlling
family shareholders, made almost no profit in the first half of this
financial year.
Pre-tax profits had slumped from DM65m to DM2m (Dollars 1.2m), Mr Arno Bohn,
chief executive, told the annual meeting yesterday. He said Porsche expected
to make a profit for the full year ending July 1992, but warned of the risks
that could stem from high claims in the coming wage round.
Nor did he have any hope to offer about the near future. 'There are no signs
of economic turnround in the US or other important export markets,' Mr Bohn
said. He expected group turnover this year to drop to around DM2.5bn, 20 per
cent less than in 1990-91.
Despite the problems surrounding the company, its management and the
supervisory board (representing the Porsche and Piech families and
employees), the annual meeting was a fairly low-key affair. Shareholder
criticism was occasionally sharp but without rancour. The family members on
the non-executive supervisory board kept silent.
Mr Bohn himself made no comment on the recent tussle with the supervisory
board, which first failed to confirm him in office and then, after he
threatened to resign, gave him a three-year contract renewal.
However, representatives of preference stockholders - the two families hold
all the voting shares - criticised the 12-man non-executive board,
especially the five family members, for allegedly having dented the
company's image by their indecision and willingness to leak details of
boardroom policy.
Mr Werner Futter, representing a small shareholder association, said the
resultant publicity had harmed the Porsche marque and was bad for employee
motivation. 'We never want to experience this again,' he declared.
Shareholders clapped, and Mr Walther Zugel, a local banker who spoke on
behalf of the supervisory board, of which he is a member, remarked: 'I
assume from the clapping that you have scored a bull's-eye.'
Mr Bohn admitted this month that the company's image had not been helped by
a series of management departures. The latest has just occurred in the US,
where the president of Porsche Cars North America resigned over unspecified
policy differences.
It is in the US that Porsche has suffered most demand weakness. Sales there
in the first six months fell 54 per cent to 1,800 cars. Other export sales
were down by 38 per cent to 3,700 cars, while those in Germany rose by 20
per cent to 5,050. Total half-year turnover was 23 per cent lower at
DM1.1bn.
Mr Bohn pointed out, however, that Porsche's new 968 four-cylinder model
(priced from DM92,000) had only been fully available since December and the
eight-cylinder 928GTS (DM159,000) from January.
Porsche was continuing its cost and staff reductions which would allow it to
break even on sales of 21,000 cars a year against 28,000 in 1989-90.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3420</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Spices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The pepper market has been relatively quiet, both in origin and in consuming
markets, and the white pepper price hardly changed, reports Man Producten.
Muntok white, faq (fair average quality), is available for spot delivery at
USDollars 1,350 a tonne and at Dollars 1,275, cif, for shipment from
Indonesia during the second quarter. Brazil is more or less sold out. The
trend in india is firmer than anticipated, with MG1 at Dollars 1,250 a
tonne, cif. But crops in countries like Thailand and Vietnam are becoming
available now and this has created some selling pressure, with faq grades at
Dollars 1,050 a tonne, cif
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3421</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / International Company News: Scitex buys US maker of image
systems
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SCITEX, the Israeli manufacturer of colour electronic pre-press equipment,
has moved to deepen its penetration of the US newspaper, magazine and
corporate publishing markets by buying a Massachusetts-based maker of
photo-scanning and transmission systems.
Scitex has agreed to pay Dollars 35m, plus unspecified performance-related
payments over the next two years, for 100 per cent of Leaf Systems.
Leaf, which has a strategic partnership with Associated Press, the US news
agency, has installations at more than 1,000 newspapers, mainly in the US.
Leaf and Scitex intend to benefit from the combination of their respective
expertise in photo and graphic-imaging technologies.
Mr Arie Rosenfeld, Scitex's chief executive, said the agreement would help
his company achieve a spread of products for publishers 'from design and
creation through colour separation to final print'.
Scitex, which last month announced a 31 per cent increase in profits in 1991
to just over Dollars 100m, had cash reserves at the end of last year of
Dollars 150m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3422</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Economic Diary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TODAY: Conservative central council meets in Torquay.
TOMORROW: National Savings results (February).
MONDAY: Parliament disolved. Meeting in Geneva of UN Compensation Fund to
work out details on compensation payable by Iraq for its occupation of
Kuwait (until March 20). European Community economic and finance ministers
meet in Brussels. Financial Times holds a two-day conference called 'World
Pharmaceuticals' in London. Autumn-winter ready to wear fashion shows in
Paris (until March 25).
TUESDAY: Public sector borrowing requirement (February). Index of output of
the production industries (January). US consumer price index (February);
housing starts-building permits (February); industrial production
(February). South Africa holds referendum on political reform. International
Confederation of Free Trade Unions holds its 15th world congress in Caracas
(until Mar 24). State of nation debate in Spanish parliament.
WEDNESDAY: Retail sales (February-provisional). Finland expected to apply
formally for European Community membership.
THURSDAY: Cross-border acquisitions and mergers (fourth quarter). Major
British banking groups' monthly statement (February). Provisional estimates
of monetary aggregates (February). Gross domestic product (fourth
quarter-provisional estimate). Personal income, expenditure and saving
(fourth quarter). Industrial and commercial companies (fourth quarter).
Labour market statistics: unemployment and unfilled vacancies
(February-provisional); average earnings indices (January-provisional);
employment, hours, productivity and unit wage costs; industrial disputes. US
jobless claims; merchandise trade (January).
FRIDAY: Retail prices index and tax and price index (February). Summit of
Commonwealth of Independent States in Kiev. Regional conference on turmoil
in Horn of Africa and Somalia. Taiwanese National Assembly begins
extraordinary session to debate democratic reforms.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3423</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Clarke Hooper warns of losses and no
interim
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in Clarke Hooper, the UK's only publicly-quoted sales promotion
group, slumped from 38p to 11p yesterday after the company announced it will
make a significant pre-tax loss for the year ending in April.
As a result the directors have decided not to pay the interim dividend of
1.7p which it announced last September.
The board said the company continued to trade within its banking facilities
and continued to enjoy the support of its principal bankers.
At the interim stage Clarke Hooper reported profits halved to Pounds 820,000
and said that the business climate had been exceptionally difficult and
showed little sign of an early recovery.
The directors said they were carrying out further rationalisation to reduce
group debt.
Mr Alan Penson has been appointed chief executive and Ms Sue Archer, the
company secretary, replaces him as finance director. Mr Barry Clarke remains
chairman.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3424</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Increased losses at Bank of Ireland's US
offshoots
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE US subsidiaries of Bank of Ireland incurred an increased pre-tax loss of
Dollars 123.4m (Pounds 70m) last year, up from Dollars 99.8m in 1990.
The result is a blow to any hopes of an early return to profits by Bank of
Ireland in north America.
The bank said yesterday that the loss reflected the continuing recession in
New Hampshire where its subsidiaries operated and the very severe decline in
real estate values during 1991.
There is also a Dollars 4m extraordinary item arising from additional
wind-down costs for Vendor Funding.
Total assets of Bank of Ireland First Holdings, which controls the US
subsidiaries, rose by 52 per cent to Dollars 4.6bn, and total deposits were
up by 63 per cent to Dollars 3.2bn. Loans increased by 31 per cent to
Dollars 2.5bn.
The increase in asset size reflected the purchases last autumn of Amoskeag
Bank and BankEast Corporation.
Mr Pat Molly, the chief executive, said that the core banking operations of
the group's US banks had been hit by continuing losses on bad loans, but
there were some signs now that problems with asset quality were slowing
down.
He said that rationalisation of the two new banks was proceeding at an
encouraging speed and they should help provide a material improvement in
Bank of Ireland's trading performance in the US during the current year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3425</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Independnce brings grist to the mill -
James Buxton on Inveresk's new-found freedom and buoyancy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR STEFAN Kay beams with pleasure as he bustles round his paper-mill, and
his employees smile warmly back at him. 'You can't imagine the satisfaction
we've had in the past 17 months from running our own business,' he says.
In the autumn of 1990 Mr Kay and his senior colleagues completed a Pounds
31m management buy-out of Inveresk, the Scotland-based maker of fine paper,
from its US owner, Georgia-Pacific (GP). The way Mr Kay tells it, they have
not looked back since, and in January this year Inveresk paid off all the
Pounds 25m of debt the MBO had lumbered it with.
GP had acquired the ailing Inveresk, which had a famous name in British
paper-making, in 1981. It was obliged to sell, when in 1990, it bought Great
Northern Nekoosa, a US paper-maker, and plunged deeper into debt. GP
co-operated in the MBO process put together by Mr Kay, Inveresk managing
director since 1988, though the deal took six months to conclude.
The MBO brought a change of attitude in the management of Inveresk. Mr Kay
says: 'GP hadn't focused on profit. There wasn't an attitude of mind in GP
that black numbers are better than red numbers.'
This meant plenty of opportunities for the new management to make savings.
For example GP was (and still is) a major supplier of pulp to Inveresk,
which used to hold between six and 10 weeks' supply at its four relatively
small mills, three of them in Scotland and one in Somerset.
'GP said the big inventory didn't matter because the pulp was GP's wherever
it was,' says Mr Kay. 'But after the MBO we were paying interest on it.'
So Inveresk cut its inventory to between one and two week's supply of pulp.
It also tightened up on customer credit arrangements. 'We were paying our
creditors in 30 days, but our debtors weren't paying for 60 days. So we went
to our creditors and said we'd pay them within 45 or 60 days,' says Mr Kay.
'We also tightened up our debt collection, which had always been good, and
tightened up our finished goods stock.'
All those measures, says Mr Kay, generated extra cash in a business which
turns over about Pounds 100m a year. By the end of December Inveresk went
back to its lenders and paid off all Pounds 22m of its senior and Pounds
3.3m of its mezzanine debt. 'We'd never wanted mezzanine financing in the
first place,' says Mr Kay.
'We always had an asset base and this was never a leveraged buy-out."
Instead of the debt Inveresk took on a Pounds 20m revolving credit facility
from banks led by Morgan Grenfell, which had organised the MBO and taken
equity in Inveresk.
Since gaining control, Mr Kay and his colleagues have made good the lack of
investment which affected the later stages of GP's ownership. It spent
Pounds 2.5m on installing the latest equipment to make furniture laminate
paper at its St Cuthberts mill at Wells, Somerset, a project which, under
GP, had been postponed for a year.
Some Pounds 1m was spent last year at each of the Scottish mills, and now
spending of Pounds 4m has been approved for the Carrongrove mill near
Falkirk to increase output of the coated board the used for the covers of
company reports, a project which Mr Kay calls a strategic investment.
Other spending is aimed at removing bottlenecks in the mills and gradually
moving them from working five and a half days a week to seven days a week.
'It's satisfying to be able to work up your investment projects and present
them to your own board for approval rather than taking them to Atlanta,'
says Mr Kay, who runs the company from Caldwells Mill at Inverkeithing, on
the Fife side of the Forth Bridge.
Although three of the four mills are working at full capacity, Inveresk is
finding conditions tight in the paper industry - the mills are operating
with only a two to three week supply of orders. But although Mr Kay sees no
sign of an upturn in the UK economy, the company is not wholly dependent on
the UK market: some 40 per cent of its output is exported, mostly to EC
countries including Germany and France, and these markets have held up
reasonably well.
'Building up other people's confidence in us in our export markets was a
10-year process,' says Mr Kay. 'The Germans don't understand quality
failure. From their point of view the fact that you are 500 miles away
doesn't mean you can't deliver at 10am on Tuesday. They allow you just one
hour each way on delivery.'
Inveresk's priority now is to increase capacity utilisation at its mills and
grow organically, but it is also keeping an eye on investment opportunities.
These are likely to be in Germany, France or other EC countries, since most
paper mills in the UK are owned by large groups. Part of the Pounds 20m
revolving credit might have to be used to finance production to meet an
upturn in demand.
In a few weeks' time the company should report pre-tax profits for the year
to December 1 1991 of just under Pounds 6m. As for the future, Mr Kay says:
'We recognise that our backers are not in it for a terribly long haul.' The
equity providers, as well as Morgan Grenfell, are County NatWest Ventures,
3i and Prudential Venture Managers.
Mr Kay lists the options: Inveresk could be sold to another company in a
trade sale; it could obtain a quote through a reverse takeover; or it could
seek a stock exchange listing.
'A trade sale is not personally very attractive to me,' he says, 'but there
could obviously be a price at which it was acceptable. It's difficult to see
who one would do a reverse takeover with. So that leaves a stock exchange
listing. We're looking at it, but not on a tremendously urgent timescale.
We're thinking in terms of the end of this year, next year or into 1994.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3426</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Johnson Matthey pays Pounds 2.2m for
Swedish purchase
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Johnson Matthey, already the world's biggest producer of automotive emission
catalysts, has taken another step towards its goal of becoming a substantial
global supplier of diesel autocatalysts by taking a controlling interest in
Svenska Emissionsteknik, writes Kenneth Gooding.
Until now Emissionsteknik, which operates from a laboratory in Gothenburg,
has been backed financially by Fond Vast, one of Sweden's national pension
funds. JM is to pay Sk22.64m (about Pounds 2.17m) for 51 per cent and has an
option to buy the rest. Taking up this option and proposed capital and
development expenditure is expected to take JM's total investment to Pounds
10m over the next three years.
JM said that by combining JM and Emissionsteknik technology it would be able
to treat emissions from all types of mobile and stationary petrol and diesel
engines.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3427</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Attributable loss at Inoco increases
sharply to Pounds 8m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Pre-tax losses at Inoco, the property development company, were reduced from
Pounds 6.13m to Pounds 3.71m in the year to December 31.
Gross rents receivable slipped to Pounds 10.4m (Pounds 10.8m). The share of
associated companies' losses grew to Pounds 1.2m (Pounds 799,000) though the
exceptional costs declined to Pounds 691,000 (Pounds 1.78m).
Below the line however, there was an extraordinary loss of Pounds 4.32m
(profit Pounds 1.51m) relating mainly to the sale of the investment in Gulf
Resources &amp; Chemical Corporation and the investment properties in Houston,
Texas. This resulted in attributable losses of Pounds 8.01m, sharply up on
last time's Pounds 4.27m, but down on the Pounds 10.4m at the interim stage.
Losses per share were cut to 1.78p (2.79p).
On the plus side, voids throughout the year remained below 8 per cent - a
'creditable performance in prevailing market conditions'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3428</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Overseas acquisitions and diversification
lift Kerry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM COONE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KERRY GROUP, the Irish dairy and food products manufacturer, yesterday
reported a 25 per cent increase in pre-tax profits to IPounds 24.1m (Pounds
22.5m) for 1991, on turnover up from IPounds 584m to IPounds 755m.
Earnings per share increased by 15 per cent to 14.5p and a final dividend of
1.4p (1.39p) is recommended for a total of 2.15p (2.1p).
The results have fulfilled market expectations of Kerry's long-term growth
prospects resulting from its aggressive overseas acquisition programme and
diversification into meat processing.
Meat processing now accounts for IPounds 372m, or 49 per cent, of turnover,
dairy products and food ingredients IPounds 353m (47 per cent) while its
agricultural division contributed IPounds 30m.
On a geographical basis the turnover breakdown is: Ireland 36 per cent, UK
and mainland Europe 38 per cent, and the US 25 per cent.
For the first time, meat processing has become the group's main activity,
and Ireland has ceased to be its principal market. Based on turnover Kerry
is now one of Ireland's top ten companies.
Most of the increased turnover comes from Kerry's acquisition of five meat
processing plants in the UK and Ireland in the past year, together with
their distribution networks, and the purchase of Dairyland Products, a food
ingredient manufacturer in the US.
Kerry said it planned to follow up its success in the US food ingredients
market 'with a thrust into the European market'.
Kerry has spent IPounds 66m on acquisitions in the past 15 months. In May
1991 a placing of 6m shares raised IPounds 10.8m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3429</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Letter: TECs are failing special needs trainees
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From D. D. N. GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I read with interest Anne Weinstock's article 'Low marks for slow
learners' on the training of people with 'special needs' (Management, March
11).
Her article raises a number of important issues which call for urgent
attention.
In recent weeks, I have been privileged to meet a number of dedicated
providers of training who are training young people and adults. Many of the
trainees have severe learning difficulties, or other special needs. Everyone
concerned would echo strongly the comments made by her.
The annual round of negotiations between TECs (Training and Enterprise
Councils) and training providers, particularly for those in the voluntary
sector, is becoming a veritable nightmare.
Again this year, many fear that they will be unable to continue to operate
at the level of funding on offer and with the conditions attached. As a
precautionary measure, many have issued redundancy notices to their staff.
TECs seek to be as flexible as they can with their funding and they are not
unsympathetic to the needs of the disadvantaged. The fact is, however, that
by no means all TECs really understand these needs, nor thought that they
would find themselves involved in the world of special needs training
provision.
At the end of the day, TECs quite understandably tend to back options which
secure their own funding.
Three issues need to be addressed. In the first place, serious consideration
should be given to 'ring fencing' funding for special needs training. This
is not a new idea. It was proposed in the report of the special training
needs task force established by the NCVO (National Council for Voluntary
Organisations), which was published in June 1991. The government promised to
consider the report seriously but it has presumably rejected the approach,
as it does not feature in current discussions. The idea merits further
consideration because it would at least provide funding reassurance.
In the second place, the output-related element of funding should be set at
a level and should be governed by criteria much more clearly related to
trainees and their potential for learning.
In the third place, progress should be made towards giving quality training
providers more than a one-year contract and the tendency towards requiring
tendering from existing and long-established training providers should be
stopped. Any TEC that has doubts about the maintenance of quality standards
has only to give due warning that contracts will not be renewed unless
standards improve.
DDN Graham,
Training Policy Studies,
5 Moss Lane,
Pinner, Middlesex,
HA5 3BB.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3430</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Letter: Chancellor foregoes 'green tax' on company cars
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From S. M. MILLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Having decided to reform the structure of company car taxation, I
believe that the chancellor has missed a golden opportunity to tax company
cars on a more environmental basis.
While it is true that the new proposals will remove the discrimination
against diesels, they do little else to promote fuel economy and through
this minimise pollution.
Would it not be better to tax company cars on the basis of a composite of
three Department of Transport fuel consumption figures?
That measure would inevitably promote fuel efficiency and reduce pollution
and would also be a rather more relevant tax for the 1990s.
S M Miller,
senior environmental
architect,
JT Design Build,
Bristol.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3431</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Letter: Insurance ticket option offers BR profit and client
peace
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Dr JOHN WELLS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Some rail users prefer cheap fares (for example, those on low incomes),
others demand a reliable service or compensation (for example, to travel to
Gatwick for a flight). I suggest that BR should give passengers the option
of buying an 'insurance ticket' at the same time as their rail ticket. The
insurance ticket would duplicate the rail ticket information, and also
specify the route and arrival time (this information stored electronically
would be invaluable to BR planning). The compensation rates should be laid
down, and depend on the lateness of the train, lack of facilities, and
amount of insurance purchased. They could include death and injury benefits.
That scheme should make a small profit for BR, its main advantage (unlike
other proposed schemes) is that it is can be administered. It will improve
services in affluent regions, but other regions will benefit as rail users
realise the profitability of buying insurance on unreliable routes.
Dr John Wells,
12 Cavendish Road,
Summertown,
Oxford, OX2 7TW.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3432</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Touchdown to a troubled inheritance: George Graham examines
the challenges facing the new head of America's space agency
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Daniel Goldin, named this week by President George Bush to be the new
head of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (Nasa), is being
launched into one of the least envied tasks in Washington.
He takes the helm of the space agency as disputes over the level of funding
from the federal government and arguments about the viability of its most
important programmes have surrounded it with controversy.
His predecessor, Admiral Richard Truly, was sacked last month after a series
of policy disagreements with the White House's National Space Council, a
supervisory board for US space interests headed by Vice-President Dan
Quayle.
Mr Goldin's task is to change the very character of Nasa, whose critics
charge that it has become so deeply imbued with its own technology-driven
culture that it is incapable of carrying out its missions.
In Nasa's own strategic plan - a slim document entitled Vision 21, liberally
sprinkled with aphorisms from Goethe, Einstein and James Michener - these
missions are spelled out in ringing terms by Admiral Truly.
'Nasa exists to make the US the world leader in space exploration and
aeronautics research and, through our achievements, to inspire and better
the lives of all Americans,' he writes.
But despite its grand goals the agency must also conform to the political
imperatives of its masters: not only the Bush administration, but also
Congress, which holds its purse strings.
At a time of tight budgets, Nasa has found it impossible to make the hard
choices necessary to please both masters. Instead, it has clung to an array
of ambitious programmes that blithely assume that its funding will, somehow,
be increased in the future.
'Nasa is overcommitted relative to likely resources - in short, it is
chasing too much programme with too few dollars,' says Mr Mark Gebicke,
director of Nasa issues at the General Accounting Office.
Mr Gebicke estimates that Nasa's current programmes will cost Dollars 92.4bn
over the next five years, between Dollars 13bn and Dollars 21bn more than
its likely budget.
Congressman Dick Zimmer of New Jersey more bluntly describes Nasa's plans as
'a Buck Rogers budget. 'It's long on fantasy and it's short on reality.
There simply won't be enough money available in the future to complete all
the programmes that are described,' he complains.
Nasa's budgets rose steadily in the late 1980s, as it began to reap an early
peace dividend from reductions in military spending. But the budget now
faces a freeze in the face of the growing US federal deficit.
In particular, the 1990 budget compromise between Mr Bush and Congress, has
prevented the transfer of money from defence to civil expenditure.
In its bid to win a greater share of the dwindling federal funds pie, Nasa
has been handicapped by its own failures: not just calamities such as the
traumatic explosion of the Challenger Shuttle in 1986, or the fatal flaw in
the mirrors of the Hubble space telescope - although these have sapped
public confidence in the agency - but a more general failure to adapt its
own structures and culture to the realities of the 1990s.
Dominated by its highly skilled engineers, Nasa developed an arrogant belief
in its own superior technological prowess and an insistence on defining its
own projects.
Admiral Truly had made more progress than had been generally recognised in
modernising Nasa's structures and management, in line with the
recommendations of a 1990 report by a commission headed by Mr Norman
Augustine, head of Martin Marietta, a defence and space contractor.
But as a former astronaut, Mr Truly was protective of the Nasa culture, and
staunchly defended his organisation's choices. 'Truly was doing a much
better job of telling the president what Nasa wanted than telling Nasa what
the president wanted. You basically get the space programme the engineers
want to build, rather than the space programme the taxpayers want to pay
for,' says Mr Pike.
Mr Goldin's credentials suggest he will challenge this Nasa arrogance. He
has long experience in military and commercial space engineering, having
spent 25 years at TRW Inc, a Cleveland-based engineering group where he
headed the space and technology division. '
'He is not dedicated to the principle that if it was not developed in a Nasa
centre it's not worth looking at; and that was one of the White House's
goals,' says Mr John Logsdon, director of the Space Policy Institute, a
Washington-based research organisation.
One of the results of Nasa's engineer-dominated culture is the emphasis on
the space Shuttle, which because of its live crew requires a degree of
reliability that cheaper, expendable rockets do not aim for.
The result is a system with undoubted merits for launching projects such as
the Hubble telescope, but at approximately Dollars 500m a launch an
extraordinarily costly method of propelling ordinary satellites into orbit.
The same culture lies behind the Space Station project. The Space Station
has been justified by its supporters mostly on the grounds of the important
scientific research it will enable, yet virtually every scientist in the US
sharply criticises the project, dubbed Freedom, for its negligible
contribution to science, and for sucking such a huge portion of available
money away from other research projects.
Putting a manned station into orbit will cost an estimated Dollars 40bn, and
operating costs thereafter would, according to the GAO, lift the overall
bill to Dollars 118bn.
But will the Space Station find a cure for everything from Aids to cancer,
as some of its backers in Nasa and Congress claim? Or, as their opponents
jibe, will it simply find out why astronauts vomit in space?
The Space Station is one of the principal issues in the increasingly heated
political debate over funding for Nasa. Many politicians no longer believe
the extravagant promises Nasa often makes for its projects. They see,
instead, an organisation that over the past 30 years has completed its
projects an average of 58 per cent behind schedule and 150 per cent over
budget.
The administration contains its fair share of space junkies - notably Mr
Richard Darman, director of the Office of Management and Budget - who
believe in the dream of pushing back the frontiers of space.
But even staunch supporters of the Space Station such as Mr Quayle have
their own priorities which do not always coincide with those of Nasa. He has
forced Nasa to scale back its reliance on the Shuttle, refusing to order
another vehicle after the delivery of the Shuttle Endeavour this month and
compelling the agency to work with the Air Force on a new expendable launch
system.
Congress, too, has its Nasa supporters, but - with the possible exception of
former astronauts such as Senator John Glenn - they are motivated more by
the presence of space-related jobs in their districts.
'The people behind the space station have managed to put a piece of the
action in many congressional districts and have won over supporters with
that approach,' says Congressman Richard Durbin of Illinois, one of the
Space Station's fiercest opponents.
One striking example of this is the likely decision by Congress to write
back into the budget the one programme that Nasa did offer to axe this year:
the advanced solid rocket motor which was designed to boost the shuttle's
payload to allow it to lift bigger sections of the Space Station. The
controversial motor happens to be built in Yellow Creek, Mississippi, in the
district of Mr Jamie Whitten, the powerful chairman of the House
Appropriations Committee.
But many voters across the US are now showing less enthusiasm for the
challenge of space - particularly in an era when competition with the Soviet
Union has lost its meaning.
'I guess we just simply have to recognise that people today are less
interested in going to Mars and more concerned about the trip to the grocery
store,' concludes Congressman Ralph Hall, chairman of the House Space
Committee.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3433</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Personal View: Polls that move markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GORDON GEMMILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Market rises on poll result.' 'New poll hits market.' This is the kind of
headline we can expect over the next few weeks. There is much at stake. The
consensus is that the FT-SE 100 Index will be about 10 per cent higher if
the Conservatives win than if Labour wins and somewhere in between if there
is a hung parliament. As the chances of each outcome change, so the market
moves to reflect the new information.
The interesting question is whether opinion polls should have so much
influence on the stock market. Each poll contributes to the state of
knowledge, but the relative importance of the information depends on two
factors. The first is the difference in level of the FT-SE 100 which could
be expected under different governments. With no difference, there would be
no response. However, it seems likely that the market would be higher if the
Conservatives won, as already indicated. The second is the change in the
probability of a Conservative or Labour win which each new poll indicates.
As the election approaches, small changes in the polls may have an
increasing impact on probabilities. Consider a change from the Conservatives
and Labour level-pegging to a three-point lead for the Conservatives. Such a
change now would not greatly affect the probabilities because it could
easily be reversed by election day. However, such a change on election eve
would indicate a huge increase in the probability of a Conservative win and
would definitely move the market.
The record from the 1987 election can be used to show how closely the market
reflects the probabilities as derived from the polls. In the first half of
that year there was a roaring bull market, so it might have been expected
that the election was merely a sideshow. Research indicates the opposite:
the stock market took very careful account of the opinion polls in the 1987
election.
Figure 1 plots the FT-SE 100 Index and the Conservative lead in the polls
from April to June of that year. There is not much relationship between the
lead and the index, even during the election campaign of May 11 to June 11.
The reason for this is quite straightforward. On May 14 the Conservatives
had a lead of 12 points, but that could easily have drifted away by election
day. On the other hand, the smaller lead of 7.3 points on the eve of the
election could not possibly have been reversed with just one day to go.
In Figure 2 the poll information has been transformed into the probability
of a Conservative win, taking account of the number of days left to go.
There is a very close correspondence between the FT-SE 100 and the
probability of a Conservative win - the simple correlation is 0.94. The
chance of the Conservatives winning (based on the polls), was never worse
than 87 per cent and by the last four days of the campaign approached 100
per cent. The market followed that chance with great precision and so, on
election day, the FT-SE 100 already reflected the Conservative win. After
the result there was hardly a ripple in the index.
The stock market in 1987 was, therefore, well-tuned to interpreting opinion
polls. By contrast the FT-SE 100 options market was not. If the result of an
election is expected to move the market, it may be a good strategy to buy
both a call and a put option (a straddle). This is a two-way bet. If the
market rises, the call pays off, and if the market falls, the put pays off.
The only problem is determining how far the market is likely to move,
because that determines how much the options are worth.
It is possible to take the options prices on any day and use them to reveal
the probability of a Conservative or Labour win. While the opinion polls
drifted in the Conservatives' favour in 1987, the options prices indicated
exactly the opposite. By the eve of election the options implied there was a
28 per cent chance of the Conservatives losing, whereas the polls indicated
such a loss to be almost impossible. The options prices were wildly
inconsistent with the opinion polls: investors were paying far too much for
their 'two-way bets'.
So what are the lessons of 1987 for 1992? The first is that unless one party
draws well ahead, the stock market will be very sensitive to opinion polls
and the sensitivity will rise as election day approaches. However, if one
party does pull ahead, expect an immediate move in the market and nothing
more after the election. The second lesson is that it would be wise to do
some calculations before taking a two-way bet with the index options. The
odds on offer may not be very good, although they look reasonable at
present. If you want to punt on the election, it may be better to approach
the bookies. In 1987 the bookies' odds were far more consistent with the
opinion polls than were those offered by the options market.
The author is Professor of Finance at the City University Business School
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3434</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Letter: Autogas brings some relief to Athens in battle
against smog
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr RAY HOLDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In 'Greeks battle to defeat the nefos' (Business and the Environment,
March 11) Kerin Hope discusses the pollution problems in Athens as part of
your urban air pollution series. What she fails to mention is that in order
to alleviate pollution problems, the government actively encourages the use
of liquefied petroleum gas (LPGas) as an automotive fuel (Autogas).
As a result, almost all taxis in Athens now run on Autogas. In fact, when
the city is suffering from a particularly bad bout of smog, road vehicles
not fuelled by Autogas are temporarily banned.
Autogas is used in niche areas in many countries apart from Greece to help
lower vehicle emissions in urban centres.
As in Athens, most taxis in Tokyo run on Autogas as a result of government
encouragement and in the US some 3m vehicles are fuelled by it.
In the Netherlands, Autogas comprises some 17 per cent of all automotive
fuels, supported by the government's introduction of zero duty rate.
The technology for Autogas conversion of vehicle engines has been around for
many years and the technology continues worldwide to keep pace with newly
improved vehicle engine developments.
The fuel is clean and highly efficient and it can make a useful contribution
towards reducing carbon dioxide emissions.
The fuel also has the advantage that it cuts down considerably on carbon
monoxide and hydrocarbon emissions.
Unfortunately, UK excise duty does not encourage the use of LPGas, in spite
of its proven environmental advantages.
Ray Holder,
director general,
LPGas Association,
Alma House,
Alma Road,
Reigate,
Surrey RH2 0OZ.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3435</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Letter: New light on Warsaw's confused property market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr DEREK SENDROVE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, As a senior property partner in a firm of English solicitors with a
large office in Warsaw, I write in reply to Andrew Taylor's article about
the property market in Warsaw ('Paris prices, Albanian standards', March 6).
His statement that 'families have the right to reclaim land and buildings
acquired by the former Communist regime' is misleading. There is, under
Polish law, no legal right to restitution yet. A draft bill was submitted to
the Sejm last July, but was one victim of the change of government.
The scheme in the draft bill was a pragmatic one, allotting all claimants
compensation on a 'points' basis, to be funded by part of the proceeds of
privatisation so that a claim would acquire a notional monetary value, which
would have been determined by the state itself. The claim would be satisfied
in bonds, which could be used to buy shares in privatised companies being
brought to the stock market or individual properties or businesses being
sold by the state.
Claimants would only in limited circumstances be able to insist on buying
back their own family property; there would have been many exceptions, for
example on the grounds that it was not possible to do so 'without
deterioration to the continued activity of the owning enterprise'.
It remains to be seen what legislation is passed, but the draft is the best
indication we have had so far. Only in a limited number of cases has there
been restitution, either on a purely voluntary, often gratuitous basis, and
sometimes (as in the case of Wisnicz castle, regained by the Lubomirski
family) where there were serious procedural irregularities in the original
nationalisation.
Derek Sendrove,
solicitor,
Nabarro Nathanson,
50 Stratton Street,
London W1X 5FL
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3436</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Letter: Poster concept lacks punch
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr PETER KREAMER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, One of the 'golden rules' I learnt when studying advertising for my
marketing diploma is as follows: 'Never spend your client's money
advertising his competitor's name or product'.
That rule is blatantly ignored by the Conservatives' pre-election 'Double
Whammy' poster.
The effect on the passing observer is the name Labour mounting an assault on
the twin evils on the boxing gloves.
Whose side, one wonders, is the agency on?
Peter Kreamer,
39 Bell Lane,
Eaton,
Wick,
Windsor,
Berkshire, SL4 6LQ.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3437</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Man in The News: Tiny dynamo at the heart of the party -
Deng Xiaoping
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALEXANDER NICOLL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Is it worthwhile to open the window and let in fresh air, though some flies
will come in as well?' The question is asked in a homily entitled 'Socialist
China mustn't totally reject capitalism', circulated this week by the
Chinese embassy in London.
The answer is yes: 'Absorbing the better part of the cultures of other
peoples to enrich ourselves is the best way to safeguard our socialist
culture.'
It is the dilemma which has embroiled China's leadership in brutal internal
power struggles since it decided in 1978 on the 'open door' policy of
economic reform. Reformers, led by Deng Xiaoping, believe that a degree of
market economics is compatible with domination by the Communist party.
Hardline ideologues fear it is not.
Occasionally, victors emerge from the fray - only to plunge rapidly back
into it. There is no mistaking the winner of the latest round. At 87, Deng
is the world's most resilient political leader, twice rehabilitated after
disgrace and reviled in 1966 as the 'number two capitalist roader'. Though
he officially retired in 1989, he remains the dominant public figure in
China. He is now making probably his last bid to ensure that his legacy will
be the continuation of the economic reform process.
The first sign that Deng was winning a three-year struggle against
hardliners came in January when he popped up in the southern provinces.
There, the success of economic reform is most evident. Industry, much of it
the result of investment by Hong Kong and Taiwanese businesspeople, is
booming, and the proliferation of mobile telephones and Avon ladies suggests
that capitalism is taking off.
Deng's tiny, frail figure had not been seen in public for a year. But,
angered by emphasis in the official media on maintaining a strong
ideological line - even including mentions of a 'class struggle' - he was
stung into public advocacy of the reformist approach. He visited the dynamic
Shenzhen special economic zone, just across the border from Hong Kong, and
predicted that Guangdong province would become Asia's fifth 'dragon' within
20 years. He was shown on national television, greeting military leaders in
Shanghai.
'Deng had to go to the south because he couldn't get his way in the north,'
says Mr Michael Yahuda, a China specialist at the London School of
Economics. 'He is struggling for dominance of the heart of the party.'
However, the fact that Deng was accompanied on his trip by President Yang
Shangkun, who has effective control of the army, as well as by high public
security officials, indicated that he was winning the high ground.
During the visit, Deng said that economic reforms must continue for 100
years. This week, a billion Chinese found that message emblazoned on the
front pages of their party-controlled newspapers. The language he had used
in public statements in the south, at first only reported by newspapers in
Hong Kong, had been adopted by the ruling 15-man politburo.
Yesterday, the newspapers were open about the fact that Deng had won: 'The
entire party and especially leading officials on all levels must seriously
study the important theories of Comrade Deng Xiaoping on the construction of
socialism with Chinese characteristics,' said the People's Daily, the
party's official mouthpiece.
The immediate consequence of the politburo's unusually public decision is
likely to be a purge of more hardline elements, especially in the propaganda
machine. Top officials including Premier Li Peng had already begun to put
greater emphasis in public statements on the need for continuing economic
reform. With the 14th party congress due to be held in the autumn, the
message will go out loud and clear through the ranks of the party that the
ideologues are in retreat and reform can be carried forward.
Two events have made the battle over reform even more intense. The tensions
leading up to the pro-democracy demonstrations in Tiananmen Square in May
1989 were fomented in part by Deng's economic reforms. Yet it was Deng who
sent in the tanks to crush the movement on June 4 in order to preserve the
dominance of the party.
More recently, the collapse of Soviet communism and the disintegration of
the Soviet empire have provided ammunition to both sides in the Chinese
power struggle. The ideologues drew the lesson that the party must tighten
its control in order to avoid collapse. Deng's view is that, though internal
stability must be maintained, economic progress is the only way to preserve
Communist party rule.
Deng is not a closet capitalist. A member of the Chinese Communist party
since the 1920s, he took part in the Long March in the 1930s, and, after the
Communists assumed power in 1949, had risen to sixth in the party hierarchy
by 1956. He was in disgrace during the Cultural Revolution, but was brought
back in 1973 and led the country's recovery. Again stripped of his posts in
1976, he was restored to them in 1977 after the death of Mao Zedong and the
arrest of the Gang of Four. He has effectively held power in China for 14
years. The Tiananmen Square massacre was the proof of his belief in
maintaining party supremacy at all costs.
'Socialism with Chinese characteristics', however, is his code-phrase for
opening the economy to the greatest extent possible without threatening the
party. Since this began in 1978, it has meant reforms of agriculture,
allowing incentives to farmers and stimulating production; price reform;
decentralisation of foreign trade; the beginnings of stock markets; joint
ventures with foreign companies; and, most impressively, the creation of
special economic zones along the southern coasts in which private-sector
investment is encouraged.
The next stage will include an attempt to replicate the success of the
southern zones by creating new ones along the northern borders with Russia,
North Korea and Mongolia. However, the greatest challenge remains how to
tackle China's massive, and grossly inefficient, public sector. Since the
party organisation is inextricably bound up with the management of state
enterprises, job losses are politically difficult to achieve.
Reforms have created expectations of greater prosperity. It will be up to
Deng's successors to match these or face the consequences. But despite the
new commitment to 100 years of reform, it is difficult to look beyond Deng's
death. His attempts to designate successors have failed dismally. The most
that can be said is that the commitment expressed this week will put his
followers in a stronger position at the party congress. But, at least in the
south, Deng has created an economic momentum which will be hard to check.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3438</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Tackled, but still in the game: Mr Brian Quinn of the Bank
of England rejects accusations that the regulator is too close to the
regulated
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Brian Quinn, the Bank of England director whose job it is to deter banks
from breaking the law or getting into severe financial difficulties, does
not seek his reward in the form of public acclaim.
'No one thanks the regulator when things go right,' he says in his soft
Glaswegian accent. 'No one blames anyone else when things go wrong. It's
like playing a football match where they only record the goals against.'
The Bank of England's only Celtic supporter has spent the past few days on
his goal line frantically trying to stop the ball from whizzing past him.
At the end of the previous week, he had to face allegations - made during
the recent Blue Arrow trial and repeated in the Economist magazine - that
the Bank of England had been in cahoots with National Westminster Bank
during the spring of 1988 to forestall a Department of Trade and Industry
investigation into NatWest's role in Blue Arrow's 1987 rights issue of new
shares.
He robustly denies these allegations. Nonetheless the DTI announced on
Thursday that it was reopening its investigation, although the focus is more
likely to be the involvement of NatWest's senior directors in the Blue Arrow
rights issue and whether the bank's chief executive, Mr Tom Frost, withheld
information from the inspectors in the original DTI inquiry.
However, the timing of the DTI's announcement could not have been more
awkward. The previous day, a House of Commons cross-party committee issued a
report into the Bank's role as supervisor of the Bank of Credit and Commerce
International, the corrupt bank, which implied that the Bank should have
taken action far earlier than it did to limit BCCI's activities or close it
down.
The criticism was far less severe than many in the Bank had feared. The
imminence of the election campaign could have deterred MPs from stirring up
controversy by making too strident an attack on the regulator.
But even the soft criticism stung the Bank. Mr Quinn insists that - on the
basis of the information available to the Bank - keeping BCCI open was the
correct course of action, even if, with the benefit of hindsight, that now
appears a mistaken decision.
There is a common thread in the Blue Arrow and BCCI allegations. In both
cases, the Bank is accused of suffering from 'regulatory capture' - that as
regulator it has become too close to the regulated. The suspicion is that
the Bank has become too conscious of the interests of banks to take
effective punitive action.
However, Mr Quinn insists that the reverse is true. 'I find accusations that
I am being too chummy with banks quite extraordinary,' he says in the
comforting surrounds of his wood-panelled office. 'That is simply not a
description of the life I lead.'
There is plenty of evidence to suggest that he is not always the banker's
pal. In the past seven years, the Bank has been responsible for forcing the
resignations of senior directors at Morgan Grenfell, after the Guinness
scandal broke; for encouraging the departures of senior directors of
National Westminster Bank in the wake of the Blue Arrow affair; and for
hastening the departure of Sir Kit McMahon as chairman of Midland Bank,
after the failure of his strategy to restore the bank's fortunes by merging
it with Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation.
Mr Quinn says an understanding of his role requires an analysis of
developments in the banking market: 'There has been a substantial change in
the extent of competition between banks. Life is much more difficult for
them than 10 years ago.'
At the same time, banks are under greater pressure to reward their
shareholders by earning bigger profits and paying bigger dividends. 'This
induces banks to do things which brings them more quickly up against the
barrier of what is acceptable to the regulator,' he says.
A second important change is that, since 1979 when the first Banking Act was
passed, the Bank's supervisory role has been based on statute, rather than
an informal code which seemed at times to give the Bank absolute authority
in parts of the City.
Thirteen years may seem long enough to adjust to a more legalistic way of
policing the City. But Mr Quinn says it is not long in the context of the
Bank's 300-year history.
Officials say that, during the 1980s, some of the older directors of the
Bank 'simply did not understand that we could no longer simply tell a bank
that we wanted it to change the way it was behaving. They could not accept
that we could only take action if we were sure of our position under the
Banking Act'.
So at the same time as banks have become more prone to using questionable
devices for generating profits, the Bank's ability to prevent them from
taking excessive risks has become more circumscribed.
'Increasingly, when we get into tussles with banks, they say: 'Where does it
say in the Banking Act that we can't do that?' ' Mr Quinn says. 'To hear
such a question 10 years ago was unthinkable.'
The relationship with banks is 'not adversarial yet', he says. 'But we are
far less chummy than we used to be.'
However, the tradition of a bank taking informal soundings from the Bank of
England before changing strategy continues: 'Bankers still come to see us to
chat informally to obtain our view about whether they should do something or
not. Around two-thirds of our discussions with banks are non-routine in this
sense.'
But the House of Commons select committee feared that, when a conflict does
arise, the Bank may be too frightened of losing the battle. It implied that
the Bank might have been slow to close down BCCI because of concern that
BCCI would then appeal against the decision through the courts.
Mr Quinn cannot comment on the details of the BCCI case; he is proscribed
from doing so under the Banking Act. However, on the general issue he says:
'I don't think we worry too much about a bank launching an appeal when we
take action to close it down.' He adds: 'There is a handful of cases every
year where we invoke the Banking Act to take away a bank's licence or force
changes to banks' activities.' There have been many cases where the Bank has
closed a bank or restricted its activities and been aware that there was a
risk of a successful appeal.
Nonetheless he stresses that losing an appeal could be devastating: 'The
damage to our reputation of having a judgment overturned would seriously
impair our ability to do our job.'
But when deciding whether to close a bank, the Bank does not merely assess
whether it has the power to do so. It asks a second question about whether
it would be right to exercise that power.
Officials with a close knowledge of the Bank explain the difference between
these two questions as they relate to the BCCI case. As early as April 1990
 -although not before then - the Bank felt it had sufficient evidence
against BCCI to close it down.
However, it chose to allow the bank to keep trading, not because of fear
that BCCI would appeal, but because it believed BCCI depositors' interests
would be damaged by closure.
The Bank had been presented with a plan to inject new capital into the
business and change its structure in a way which would have made it easier
to police. In the circumstances, the Bank felt depositors would have been
very badly served by closure.
'Maybe we were wrong to keep BCCI open as long as we did,' says Mr Quinn.
'But we thought we were right, on the basis of all the available
information. If MPs say their judgment is different from the Bank's, that is
fine.'
The protection of depositors is his top priority, under the 'mission
statement' which his department adopted three years ago, following the
example of many private-sector companies. Prudential supervision - or
monitoring the health of banks - is second on the list.
'People say we are too interested in promoting the City to take a tough line
on regulation,' he says. But he denies the charge that the Bank is slow to
punish errant banks for fear of damaging the City's reputation. The
promotion of London as a financial centre does not appear on his
department's mission statement, although it is one of the core aims of the
Bank as a whole.
In the Blue Arrow case, however, it was clearly reluctant to see NatWest, at
the time the UK's biggest bank, pilloried in public.
Mr Quinn is again prevented by the Banking Act from discussing this. But an
account of what happened can be constructed from court transcripts and
interviews with officials.
The question which NatWest had to address in the late autumn of 1987 and the
winter of 1988 was whether it had broken the law by acquiring an interest in
13.5 per cent of Blue Arrow's share capital but not disclosing the exposure;
under the Companies Act, companies were at the time supposed to disclose
shareholdings in excess of 5 per cent.
In February, NatWest asked its then deputy chairman, Sir Philip Wilkinson,
to conduct an investigation into how this happened and whether the lack of
disclosure was reprehensible. Sir Philip duly produced a draft, which was
shown to the Bank of England in the spring.
During the recent Blue Arrow trial, it emerged that Mr Quinn encouraged
NatWest to redraft the report. A note of Mr Quinn's advice, made by Mr
Charles Green - at the time one of NatWest's deputy chief executives - said
that Mr Quinn had recommended that 'we should report a measure of ambiguity
in the evidence as to whether there was a conscious or sub-conscious
circumvention of the rules'. NatWest subsequently thanked the Bank for its
advice.
The implication appeared to be that the Bank had encouraged NatWest to
soften the report's conclusions, in order to minimise any potential for
scandal and forestall any attempt by the Department of Trade and Industry to
launch its own inquiry.
However, a Bank official insists the reverse is true. Sir Philip's original
draft was apparently too lenient on NatWest because it described the
purchase and non-disclosure of the stake as a perfectly normal transaction.
The Bank knew enough to be sure that this was far from the case. So it
encouraged NatWest to redraft the report at least to acknowledge the
possibility that it may have committed an offence.
But Mr Quinn's decision to give any advice at all to NatWest is by no means
unimpeachable. In April, the Bank had encouraged the DTI to delay the launch
of a formal inquiry into the Blue Arrow affair until the NatWest report had
been completed.
Having intervened to that extent, the Bank's reputation for impartiality
might have been better served by allowing NatWest to submit the flawed first
draft to the DTI and then informing the DTI that it disagreed with NatWest's
conclusions.
The Bank's misjudgment was rammed home a year later. In effect it had given
its stamp of approval to the final version of NatWest's internal report,
which was sent to the DTI. But when DTI inspectors were appointed at the end
of 1988, they found a separate NatWest report on the Blue Arrow incident -
intended for internal consumption only.
This other report was far more critical of NatWest's behaviour than the
report sent to the DTI. Naturally enough, the Bank felt very disappointed
with NatWest.
But Mr Quinn retains faith in the integrity of bankers: 'We have not had
enough cases of being let down to fundamentally change our approach of
trusting banks.'
He may have scored an own goal in the Blue Arrow case, but he is not
changing his tactics.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3439</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Leading Article: Weighing the political risk
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WHICH BUDGET matters most: the one delivered by Mr Norman Lamont on Tuesday
or the one to be delivered by his Labour opposite number Mr John Smith next
week? If the stock market's unhappy response to Mr Lamont's fiscal package
is anything to go by, Mr Smith's version will have to be taken seriously.
The market's verdict was supported by the initial evidence from the polls:
the first post-Budget survey by Mori suggested that Labour had a narrow
three-point lead.
Not that Mr Lamont should carry all the blame. The most striking feature of
his Budget message was the unexpected extent of the deterioration in the
public finances. From a surplus of half a billion in 1990-91, the public
sector borrowing requirement (PSBR) is expected to jump to Pounds 28bn in
1992-93, after allowing for privatisation proceeds of Pounds 8bn. By 1993-94
it is expected to reach Pounds 32bn. Against all that, the chancellor's
Pounds 1 1/2 bn handout scarcely deserves to be called a bribe. His room for
manoeuvre was phenomenally limited, and it seems questionable whether any
other chancellor would have made a better fist of presenting a pre-election
Budget in the midst of a recession.
Much of the electoral debate hinges on the credibility of the main political
parties in economic management. How credible is the prospectus that Mr
Lamont is offering? Not quite credible enough, seems to be the stock market
view, for it is hard to reconcile the forecasts in the Budget Red Book with
what has been going on in the dealing rooms.
Electoral fortunes
The Treasury is looking for a buoyant recovery, with non-oil gross domestic
product returning to 3 per cent real growth by 1993-94 and 3 1/2 per cent in
the three years thereafter. The best that can be said about the equity
market's dim response is that investors appear to have been struck more by
the view that the government's electoral fortunes might be on the wane than
by anything in Mr Lamont's growth assumptions.
Scepticism would anyway be justified by the Treasury's recent forecasting
record: having underestimated the recession by a mile, it would not be
surprising if the forecasters were now to overestimate the speed and
strength of the upturn.
It is true that share prices were vulnerable to a setback. The downward
movement was greatly exaggerated because of the extensive bull positions
taken by market makers in advance of the Mr Lamont's speech. The unwinding
of those positions, many of them established via the futures markets, has
had a notably depressing impact on the FT-SE Index this week.
But the more interesting question concerns inflation and the gilts market.
Here Mr Lamont has a better story to tell, with RPI inflation down to 4 per
cent in January compared with 9 per cent a year earlier. By the first half
of 1993, it is forecast to fall to 3 1/4 per cent, with producer output
prices down to 1 1/2 per cent. Does this make long gilts a bargain on yields
of 9 1/2 per cent, showing a margin of more than 5 percentage points over
the real yield on index-linked gilts? Once again the market's reaction was
sceptical and the PSBR figures no doubt had something to do with it. Gilts,
which became a rare commodity under Mrs Thatcher, are about to stage a big
comeback.
Ungracious reaction
Yet there are good grounds for thinking that in this case the market's
reaction was ungracious. One thing that differentiates the 1990s from the
period of heavy borrowing under Labour in the second half of the 1970s is
that exchange controls have gone. Another is that Britain is part of the
European exchange rate mechanism. A PSBR representing 4 1/2 per cent of GDP,
modest by the standards of the 1970s, will thus be much easier to finance in
the global capital market that now exists.
Admittedly the ERM is only a semi-fixed system, with Britain remaining, for
the moment, in a wide band. The present premium of a little under two
percentage points on sterling 10-year bonds against German bonds reflects
the risks inherent in that position. Gilts have to allow something for the
risk of trouble within the ERM system itself. At the core of the system, the
Germans are deeply unhappy with the Maastricht deal and the French are
witnessing a rising nationalist tide. And whatever the politicians say,
gilt-edged buyers also have to weigh the risk of a British devaluation.
All three parties are offering similar macro-economic policies. As far as
the markets are concerned, everything hinges on the strength of their
commitment to the ERM. The way for an incoming government to signal its
commitment would be to fund a good portion of the enlarged PSBR with
index-linked gilts, thereby demonstrating faith in a lasting low inflation
rate. That, paradoxically, would also be a buying signal for fixed-interest
gilts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3440</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Call for no change in A-levels
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A-LEVELS should remain largely unchanged but with strict limits on
non-examined coursework, the School Examinations and Assessment Council said
yesterday.
The council, which is the government's advisory body on examinations,
published principles for the development of A-levels, which are the main
exams taken by 18-year-olds for entry into higher education in England and
Wales. The principles include an obligation to limit coursework to no more
than 20 per cent of each A-level course.
Lord Griffiths, the council's chairman, said: 'The implementation of these
principles will increase the acceptability of AS examinations and lead to an
increasing breadth in the programmes of A-level students.'
Mr Kenneth Clarke, education secretary, has indicated support for the
principles. Labour and the Liberal Democrats are committed to abolishing the
council and replacing the A-level with a broader post-16 examination.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3441</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / London Clubs faces threat to gaming licences
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID SPANIER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE POLICE and the Gaming Board have applied to magistrates for cancellation
and non-renewal of gaming licences held by London Clubs, calling the company
'not fit and proper' to manage casinos - the gravest charge in British
gaming regulations.
The decision follows a raid in June on the main casinos owned by London
Clubs. Detailed grounds for the action, which run to several pages, were
given to London Clubs' management yesterday.
London Clubs' casinos include the Ritz Club in Piccadilly and the recently
opened Les Ambassadeurs at the end of Park Lane. It also manages the Carlton
casino in Cannes.
The company, which has vigorously denied any wrong-doing, intends to defend
its record point by point in the licensing hearing, expected to start late
next month.
Mr Max Kingsley, managing director of London Clubs, said last night: 'Now
that we have seen the grounds for the objections our position is simply that
we have found nothing in them that would justify cancellation or non-renewal
of our licences. We shall be fighting the case all the way.'
The hearing is expected to last four or five weeks.
Disposal of the properties to a new operator would be difficult to arrange,
after recent Gaming Board moves to tighten up the transfer of licences. If
the magistrates granted cancellation the premises could not be used for
gambling for three years.
Annual profits of London Clubs are estimated at Pounds 20m. The recession
has made life tougher for casinos, but London Clubs' managers claim they are
holding their own.
The raid in June came days before a planned flotation of shares in London
Clubs - 250 police and the Gaming Board inspectorate went into the clubs and
removed about 60,000 documents.
The Gaming Board declined to have any contact with the company to explain
its action, until yesterday's official decision to proceed against it.
What the police were looking for has never been revealed. The detailed
grounds given yesterday are understood to cover eight different matters,
only one of which is claimed to be a breach of the Gaming Act.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3442</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / MPs in split over 'supergun' report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MPs investigating the Iraqi 'supergun' affair split yesterday over a report
which criticises officials but stops short of attacking the intelligence
services and ministers.
The cross-party trade and industry select committee approved, by six votes
to four, a report in time for publication on Monday - hours before the House
of Commons rises until after the general election.
Four Conservative MPs on the committee tried to block the report, partly
because they believe criticisms implied in it have not been properly
substantiated or investigated.
One, Mr Keith Hampson, Tory MP for north-west Leeds, voted against the
report because he wanted further inquiries into fresh allegations about how
much was known by Sheffield Forgemasters, one of the companies at the centre
of the controversy.
The Department of Trade and Industry has said it was not fully briefed about
the Iraqi project until March 1990, when eight sections of steel tubing
manufactured by Sheffield Forgemasters were seized by customs officials at
Teesport near Middlesbrough.
At least two of the Tories also opposed a paragraph which says Customs and
Excise impeded the committee's investigation by refusing to answer questions
fully because of their role as a prosecuting authority.
At the same time, the four Labour MPs on the Tory-dominated committee failed
to win support for a series of amendments which argued that it was not
credible that the security forces were unaware of the so-called 'Project
Babylon' prior to March 1990.
The Labour MPs also failed to insert amendments questioning whether the
information available should have been passed to ministers.
The report blames officials at the DTI and at the Ministry of Defence for
not pooling information which, if put together, should have provoked
suspicions much earlier. It suggests, however, the mistakes were innocent,
rather than part of a conspiracy.
There is also mild criticism of two companies involved - Sheffield
Foremasters and Walter Somers for not investigating further the true purpose
of the parts they were making.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3443</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Election 1992 Preview: Most people are not pleased most of
the time - Joe Rogaly explains that the opinion of the British people is not
necessarily reflected accurately in the composition of the government
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The one thing this election will not tell us is which party the majority of
the people of the UK want to govern them. Our elections never do. Since 1945
the closest we have come to putting in a truly majority government was in
1955, when Eden romped home with 49.7 per cent of the votes cast. Many other
famous victories have fallen far short of that.
For example, the three contests won by the Conservatives under the
leadership of Mrs Margaret Thatcher did not represent a positive
determination by a majority of the people that they welcomed a Tory decade.
Mrs Thatcher secured huge majorities in terms of seats in the House of
Commons, but during her time the highest share of votes cast for the
Conservatives was 43.9 per cent. That was in 1979. In that same year, after
all the tribulations of the winter of discontent, the Labour vote actually
rose by nearly 100,000 compared with the previous election in October 1974.
What made the difference was a reduction of some 2m in the Liberal vote, and
an increase of about 3m in the Tory vote. In the two subsequent elections
the split between Labour and the Alliance parties widened. The Conservatives
sailed home on 42.4 per cent of votes cast in 1983 and 42.3 per cent in
1987.
These seemingly substantial minorities melt away when the calculation takes
account of the quarter of the electorate that did not turn out. Then it is
seen that at no time did the governments of the 1980s rest on the expressed
support of more than a third of the people. Even in 1987 only 32 per cent of
the registered voters placed a cross before a Conservative candidate.
Thus does simple arithmetic make nonsense of the notion that after 1979
there was a sea-change of opinion, or that 'the country' decided at three
elections in a row that it wanted a government of the intermittently
idiosyncratic right. It was reasonable to reduce the previously penal rates
of income tax, privatise what Labour had nationalised, constrain the trade
unions and reform the health and education services, but election results do
not indicate that there was popular pressure for any of these policies.
Such equations work backwards as well as forwards. To demonstrate that Mrs
Thatcher's governments represented a minority of the people is not the same
as to say that a majority wanted a Labour government. In 1983 the
non-Conservative national parties were almost evenly split - 27.6 per cent
for Labour, 25.4 per cent for the Social Democratic and Liberal party
alliance. There was undeniably ferment on the left, but this does not mean
that you could add the two scores, making 53 per cent, and assert that most
people wanted a Lib-Lab alliance.
Had that been a practical proposition, many votes might have been cast quite
differently. Social Democratic party supporters and many Liberals rejected
renationalisation, unilateral nuclear disarmament, and withdrawal from
Europe - all three of which were principal planks of Labour policy.
You may protest that none of this matters so long as the party that gets
into government is the one that won the most votes. Even that is not
guaranteed. In 1951 Labour won some 225,000 more votes than the
Conservatives, but Sir Winston Churchill (then plain Mr) became prime
minister. His Conservatives commanded 321 seats to Labour's 295. In February
1974 more people voted for Mr Edward Heath's Conservatives than for Mr
Harold Wilson's Labour party, but it was Mr Wilson who returned to Number 10
Downing Street. 'The country' did not turf Mr Heath out. It was the
electoral system that achieved that.
Sweeping proclamations about what the people now want are a form of
shorthand, convenient for idle minds. It is better to be particular. For
example, Scotland has a four-party system. Two of the parties - Labour and
the Liberal Democrats - propose to establish a devolved assembly for
Scotland. The Scottish Nationalists want independence. Only the
Conservatives propose to maintain the status quo. Yet the Tories could win
the forthcoming election on a minority of United Kingdom votes and override
the wish for some form of home rule, as expressed by three-quarters of the
Scots. Again, Northern Ireland's politicians live in a world of their own.
They are preoccupied with Ulster, not UK-wide concerns. Most Unionist MPs
vote with the Conservatives in the Commons.
There are two principal reasons why voting behaviour and thus the expression
of the 'opinion of the people' have become disaggregated. The first is that
the rise of the Liberals and nationalists has eaten away at support for
Labour and the Conservatives. Between 1945 and February 1974 the largest
share of the vote attracted by the then Liberal party was 11.2 per cent. The
average Liberal score over the eight elections between 1945 and 1970 was 7
per cent. In the five elections since February 1974 the average for the
centre parties has run at 20 per cent. The Celtic vote, although small in
absolute terms, has shown a similar increase.
Second, voters have become less attached to parties. Loyalties can no longer
be taken for granted. This is true of most democracies in the west. The
classic socialist-capitalist divide was dependent to some degree upon the
existence of a large blue-collar proletariat. Contemporary class structures
are complicated and inherently unstable.
Thus it is hardly surprising that the picture of public opinion drawn from
the evidence of polling data is blurred. A 1988 survey by Mori indicated
that 54 per cent of the British people then held essentially socialist
values while 39 per cent adhered to what at the time were called
'Thatcherist' values. As recalled by Mr Bob Worcester of Mori: 'A third of
those who said their voting intention . . . was Labour held essentially
Thatcherist values and over a quarter (27 per cent) of those whose voting
intention was Tory were essentially socialists, whether they knew it or
not.'
There is another reason for describing the public mood as confused. In his
recent book, British Public Opinion, Mr Worcester suggests that three
elements influence the behaviour of marginal voters, those important
individuals who determine which party wins and by how much. These are: the
image of the leader, the party's perceived fitness to govern, and party
policies. As to the first, today's Conservatives are far ahead with Mr John
Major. The Tories also probably have the edge on fitness to govern, although
Labour, with its clean shirts, neat suits and conservative ties, has been
catching up fast. Finally, there is a familiar list of policy divides.
Labour is preferred on health, education, social security and the like,
while the Tories' principal advantages are the economy, defence, law and
order.
It is the economy that tends to be the deciding factor. Here the regional
distribution of seats is instructive. Of about 100 Conservative marginals,
78 are to be found in London and the south-east, the Midlands and the
north-west. In most of them, the existing Tory majorities are vulnerable to
a strong swing to Labour. It could be that decisions by fewer than 250,000
voters in those constituencies will be decisive. If so, the question on
polling day boils down to something far more mundane than 'what is the mood
of the country?' It is: 'How badly off do a handful of swing voters in about
an eighth of the constituencies feel - and do the Few Who Choose think they
would be any better off under Labour?'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3444</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Election 1992 Preview: Mother of all media efforts -
Television reports will be extensive, and intensely scrutinised
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Early in the 1979 election campaign, a sensibly-shod Mrs Margaret Thatcher
strode purposefully across a Suffolk field to embrace a new-born calf.
She was not alone. Behind the prime minister-to-be trailed an army of
television crews crowding out the small but dapper figure of her public
relations chief, Mr (now Sir) Gordon Reece.
The stunning impact of this first, wholly gratuitous British photo
opportunity is long remembered, leaving the more cynical witnesses to claim:
'The calf died, but the photos lived on.'
Television coverage of general elections had come a long way to reach this
muddy nadir. Up until 1958, fearful of accusations of bias, the BBC simply
did not follow the story at all - a self-denying ordinance that left
transmissions exclusively to the parties' election broadcasts.
No longer. To the delight of video rental shops and cinemas across the land,
election '92 heralds an unprecedented blitzkrieg on all four channels,
fuelled for the first time by 24-hour satellite coverage.
So far, the three main party leaders have already scheduled four full-length
interviews to run over the course of the campaign - one for each channel -
with Justices Frost, Day, Walden and Dimbleby presiding.
The main evening news broadcasts of ITN and the BBC will be stretched.
Channel 4 is promising - 'for true junkies,' as one broadcaster put it  - a
nightly two-hour midnight special now the campaign proper is getting under
way. And as the dishes of Sky News fill with unedited live coverage of the
main parties' morning news conferences, parallels are inevitably being drawn
with the Gulf war.
'It will,' sighed one already fatigued programme-maker, 'be the mother of
all elections.'
Connoisseurs of election news say the three weeks of fly-on-the-wall reports
will actually reflect three separate struggles: first, the traditional party
conflict; second, the tussle for viewers between the channels; and last, the
battle between the party spin doctors and the media over what actually
constitutes the news.
This, after all, is the first head-on clash between BBC deputy
director-general Mr John Birt's interpretative genre of news, dubbed 'the
mission to explain', and what politicians like to call 'straight reporting'.
In simplified terms, the conflict boils down to not much more than the
traditional tug of war over what the producers think is legitimate news and
comment versus the parties' wishes to see their 'agendas' delivered, without
appropriate health warnings, into the nation's living rooms.
Pre-emptive strikes in this endless war of attrition are taking place almost
daily. At the Tory party conference in Blackpool in October last year, Mr
Chris Patten, the party chairman, urged Conservatives to jam switchboards at
the slightest sniff of bias on either ITV or the BBC.
The same week his own office was doing just that with furious objections to
an overly zealous BBC effort to 'balance' health secretary Mr William
Waldegrave's platform speech on his National Health Service reforms with
material contesting his claims.
Nor is Labour shy of making its voice heard. Mr David Hill, the party's
communications director, has several times accused television of taking its
agenda from the Tory tabloids, above all the Daily Mail.
These spats may yet prove mere trailers for truly volcanic rows once the
this closely fought election gets fully under way.
For Mr Shaun Woodward, the Tories' communications chief and a former BBC
producer, the issue centres on the narrow line dividing objective
explanation and editorialising. It is, Mr Woodward says, fair to report his
party's furiously contested claims that Labour's programme will cost Pounds
37bn above and beyond current public spending levels.
But when background 'packages' are prepared at speed on policy issues,
objectivity is in peril. 'The problem is that when you get it wrong - even
if it is only once every six months - 9m or 10m people pick up a biased
story,' Mr Woodward says.
Conscious that most national newspapers are hostile, Labour is conversely
demanding that television pursue objective truth.
'The real Neil Kinnock emerges on television and radio,' says David Hill.
'We can show that the Tory tabloids' image of him does not hold up.'
Labour is also demanding a little coverage of its own claims, such as those
of alleged 'Tory plans' for imminent tax rises or spending cuts once the
election is over. Noting that ITN's editor-in-chief, Mr Stewart Purvis, has
told his staff to avoid calf-hugging opportunities, Mr Hill promises to wait
and see.
'If the only way the Tories can get good coverage is to have John Major
running around shaking hands, it will be interesting to see whether the
Purvis doctrine stands,' he says.
One long-time independent television reporter says Mr Hill need not wait
long. 'It's nonsense to say the photo opportunity is dead. Good pictures
will always be used. What matters is the commentary on top.'
Isolated in the third corner, the Liberal Democrats, meanwhile, are fighting
a lone and largely hopeless battle for the use of the stopwatch to measure
the distribution of airtime. Officially, both main parties and the main
channels say the stopwatch's days are over. But none of the reporters
believes it.
'They will be stopwatching and we will be watching our backs,' one says.
For most viewers, agonising about objectivity is not what elections are
about. They have a case. Experienced hands such as Sir Robin Day agree that
while policies have their place, often the most gripping election moments -
if not the election-deciding ones - come from the unexpected.
The harrying of Mrs Thatcher by an unknown housewife on the Belgrano affair
on the BBC's Election Call phone-in will be remembered longer than the
election at which it occurred.
But the real story, of course, is the result.
For the election night shows themselves, speed and accuracy are of prime
importance. Last time, despite the intellectual brilliance of the Kellners,
Coles, Crewes and Dimblebys, the BBC slipped up in its opinion polling. It
gave the Tories a five-point margin of victory, as against the actual
outcome of nearly 12. ITN also claimed it had five out of six results before
its rival (by anticipating, Auntie protests, unconfirmed figures).
This year, the Beeb has poached Mr Paul McKee, once ITN's exit poll wizard,
and hired NOP at a cost not far off Pounds 200,000 to quiz some 14,000
homebound voters. For added glamour, gigantism around the set is back in
fashion. The lanky Mr Peter Snow, for example, is to be dwarfed by a
6-by-8-metre computer projection screen on the election night show.
As one of the first results may be Cheltenham - forecast by some to be going
Liberal Democrat - third-party supporters may yet be treated to a
once-in-a-lifetime computer projection of a huge, digitalised House of
Commons chamber packed to the gunwales with little yellow men.
'Just,' as Mr Snow is fond of saying, 'for fun.'
BIBLIOGRAPHY
Multi-party Politics and the Constitution by Bogdanor V (Cambridge 1982)
British Election since 1945 by Butler D (Blackwell 1989)
The British General Election of 1987 by Butler D and Kavanagh D
(Macmillian 1988)
Political Communications: The British General Election of 1987 by Harrop
M and Creve I (Cambridge 1990)
Can Labour Win? by Harrop M and Shaw A (Unwin Hyman 1989)
Can The Tories Lose by Smyth G (Lawrence and Wishart 1991)
Political Change in Britain by Butler D and Stokes D (Macmillian, 2nd
edition 1975)
British electorial facts 1832-1987 by Craig F (Macmillian 1987)
How Britain Votes by Heath A (Pergamon 1985)
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3445</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Election 1992 Preview: Compelled to swim in turbulent waters
 -Barry Riley examines how economic undercurrents have buoyed up, and sucked
down, political aspirants
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Clobber the economy in the early part of a parliament's term and then ride
back to power on the back of the rebound of production and optimism about
four years later. Such has been the classic formula for electoral success in
post-war Britain.
It has been successfully adopted by Conservative governments in the 1950s
and 1980s, but Labour administrations have never mastered the technique.
Perhaps that is partly why Labour has only held power for a third of the
period since 1945.
Now the Conservatives, too, have apparently lost their cyclical touch, and
have been struggling to achieve a winning position in the opinion polls. As
in 1964, when Mr Reginald Maudling's dash for growth blew up in their faces,
they have run right out of good luck and good timing.
Consider how the Conservatives behaved in their first term after regaining
power in 1979. Straightaway their most secret and unpopular plan, to raise
VAT from 8 to 15 per cent, was implemented. In March 1981, still less than
two years into the term, Sir Geoffrey Howe delivered his famously vicious
Budget, the one that attracted protests from 364 Keynesian economists. By
1983 the economy was recovering well enough for the Tories to win, though
admittedly it might have been very tight without the help of the 'Falklands
Factor' and the eccentric Labour leadership of Mr Michael Foot.
After the 1987 Conservative win, however, Mr Nigel Lawson broke all the
rules. Celebrating an economic miracle, he cut taxes in March 1988 and with
the money supply bounding ahead unchecked he encouraged a strong surge of
output in that year, continuing into 1989. It is true that in other respects
the Conservatives followed the traditional formula, by attempting to hustle
the unpopular poll tax legislation through early in the parliament. The
worst must come first. However, the poll tax proved such a disaster that it
is still overhanging the government in 1992 at the tail-end of its term.
It will be hard for Mr John Major to unload all the blame for the current
economic problems on to Mrs Margaret Thatcher and Mr Lawson, but no doubt he
will cautiously try. Mrs Thatcher has apparently promised to stay gagged,
but her former economic adviser, Sir Alan Walters, remains voluble.
Certainly the recession hit hard in 1991, the year in which Mr Major ideally
would have wanted to call an election. The timing was disastrous. And all
attempts to talk the economy up subsequently have failed, leaving the Tories
facing the most depressed economic backdrop for any election since 1974,
with its three-day week.
As recently as the autumn of 1990 Mr Major was denying that there was even
likely to be a recession. When the reality became evident in the early part
of last year, the government's emphasis switched to the likelihood of a
quick rebound from the middle of 1991.
Thanks to a surge in North Sea oil output, the third-quarter gross domestic
product statistics did indeed show the famous 'technical' recovery but there
have been more disappointments since. No genuine economic recovery will
become evident before the election; indeed, in important areas, such as the
housing market, the election has created damaging uncertainties and has
itself become an impediment to an upturn. House prices fell by 1.2 per cent
in February, according to Nationwide Building Society.
It is a grim picture, but not one entirely without redeeming features. A
depressed economy is at least good for inflation, which has dropped to about
4 per cent. Moreover, the government has been able to raise its borrowing
requirement very sharply without, in these circumstances, seriously
upsetting the bond market. Two years ago, the public sector was in budget
surplus, but the deficit has been forecast at Pounds 28bn for 1992-93, and
more than Pounds 30bn in 1993-94. Public pay settlements for teachers and
nurses have been relatively generous in real terms, and public spending in
general has been rising fast: the offer of Pounds 55m to back Manchester's
Olympic Games bid is the kind of hand-out calculated to win votes.
During the campaign, the government will need to build on these few
favourable factors and also emphasise the crucial differences between the
parties in the area of taxation. The willingness of the financial markets to
swallow high borrowing levels during the recession has given the
Conservatives scope to trim tax levels even though revenues have been weak.
A year or two ago, the Conservatives were claiming that Labour would borrow
too much, but we are unlikely to hear much about this during the campaign:
the pot can no longer call the kettle black.
Once again Labour, in its tax policies, has been trapped in minority
attitudes. Although in the past few years Mr Neil Kinnock has swept out much
indigestible left-wing dogma from Labour's manifesto, the plan to raise
income taxes to an effective top rate of 59 per cent has evidently proved a
miscalculation. Few will pay these rates, but many more fear that they
might.
Elections are cynical affairs. A party must soothe and even bribe many of
its natural enemies in order to gain a majority. Labour's natural
supporters, such as many old people dependent on state pensions, will vote
for it anyway. They can be rewarded after the election. In addition, Labour
has needed to attract middle-income voters but it has not so far displayed
the leadership and inspiration that might persuade these people to vote
against their narrow sectional interests.
Other economic differences are less important in election terms. Labour has
backed the participation of sterling in the exchange rate mechanism of the
European Monetary System, and has said it will not devalue from the central
DM 2.95 parity. Although it has called for cuts in interest rates, in
practice monetary policy will be largely out of its hands.
Of course, there may be a hidden agenda which includes devaluation, or
'realignment' within the ERM, but previous Labour governments have in
practice tended to struggle for years to avoid devaluation: the Attlee
regime took four years to be persuaded that devaluation was inevitable in
1949, and the Wilson regime laboured for three years before devaluing in
1967.
The Conservatives have avoided set-piece devaluations of this kind, but have
at times allowed sterling to float down quite aggressively, most recently
under Mr Lawson as chancellor in 1986, when the pound depreciated by 22 per
cent against the D-Mark.
Apart from taxation and social spending, the main economic differences
between the parties are probably in their degrees of interventionism:
traditionally Labour has tended to set up National Plans and National
Enterprise Boards and has employed a variety of devices of the corporate
state ranging up to nationalisation. Conservatives have relied much more on
a free market approach, which reached extremes under Mrs Thatcher in the
1980s.
It is a moot point whether industrial policies win votes. In any case,
Labour's scope for intervention is much less now that the UK is becoming
firmly integrated into the European Single Market. The old paraphernalia of
credit controls, exchange rate controls, subsidies and import surcharges are
mostly ruled out (though the French have not entirely realised this).
Even so, Labour could be vulnerable to charges that they would turn the
clock back to the 1960s, when union leaders dominated the TV news and were
regularly enjoying beer and sandwiches at Number 10 Downing Street before
emerging to celebrate a 'triumph for common sense'. There is talk of giving
back certain privileges to unions, and of bringing in minimum pay levels:
again, such proposals will win few new votes for Labour.
The hostility of the financial markets is a potential disadvantage for
Labour, but the European context of the 1990s may provide some protection.
There are other socialist regimes in the EC, and tricky coalitions too, but
these are not usually regarded with particular alarm.
City of London financial dealers may be mindful of the Labour threat to
their after-tax incomes, but the personal damage will not for long overcome
the more general economic and financial logic. All the same, a Labour or
coalition government must expect to be severely tried out by the foreign
exchange and gilt-edged markets in the immediate aftermath of the election.
This promises to be the closest race for a long time. In 1987, the
Conservatives were always some 10 points ahead in the opinion polls and
there was only one minor hiccup when a rogue Gallup poll on 'wobbly
Thursday' a week before the June 11 election suggested that there might not
be an overall majority. In just over a month between the announcement of the
polling date and the declaration of the result the FT-SE 100 Index rose some
8 per cent.
The disappointment was that after such a well-telegraphed result the market
had little more to offer. A 'wall of money' was expected to arrive from
Japan but it never did. After a modest further rise, the London equity
market hit a high point in July which was not significantly exceeded for
nearly four years.
In 1992 the situation could be very different, with great uncertainty during
the campaign and possibly afterwards too. The City of London for several
months has seemed to be blithely assuming the Conservatives would secure a
victory, albeit narrow. But after this week's Budget the stock market had a
nasty attack of nerves.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3446</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Election 1992 Preview: Policy promises of the three main
parties
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ECONOMY: Commitment to 'opportunity, choice, ownership and responsibility'.
Promise will be to complement the free-market economics of the 1980s with a
more responsive approach to social policy. Low inflation and sustained
growth within the European exchange rate mechanism; privatisation of British
Rail and British Coal; more measures to dilute the power of trades unions.
TAXES/SPENDING: Long-term commitments to reduce public spending as a share
of national income and to cut basic rate of income tax to 20p; reduce
inheritance tax and boost tax incentives for saving.
PUBLIC SECTOR: Citizen's Charter to protect individual rights against
bureaucracies; measures to force 'contracting out' of services provided by
civil servants and public sector workers.
HEALTH/EDUCATION: Further moves to encourage internal market by encouraging
more hospitals to opt for trust status and GPs to operate their own budgets;
drive to break local authority control over education by persuading schools
to seek grant-maintained status.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT: Stimulate home ownership by breaking the monopoly of local
authorities over public rented housing; move towards single-tier local
authorities and replacement of poll tax by council tax.
SOCIAL SECURITY: Moves to encourage private pensions; commitment to maintain
child benefit and increased 'targeting' of benefits.
FOREIGN: Commitment to continuing role for Nato in Europe's defence;
maintenance of a credible nuclear deterrent; increased aid for former Soviet
republics; 'positive but sceptical' approach to further European
integration.
ECONOMY: Stress on prudence, stability and investment-led growth; Pounds 1bn
recovery package; tax reforms raising top rate to 50p for high earners; end
to ceiling on National Insurance contributions; unearned income above Pounds
3,000 subject to NICs; maintenance of current exchange rate in ERM; curbs on
credit; merger of autumn statement with Budget.
SOCIAL SECURITY: Rise of Pounds 5 in single pension, Pounds 8 for couples;
extra pensions for over-75s; child benefit of Pounds 9.55 for each child;
new disability allowances.
INDUSTRY/BUSINESS: Tax breaks for investment and small businesses;
government departments to spend 5 per cent of R&amp;D budgets on small
companies; creation of Technology Trusts linking academics, business and
government; National Investment Bank to promote long-term loans; tougher
takeover rules.
EDUCATION/TRAINING: End to Tory 'opt-out' of schools scheme; reform of 'A'
Level syllabus plus new targets for pupil achievement; 'contract' between
parents and schools; Education Standards Council; national training strategy
through Skills UK agency; legal requirement on employers to give training.
ENVIRONMENT: Environmental Protection Executive.
NATIONALISATION: Government control of national grid; state majority shares
in water companies 'when resources allow'.
HEALTH: Reversal of Tory 'market reforms' of National Health Service;
increased funding; performance agreements and efficiency measures.
EMPLOYMENT: Partial repeal of anti-strike laws; national minimum wage of
Pounds 3.40 an hour; temporary employment schemes for jobless.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT/DEVOLUTION: Tax-raising Scottish Parliament bill; creation
of democratic Greater London Authority, later English regional authorities;
substitution of Council Tax with new rating system. CONSTITUTIONAL REFORM:
Right to Information bill; Charter of Rights; reform of House of Lords;
study electoral reform.
FOREIGN: Signature of the Social Charter; backing for moves to single
currency and Common Agricultural Policy reform.
DEFENCE: Probable cancellation of fourth Trident submarine; agency to
convert defence jobs to civilian sector.
ECONOMY: Independent Bank of England and move sterling to narrow bands of
ERM; monetary and fiscal policies to reduce inflation; unemployment package.
INDUSTRY: Break-up of private sector monopolies, including British Telecom;
shareholders' ballots before takeover bids; greater disclosure of
information; rights for all employees to profit-sharing or share schemes.
TAX/BENEFITS: National Insurance system merged with combined tax and
benefits system; abolition of new 20p rate; abolition of State Earnings
Related Pension Scheme; tax-free basic state pension; phasing out of
mortgage interest relief; local income tax.
CONSTITUTIONAL REFORM: Single transferable vote system for all elections;
Bill of Rights; home rule for Scotland and Wales; freedom of information
legislation.
EDUCATION: Extra 1p on the basic rate of income tax to fund spending;
training taxes and compulsory two days a week training release for employees
less than 19 years old; tax-free childcare vouchers.
ENVIRONMENT: Higher 'pollution-added taxes', including increase of 10p a
year for five years on a gallon of petrol.
HEALTH: Replacement of 'internal market'; increase in NHS funding.
FOREIGN/DEFENCE: Pro single European currency; defence review with view to
cut spending by 50 per cent by 2000; commitment to fourth Trident submarine.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3447</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Election 1992 Preview: Shock troops for the front line ..
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MICHAEL HESELTINE has been given a starring role in Mr John Major's 'A' team
for the election campaign. The sole remaining survivor of Mrs Margaret
Thatcher's 1979 cabinet - and the architect 11 years later of her downfall -
Mr Heseltine has emerged as the most aggressive spokesman for the man who
beat him in the race for the Conservative party leadership. The environment
secretary will be among the most prominent of the party's television 'stars'
during the campaign. If Mr Major were to lose the election badly he would
almost certainly re-emerge as a leadership challenger.
CHRIS PATTEN is the Conservatives' political philosopher turned party
propagandist. Long regarded as one of the most intelligent 'thinkers' on the
Tory left, as party chairman he has become the key strategist in Mr Major's
election team. After a determined effort last year to shave the rougher
Thatcherite edges off his party's image, Mr Patten has now switched his
focus to attacks on Labour's tax, spending and trade union policies. With an
estimated Pounds 20m budget at his disposal, the 47-year-old MP for Bath is
promising the most elaborate and expensive election campaign in British
politics.
ROBIN COOK is acid-tongued. His friends and foes alike are well aware that
the sharply intelligent shadow health secretary does not suffer fools
gladly. Cool to the point of aloofness, the MP for Livingston prefers the
stiletto to the sledge-hammer and wields it with considerable effect.
Widely regarded as a potential leftwing candidate for the Labour leadership,
Mr Cook, 46, belongs to the progressive, pro-electoral reform strand of
radicalism surging through the constituency parties. He needs a good
campaign and, with health high on Labour's agenda, is expected to have one.
JOHN SMITH is Labour's trump card in the credibility war with the Tories.
The shadow chancellor, 53, has honed his debating skills as an Edinburgh
advocate to prove a formidable television performer, more than capable of
'selling' Labour's economic policy.
With the election focusing on the tax cuts versus public spending argument,
his reassuring Scottish burr could make the difference between victory or
defeat. One of the few Labour frontbenchers to have served in a Cabinet -
trade secretary in the Callaghan government - his next job will either be in
the Treasury or as opposition leader.
CHARLES KENNEDY, 32, the Liberal Democrats' president and health spokesman,
will help the fresh-faced image that the party hopes to project. MP for
Ross, Cromarty and Skye since 1983, his strengths are an irreverent wit,
charm and expertise in communicating - in print, on radio or television. His
weaknesses are his lack of gravitas and paucity of political ambition. He
will not be in the party's inner circle responsible for strategic election
planning. Brought up in Fort William he surprised himself when he beat a
Tory minister to win his seat as a Social Democrat MP.
DES WILSON, campaign director for the Liberal Democrats, will not only
supervise behind-the-scenes operations but do star turns on television. The
51-year-old, ruddy-faced New Zealander, still with an antipodean twang, has
a contagious enthusiasm, but also a reputation for tetchiness and
selfishness when the going gets rough. His campaigning zeal dates from his
involvement with the Shelter lobby group for the homeless in the late 1960s.
He can run effective campaigns on shoe-string budgets - largely by injecting
boundless personal energy. He also writes racy, lightweight novels.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3448</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Election 1992 Preview: Weighing the balance of power - A
hung parliament looks more likely now than it has for 20 years
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It is as difficult to predict a hung parliament as it is to forecast an
outright victory for the Conservatives or Labour. As the election campaign
gets under way, the protagonists still have ample scope to make the mistake
or to discover the wheeze which loses or wins the election.
Advance judgments on how the different players will respond if both Mr John
Major and Mr Neil Kinnock are denied an overall majority are more precarious
still. The political pressures on parties large and small after an
inconclusive election would rapidly submerge the public pronouncements made
before it.
What can be said with certainty is that the relative standing of the two
main parties as they enter the campaign makes a hung parliament look more
likely than at any time since the early 1970s. You do not need to search
hard at Westminster to find a cabinet minister or his Labour shadow ready to
predict that there will be two general elections in 1992.
After wild gyrations during the first four years of the present parliament -
the Conservatives' standing fluctuated from as high as 50 per cent in the
heady aftermath of Mrs Margaret Thatcher's 1987 victory to as low as 28 per
cent at the height of the poll tax row three years later - the opinion polls
have settled down.
Ignoring the statistical blips and occasional fluctuations around the
margins for error, every survey since last autumn has reinforced the view
that the electorate has already made up its mind.
A little less than 40 per cent say they have decided that, in spite of the
poll tax and the recession, they will stick with the Conservatives. The same
number think that Labour, with its socialist past behind it, should be given
a chance to do better. About 15 per cent - and more recently 16 or 17 per
cent - say they want the Liberal Democrats to remain a force in British
politics.
If the voters stick to their guns until April 9, neither Mr Major nor Mr
Kinnock will secure an overall majority. A hung parliament will oblige one
or the other to do a deal with smaller partners - or force another election.
By polling day, one the main parties must hold a lead of at least 3
percentage points to be sure of winning the 326 seats needed to command in
the House of Commons.
The arithmetic, though, is not quite that simple.
In a perfect voting system, the same number of votes would deliver each
party the same number of seats. But, as third-party leaders have long
lamented, the British system is far from perfect. In 1987, the then
Liberal-SDP Alliance won 23 per cent of the votes and took only 19 of the
650 seats.
That misalignment between votes and seats diminishes rapidly when it is
applied to the main parties, but it leaves the Conservatives still with a
significant advantage.
Labour tends to pile up votes where they are least useful - in its own
strongholds in the north of the country and in seats in the south where its
candidates have little chance of winning. The Conservative vote is
distributed more efficiently between the constituencies it needs to win.
So Mr Major can expect up to 20 more seats than his principal opponent for
the same number of votes. In a closely fought election, such a margin might
well be decisive.
The chart above underscores the effect. If Labour took 41 per cent of the
vote on April 9 it would need to be five points clear of the Conservatives
to be sure of an overall majority. But if Mr Major's share was 41 per cent
he could be certain of returning to Downing Street with only a three-point
lead over Mr Kinnock.
It would be a mistake for the Conservatives to draw too much comfort from
this change in the electoral landscape. It may underscore the immense task
Labour faces in securing an overall majority. But the large number of dark
squares (representing a hung parliament) indicates how much easier it would
be for the opposition to deprive Mr Major of his overall majority.
It is then that the ground becomes precarious.
If he were just a handful of seats away from the magic 326, it is not hard
to see Mr Major doing an informal deal with the Ulster Unionists (who can
expect to hold 13 seats) in order to retain at least, temporarily, the keys
to Number 10. The Unionists would initially demand abrogation of the
Anglo-Irish Agreement, but might well settle for a commitment to re-open
negotiations on the agreement with the Dublin government.
But if Conservatives held, say, 315 seats or fewer, Mr Kinnock's claim on
Downing Street might well be stronger - even if Labour had won fewer
constituencies.
The political judgment would be that Mr Major had lost the election.
Whatever they say now, a substantial majority of the MPs from the smaller
parties - in 1987 they won a total of 45 seats - would be happier sustaining
a minority Labour government than keeping the Conservatives in power.
Mr Paddy Ashdown, the Liberal Democrat leader, insists that he would support
whichever of the two leaders was ready to offer a commitment to proportional
representation and agree a full programme of government.
In practice, his colleagues admit that the terms exclude a deal with Mr
Major and that the party would be reluctant to vote down Mr Kinnock even if
he offered significantly less - in particular the creation of a Scottish
assembly. The Welsh and Scottish Nationalists and the Social Democratic and
Labour Party (SDLP) in Northern Ireland could also be expected to back
Labour rather than the Conservatives.
So in practice Mr Kinnock could hope for the support - tacit or active  - of
more than two-thirds of the MPs from minority parties. That could sustain
him in government temporarily even if Labour had won fewer than 300 seats.
The arithmetic is complicated further by the constitution. As leader of the
largest party, Mr Major might push ahead and present his legislative
programme in a Queen's Speech. If that were voted down, he could ask the
Queen for a second election. Constitutionally she could refuse and instead
give Mr Kinnock the chance to form a minority government. No monarch this
century has declined a request to dissolve parliament.
Either way, if the electorate does not deliver a definitive verdict on April
9, the odds are that it will be asked to try again later in the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3449</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Election 1992 Preview: So many could owe so much to so few -
Certain marginal seats will determine who leaves the battlefield as victor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
For the past year the politicians have been exchanging fire from trenches
dug at Westminster. Now the fight will move to the electoral battlefields
which will decide whether Mr John Major or Mr Neil Kinnock enters Downing
Street on April 10.
The focus of media coverage may remain on the daily Westminster press
conferences, on the set-piece television interviews and on the inevitable
'gaffes' which will be made by leading figures on all sides.
But the final result is in the hands of a few hundred thousands voters in
London and the south-east, in the north-west, the Midlands and in a few
dozen other constituencies dotted around the rest of Britain.
By the time we reach polling day, it may be that it is the last-minute
preferences of 30,000 or 40,000 people in a couple of dozen constituencies -
out of the 33m or so who are expected to vote - which put Mr Major or Mr
Kinnock into Number 10. It will be the collective voice of places such as
Hornsey and Wood Green, Bolton North West, Birmingham Selly Oak and
Southampton Test that counts.
The Liberal Democrats will have an impact, even if the party's recent rise
in the opinion polls to 16 or 17 per cent still leaves them well short of
the 23 per cent that the Liberal/SDP Alliance secured at the last election.
A further rise in the third-party vote towards the 1987 figure could help
the Conservatives, by splitting the opposition in many seats that would
otherwise be vulnerable to Labour.
Mr Paddy Ashdown, the Liberal Democrat leader, expects to profit at Mr
Major's expense from the impact of the recession in southern constituencies,
where his party starts more often than Labour as the main challenger to the
Conservative incumbent. Much of the party's effort will be focused on
constituencies in the south-west and Scotland, but it will also be seeking
to hold on to its by-election prizes of Eastbourne and Ribble Valley.
Realistically, Mr Ashdown's best hope is to match the 19 seats that the
Alliance won in 1987. This time that might be enough to give him the balance
of power in a hung parliament.
Scotland is another election altogether. The result may be critical in
mapping out that nation's future within the United Kingdom. The
Conservatives won only 10 of the 72 Scottish seats in 1987 and have since
lost one of those in a by-election. Their only hope of maintaining or
improving on that figure is that the recent rise in support for the Scottish
National party draws support from Labour.
But shifts in support north of the border are unlikely to be pivotal in
deciding who governs at Westminster.
The broader arithmetic is straightforward. Taking the results in 1987 as the
base, Mr Major starts with a seemingly impregnable majority of 102 seats
over all the other parties combined. The Conservatives won 376 seats at the
last election, 50 more than the 326 that any party will need to command a
majority of one in the House of Commons.
To be sure of forming a government, Mr Kinnock has to add another 97 seats
to the 229 that Labour won in 1987. If he is less ambitious (and many
members of the shadow cabinet doubt whether Labour can secure an overall
majority in a single election), he will need an extra 65 to 70 seats to have
a credible chance of forming a minority government or an additional 75 to be
sure of becoming the largest party.
Either way, well over half of Labour's target seats are clustered in three
main battlegrounds - London and the south-east, the north-west, and the East
and West Midlands.
For all his confident predictions, Mr Kinnock has a mountain to climb. To
secure an overall majority, he must do better - securing an 8 per cent swing
 -than any opposition leader since Mr Clement Attlee defeated Mr Winston
Churchill in 1945.
If the average swing of 5 to 6 per cent seen in recent opinion polls were
replicated on April 9, Mr Kinnock would deny Mr Major his majority, yet
still emerge with fewer supporters at Westminster.
Labour must do well in places where the prosperous working classes deserted
in droves to Mrs Margaret Thatcher in the first half of the 1980s - and have
been less persuaded than many others by Mr Kinnock's success in dragging his
party towards the political centre ground.
The 1987 election was a tale of two nations, with the Tories sweeping to
victory in the prosperous south and Labour piling up votes that it did not
need in its safest territories in the north. Labour took only one - Oxford
East - of the 111 seats in the south-east outside London.
There are some things on Labour's side. Rising unemployment and the surge in
housing repossessions have been particularly damaging for the Conservatives
in London and the south-east. The poll tax has hit hardest in the
working-class areas of the north-west which Mrs Thatcher carved out as her
own during the 1980s.
But the Conservatives have their own cards. Labour's tax plans - in
particular the abolition of the ceiling on National Insurance contributions
 -most threaten voters in the south. Tory candidates in the south-east will
campaign on three themes: tax, tax and tax.
In many of the seats that Labour is targeting, the Conservative candidate
has had nine years to build a local reputation. Some estimates suggest the
'incumbency' factor could be worth 1,000 votes, enough to deny Mr Kinnock a
dozen or more seats he might otherwise win.
London will provide the most important test. The capital city is a parable
of Labour's decline. Its local parties were a moving force behind the lurch
to the left during the late 1970s. They have been the hardest for Mr Kinnock
to tame, and Labour has not won a seat from the Conservatives since 1974.
Now it needs to grab 20 in a single election. Some, like Battersea, it
cannot hope for. But Dulwich, Hampstead and Highgate, Walthamstow,
Streatham, the two Lewisham seats, Croydon North West and Hornsey and Wood
Green are among those Mr Kinnock must win this time.
Outside the capital, he needs victories in Basildon and Thurrock in Essex,
in the two Southampton constituencies, in Dr David Owen's former seat at
Plymouth Devonport, in Slough and Swindon and in Luton South.
The roll call then moves on to a further 20 target seats in the north-west -
Bolton North West, Bury South, Wallasey, Pendle and Hyndburn among them. To
the west, York, the most marginal seat in the country with a Conservative
majority of 147, should fall easily to Mr Kinnock. But he must also win in
the Midlands, taking among others Wolverhampton North East, Birmingham Selly
Oak, Birmingham Northfield, the two Conservative-held Nottingham seats and
Derby North.
For Mr Kinnock it is a list that it is as daunting as it is long. It is one
he must have learnt by heart since 1983. But Mr Major will know it, too.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3450</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Election 1992 Preview: A fight destined to be as bitter as
it is close - Neither of the main parties will stand on its record
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The immediate policy choices facing the voters on April 9 look narrower than
at any general election since the early 1970s; and yet the consequences of
their decision will be as important as any in post-war history.
The outcome of this election will offer history's first judgment on
Thatcherism: on whether it lives up to its claim of a revolution; or whether
it was a noisy but brief interlude in the comfortable politics of consensus.
A fourth victory for the Conservatives would hold out the prospect of
one-party government - now established as the norm in Japan and Italy. In
the process it would provide the catalyst for the realignment of opposition
politics which the 1980s so often promised but never delivered.
Whatever the result, there will be pressures on the new government for
constitutional change - including the introduction of self-rule for Scotland
and proportional representation - which could redraw decisively the
political map of the United Kingdom.
It is an election that challenges precedent.
If Mr John Major is returned to Downing Street, he will have defied the
shifts in national mood which have ensured that no party since Lord
Liverpool's administrations during the Napoleonic Wars has secured four
successive terms.
For Mr Neil Kinnock to be certain of victory, Labour needs to secure a swing
in votes (of 8 per cent or more) not seen since the defeat of Sir Winston
Churchill in the aftermath of the Second World War. If Mr Kinnock does not
secure the 5 per cent needed to deprive Mr Major of his parliamentary
majority, then his party will have little choice but to embrace electoral
reform.
Sandwiched between them are the Liberal Democrats. Led by Mr Paddy Ashdown,
the awkward yet confident offspring of the old Liberal-SDP Alliance is
struggling to salvage third-party politics from the wreckage of the 1980s.
Nobody talks any longer of breaking the mould. Yet Mr Ashdown's hopes of
securing a real influence on government are as strong as those of any third
party leader this century. The opinion polls have given credibility at last
to the Liberal dream of a hung parliament.
For the past year Labour and the Conservatives have seen their support stuck
at just below 40 per cent with the Liberal Democrats hovering between 15 and
20 per cent. The private assessment of their respective strategists is that
this will be the first election since 1974 which will be decided in the
final few weeks or days of campaigning.
The fight will be as bitter as it is close. The Conservatives have become
too accustomed to power and Labour too desperate to win it for either to
prefer the moral high ground to the mud of negative campaigning.
Mr Kinnock's tax and spending plans will be at the heart of the Conservative
onslaught. Mr Major, for his part, will be blamed for the recession and
charged with plans to privatise the welfare state.
Presidential-style campaigns will encourage the personal invective. This is
Mr Kinnock's last chance. It might also prove to be Mr Major's, if he were
to lose badly.
The Conservatives are convinced that they have a decisive edge. Mr Major is
young, popular and judged to be in touch with the mood of the country. Only
a tiny proportion of voters blame him for the present economic mess. A large
majority tell the opinion pollsters that they prefer him to Mr Kinnock.
The Labour leader is not dismayed. His efforts since 1983 to rebuild his
party have left him one of the toughest politicians of his generation. He is
an experienced campaigner. Mr Major is much-liked but he can be brittle. He
has never faced the pressure which will confront him in the next few weeks.
Personalities will be as important as policies. There is a new equilibrium:
Labour has retreated from socialism, and the Conservatives from Thatcherism.
The battle is no longer to shift the centre of gravity but to occupy it.
Mr Kinnock promises to manage a capitalist economy more effectively than the
Conservatives. Mr Major pledges that only he can modernise the most
important creation of socialism - the welfare state. Both accept that the
constraints imposed by the exchange rate mechanism and by the march towards
European integration will restrict their freedom to operate the main levers
of economic management.
Neither party will fight on its record.
There is much in the Conservative record since 1979 - the replacement of
statist with market economics, the taming of the trade unions - that has
become so much the conventional wisdom that even Mr Kinnock is pledged to
preserve it.
There is much embarrassment, also. Who dares mention the 'economic miracle'
proclaimed just four years ago when the voters have since been battered by
recession. How much credit can Mr Major claim for sinking the poll tax, the
flagship of his then triumphant predecessor in the 1987 election?
He will ask not for a fourth term for his party but for a first term for its
youthful prime minister.
Mr Kinnock too will prefer a vision of the future to reminders of Labour's
past. Nobody can doubt his achievement in bullying and cajoling his party
into dumping the ideological baggage which weighed it down in 1983 and 1987.
But the longest recession since the 1930s has not been enough to give the
opposition a decisive lead - an awkward reminder that the voters are not
persuaded that its conversion is permanent.
The retreat from political extremism to the more reassuring worlds of Mr
Kinnock's market socialism and Mr Major's social market will not rob the
voters of a choice.
The sound and fury on the hustings - Labour would put 10p on the basic rate
of income tax, the Tories would privatise the health service - will obscure
less dramatic, but real, differences.
The emphasis in Mr Major's agenda on personal ownership and choice, on
individual opportunity and responsibility, encapsulates the aspirations if
not the revolutionary zeal of Thatcherism. Public health and education will
not be privatised but these great monoliths of the welfare state will be
broken up.
The tax cuts, privatisation and personal ownership at the heart of the
Conservative manifesto will underscore that its economic instincts still owe
more to Atlanticism than to European Christian Democracy.
Labour has different ambitions. The most prosaic but by far the most
important is to demonstrate that, after 13 years in the political
wilderness, it is competent to govern.
This craving for respectability is underlined by a commitment to sustain an
exchange rate in the ERM which the party would never itself have chosen. It
finds echoes in the constant reassurance that its tax and spending policies
threaten only the most modest redistribution of wealth.
But Labour has not been converted to US-style market economics. Instead it
sees the deregulation and liberalisation pursued by the Anglo-Saxon
economies during the 1980s as the cause of their current ills. Mr Kinnock
has declared himself for capitalism - but for comfortable European, not
abrasively American, capitalism.
There are other fault lines. The opposition has a constitutional agenda  -
starting with a devolved assembly for Scotland and ending with the
replacement of the House of Lords - which could yet provide the impetus for
more radical change than its authors intended. In the interim it would offer
the basis for an informal deal with the Liberal Democrats if neither of the
main parties secures an overall majority.
But such concepts have yet to stir the voters in the general election
battlegrounds of the north-west and Midlands, London and the south-east.
Robbed of the certainties of Thatcherism and of the opportunity to punish
the 'loony left', they are concerned with the recession, their prospective
income tax bills, local hospitals and schools.
Mr Major starts with the advantage of a large majority at Westminster and of
an electoral landscape the contours of which provide a natural bias in
favour of the Conservatives. But he leads a government that has let the
economic and political cycles fall hopelessly out of alignment. Mr Kinnock
leads a party that has cast off its socialist shackles but has yet to
persuade enough of its erstwhile supporters that it again offers a better
guarantee of their future prosperity.
It may be that, this time, the voters will need more than one election to
make their choice.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3451</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Election 1992 Preview: The decline of the true party
believer - David Butler analyses how elections have changed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Democracies the world over complain of the Americanisation of campaigning.
Most recent innovations have their origins in the fertile world of US
politics and advertising. Private opinion polling and professional campaign
advisers; photo-opportunities and sound-bites; image-making and negative
campaigning evolved across the Atlantic. Dirty tricks - and their exposure -
are peculiarly associated with Washington.
But there is nothing new under the sun. Last century, Gladstone was the
focus of a notable image-making industry. The Liberal campaign of 1905 was
remarkable for its knocking copy. Even the manipulation of the economy to
coincide with the electoral cycle is not new: as Lord Brougham wrote to
Thomas Creevey in 1816: 'A government is not supported a hundredth part so
much by the constant, uniform, quiet prosperity of the country as by those
damned spurts that Pitt used to have just in the nick of time.'
Nevertheless, election campaigns have been transformed in the past 40 years.
The law regulating their conduct is virtually unchanged. The goal of victory
is still central to the contenders. But what they do to persuade us to vote
for them is quite different.
In 1950, the time-honoured rituals of canvassing and evening meetings were
observed almost everywhere. A total of 40 per cent of voters in the UK
remembered going to a meeting, and more than 50 per cent recalled being
canvassed. In 1987, only 3 per cent went to a meeting and only 20 per cent
were canvassed.
The BBC excluded all reference to the election from its news in 1950. Full
broadcast coverage arrived only in 1959 but, by 1964, 80 per cent of people
said they received most of their information about politics from television.
The parties responded. In 1950, election news was made by the rival party
leaders, Winston Churchill and Clement Attlee, making evening speeches at
big rallies, designed for headlines in the morning newspapers next day.
Today the party leaders work an 18-hour day, trying to provide the lead
story for successive bulletins from breakfast TV to the midnight news. They
also put inordinate effort into their party election broadcasts.
National press advertising, thought illegal in 1950, now absorbs two-thirds
of national campaign expenditure - in 1987, its cost exceeded total spending
by all candidates in the constituencies.
Advertising consultants have always been there, but their role has expanded.
The Tories with Saatchi &amp; Saatchi and Labour with its Shadow Communications
Agency have advisers involved in daily discussions of tactics and publicity.
Over the last generation, then, campaigning has become far more complex and
sophisticated. But have the new techniques affected the voter?
Volatility has increased both between and during campaigns. From 1945 to
1965 only one by-election in 12 led to a switch in party control; since
1965, one by-election in three has done so. The 1950s fluctuations in the
monthly opinion polls were minimal; now the party lead often goes up or down
by 10 percentage points or more. Thirty years ago, 50 per cent of people
described themselves as 'very strongly' attached to one party; now only 20
per cent do so.
The greater fluidity of society and the disillusionment with all politicians
in a period of national decline are part of the reason. But there are two
other explanations: First, the re-emergence of the Liberals: it is only
since 1974 that the Liberals returned to the major league. By offering a
candidate in every constituency, they have given disillusioned Tory and
Labour supporters a half-way house. Tactical voting has eroded two-party
solidarity.
Second, the coming of television as the prime source of political
communication. Argument in the TV studio has to be much less raucous than in
the House of Commons. Voters learn that there is less difference between the
parties and their spokesmen than seemed the case when a single opinionated
newspaper provided the information. In 1992, it is much harder than a
generation or two ago for a voter to be a true believer, to see his or her
party as having a monopoly on wisdom, care and patriotism.
Campaigns have also lengthened. Although they last a formal 23 days from
dissolution to voting, the national struggle casts a shadow well beforehand.
All party politics involves electioneering, but it has never been so
explicit as in the last few months. During April to September 1964, at the
end of the only other full-term parliament, there was an oasis of
tranquillity compared with the carefully orchestrated point-scoring of the
last two months. The closer the parties are on main policy, the more they
must turn to minor issues and mud-slinging to differentiate themselves in
the eyes of the electorate.
Elections have altered, too, thanks to population movements and attitude
changes. There used to be many more marginal seats, and party strengths were
more evenly spread about the country. From 1945 to 1970 each election
yielded about 180 marginal seats (with a majority of less than 20 per cent).
About 18 seats used to change hands for each 1 per cent swing from
Conservative to Labour or vice versa, making a difference of 36 to the net
majority in parliament. But since the 1970s, the number of marginals has
plummeted to 80 or less; a 1 per cent swing now yields only eight changes of
control. If the election system had worked in 1983 as it did in 1959, former
prime minister Mrs Margaret Thatcher would have had a majority of almost 300
instead of a mere 146.
The reason for this revolution in electoral arithmetic is that the
Conservatives have lost almost all their inner-city and Scottish seats to
Labour, while Labour has been ousted from suburban and rural areas. In 1945,
the Conservatives won a majority of votes in both Glasgow and Liverpool: now
they do not have a single seat in either city. In 1945, Labour won half the
agricultural seats in East Anglia; now they have sunk to third place in all
but one. And in 1955, the Conservatives held a majority of the seats in
Scotland; now they have only nine out of 72. The polarisation of
constituencies and the disappearance of marginals means that elections are
less likely to produce landslides. Even in a bad year more incumbents are
likely to hold on to their seats.
The electorate is different now from the one that put Labour in power in
1945. Every year, about 2 per cent die and 2 per cent come of age. At least
5 per cent of the native-born population has emigrated; 5 per cent of voters
are of New Commonwealth stock.
Moreover the growth in ownership of houses and other material assets, and
the increase in education, have combined with the decline in manual
occupations to reduce the natural base for the Labour party. The decline in
the Labour vote from 48 per cent in 1945-51 to 30 per cent in the 1980s owes
more to changes in society than to the ineptitude of its leaders. But Labour
is still the party of the working class, even though its hold has been much
weakened. The only major categories of voter that gave more than 50 per cent
support to the Labour party were council tenants and those of New
Commonwealth origin.
A different electorate, a different operation of the electoral system, and a
very different style of campaigning - the last generation has seen a
revolution in the nature of British democracy.
Fewer seats change hands for each 1 per cent of swing. But more voters are
ready to change. The highly orchestrated campaigns, or the chance banana
skins of the next few years, have an unrivalled opportunity to switch the
outcome of the election.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
CHANGING FACE OF THE UK
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                            1950        1991/2
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Number on electorial register                34m           43m
GDP per head (in constant terms)             100           239
Value of Pound                          Pounds 1            7p
Owner-occupied homes                         28%           67%
Adults owning shares                          7%           24%
Households with television                   10%           98%
Car in household                             12%           65%
Telephone in household                       12%           85%
Still at school over 14                      40%          100%
17-19 age group entering higher education     6%           16%
Population over 65                           10%           17%
Of New Commonwealth origin                  0.5%            5%
Employed in manual jobs                      65%           47%
Employed in manufacturing or mining          39%           23%
Unemployed                                  1.5%            9%
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3452</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Bonn sees danger to unity in states' demands
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SENIOR German officials warned yesterday that the federalist demands of the
German states would prevent the country negotiating as a single unit within
the European Community and endanger its budget discipline.
As leaders of the 16 states spelt out their determination to play a direct
part in future budget negotiations in Brussels, they were warned that their
actions could undermine EC stability.
Mr Horst Kohler, state secretary in the German Finance Ministry and
Chancellor Helmut Kohl's principal negotiator on European monetary union
(Emu), expressed confidence that ratification of the Maastricht treaty on
both political and monetary union was not in danger. He also warned that the
whole debate in Germany over Emu was simplistic and insulting to the
importance of the issue.
Another official said the logical consequence of the German states' demands
for constitutional changes to reinforce their role in EC decision-making
would be to reduce Germany 'from a federal republic to a confederation'.
Mr Kohler summoned a briefing at the Finance Ministry to spell out concern
at the state of the European debate in Germany. Politicians, media
commentators and state members of the board of the Bundesbank have voiced
fears over introduction of a single European currency, and a common central
bank, under European union.
'I am concerned both about the manner, and the circumstances, of the debate
in Germany, because it makes it clear that German self-confidence has still
not got very far,' he said. 'Who would dare to underestimate the meaning of
the stability of the D-Mark? It is the absolute essence of our political and
economic meaning, of our self-confidence. The debate must not be re-duced to
the level of saying: 'They are endangering our D-Mark and therefore they are
traitors to the Fatherland.''
He rounded on the German states, which want a substantial reinforcement of
their control over the central government in return for ratification of the
Maastricht treaty. 'They are mixing up their justified desire to preserve
their own identities, with a fear that they face declining living standards,
and with a misunderstanding of the nature of federalism,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3453</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / US producer price trend calms Wall Street fears
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FEARS ON Wall Street that US inflation might rise if the economy recovers
were reduced yesterday by another encouraging report on price trends.
The Labour Department said the producer price index for finished goods rose
0.2 per cent last month and only 0.4 per cent in the year to February.
Financial markets had expected a monthly increase of 0.3 per cent. The
better-than-expected report calmed nerves in bond markets, which saw sharp
price falls on Thursday following news of a surge in retail sales in recent
months.
Separate figures from the Commerce Department showed a 0.4 per cent drop in
business inventories between December and January. Given the strong rise in
retail sales, much of this fall was probably involuntary. Many analysts
expect companies to begin rebuilding inventories, giving output a modest
boost this spring.
The most encouraging figure was a 0.1 per cent increase in the 'core'
producer price index - which excludes the volatile food and energy
components. This was the smallest gain since last July and reduced the
annual rate of core producer price inflation to 2.4 per cent.
Inflation for goods at an earlier stage of production remains subdued. In
the year to February the indices for crude goods and intermediate goods fell
by 6.7 per cent and 0.7 per cent, suggesting further moderation of finished
goods prices in coming months.
World stock markets, Page 23
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3454</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / W German slowdown hits confidence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES and QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE WEST German economy put in its weakest quarterly performance since
mid-1987 in the closing three months of 1991, the federal statistics office
said yesterday. Business confidence is suffering as a result and growth in
capital spending has slowed dramatically.
Gross national product grew only 0.6 per cent in 1985 prices compared with
the last quarter of 1990, the office said. After seasonal adjustments this
translates into a 0.5 per cent fall ' the third quarterly decline in
succession.
Spending on plant and equipment rose only 0.5 per cent, in sharp contrast to
double-digit increases recorded in the first three quarters, when capital
spending rose by a quarterly average of 13 per cent.
Growth in exports and imports of goods and services also decelerated sharply
in the period under review and private consumption, in 1985 prices, rose
only 1 per cent.
The slowdown in internal economic development was highlighted by the second
consecutive quarterly fall in gross domestic product, the measure which
excludes income from abroad. Seasonally adjusted growth fell
quarter-on-quarter throughout last year.
Aggregate growth in GDP for the year was 3.4 per cent, compared with 3.1 per
cent (adjusted from the 3.2 per cent reported last month) for GNP.
Mr Jurgen Mollemann, economics minister, said the figures should remind
trade unions and employers that excessive wage deals could threaten the
economic upswing expected later this year.
The IfW economic institute attached to Kiel University, said earlier this
week that it did not now foresee recovery before 1993, and calculated that
overall GNP growth this year would be only 1 per cent.
Although the steady decline in growth rates and business activity
technically indicates a recession, output and employment are still at
historically high levels.
As the statistics office noted, the number of people employed in west
Germany at the end of last year was 563,000 higher in the last quarter of
1990, and numbers registered as unemployed were down 84,000.
Plant capacity utilisation, including use of extensive new equipment
installed since unification in October 1990, still stood at 87 per cent in
December. Levels of below 80 per cent have been a characteristic of past
German recessions.
The Bundesbank reported a marked fall in German overseas investment in
January. Direct investment fell from DM5.9bn (Pounds 2bn) in December to
DM1.3bn (Pounds 455m).
Strong overseas interest in German government bonds, meanwhile, helped
attract DM14.1bn of long-term foreign funds compared with DM5.8bn a month
earlier. The country's overall current account deficit widened during the
month from DM1.7bn to DM6.4bn.
The Russian government has agreed to provide counter-guarantees for German
exports, clearing the way for export contracts blocked since the collapse of
the former Soviet Union, the German Economics Ministry said yesterday,
writes Quentin Peel from Bonn. Hermes, the German export credit insurance
agency, will now provide export cover up to the annual ceiling of DM5bn
(Pounds 1.7bn) already agreed by Bonn, in an effort to control its trade
exposure to the former Soviet republics.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3455</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Burma refugees worry Bangladesh
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REAZUDDIN AHMED
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DHAKA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mrs Khaleda Zia, prime minister of Bangladesh, goes to the US next week for
discussions with President Bush and Mr Boutros Boutros Ghali, the UN
secretary general, on the influx of Moslem refugees from neighbouring Burma
and violations of human rights by the military government in Rangoon, writes
Reazuddin Ahmed in Dhaka. Bangladesh is seeking UN Security Council
intervention to resolve the problem.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3456</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Siemens and AT&amp;T in Malaysian row
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Two of the world's telecommunications giants, Siemens and AT&amp;T, have become
embroiled in an argument with the Malaysian authorities over the awarding of
a MDollars 2bn (Pounds 455m) telecommunications contract, writes Kieran
Cooke, recently in Kuala Lumpur.
Malaysia recently announced that five companies - Ericsson of Sweden, NEC
and Fujitsu of Japan, France's Alcatel and Nokia of Finland - would supply
equipment designed to double Malaysia's telecommunications facilities over
the next five years. Siemens and AT&amp;T have written to Dr Mahathir Mohamed,
the prime minister, requesting a retendering process.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3457</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Greece bans pay rise for public sector
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The Greek parliament yesterday passed a law banning pay increases this year
for more than 500,000 public sector workers amid growing concern over the
rising public deficit, writes Kerin Hope in Athens.
The measure provoked a round of strikes by workers in banks and public
utilities who received increases averaging more than 17 per cent last year,
compared to the official ceiling of 6.2 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3458</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Romania starts cautious reform
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VIRGINIA MARSH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUCHAREST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Romania took a cautious steps towards a market-led economy with the
publication yesterday of a plan for the restructuring of industry, writes
Virginia Marsh in Bucharest.
Announcing the plan, Mr Theodor Stolojan, the prime minister, stressed that
state-owned enterprises, which accounted for nearly 80 per cent of gross
domestic product in 1991, could no longer expect subsidies. 'In the future
we will give advice and support but not money,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3459</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Irish bank staff suspended
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM COONE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Over 600 bank staff in Ireland have been suspended from duty since Thursday,
as Allied Irish Bank retaliated against employees who have stopped
processing bank charges.
Last Monday, the Irish Bank Officers' Association instructed its 13,000
members to stop processing charges to customers, as part of a stepped-up
campaign of industrial action in support of a 6.5 per cent pay demand,
writes Tim Coone in Dublin.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3460</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Strike halts flights to Italy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE bulk of flights in and out of Italy were yesterday cancelled as a result
of an air controllers' strike and further substantial disruptions are
expected over the next four days affecting some 80,000 passengers, writes
Robert Graham in Rome.
Yesterday Alitalia said that only eight out of 90 national flights and a
further eight out of 110 international flights were able to operate because
of the air controllers' strike which lasted from 0900 to 1400. Foreign
carriers operating to and from Italy were also badly affected.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3461</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Bush abandons plans for car pollution curbs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT George Bush yesterday took his re-election campaign to the
car-making state of Michigan by announcing that his administration was
dropping controversial plans to impose new anti-pollution controls on cars.
The administration has decided to abandon a proposed rule which would have
required carmakers to fit special canisters designed to catch petrol vapours
that escape during refueling - a requirement that would have substantially
increased costs.
Instead, the Environmental Protection Agency plans to require the
installation of vapour traps directly on petrol pumps.
President Bush was due to announce the move yesterday during a campaign trip
to Detroit. He was also expected to promise to resist congressional pressure
for the imposition of tighter fuel efficiency standards on new cars.
Michigan is due to vote in a presidential primary on Tuesday, along with the
neighbouring state of Illinois. The state numbers many car workers among its
voters, and it has been shaken by the massive job cuts recently announced by
General Motors.
The Bush campaign was also considering running a television advertisement
attacking Mr Patrick Buchanan, the president's right wing challenger, for
owning a German-built Mercedes car - in contradiction of the protectionist
rhetoric Mr Buchanan has used to criticise Mr Bush.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3462</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Armenian-Azeri dispute 'a war', says CIS chief
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD and MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FIGHTERS from Armenia and Azerbaijan are attacking towns in each others'
territory, in what appears to be escalating into war between the two
republics, according to Lt-Gen Boris Pyankov, deputy head of the armed
forces of the Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS).
However, Gen Pyankov's assessment of the conflict over the disputed enclave
of Nagorno-Karabakh appeared to be at odds with a claim from Turkish Prime
Minister Suleyman Demirel, in Ankara yesterday, that the two sides had
achieved a ceasefire.
According to a military commander in Agdam, speaking earlier yesterday, an
Azerbaijani official had left Agdam for talks with the Armenian authorities
within Karabakh.
In the first direct move by the United Nations, Secretary-General Boutros
Boutros Ghali said yesterday he was sending Mr Cyrus Vance to the area on a
fact-finding mission.
In a message to Mr Jiri Dienstbier, Czechoslovak foreign minister and
president of the Conference on Security and Co-operation in Europe, Mr
Boutros Ghali said the situation called for concerted efforts for a peaceful
solution.
He also sent messages to the Armenian and Azerbaijani leaders calling for
'maximum restraint'. Mr Vance is to visit Nagorno-Karabakh, Yerevan, the
capital of Armenia, and Baku, the Azerbaijani capital.
In the other main conflict in the former Soviet Union, a ceasefire
established in the republic of Moldova between Moldovans and ethnic Russians
broke down yesterday and two people were killed.
In the Russian parliament yesterday, Gen Pyankov said that 'fighting has
gone beyond the borders of Nagorno-Karabakh, and is going on in the region
of Agdam, which is being stormed by Armenian militants'. Agdam is several
kilometres inside Azerbaijan, near the Karabakh border. Azeri forces were
also pushing over the border of Armenia in the Kazakh region.
He said CIS army families were 'in effect' being held hostage in the two
republics, with 27 of the former 67 CIS posts on the border between the two
countries still not evacuated, because of attacks by militants.
In the past two months, CIS forces in Transcaucasia had sustained 112
attacks and 11 deaths: 87 in Azerbaijan, 13 in Georgia and 12 in Armenia.
The CIS garrisons could not retaliate against attacks, he said, because they
did not possess sufficient strength, but local people, who saw the posts as
a form of security, were refusing to allow them to leave.
The Ministry of Defence said yesterday an order had been given to evacuate
the posts. Gen Pyankov called for CIS military in the area, under the
command of the Transcaucasian military district in neighbouring Georgia, to
be put under Russian jurisdiction, prior to being pulled out.
He said 103 men of Armenian descent, who had belonged to the 366 regiment
which was pulling out of Karabakh, had opted to stay to fight.
Earlier yesterday, Reuters agency reported people streaming away from Agdam
as rumours of an Armenian attack mounted and as it came under extensive
rocket attack. Mr Gyunduzh Akhundov, the mayor of Agdam, said that ten
rockets had fallen overnight, killing three people.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3463</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Japan's MPs pass budget after delay caused by scandals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE lower house of the Japanese Diet yesterday approved a Y72,218bn (Pounds
318bn) budget for the year starting on April 1, after weeks of delay caused
by the recent spate of political scandals.
The budget is expected to pass smoothly through the upper house. Even if
objections are raised there, the bill will automatically become law in 30
days, under the Japanese constitution.
The budget includes plans to boost the economy mildly through increased
public works spending, funded by a modest increase in public borrowing. The
Finance Ministry is also encouraging government agencies to start projects
as early in the new financial year as possible in order to give a fillip to
the economy.
The ministry resisted industrialists' demands for a bigger increase in
public works spending to compensate for an expected decline in corporate
investment.
But with the economy continuing to weaken, there are growing demands in the
ruling Liberal Democratic party for a supplementary budget later in the
financial year. The ministry, which opposes increases in public borrowing,
has so far resisted such demands. But it will come under renewed pressure as
soon as the main budget become law early next month. Those LDP leaders who
favour increased public spending would like to see work on a supplementary
budget to be well in hand before elections to the Diet's upper house in
July.
Yesterday's lower house vote followed an agreement late on Thursday between
leaders of the LDP and opposition parties. The opposition agreed to drop
demands for immediate cuts in defence spending and for tax cuts for
part-time workers. In return, the LDP pledged to consider the opposition
proposals in future budget planning. Defence spending is already under
review in the light of the easing of international tensions which has
followed the end of the Cold War.
Japanese wholesale prices fell 1.6 per cent in February from the same month
last year due to declining oil prices and weakening economic activity.
Domestic wholesale prices dropped 0.6 per cent.
Japan's Fair Trade Commission will submit a bill to parliament raising the
maximum fine for monopolistic practices 20-fold to Y100m (Pounds 440,500), a
commission spokesman said. The ruling Liberal Democratic party negotiated
with the anti-trust watchdog to lower the ceiling and approved the bill on
Thursday night. Washington has been pressing Tokyo to impose higher criminal
penalties on price cartels and other monopolistic practices which it says
act as trade barriers.
A corporation found controlling a market by bid-rigging and price
manipulation faces a maximum fine of Y5m. The US imposes criminal penalties
of up to Dollars 10m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3464</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / Britain's superchip factory faces closure
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INMOS, the semiconductor company which invented the transputer
microprocessor - the 'computer on a chip' - plans to close its fabrication
plant in Newport, South Wales, unless it receives government aid.
The move by Inmos, now owned by SGS-Thomson, the French-Italian
semiconductor manufacturer, may end a controversial and often politically
charged chapter in the history of the UK semiconductor industry.
Closure would mean the end of UK manufacture of the transputer, which is one
of the few successful semiconductor inventions to come out of Britain and
one that had been hailed as a key to regaining British leadership in the
computer industry.
The plant's planned closure in 12 to 18 months, after prolonged speculation
concerning its future, is also likely to rekindle debate about UK industrial
policy and its failure to keep strategic technologies in UK ownership.
Mr Gordon Brown, Labour's trade and industry spokesman, said the closure of
the plant would mean 'yet more high technology redundancies and yet another
British invention lost to British manufacturing for good'.
Inmos said, however, that because of the response in the UK to its decision,
it would now make a formal application for aid to the Welsh Office.
It said it had not applied before because several months of discussion had
led it to believe that aid was unlikely to be forthcoming.
The result of its application could alter the decision to close the plant,
Inmos said.
Inmos was set up by the Labour government in 1978 in an effort to win a
leadership position for Britain in microelectronics. The government invested
huge sums in the company to enable it to develop the transputer, a
semi-conductor which can process a large amount of data concurrently at very
high speeds.
While Labour looked to the transputer as a revolutionary device which could
help Britain gain leadership in semiconductors, the succeeding Conservative
government delayed funding and then sold Inmos to Thorn EMI in 1984. Thorn
sold Inmos to SGS-Thomson in 1989.
The transputer recently won a significant endorsement when IBM, the world's
largest computer manufacturer, decided to use the device in the control
mechanism of its computers.
Inmos said, however, that it did not make economic sense for SGS-Thomson to
invest the Pounds 50m or so needed to upgrade the Newport plant in order to
satisfy volume production.
The financially pressed group has recently made huge investments in other
semiconductor fabrication plants.
Production at the Newport plant will be gradually wound down over the next
12 to 18 months and transferred to SGS-Thomson plants at Rousset, in
southern France, Agrate in Italy and Carrollton, Texas.
There will be a limited number of redundancies among the 450-strong
workforce in the next month, but there are no detailed plans for overall
redundancies when the plant finally closes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3465</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Teenage robber jailed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A teenage bank robber was sentenced to seven years' youth custody for 10
raids which netted nearly Pounds 20,000. Leon Scarlett, 17, carried out the
robberies on banks and building societies in east London last autumn while
on bail for another raid, the Old Bailey heard.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3466</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Young arm of the law
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Three youngsters who trailed an armed robber to his home even though he
threatened them with a knife, were each awarded Pounds 50 by a judge. Marie
Telford, 10, her sister Lisa, 9, and Mark Noble, 10, spotted the masked man
fleeing from the Co-operative supermarket at Intake, Doncaster, South Yorks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3467</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Arthritis advance likely
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Medical researchers at Bristol University believe they are on the verge of a
bigadvance in combating rheumatoid arthritis, one of the most common
crippling diseases. They have stopped the disease forming in laboratory
animals by injecting a naturally-occurring protein.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3468</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Sub operations to be cut
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Royal Navy is to cut submarine operations in the Clyde by a third and
introduce stricter safety measures to avoid risk to fishing boats.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3469</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCNAEAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920314
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Roof fall kills miner
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A miner, Alexander Stewart, 32, died in an underground roof fall at the
Longannet pit in Fife, Scotland.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3470</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAG7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: L &amp; G results please
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By COLIN MILLHAM, JOEL KIBAZO, STEVE THOMPSON and CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Legal &amp; General share price outperformed the market throughout the day,
responding positively to better than expected preliminary figures.
Marked up to 374p immmediately after the preliminary results became known,
the shares subsequently slipped back to finish unaltered on the day at 367p.
Analysts, however, were broadly enthusiatic over the results, and especially
the dividend total, which was raised by 5 per cent, at the very top end of
the range. Profits of Pounds 11.3m, although well down on last year, were
towards the best of analysts' forecasts.
Mr Youssef Ziai at UBS Phillips &amp; Drew, a long-time bull of the shares,
described L &amp; G's performance as 'the best of the general insurers to date',
and said that in view of the difficult trading endured during 1991, he saw
no reason why a similar dividend rise could not be achieved this year. Mr
Trevor May, insurance specialist at Nomura, said the shares looked good
value, pointing out the asset backing of 450p a share.
Guinness sold
In the drinks sector, Guinness fell 27 to 575p on turnover of 4.1m. The
shares became a target for profit-taking following the rise prompted
recently by suggestions that Mr Warren Buffett of Salomon Brothers had built
a stake of around 2 per cent.
This, coupled with the company's relative immunity to developments in the UK
brewing industry, had pushed the stock to a premium of about 20 per cent to
the sector.
However, Mr Mike McCarthy, at Smith New Court, warned of a recent fall in
the value of whisky exports to Japan and the US, and suggested there could
be short-term weakness in the shares. Other analysts agreed that the Warren
Buffett hints had left the shares ahead of other major drinks companies,
rendering them vulnerable in a market susceptible to pre-election
profit-taking.
Utilities steady late
Utilities remained under downward pressure as marketmakers cut their dealing
levels in an attempt to head off attempted selling prompted by political and
regulatory fears. Confidence in the water stocks, however, was boosted after
the Ofwat regulator rejected suggestions that it wanted to control
dividends.
The mark-down paid off at the end of the session when the regional
electricity issues stabilised and the water stocks began to pick up.
The latter were given a late boost from a utilities seminar hosted in
Edinburgh by County NatWest, the stockbroker. At the seminar Mr Chris Bolt,
head of economic regulation at Ofwat, the water industry watchdog, dispelled
what he described as 'the myth that Ofwat is operating or would like to
operate a system of dividend control; Ofwat does not want to introduce
dividend control either directly or through the back door'.
Of the Footsie stocks, Anglian ended 8 lower at 347p, Thames dipped 10 1/2
more to 350 1/2 p and Severn Trent lost 9 to 331p. The Electricity Package
settled 65 down at Pounds 2658.
BTR in demand
Among the few firm stocks in the FT-SE 100 list, BTR stood out on
re-evaluation of Wednesday's results. Having initially given up a penny as
the market retreated, the stock attracted institutional bargain hunters
which sent the price up 10 to 396p. The shares have declined in recent weeks
on concern over the integration of Hawker Siddeley into BTR, acquired last
November.
Mr Ian Hilliker at County NatWest, which has returned the stock to its buy
list, said: 'The shares have got terrific recovery potential and we expect
them to outperform in the long term relative to the market.' Turnover was
4.4m.
The best individual performance from the Footsie constituents came from RTZ
 -up 16, or almost 3 per cent, at 555p, after 560p, after the group unveiled
better than expected preliminary figures.
The stock was also viewed by the market as one of the best defensive plays
in the Footsie, with around 90 per cent of its assets outside the UK.
Market fears over Enterprise Oil's final dividend payment were proved wrong
as the group increased the payout by 0.25p to 9.25p, thereby increasing the
total payment by 5 per cent.
Nevertheless, the shares dipped to 362p before stabilising and ending the
session a net 2 off at 367p, with a number of analysts still fretting about
the group's gearing level and high production costs.
Lasmo, meanwhile, bore the brunt of some more aggressive selling from the
big integrated London brokers, the shares closing 9 1/2 weaker at 186 1/2 p,
their lowest level since March 1988.
BP was the most heavily traded stock in the market with turnover approaching
the 20m mark. US funds were said to have moved back in to pick up the
shares, which retain a high rating across the Atlantic on the belief the
dividend is secure. Influential US brokerage CJ Lawrence was reported as
reiterating its buy stance on the stock. At the close BP was only 2 easier
at 261p, having rallied from an earlier 256p.
Reaction to United Biscuits' higher dividend and better than expected
profits was muted as the company gave little indication of when it expects
an improvement in markets on either side of the Atlantic. Mr Eric Nicoli,
group chief executive, said: 'We are hopeful of seeing an upturn this year,
but we are not seeing any signs yet.'
The shares held up well, against a weak trend, rising a penny to 413p as the
company lifted its final dividend to 9.8p from 9.1p, giving a total of 15.3p
for the year, against 14.4p. Profit for 1991 rose to Pounds 211.3m from
Pounds 195.1m, above market forecasts of around Pounds 208m and proving the
company's ability to boost profits in difficult trading conditions,
according to analysts.
Among supermarket groups, Tesco slipped 12 to 252p on exceptionally heavy
turnover of 9m shares, hit by a sell note from County NatWest, while J.
Sainsbury lost 5 at 389p on 1.9m traded, on a similar recommendation from
Kleinwort Benson.
Kingfisher lost another 14 to 489p and WH Smith 'A' fell 9 to 461p on
continued worries about a DIY price war.
The sale, via stockbroker Hoare Govett, of a block of 2.6m Steetley shares,
equivalent to a 1.67 per cent stake in the brick manufacturer, was believed
to have come from the Electricity Board Pension Fund. The stock was thought
to have gone to arbitrageurs and is expected to end up in the Redland camp.
Redland shares, upset in line with the rest of the sector by diminished
hopes of a base rate cut, receded 8 to 451p. Steetley was 6 off at 381p.
Profit-taking depressed selected leisure stocks which had risen in advance
of the Budget in anticipation of a boost to consumer spending. Ladbroke,
down 7 1/2 to 228 1/2 p in good volume of 3.4m, was also out of favour on
consideration of the group's recent figures, with property worries remaining
a niggling doubt with some in the market.
Hotel group Forte encountered profit-taking and dipped 7 to 224p on 1.6m
traded. So did Euro Disney, which has surged in the past fortnight on news
that it is to join the CAC 40 index in Paris. The shares retreated 23 to
1653p.
There was further nervousness in MTM, the speciality chemicals producer,
whose shares have collapsed following two profit warnings and board
resignations over the past fortnight. Most worrying, however, was that,
after all the bad news and a plummet in the share price, investors still
wanted to sell - prompting some in the market to speculate that there could
be worse news to come.
MTM's delayed accounts are due to be published at the end of the month. The
stock fell 8 to 88p in active trading of 700,000 shares.
A gloomy statement accompanying results which revealed an 18 per cent
profits setback to Pounds 96.3m, the bottom of market expectations, sent TI
Group falling 14 to 614p.
Mr John Goldschmidt at Charterhouse Tilney believes the company will put in
a better performance this year. But he has trimmed this year's forecast by
Pounds 10m to Pounds 115m.
MARKET REPORTERS:
Colin Millham, Joel Kibazo,
Steve Thompson,
Christopher Price.
Other market statistics, including the FT-Actuaries Share Indices and London
Traded Options,
Page 20.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1991/92
NEW HIGHS (31).
AMERICANS (1) Houston Inds., BANKS (1) HSBC, BUILDING MATERIALS (2) Heywood
Williams Cv. Prf., Titon, BUSINESS SERVICES (1) Davis Service, CONGLOMERATES
(1) Jardine Hldgs., CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1) Boot (H), ELECTRICALS (2)
China Light, Johnson Elect., ELECTRONICS (2) Druck, Mulitone, ENGINEERING
GENERAL (2) Concentric, Weir, FOOD RETAILING (2) Morrison (Wm), Do. 5 1/4 pc
Prf., HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (1) Community Hospitals, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (7) Beta
Global Emrg. Mkts., Do. Wrrnts., China &amp; Eastern, EFM Dragon, Scottish
Value, Spanish Smllr. Wrrnts., Templeton Emrg. Mkts. Wrrnts., MEDIA (1)
Abbott Mead Vickers, MISCELLANEOUS (1) Benson, OTHER FINANCIAL (1) BWD
Secs., PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (1) Brit. Polythene, PROPERTY (1) HK
Land, STORES (1) Lloyds Chemists, TEXTILES (2) Leeds, Sherwood.
NEW LOWS (67).
BRITISH FUNDS (4) Ex. 13 1/2 pc 1992, Tr. 8 1/2 pc 2007 A, Tr. 14 1/2 pc
1994, Tr. 9pc 2012, CANADIANS (1) Gulf Canada, BUILDING MATERIALS (1) Euro.
Colour, BUSINESS SERVICES (3) ATP Comms., African Lakes, REA, CONGLOMERATES
(3) Gieves, Jourdan (T), Mosaic Invs., CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (4)
Havelock Europa, Kajima, Miskin, Wescol, ELECTRONICS (1) Harland Simon,
ENGINEERING GENERAL (2) Hadleigh Inds., Renold, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (1) Kunick
8 1/4 pc Prf., INSURANCE BROKERS (1) Archer (AJ), INVESTMENT TRUSTS (14)
Drayton Blue Chip, EFM Inc., Electra Inv., Gartmore Scot. Cap., Gartmore
Value, Jupiter European Wrrnts., Melville St. Invs., Murray Split Cap.,
River &amp; Merc. Cap., Schroder Japanese Wrrnt., Scot. Natl. Cap., Siam
Selective Growth Wrrnts., Sphere Inv. Inc., St. David's Cap., MEDIA (4)
Avesco, Holmes Marchant, MMI, Do. Wrrnts., METAL &amp; METAL FORMING (1) Tinsley
(E), MISCELLANEOUS (2) Business Tech., WSP, OIL &amp; GAS (7) Aviva Petrlm.,
Clyde Petrlm., Enterprise Oil, Goal Petrlm., LASMO, Premier Cons., Triton
Europe, OTHER FINANCIAL (2) Berkeley Govett, King &amp; Shaxson, PROPERTY (13)
BHH, Debenham Tewson &amp; C, Gt. Portland, Hammerson A, Helical Bar, Do. 5 1/4
pc Prf. 2012, Hemingway, Land Securities, MEPC, Merivale Moore, Slough
Ests., Do. 8 1/4 pc Prf., Wates City of Lon., TEXTILES (1) Jacques Vert,
TRANSPORT (1) All Nippom Airways, MINES (1) Cluff Res.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3471</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAG6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Futures again undermine share prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CITY'S increasing nerv-ousness over the UK government's electoral
prospects continued to bear down on share prices in London yesterday. With
any lingering hopes for a base rate cut dealt a further blow by weakness in
sterling and renewed firmness in money market rates, equities suffered
increased selling pressure across the full range of the market.
Marketmakers again paid dearly for the bull positions built up ahead of the
Budget speech. Two new bouts of selling of the March index future, as
securities firms tried to regain their balance, undermined the stock market,
driving the FT-SE Index below the 2,500 mark. Traders warned that the very
large positions built up in futures ahead of Mr Lamont's Budget have still
not yet been cleared. Futures-led selling remains a threat.
The futures sector took the whip hand from the opening of trading. The March
Footsie contract quickly dipped below 2,500, and the underlying stock market
was forced to follow. Then, as the March contract regained the 2,500
territory, so did the stock market, trimming its loss on the Footsie from
31.3 to 20.9 at midsession.
The final downturn came when sterling extended its early fall after news of
higher inflation in Spain removed hopes that a cut in Spanish rates might
yet open the way to a base rate cut in London.
Selling of the stock index futures increased as market traders struggled to
get clear of their mistaken bull stance. The March contract again closed at
a discount of about four points to the stock market, where the FT-SE Index
ended 29.1 down at 2,493.3, its lowest for two months. London's weakness was
not helped by an early loss of 17 Dow points as Wall Street started the new
session.
Seaq volume contracted to 483.4m shares from Wednesday's total of 557.4m.
Retail, or customer, business on Thursday increased to Pounds 1.1bn,
indicating that, in addition to the futures-led activity by marketmakers,
some institutions were also selling stock in the wake of the Budget and the
general election date news.
The setback continued to feature those stocks which had benefited from the
widespread assumption that base rates would be reduced at the Budget or, at
least, during the election campaign. Building material shares came back
sharply. There were further losses in the retail sectors, where the collapse
of base rate optimism more than offset the relatively optimistic monthly
sales survey from the Confederation of British Industry.
With domestic factors so firmly dominating investment sentiment, there was
little activity taking place in the international blue chip stocks.
Reviews of the UK Budget continued to flow from securities houses to their
clients. Panmure Gordon, the UK brokerage house, taking a somewhat more
optimistic view than many, suggested that a more considered response to the
prospects of 'sound non-inflationary economic recovery' would send the stock
market higher over the next 12 months.
Robert Fleming Securities, however, warned that attention will now switch to
the forthcoming election campaign. Publication is expected tomorrow of the
first of a flood of post-Budget polls of public opinion which are likely to
strongly influence the performance of the stock market until April 9,
Election Day.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3472</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAG5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNCERTAINTY over the outcome of the UK general election and the gloomy
economic outlook led to heavy stock selling in the futures, writes Joel
Kibazo.
Trading in the March contract on the FT-SE started the session at 2,515, but
selling by independent traders in the first few minutes sent the contract
falling to 2,506. A brief squeeze sent it forward again to 2,520. However, a
negative sentiment took hold after 9am and March came under strong selling
pressure, leading the underlying cash market down. By early afternoon the
contract was trading at 2,482, the low point of the day.
In spite of some sporadic buying at the low levels just before the close,
the March future finished at 2,489, down 63 from the previous session and at
a four-point discount to the cash market. Turnover at over 10,000 lots was
heavy.
Further falls were recorded in the March contract in after-hours' trading,
once again leading some dealers to expect a poor opening today. But others
believe the falls in the last two days have been overdone.
In the LTOM, turnover reached 27,733 lots. The Euro FT-SE option had 3,238
contracts traded. British Airways was the busiest stock option with a total
of 876 lots dealt.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3473</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAG4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Stores active as Dow recovers
early decline
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
US EQUITIES recovered from a weak start to leave leading indices little
changed on the day, writes Karen Zagor in New York.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average closed at its overnight level of 3,208.63,
after having fallen to 3,191.86 in the morning. Volume on the New York SE
was unexceptional, with 180.3m shares changing hands. In spite of the Dow's
subsequent recovery, declining issues still led rises at the close by 1,017
to 611, but the broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 index was finally just
0.14 off at 403.89.
Silicon Graphics plummeted Dollars 4 3/4 to Dollars 21 7/8 in unusually
heavy volume after the company agreed to acquire Mips Computer Systems in a
stock-swap merger. Mips jumped Dollars 2 1/2 to Dollars 13 1/2 in active
over-the-counter trading.
Retail issues were actively traded. Lands End, the big US catalogue
retailer, climbed Dollars 1 1/2 to Dollars 34 3/4 on the back of
fourth-quarter earnings of Dollars 1.10 a share, up from 78 cents a year
earlier.
In contrast, Dayton Hudson saw operating profit fall in all three of its
divisions for the year. Same store sales rose by only 2 per cent
year-on-year for the group overall. Dayton Hudson tumbled Dollars 5 3/4 to
Dollars 61 1/8 on the results.
Wal-Mart firmed Dollars  1/2 to Dollars 52 7/8 after boosting its quarterly
dividend from 4.25 cents a share to 5.25 cents. Traditionally, the discount
retailer has been a low-yielding stock, since the company has preferred to
plough money back into the business.
Gap Stores moved ahead Dollars 2 to Dollars 44 3/4 on unexpectedly strong
February sales.
Schlumberger added Dollars 2 1/8 at Dollars 57 after Goldman Sachs repeated
a 'buy' rating on the stock.
Black &amp; Decker, the US power tool and home appliance maker, dipped Dollars
7/8 to Dollars 23 1/2 on news that it had filed for a public offering of
shares in its information systems and services business. The company also
filed to offer 18m shares of its own stock. The shares are expected to bring
in net proceeds of about Dollars 350m, including the repayment of some
inter-company debts.
In the secondary market, the Nasdaq composite was quoted 1.22 lower at
615.92.
Canada
SAGGING gold shares led the Toronto market to another weak finish in active
trading. The composite index shed 23.7 to 3,479.8 and declines outpaced
advances by 375 to 177 after volume of 30.1m shares.
The gold sub-group fell 2.04 per cent as spot gold lost USDollars 3.10 to
USDollars 347.65 an ounce in New York. American Barrick, the sector's most
heavily weighted issue, retreated CDollars  7/8 to CDollars 31.
Trizec reported lower first-quarter earnings and plans to make an equity
offering this year to reduce debt. The 'B' shares dipped CDollars  1/4 to
CDollars 8 5/8 .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3474</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAG3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Dollar up but sterling totters
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR pushed upwards after surprisingly strong US retail sales figures
yesterday afternoon, but climbed less quickly than analysts had expected,
writes Neil Buckley.
Sterling, meanwhile, had a very shaky day as political nervousness gripped
the markets. It was down more than a pfennig against the D-Mark and a cent
against the dollar, with the sterling index sliding from 90.3 to 89.7.
The dollar climbed more than 1 1/2 pfennigs in late European trade after US
retail sales figures for February rose by 1.3 per cent, compared with the
0.7 per cent expected. This was from a January base that was revised upwards
to a 2.1 per cent increase, rather than the 0.6 per cent first reported.
Mr Gerard Lyons, chief economist at DKB International, said: 'The strength
of the figures suggests the dollar will rise even further. I am surprised
the immediate reaction was not stronger.'
A 20,000 rise in the US weekly jobless claims to 459,000 was largely ignored
by the market, as the dollar advanced to DM1.6735 from a DM1.6655/65 start.
It also appreciated to Y134.20 from Y133.55.
Dealers said a big sell order sitting at DM1.6740 may have slowed the US
currency's rise, with a few speculators, including a major Middle East
operator, deciding to take profits. But most felt the dollar was still
firmly on an upward trend, and would soon breach the DM1.68 and Y135
barriers.
In late Asian trading it had remained strong, and broke the Y134 barrier for
the first time in six months. It finished at Y134.00 and DM1.6690.
Dealers said the market was trading on sentiment, and ignoring the rather
haphazard attempts at intervention by the Bank of Japan the day before.
Attempts by Mr Yasushi Mieno, BoJ governor, to dampen speculation about an
imminent Japanese interest rate cut, by saying the bank's monetary policy
remained unchanged, had little effect.
In the EMS, both sterling and the peseta moved downwards against the D-Mark,
with disappointing Spanish inflation figures ruling out a Bank of Spain rate
reduction.
The pound dropped more than a pfennig to DM2.8578/85, against DM2.8715/20 on
Wednesday. As it was close to its effective floor against the top-placed
peseta, it tended to drag the Spanish currency down with it. It briefly
dropped below its floor following the London close.
Sterling weakened against the dollar to Dollars 1.7104, from Dollars 1.7240
on Wednesday. In New York it ended a little better at Dollars 1.7130. Mr
Lyons commented: 'The combination of a poorly received Budget and electoral
uncertainty has produced a very weak sterling.
'It looks vulnerable, and in the next few weeks it will be driven not by
economic factors but by the opinion polls.'
Dealers warned that good showings by the Labour party in this weekend's
opinion polls could see the Bank of England having to underpin sterling.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3475</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAG2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Government Bonds: Treasuries fall on concern over retail
sales increase
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR and SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
US TREASURY prices tumbled yesterday morning as traders registered their
concern over inflationary pressures after a 1.3 per cent increase in
February retail sales.
The yield on the Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond crossed the 8 per cent
level as the market responded to the data, which provided some evidence of
economic recovery.
In late trading, the long bond was  7/8 lower at 99 9/16 , yielding 8.03 per
cent, while at the short end of the yield curve the two-year note was off
1/4 to yield 5.7 per cent.
The market had expected retail sales to rise about 0.8 per cent in February
and was surprised by the stronger figure. In addition, January sales were
revised upward to show a rise of 2.1 per cent.
Fear of inflation is starting to weigh on the bond market as the economy
starts to show further signs of revival. Yields started to climb on
Wednesday after President George Bush said economic growth was more
important than the level of long-term interest rates.
The Federal Reserve entered the open market to arrange four-day system
repurchase agreements when Fed funds were trading at 3 15/16 per cent. The
manoeuvre was widely expected and did not indicate a change in monetary
policy.
UK GOVERNMENT bonds fell nearly a quarter of a point as the market continued
to fret about the government's forecast for borrowing in the next financial
year.
Traders said an opinion poll in a national newspaper, which predicted a hung
parliament, and sterling weakness, also depressed the market. Attention is
expected to focus on the opinion polls at the weekend, now a general
election has been called. City economists believe a hung parliament is the
most likely outcome of the election, according to a telephone poll conducted
by Reuter news agency .
The benchmark 11 3/4 per cent gilt due 2003/07 fell from its opening of 113
7/16 to 113 7/32 . Among shorter-dated issues, the 10 per cent gilt due 1994
dropped from 100 15/32 to 100 1/4 . The Liffe gilt futures contract was
heavily traded with a volume of 48,000 contracts, and slipped from 95.09 to
95.07.
THE SPANISH government bond market dropped sharply on higher-than-expected
inflation figures which wiped out any hopes of a cut in interest rates.
Inflation for February rose by 0.7 per cent month-on-month, or 6.8 per cent
year-on-year, compared with 5.9 per cent year-on-year in January. The market
had expected a month-on-month increase of 0.1 per cent.
Traders said there was a marked sell-off across the yield curve in response
as many houses had taken long positions. The yield on the 11.60 per cent
bond due 1997 moved from 11.03 per cent at the opening to 11.17 per cent.
The 10-year issue - the 11.30 per cent bond due 2002 - saw its yield move
from 10.67 per cent to 10.75 per cent.
GERMAN government bonds fell on rumours the government is considering a
scheme to extend a 25 per cent withholding tax on interest income to foreign
investors.
A spokesman for the German Finance Ministry later denied the rumour, but
bunds ended the day slightly lower. The Liffe bund futures contract, which
opened at 88.28, fell to a low of 88.07 and ended at 88.23.
JAPANESE government bonds ended unchanged to slightly lower in dull trading,
mainly as a result of the yen's weakness against the dollar.
The yield on the benchmark No 129 bond ended unchanged at 5.445 per cent
after trading in a range of 5.425 to 5.445 per cent yesterday. The futures
contract closed at 102.26, down from its opening level of 102.35, having
traded in a range of 102.25 to 102.40. The unsecured overnight call rate was
mostly traded at 5 per cent, up from 5 5/8 per cent on Wednesday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3476</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAG1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Henkel's net profits rise 3%
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
NET profits at Henkel, the German chemicals and consumer products group,
rose by more than 3 per cent last year to DM443m, (Dollars 270.1m), in spite
of weak performances in export markets and chemicals, writes Christopher
Parkes.
Turnover, up 7 per cent to DM12.9bn, was helped by strong advances in
detergents, up 10 per cent, and adhesives, up 8.6 per cent. A 13 per cent
increase in sales of adhesives stemmed mainly from the impact of
acquisitions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3477</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAG0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Holzmann posts 18% advance in
sales for 1991
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PHILIPP Holzmann, one of Germany's leading construction companies, yesterday
reported an 18 per cent increase in sales for 1991 and said it had started
the new year with orders on its books equivalent to 12 months' output,
writes Christopher Parkes in Bonn.
Turnover was DM10.95bn (Dollars 6.6bn) and the company said operating
profits had increased, without giving figures.
Shareholders, paid DM11 a share from profits of DM106m last year, would get
a 'satisfactory' dividend.
Improvements in the domestic market more than compensated for weaknesses in
the US, where sales fell almost 12 per cent during the year, and order
intake slumped by more than 40 per cent.
Activity in Germany, source of half the group's outstanding orders, remained
strong.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3478</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Daily News loss mounts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Daily News, the New York tabloid acquired last year by the late Mr
Robert Maxwell, says its losses in February were higher than expected and
that it no longer expects to break even this year, writes Alan Friedman.
The newspaper, which has filed for protection from creditors, is meanwhile
searching for a buyer. Thus far the main candidate is Mr Peter Kalikow,
owner of the rival New York Post who filed last year for personal bankruptcy
protection.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3479</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Silicon Graphics to acquire MIPs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SILICON Graphics, a Silicon Valley manufacturer of graphics computer
workstations is to acquire MIPs Computer Systems, a closely allied developer
of Reduced Instruction Set Computing (Risc) microprocessors in a stock swap
valued at about Dollars 406m.
The acquisition was seen as a defensive move to ensure the future viability
of its key technology partner. Silicon Graphics uses MIPs microprocessors in
its graphics workstations.
MIPs has been struggling in the face of heavy competition from companies
such as Hewlett-Packard, Sun Microsystems, International Business Machines
and Digital Equipment to establish its Risc microprocessors as a broadly
used industry standard architecture for computers.
Last year, MIPs announced the formation of the Ace Consortium, an industry
group also including Compaq Computer, Digital Equipment , Microsoft and
Silicon Graphics, that aimed to establish hardware and software standards
for a new generation of computers. But, the recent announcement by Digital
Equipment of its Risc microprocessor, which outperforms the latest MIPs
devices, raised questions about that company's long-term commitment to the
MIPs architecture.
Announcing the acquisition, Mr Edward R. McCracken, president and chief
executive of Silicon Graphics said the combined company aimed to establish
MIPs' technology as an alternative to Intel microprocessors in personal
computers.
A subsidiary company, MIPs Technologies, will be established to develop RISC
technology and enhance the strength of the Ace initiative, the companies
said.
Under the terms of the agreement, MIPs stockholders will receive 0.61 shares
of Silicon Graphics' common stock for each share of MIPs' common stock
owned.
In reaction to the acquisition announcement, MIPs shares rose to Dollars 13
3/8 , while Silicon Graphics declined to Dollars 21 7/8 amid concerns about
the impact on short-term earnings. Silicon Graphics said, however, that the
merger will not be dilutive in fiscal 1993, beginning in July.
The transaction is expected to be completed by the end of June 1992.
The annual revenue for the combined companies will approach Dollars 1bn, the
companies said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3480</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Downturn at Dayton Hudson
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DAYTON HUDSON, the large US retail group and viewed as one of the nation's
more competent stores, yesterday disappointed Wall Street with a fall in
profits, to Dollars 301m after tax, in the year to February 1.
This compared with Dollars 412m in 1990-91, and included a drop in
fourth-quarter profits from Dollars 235m to Dollars 192m, again after tax.
Dayton Hudson admitted that the figures, scored on annual sales of Dollars
16.1bn compared with Dollars 14.7bn, were disappointing, and its shares slid
Dollars 5 3/4 to Dollars 61 1/8 at close of trade.
Dayton Hudson takes in three main operating units: Target, its discount
store chain, Mervyn's, which operates discount department stores mainly on
the west coast, and the traditional department store chain, which takes in
Marshall Field's, bought from BAT Industries of the UK.
The company said that all three saw a decline in operating profits last
year. Target, which competes head-on with the fast-growing Wal-Mart chain,
saw profits fall from Dollars 466m to Dollars 458m, with gross margins down
'significantly'.
The company has been pushing hard to match Wal-Mart and K mart, and said
that its new 'value strategy' had hit margins. However, same-store sales
were up by 4 per cent, and the group said that Target should see 'a strong
performance' in the current year.
Mervyn's was hurt by the sluggish Californian economy, with operating
profits down from Dollars 366m to Dollars 284m, and same store revenues
declining 1 per cent. The department store business, meanwhile, saw
operating profits decline from Dollars 183m to Dollars 168m, with same store
sales up 1 per cent. Overall, same-store sales improved by 2 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3481</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: AMR shares benefit from revised
traffic predictions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in AMR, the parent company of American Airlines, rose Dollars 2 3/8
to Dollars 77 1/2 yesterday morning, after the company suggested to analysts
that March results should be better than previously expected.
The results will compare with a very weak month in 1991, when the Gulf war
overhung the airline industry. Nevertheless, AMR is reported to have revised
its prediction for the increase in traffic from 22 per cent to 26 per cent,
with a slightly more favourable picture on costs.
American is one of the three largest carriers, and its results can be a
pointer for the industry generally - which has been cheered by some firming
of domestic fares. Some analysts were reported to have revised earnings
estimates in the wake of AMR's latest news, with growing predictions of a
profit from the group in the first three months of 1992.
About 8,000 former employees at Pan Am, the now-defunct US airline,
yesterday launched a Dollars 1.1bn 'class action' suit against Delta Air
Lines.
Delta, one of the three biggest US carriers, was to have been Pan Am's
partner in a reorganisation plan which would have reduced the bankrupt
airline's route network and left it concentrating on its Latin American and
Carribean service. The 'reorganised' Pan Am would have continued to employ
about 6,900 people.
Delta went ahead with the purchase of Pan Am's east coast shuttle and
transatlantic routes, but pulled out of the rest of the deal when Pan Am's
losses mounted. Pan Am was then forced to ground its fleet, leaving
thousands of employees - mainly in New York and Miami - out of work.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3482</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: CIA bucks sector trend with 16% rise
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CIA Group, the independent media-buying concern, bucked the trend in the
advertising/marketing sector in the year to December 31 and reported
increased profits and turnover for the 13th year running.
Taxable profits advanced 16 per cent to Pounds 2.83m (Pounds 2.45m) in the
12 months and was struck on turnover 4 per cent ahead at Pounds 172m (Pounds
165m).
Mr Chris Ingram, chairman of this USM-quoted group, said that this latter
improvement reflected 'the strong growth of international business, offset
by cutbacks in the UK'. CIA achieved more than Pounds 50m in net new
business gains in 1991, against Pounds 35m previously. So far in 1992 more
than Pounds 20m-worth of new business has been won.
Operating profits edged up to Pounds 1.29m (Pounds 1.17m), though investment
income grew more strongly to Pounds 1.54m (Pounds 1.28m). Earnings rose 17
per cent to 13.62p (11.65p) per share and the final dividend is lifted to a
proposed 2.6p (2.2p) for a total of 3.75p (3.2p), also a rise of 17 per
cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3483</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Edmond declines to 'creditable' Pounds
1.73m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Edmond Holdings, the housebuilder operating in Hull, east Yorkshire, the
Midlands, East Anglia and South Wales, saw pre-tax profits decline from
Pounds 3m to 'a creditable' Pounds 1.73m in the year to December 31.
Mr Andrew Naish, chairman, said that house prices had continued to fall
throughout the period, despite the interest rate reductions.
Against this background, he was pleased with the profits figure which was
achieved on turnover down at Pounds 17.3m (Pounds 19m).
Earnings dropped to 2.41p (4.13p) but the directors have recommended
maintaining the final dividend at 1.2p for an unchanged total of 1.85p.
Total house completions were 329 (323) units at an average price of Pounds
52,500 (Pounds 58,800). Gearing was reduced to 41 (66) per cent and the
landbank increased to 1,850 (1,300) plots.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3484</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Kode forced to make further dividend cut
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Kode International, electronics and computer services group, reported a
slight downturn in profits for the year to December 31.
Operating profits were 8 per cent up from Pounds 561,000 to Pounds 608,000,
with turnover marginally lower at Pounds 15.7m compared with Pounds 16m. But
a rise from Pounds 57,000 to Pounds 122,000 in exceptional items, mainly
redundancy and compensation payments, left pre-tax profits down from Pounds
504,000 to Pounds 486,000.
After tax of Pounds 137,000 (Pounds 163,000), earnings per share came to
4.3p (5.8p). The proposed final dividend is cut from 5p to 3p following the
1.5p cut in the interim, to make the total payment of 4p, against 7.5p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3485</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Abbeycrest tumbles Pounds 1m to Pounds
3.35m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
In 'the most challenging year ever experienced' Abbeycrest, the designer and
manufacturer of gold and silver jewellery, reported pre-tax profits down by
almost Pounds 1m to Pounds 3.35m.
Mr Michael Lever, chairman, said in spite of extensive discounting in the
retail jewellery sector over the peak Christmas selling season the company's
market had still contracted by more than 20 per cent.
Turnover for the year to end-December was static at Pounds 60m (Pounds
60.2m) and operating profits fell from Pounds 5.31m to Pounds 4.32m. Net
interest payable however was reduced from Pounds 1m to Pounds 967,000.
Bad debts, brought about by customer failures, led to an increase in
provisions to Pounds 494,000 against Pounds 41,000 last year.
A final dividend of 2p (2.4p) is proposed making a total of 3.2p (3.6p).
Earnings per share fells from 12.1p to 9.8p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3486</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Sirdar boosted 34% by lower interest
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sirdar, the Wakefield-based textile company, had a much better half year
with pre-tax profits for the six months to end-December up by 34 per cent
from Pounds 2.1m to Pounds 2.8m. Turnover fell slightly from Pounds 27.5m to
Pounds 27.1m.
Cost savings and increased efficiencies resulted in a 19 per cent
improvement in operating profit to Pounds 3.2m; the pre-tax profit was
boosted by a sharp reduction from Pounds 712,000 to Pounds 479,000 in
interest charges.
The interim dividend is a same again 1.65p per share from earnings of 3.25p
(2.27p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3487</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Ex-Lands climbs to pounds 33,000 at midway
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ex-Lands, the investment and leisure group, increased its profit, before and
after tax, from Pounds 19,000 to Pounds 33,000 in the six months to December
31, after costs incurred on potential acquisitions of Pounds 64,000 against
Pounds 26,000.
Turnover was Pounds 10,000 down at Pounds 714,000. Earnings per share for
the period amounted to 0.05p (0.04p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3488</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Cala interim losses reduced to Pounds 1.57m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Reduced pre-tax losses of Pounds 1.57m were announced by Cala, the builder
and property dealer, for the six months to December 31. The comparable loss
was Pounds 3.95m.
Turnover was lower at Pounds 27.3m (Pounds 33.8m) but sales continued to be
made in all areas although margins were under pressure.
Losses per share fell to 2.98p (7.21p) and the interim dividend is
maintained at 1.15p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3489</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Church halved to Pounds 1.7m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A HALVING of pre-tax profits, from Pounds 3.58m to Pounds 1.7m, was
announced by Church &amp; Co, the Northampton-based shoe maker, for the year to
December 31 1991.
Mr John Church, the chairman, said that cost cutting across all the group's
companies had helped it to recover a large part of its profitability in the
second half. Profits in the first half amounted to just Pounds 14,000
(Pounds 1.87m).
There were exceptional redundancy and other reorganisation costs of Pounds
280,000 and interest took Pounds 1.35m (Pounds 1.46m). Earnings were halved
to 11.6p (22.8p) and the directors propose to maintain the dividend for the
year at 12.5p with an unchanged final of 9.5p.
Turnover was a lower Pounds 65.2m (Pounds 68.6m).
A Jones &amp; Sons, a wholly-owned subsidiary, contributed slightly increased
pre-tax profits of Pounds 290,000 in 1991 against Pounds 284,000 previously
although turnover was marginally down from Pounds 29.6m to Pounds 28.7m.
Earnings per share came through at 27.3p (34.5p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3490</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Forced winding-up at Ramar Textiles
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ramar Textiles, the Durham-based clothing manufacturer, was compulsorily
wound up yesterday with debts of Pounds 13m.
Its shares were suspended at 14p and receivers were appointed last September
after its poor financial health had disrupted production and prevented it
filling some orders.
As a result Samuel Montagu withdrew its underwriting for a rights issue and
share placing which would have given the company Pounds 6.4m of new funding.
The placement would have been to Mr Richard Caring, a businessman with
clothing industry interests including half of Together, a joint venture with
Otto-Versand, the German group. It would have lifted his interest in the
enlarged Ramar to 29.9 per cent.
Subsequent negotiations between the receivers and a potential buyer fell
through.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3491</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Sleepy Kids reports Pounds 155,927 loss
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sleepy Kids, the children's animation and character merchandising group,
incurred a pre-tax loss of Pounds 155,927 in the year to October 31 1991.
The result, the first since the company moved to the USM in December 1990,
was struck on turnover of Pounds 183,840 and compared with a loss of Pounds
805,869 from turnover of Pounds 204,140 for the previous 15 months.
Mr Keith Isaac, chairman, said that the group had decided to reflect a more
prudent accounting policy by writing off development costs which had been
shown as an intangible asset in last year's balance sheet.
This had been dealt with by a prior year adjustment which charges Pounds
816,318 to the profit and loss account for the previous 15-month period as
an exceptional item. This year's charge is Pounds 58,079.
Mr Isaac said that Potsworth &amp; Co/Midnight Patrol, the company's first
animation production, had been sold to 24 countries and negotiations for
further sales were underway.
Losses per share were reduced from 4.22p to 0.74p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3492</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Beradin Holdings advances 46%
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Beradin Holdings, the rubber and palm oil producer, lifted pre-tax profits
by 46 per cent from Pounds 152,280 to Pounds 221,650 for the year to
December 31 1991.
Turnover moved ahead to Pounds 617,556 (Pounds 475,363).
After Malaysian and UK tax of Pounds 112,231 (Pounds 57,120) earnings per
share improved to 0.74p (0.63p). The proposed dividend is stepped up by 0.1p
to 0.55p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3493</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: T Clarke dives but lifts dividend
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Pre-tax profits of T Clarke, the electrical engineer and contractor, plunged
from Pounds 5.06m to Pounds 1.89m in the year to December 31.
Turnover over the 12 months decreased from Pounds 76m to Pounds 59.2m.
Earnings per share, after tax of Pounds 683,000 (Pounds 1.85m), emerged at
9.8p, against 26.08p for 1990.
The proposed final dividend is raised from 5.04p to 5.292p making a total of
6.542p, up from 6.24p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3494</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Losses at Creston grow to Pounds 481,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Group pre-tax losses grew at Creston from Pounds 53,000 to a 'most
disappointing' Pounds 481,000 in the six months to December 31. Again there
is no dividend and the board feels it is unlikely one will be paid for the
full year.
The group said that 'strenuous efforts to contain costs and reduce overheads
and interest charges' failed to produce the hoped-for results. Profits of
the parent company fell to Pounds 32,000 (Pounds 62,000), but the subsidiary
companies - the principal of which is Aluminium and Timber Securities -
tumbled to losses of Pounds 263,000 (profits Pounds 35,000). Further
restructuring and retrenchment was now in action at ATS.
Group turnover declined to Pounds 5.16m (Pounds 7.47m) and losses per share
emerged at 2.39p (0.26p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3495</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Return to dividend list by N Sea Assets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
North Sea Assets is to pay its first dividend since 1985 with a proposed
final payment of 0.75p on 1991 pre-tax profits 72 per cent ahead at Pounds
2.08m, against Pounds 1.21m.
Mr Philip Parker, chief executive, said that the company's businesses, which
supply services to the offshore oil and gas industry, had made considerable
progress.
During the year the company withdrew from shipping, which was making losses.
In November the ship management activities and five of its six ships were
sold followed by the sale a few days ago of the remaining ship.
Turnover rose to Pounds 29.1m (Pounds 21.6m) and the pre-tax figure was
struck after a higher net interest charge of Pounds 985,000 (Pounds 361,000)
and an exceptional gain of Pounds 43,000 compared with a charge last time of
Pounds 360,000.
Earnings per share came out at 4.16p (2.81p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3496</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Pochin's tumbles to Pounds 1.08m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
POCHIN'S, the Cheshire-based civil engineer and building contractor, saw
pre-tax profits in the six months to November 30 decline from Pounds 1.54m
to Pounds 1.08m on turnover down from Pounds 23.3m to Pounds 14.2m.
Mr Nicholas Pochin, chairman, said the results were a reflection of the
state of the industry. The recession persisted and until incentives were
provided to bring back confidence, building and construction would remain
stagnant. He added that profits continued to be supported by healthy
investment income.
The interim dividend is held at 8p from earnings of 73.5p (96p) per share.
Tax took Pounds 312,000 (Pounds 540,000).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3497</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: TI shows resilience with 18% fall -
Acquisitions make up for lower sales from existing operations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TI, the specialist engineer, yesterday demonstrated a resilience amid
difficult trading conditions, reporting an 18 per cent fall in 1991 pre-tax
profits to Pounds 105.2m. After allowing for a one-off hedging gain in 1990
of Pounds 7.3m, profits last year fell only 13 per cent.
Mr Christopher Lewinton, chairman, said he was satisfied with the results
which demonstrated the benefits of having a wide spread of industries and
markets.
Earnings per share fell from 55.5p to 44.8p but the group proposed an
increased final dividend of 13.5p, giving 20.5p for the full year, a 5 per
cent advance.
Turnover was 1 per cent higher at Pounds 899.5m with bolt-on acquisitions
almost offsetting the Pounds 29m lower sales from ongoing businesses.
Interest earned fell from Pounds 11.2m to Pounds 7.8m, as the group spent
Pounds 106m acquiring businesses and Pounds 28m reorganising them, turning
net cash of Pounds 51.6m into a net debt of Pounds 37m. The overall
operating margin fell from 12.1 per cent to 10.7 per cent.
Of the three core divisions to emerge from TI's drastic restructuring over
the past five years, engineering seals performed best, increasing pre-tax
profits from Pounds 36.8m to Pounds 42.5m and margins by 0.4 percentage
points to 15.1 per cent.
Profits at specialised tubes fell from Pounds 43m to Pounds 34.3m and
margins slipped two percentage points to 8.8 per cent. The problems were
concentrated in the UK at the old Tube Investment industries, Desford and
four smaller businesses.
In specialised engineering profits fell from Pounds 22.9m to Pounds 18.2m
with some erosion of margins, partly because aircraft engine builders
deferred spending programmes.
COMMENT
Six years after Mr Lewinton began to transform the old Tube Investments
bicycles-to-kettles mish-mash, TI's three core divisions are well placed to
be an early beneficiary of any economic recovery. This year TI may not set
the world alight. But if anything like the expected recovery emerges in the
US, where TI derives 45 per cent of sales, 1993 should see a jump in
earnings. The group has also dispelled some suspicions about its accounting
policies. TI, we are told, will no longer surprise the City with the release
of provisions to cover reorganisation costs on acquisitions; it will tell us
first. Organic growth and small bolt-on acquisitions, already proving
successful, should lead to a modest rise in pre-tax profits to Pounds 110m
this year, giving 47p of earnings and a prospective multiple of 13. In 1993,
however, profits are forecast at about Pounds 127m, or 53p and a multiple of
11, a substantial discount to the market for a company with strong
management. TI has less room for manoeuvre should it embark upon a large
bolt-on or another sizeable acquisition to build into a fourth core
business. Last year's Pounds 106m acquisition programme led to a Pounds 99m
write-off of goodwill against the balance sheet, reducing shareholders'
funds to Pounds 252m. Any further acquisition, unless financed by new paper,
would be likely to increase gearing quite sharply on net debt currently
standing at Pounds 37m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3498</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Chas Baynes up 20% but warns of 'tough'
first half
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHARLES Baynes, the special-ist engineering and packaging distribution
company, yesterday announced a 20 per cent increase in pre-tax profits as
earnings from packaging and technical products more than offset a downturn
from building components.
But Mr John Perkins, executive director, warned that trading conditions
remained poor in some sectors and predicted the first half of the current
year would be 'very tough'.
The company reported pre-tax profits of Pounds 6.75m for the year to
December 31, compared to Pounds 5.6m a year ago. Turnover increased 39 per
cent to Pounds 73.7m.
Technical products, including specialist metal valves, saw a near fivefold
increase in turnover and operating profits to Pounds 12.5m and Pounds 2.21m
respectively. Packaging distribution, which was boosted by acquisitions
costing Pounds 10.6m, increased operating profits to Pounds 1.5m (Pounds
867,000).
However profits from the building components division slumped in line with
the commercial property market and fell to Pounds 619,000 (Pounds 1.6m).
Aerospace components lifted profits slightly to Pounds 1.87m.
Earnings rose to 3.91p (3.64p) per share. A final dividend of 0.85p (0.8p)
is recommended to make a total of 1.35p, an increase of almost 13 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3499</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Emess hit by interest and exceptional
charges
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EMESS, the lighting and electrical accessories company, yesterday reported a
43.3 per cent fall in pre-tax profits for the year to end-December because
of higher interest charges and exceptional charges from relocating its US
consumer lighting company.
Pre-tax profits fell from Pounds 7.4m to Pounds 4.2m on sales of Pounds 160m
(Pounds 165m). Fully diluted earnings per share fell to 2.2p (3.5p) while
the final dividend was cut from 2.2p to 0.35p making a total of 1p (3.5p).
Net debt at the year-end was Pounds 33m, resulting in gearing of 58 per cent
which the group plans to reduce through non-core disposals. Interest charges
rose from Pounds 3.7m to Pounds 4.2m.
A profit of Pounds 3.3m from the sale of the UK's graphics business was not
enough to offset Pounds 2.9m of costs from the closure of the UK consumer
business; Pounds 300,000 loss on the sale of a long-term investment in the
UK and Pounds 2.2m of costs from restructuring and relocating the US
consumer business.
The overall losses were taken as an exceptional charge of Pounds 2.1m. The
disposal of Imperial Graphics to Kolon of Korea in December for Pounds 7m
was too late to affect last year's results.
Mr Michael Meyer, the chairman, said it had been a 'dreadful year' for Alsy,
the US lighting company, but said the group had taken determined action to
improve performance by moving the manufacturing facilities to Pennsylvania.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3500</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Forth Ports float will raise Pounds 33m for
Treasury
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BOLGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FLOTATION of Forth Ports, which handles most port operations in the
Firth of Forth in eastern Scotland, will raise Pounds 33m for the
government.
A total of 27m ordinary shares will be issued at 110p. Half have been firmly
placed with financial institutions and the rest are being placed, subject to
recall to meet demand from the public, through intermediaries. A further 3m
shares have been reserved for an employee share ownership scheme.
Applications must be received by March 18 and allocations will be announced
the next day. Dealing in the shares is expected to begin on Monday, March
23.
The sale is the only public flotation so far in the privatisation of the
trust ports. Mr Hugh Thompson, Forth's chief executive, said he had rejected
the more popular management buy-out route because the company would have
been highly geared, limiting its activities and scope to make acquisitions.
Mr Thompson said he was looking actively at acquisition opportunities. Forth
would be interested in smaller ports elsewhere in the UK and marine-related
businesses.
Financial advisers to the issue are British Linen Bank, the merchant banking
arm of Bank of Scotland, with brokers de Zoete and Bevan. The issue was
fully underwritten by UBS Phillips and Drew.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3501</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / RTZ shares rise on news of profits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES IN RTZ, the world's biggest mining company, rose against the market
trend in London yesterday by 16p to 555p after the group reported a
better-than-expected 36 per cent drop in pre-tax profits for 1991.
In spite of the relatively gloomy outlook for metals demand in 1992, RTZ is
maintaining its annual dividend at 19.5p a share.
Pre-tax profits fell from Pounds 879m to Pounds 562m. Net attributable
earnings, which RTZ said was the most relevant measure of its performance,
fell 39 per cent from Pounds 507m or 51.4p a share to Pounds 308m or 31.1p
after a Pounds 74m exceptional item (Pounds 46m net of tax).
Mr Bob Wilson, chief executive, said that 'by no stretch of the imagination
could these be called good results'. But he pointed out that while 1991
earnings were Pounds 199m lower than in 1990, operating cash flow remained
strong at Pounds 744m, only Pounds 57m or 7 per cent less than in 1990.
Although capital expenditure was higher at Pounds 307m (Pounds 272m),
continuing high levels of cash generation ensured the balance sheet remained
healthy, with gearing up only slightly from 25 per cent to 27 per cent.
The exceptional item related to RTZ's decision to scrap the copper smelter
at its Bingham Canyon mine near Salt Lake City in the US and replace it with
an Dollars 880m (Pounds 513.9m) new one. Additional depreciation of the
existing smelter is therefore necessary and the whole of this has been
provided in 1991.
Mr Wilson made it clear RTZ was keeping its options open about the Dollars
770m development of a gold project at Lihir Island in Papua New Guinea.
He said that, even if Lihir went ahead with the smelter project, he would
not expect RTZ's gearing to rise above 40 per cent.
In the face of difficult economic conditions last year, RTZ accelerated the
pace of efficiency improvements.
In 1991 its workforce (not counting associates) was reduced by a further 8
per cent or nearly 4,000 to 44,600.
In 1990 about 7,000 jobs were lost.
The group warned that there would be more redundancies in 1992, particularly
at QIT, the titanium dioxide subsidiary in Canada.
Group turnover slipped 4 per cent to Pounds 4.89bn.
Earnings from mining and metals fell by Pounds 61m to Pounds 308m while
those for industrial minerals and manufactured products fell Pounds 29m to
Pounds 140m.
Lex, Page 18; Copper smelter project, Page 30; Market, Page 40
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3502</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Washington tries to allay Gatt fears
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL and FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AGREEMENT in the Uruguay Round of talks on world trade liberalisation is
more likely following meetings this week in Brussels, according to Mr Rufus
Yerxa, US ambassador to the Geneva-based General Agreement on Tariffs and
Trade.
His comments came during a response to fears voiced in the Gatt's latest
review of US trade policy that Washington was retreating from its commitment
to liberal world trade.
The Gatt review argued that US efforts to seal preferential regional trade
arrangements - such as with Mexico in the North American Free Trade
Agreement - could lead to 'the erosion of basic Gatt principles by
regionalism, bilateralism, unilateralism or various forms of managed trade'.
Mr Yerxa disputed that the US drive for regional trade accords weakened its
commitment to the multilateral trading system. Regional economic integration
would benefit the western hemisphere and lead to a more open trade
environment worldwide, he said.
On the US-EC farm trade negotiations, which have for so long stalled
progress towards a Uruguay Round trade accord, Mr Yerxa said fresh proposals
from US president George Bush, presented in Brussels this week to Mr Jacques
Delors, president of the European Commission, were 'a good faith effort on
our part' to give the EC new ideas for resolving differences.
Mr Delors was to reply yesterday to Mr Bush's letter, but its contents have
not been revealed.
EC officials were meanwhile trying to dampen hopes of a breakthrough.
Trading partners' criticisms of the US during the Gatt review included US
anti-dumping and countervailing duty actions, the automatic Dollars 1bn
(Pounds 585m) boost to farm export subsidies under the 1990 Farm Act if
there is no Uruguay Round accord by June 1992, and bilateral and managed
trade deals.
Warning on US retreat, Page 3
Trade disagreement, Page 17
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3503</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Ukraine stops missile shipments to Russia in row over
stockpiling
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRYSTIA FREELAND and LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KIEV, MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UKRAINE has stopped shipping its tactical nuclear missiles to Russia, where
they were to be destroyed under pledges made to the international community,
Mr Leonid Kravchuk, the Ukrainian president, announced yesterday.
The decision was provoked by Ukrainian fears that the weapons were not being
dismantled in Russia, but were being stockpiled. 'We cannot guarantee that
weapons transported to Russia will be destroyed or that they will not fall
into undesirable hands,' Mr Kravchuk said.
At the same time, Mr Konstantin Morozov, defence minister, announced that he
had taken control of the Uzin air force base near Kiev which was formerly
under the collective command of the Commonwealth of Independent States
(CIS).
The aircraft at the base are capable of carrying nuclear weapons, but Mr
Morozov said Ukraine was not seizing the weapons themselves. The decision
was taken because CIS military commanders had banned Ukrainians serving in
their forces throughout Ukraine from swearing allegiance to the republic, he
said.
Both moves are likely to complicate already tense relations with Russia. Mr
Kravchuk's motive in the nuclear missiles decision could be partly to gain
leverage with Russia by hanging on to the weapons in the run-up to what are
expected to be difficult negotiations on the future of the former Soviet
army in Kiev on March 20.
Ukraine feels mounting unease at the presence of a nuclear power on its
north-eastern border. Mr Kravchuk yesterday insisted that Ukrainian tactical
nuclear warheads 'should not be used to strengthen anyone's nuclear
arsenal'.
The move is likely, however, to jeopardise Ukraine's promise to destroy all
its tactical nuclear missiles by July and its commitment to become a
non-nuclear power by 1994. The only facilities for destroying nuclear
weapons in the former Soviet Union are located in Russia, but Mr Kravchuk
proposed the construction of a separate site in Ukraine. Western diplomats
confirmed Mr Kravchuk's assertion that existing facilities in Russia are
unable to accommodate all Ukrainian missiles.
Mr Andrei Kokoshin, deputy director of the USA and Canada Studies Institute,
a Moscow think tank, commented recently that 'it can't be done overnight . .
. The weapons have to be stored in a central place, then sent to storage
facilities attached to plants for the dismantling. We also need storage for
weapons-grade enriched plutonium and uranium. There are bottlenecks at every
phase.'
The move is the most recent example of Ukraine's efforts to establish
independent institutions rather than operate through collective structures
of the CIS. It may also be an attempt to win a greater share of western
funds earmarked for the destruction of nuclear weapons in the former USSR.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3504</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / DTI reopens Blue Arrow inquiry: NatWest wins chance to
counter allegations over conduct at first hearing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MASON and ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Department of Trade and Industry has reopened its inquiry into the Blue
Arrow affair to investigate the roles in the scandal played by the senior
management of National Westminster Bank.
The appointment of DTI inspectors, announced yesterday by Mr Peter Lilley,
the trade secretary, followed a call earlier this week by Lord Alexander,
NatWest chairman, for such an inquiry.
Lord Alexander's request was in response to allegations during the recent
Blue Arrow trial and subsequently repeated in last week's Economist
magazine.
It was alleged that the bank and its chief executive, Mr Tom Frost, had
misled the inspectors in the first inquiry and deliberately concealed
documents from them.
NatWest and Mr Tom Frost deny the allegations and asked for the DTI
investigation in an attempt to clear their names.
The inspectors appointed are Mr Michael Crystal QC and Mr David Spence, an
accountant with Grant Thornton - who both conducted the first DTI inquiry
into Blue Arrow - and Mr Victor Temple, a barrister.
A DTI official said the inspectors would 'cast their net widely', although
they would be looking in particular at evidence relating to the involvement
of senior NatWest executives in the Blue Arrow rights issue which came out
in the recent Blue Arrow trial.
The DTI said that in launching the second inquiry it was responding in part
to Lord Alexander's request. 'NatWest's request was the catalyst for the new
inquiry', said an official.
However, he pointed out that the investigation had been ordered under
Section 432 of the Companies Act, which suggests that the department is
taking into account other sources of information as well as the request from
Lord Alexander.
A section 432 inquiry is made when the DTI has reason to believe that
wrongdoing has taken place worthy of investigation. Inquiries at the request
of a company are brought under section 431 of the Act. The DTI said it was
unlikely that NatWest would be asked to pay for the inquiry.
Lord Alexander welcomed Mr Lilley's announcement. 'The bank will co-operate
fully with the inspectors and I look forward to a speedy resolution of the
inquiry,' he said. However, the DTI said the new inquiry was likely to last
for 'months'.
Mr Frost, who is expected to retire next year, will stay in his post as
chief executive. NatWest said it was 'complete nonsense' to suggest that Mr
Frost should stand down during the inquiry.
During the year-long trial, a barrister acting for one of the defendants
said a draft memo on NatWest's involvement in the Blue Arrow deal,
containing handwritten notes made by Mr Frost, had not been submitted to the
DTI inspectors.
Separately Mr Hugh Hudson, the NatWest inspector who carried out the bank's
internal inquiry into the affair, said during the trial that he felt 'let
down' by Mr Frost and by Sir Philip Wilkinson, the former deputy chairman,
for not supplying him with relevant documents.
The new inquiry could mean the recalling of many of the witnesses who gave
evidence to both the original inquiry and the trial.
The Bank of England said it did not regard the new inquiry as a problem. 'We
will supply the inspectors with all our papers, which we did the last time,'
it said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3505</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Tories postpone poll tax capping
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DECISIONS ABOUT which councils should have their spending 'capped' or
limited by central government have been delayed until after the general
election.
Mr Michael Portillo, the local government minister, told MPs in a Commons
written answer that capping decisions would be held over. Ministers say that
by convention such sensitive decisions are not announced during an election.
The news emerged as Cipfa, the public finance and accountancy body, said the
average 1992-93 poll tax in England, taking account of how many people are
due to pay in each authority, would be Pounds 279.34, an increase of 11 per
cent on the present year.
For Wales, the average poll tax figure is just under Pounds 150, an increase
of 24 per cent, and for Scotland Pounds 298, an increase of just over 20 per
cent.
Labour had predicted the average bill in England will be closer to Pounds
300 than to the government's target of Pounds 257.
Some 15-20 councils in England, Scotland and Wales are expected to have
breached the provisional capping criteria for 1992-93, set out by Mr Michael
Heseltine, the environment secretary, last year.
These include Warwickshire county council, whose budget of almost Pounds
300m is about Pounds 7m above the government's rules. Among the others which
would have faced capping are Basildon in Essex, Langbaurgh and Middlesbrough
on Teesside, and the London boroughs of Greenwich and Lambeth.
Mr David Blunkett, Labour's local government spokesman, said: 'The
government have created yet another poll tax dilemma for themselves. To have
acted on the capping rules would merely have reinforced the picture of their
fingerprints on every bill. But their delay in this decision will cause
confusion in the authorities concerned.'
Last April, Mr Heseltine told 14 authorities to cut their budgets for the
current year; three were Tory and the rest Labour.
Labour is buoyed by its analysis of increases in poll tax bills by political
control of authority, which shows that the weighted average increase for
Tory and for Liberal Democrat authorities is 13 per cent, while in Labour
authorities it is 11.9 per cent. The Tories counter that the average size of
bills is still larger under Labour councils.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3506</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / A free trade disagreement: Bernard Simon examines the
deterioration in economic relations between Canada and the US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Canadians are famous for preferring compromise to conflict, but now they are
gearing up for a confrontation. There is no mistaking their anger that their
country, the US's biggest trading partner and traditionally among its
closest allies, has become one of the prime targets of the rising
protectionist tide in Washington.
The tensions between the US and Canada may lack some of the spice of
Washington's spats with Japan. No Canadian politician or businessman has,
for example, excoriated American workers for laziness. Nonetheless, the
lengthening list of trade disputes between the world's two biggest trading
partners - with two-way trade of more than CDollars 200bn (Pounds 97bn) a
year - has important ramifications.
The US's actions, most recently directed against cars and softwood lumber,
Canada's two biggest southbound exports, have raised questions in Ottawa
about Washington's commitment to the spirit, if not the letter, of the 1989
US-Canada free trade agreement (FTA). It also carries several lessons for
the current talks to expand the FTA into a North American Free Trade Area,
including Mexico.
The friction has particularly worrying implications for Canada's efforts to
woo foreign investors with the promise of an open border to the huge market
to the south. From Ottawa's point of view, new duties and non-tariff
barriers put up by the US send a signal that, despite the free trade
agreement, investors might be better off locating factories in America,
rather than in Canada.
While the federal government in Ottawa remains committed to the 1989 pact,
Prime Minister Brian Mulroney said in an interview with the Financial Times
last week that 'somebody is taking a tremendous instrument, vitiating its
effectiveness, and diminishing its attractiveness for others. I find it
penny wise and pound foolish what the Americans are up to.'
The US administration's recent actions against Canadian exports could
further damage the popularity of the Mulroney government. Mr Mulroney, who
receives less than 20 per cent of support in opinion polls and who faces a
general election within the next 18 months, has made trade liberalisation
with the US one of the cornerstones of his eight years in office.
When Canada negotiated the FTA with the US, Mr Mulroney sold the deal to a
sceptical electorate as a sort of insurance policy which would give Canadian
companies more secure access to their biggest export market. Besides
eliminating all customs tariffs by 1998, the FTA provides for a
continent-wide market for Canada's oil and gas exports, and a fair and
speedy mechanism to resolve trade disputes.
The problem for Canada, however, is that the domestic economy was not ready
for the shock therapy of free trade. After years of being cosseted by
inter-provincial trade barriers and free-spending governments, Canadian
businesses and workers have found themselves ill-equipped to go head to head
with bigger, lower-cost and more productive US competitors.
As a result, the FTA has taken much of the blame for Canada's recession.
Falling customs duties have put especially heavy pressure on its food,
textile and furniture manufacturers. Many companies which used to have
factories on both sides of the border are integrating production in the US.
Several Canadian manufacturers, especially of automotive parts, have moved
their plants to southern US states.
The recent rulings against cars and lumber have reinforced the impression
among many Canadians that, far from being favoured trading partners, they
are victims of the free trade agreement. Mr Gordon Ritchie, who was Canada's
deputy chief negotiator in the FTA talks, observes that 'by any objective
measure, you can demonstrate that the Americans have bashed their Canadian
cousins harder than their former Japanese enemies'.
Earlier this month, the US customs service ruled that Honda cars assembled
in Ontario fail to meet the 50 per cent North American-content threshold
required for duty-free access to the US under the FTA.
The definition of local content is fuzzy and complex and is subject to
varying interpretations. Honda and the Canadians are angry that the customs
service decided, for instance, that engine blocks assembled in Ohio and
shipped north to be installed in Honda cars do not qualify for local content
status. At the same time, US trade negotiators are trying to convince the
European Community that Hondas made in Ohio are North American and not
Japanese cars.
The dispute over lumber, involving trade of more than CDollars 3bn a year,
has compounded the Canadians' anger. An interim duty imposed on Canadian
softwood lumber last October marked the first time the Commerce Department
had initiated a subsidy ruling under section 301 of the US Trade Law without
calling for evidence of injury to domestic producers.
Last Friday, the Commerce Department replaced the interim duty with a 14.5
per cent tariff on Canadian lumber after ruling that sawmills north of the
border are subsidised by low tree-cutting fees in provincial forests and by
curbs on log exports.
These high-profile cases are by no means the only Canadian complaints. Mr
Ritchie says some Canadian exporters have found that US duties on their
products have gone up, rather than down, since implementation of the FTA,
thanks to reclassification of items under different tariff headings.
He adds that the tighter inspection of Canadian meat shipments at border
crossings begun last year 'is clearly contrary to the understanding of the
FTA'.
Despite these concerns the Canadians have no intention of backing away from
the FTA. The pact has brought one principal advantage: an innovative
mechanism to settle disputes.
Since the FTA came into force, about two dozen complaints, covering products
as varied as raspberries and steel rails, have been referred to arbitration
panels comprising relatively independent trade experts from both sides of
the border.
Most cases have involved Canadian complaints against US agencies, and Canada
has won some significant victories. A long dispute over pork ended last year
with a panel overturning a decision by the US International Trade Commission
that the American pork industry was threatened by imports from Canada. The
panel found that the commission had committed errors of law and that its
finding of 'imminent material injury' was not supported by the evidence.
Both the Honda and the softwood lumber disputes are likely to end up in the
laps of dispute settlement panels.
The recent bout of trade friction also holds lessons for the negotiations
now under way with Mexico to create an expanded, North American free trade
area (Nafta). The Honda row, for instance, has persuaded both the Canadians
and Mexicans of the need for clearer rules of origin than exist in the FTA.
Dr Sylvia Ostry, Canada's former ambassador for multilateral trade
negotiations, says the Nafta will require a detailed dispute settlement
process to cover not only trade disagreements, but also other issues that
have become crucial concerns in the negotiations.
Two obvious examples are Mexico's environmental standards and labour laws,
which could easily become targets the next time the protectionism bandwagon
starts rolling in the US. Trade unions and environmental groups in the US
and Canada fear that free trade will encourage many industries to move to
Mexico, where wages are lower and pollution standards less strict.
With the US election campaign gathering steam, it is unlikely that either
President Bush or the US Congress will push hard for a free trade pact in
the months ahead. Mr Mulroney is confident that any protectionist tide will
ebb once the US election campaign is out of the way.
'As the political season winds down, I think you are going to see a lot of
this stuff wind down with it,' he says. Despite the friction with the US,
the prime minister says he is still committed to free trade. 'It wouldn't
bother me in the least to sign a free trade agreement with Mexico two weeks
before an election,' he adds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3507</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / The devil you know . . .: Philip Stephens on the parties'
main campaign themes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
If the prime minister loses the general election it will be because the
electorate blames his government for the recession. If he wins it will be
because the voters trust his management of the economy, rather than Mr Neil
Kinnock's.
The contradiction between those two statements is more apparent than real.
As the campaign for April 9 unfolds, both the Conservative and Labour
parties recognise that the economy will be the pivot on which the outcome
will hinge.
Of course it will be more complicated than that. The Conservatives will make
much during the campaign of Mr John Major's personal popularity and his
achievements in 16 months in Downing Street. Labour will draw support for
its reputation as the more trusted guardian of the welfare state.
But campaign strategists of all persuasions believe that the issue which
will loom largest for the uncommitted voters upon whom the result depends
will be the economy.
This is first postwar election being fought in the middle of recession.
Unemployment was still high and rising in 1983 and 1987 but consumer
spending and output were moving in the opposite direction.
More important, voters who were ready to accept that the recession in
1980-81 was a price the country had to pay for the profligacy of the 1970s,
may be far less willing to excuse the government a decade on.
If any single factor has sustained Labour support in the opinion polls over
the past year it has been the length and depth of the downturn. The latest
Gallup poll for the Daily Telegraph, for example, indicates that less than
30 per cent of the electorate is satisfied with the government's record.
Mr Kinnock will take maximum advantage of the discontent. Each and every
step of his party's campaign will include a reminder of the business
failures, the increase in unemployment and the jump in housing repossessions
since Mr Major replaced Mrs Margaret Thatcher in November 1990.
Mr Major has had some success in deflecting the blame. Gallup shows that
more than two-thirds of voters are ready to place much responsibility for
the recession on Mrs Thatcher. A similar number have also been swayed by the
emphasis on the impact of worldwide recession.
The Conservative campaign does not rest there. One strand will be the
constant reminder that Labour would put up taxes; another will be the,
albeit unstated, message that whatever mistakes the government has made, a
Labour administration would compound them.
They will be drawn together to make the central claim that Labour's
conversion to market economics is unconvincing: that its high tax, high
spending, pro-trade union policies would stifle enterprise and push up
inflation. Mr Major has the opinion polls on his side: Mori's latest survey
for The Sunday Times shows, for example, that 39 per cent of the voters
prefer Conservative management of the economy to the 28 per cent convinced
by Labour's alternative.
If he is to win the election, Mr Kinnock must narrow that gap or ensure that
on April 9 the voters' disenchantment with the Conservative record outweighs
their mistrust of his prospectus.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3508</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Leading Article: Case for new budget procedure
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BY PROPOSING a Budget covering both expenditure and revenue, the chancellor
is, as he claimed, replacing a system that is 'not only illogical', but
'also had a number of highly undesirable consequences'. He promptly proved
himself to be absolutely right. If this had been one of the proposed
December budgets, with the 'more informed and focused debate' mentioned in
the accompanying White Paper, Mr Lamont might have been warned off his new
lower rate band of 20p. This year, as it happens, the election stands in the
way instead.
The peculiar British practice of presenting two half-budgets a year - one,
covering spending, in the autumn, the second, covering revenue, in the
spring - is a relatively recent innovation. It was the result of a change
that was itself desirable: the publication of plans for public spending well
before Budget day.
What the chancellor proposes is to bring the two together once more, this
time in December. This would provide all the advantages laid out in the
White Paper: better decision-making; improved presentation; more informed
debate; and better planning for taxpayers.
The main point is that tax proposals would come three months earlier. This
would have three main effects.
Modifications could be made in the course of parliamentary debate without,
as now, requiring changes in fiscal policy after the beginning of the
financial year.
Lobbies would have a longer period to mobilise against proposed changes, but
this potential disadvantage should be offset by the benefits of more open
government.
Policy would be made in greater ignorance of the fiscal out-turn for the
current year.
Real advantage
The last of these, far from a disadvantage, could be a real advantage. By
making macroeconomic fine-tuning still less credible, the focus would fall
on the proposed fiscal structure, precisely where it should fall.
If one wanted an argument for a longer period of reflection, one need look
no further than the proposed lower rate band of 20p. If the government
wishes to offer the flattery of imitation, it should restrict itself to
Labour's good ideas, not its bad ones.
For most taxpayers the value of the lower rate of tax will be Pounds 100 (5
per cent of Pounds 2,000), but for those who fall within the first Pounds
2,000 of taxable income it is less. For the same cost, the chancellor could
have increased the personal allowance by enough to give Pounds 92.50 to all
basic rate tax payers, including those who fall within the first Pounds
2,000 of taxable income.
Taxpayers' headache
The 4m people who fall within the new band will also now have to reclaim the
difference between the new lower rate of tax and the basic rate on their
investment income. The main result, apart from headaches for taxpayers, will
be 800 additional jobs in the Inland Revenue.
What then of incentives? Roughly half of those on the new marginal rate are
pensioners, for whom incentive effects are largely irrelevant. Those on
family credit will face a marginal tax rate only 1 1/2 percentage points
lower, because their benefits are calculated on a net of tax basis. Even for
those not on benefits, a change of 5p in the pound in the marginal rate of
tax will not represent a noteworthy change in incentives.
The chancellor also presented the new lower rate as a step on the path
towards a 20p basic rate. But the basic rate of tax is not a significant
distortion. Moreover, given the deteriorating fiscal position, tax
increases, not cuts, may soon be required.
Finally, the greater simplicity and transparency that have resulted from
reduction in the number of tax bands are major benefits of the reforms under
previous chancellors. To throw this away for political advantage must be
foolish.
On the lower tax rate, Mr Lamont may prove to have been too clever by half.
But the new budgetary timetable should endure. If so, Mr Lamont's procedural
reform will still be remembered long after the main feature of his budget is
deservedly forgotten.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3509</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Observer: Rough
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A golfer, teeing off, is boasting to his partner about his marvellous
Japanese-made golf ball. 'Hit it into the water, and it floats. It glows in
the dark so you can see it, and it emits an audible whine so that it's easy
to detect in the long rough.'
'Where did you get it?', asks his partner, visibly impressed.
'I found it.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3510</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Observer: Reprint
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Pier Luigi Abete made a brave show of being the right man for the job when
he was chosen yesterday to head Italy's industrialists' confederation,
Confindustria. Unfortunately, there was nothing to hide the fact that he was
a second choice.
The 45-year-old Abete, who runs a successful Rome-based family printing and
publishing business, only became the front-runner two weeks ago when Fiat
boss Gianni Agnelli decided he could not afford to release Cesari Romiti,
the Turin-auto group's chief executive and the industrialists' preferred
choice. Although Abete has long been involved in Confindustria and has been
a vice-president since 1988, he lacks the stature of a Romiti.
Agnelli, one of the three wise men responsible for weeding out the
candidates, last week extolled Abete's talents but added: 'He is not a Mike
Tyson, nor is he a Schwarz-
enegger, nor, indeed, a
Schwarzkopf.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3511</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Observer: Proprietorial
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
What was intended as an election brickbat turned into a bit of a boomerang
for the Tories' Chris Patten.
In a radio interview with LBC's Mike Carlton, the Conservative party
chairman accused Labour of distorting facts about the National Health
Service in a press ad which, Patten said, 'has been taken to pieces in one
of our newspapers this morning . . .I think it's in the Daily Mail.'
'One of our newspapers?', asked an incredulous Carlton. Patten riposted that
he'd meant 'British papers', presumably to distinguish them from those of
the Australian-born Carlton's homeland.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3512</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Observer: Type cast
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Hanson doth protest too much, methinks. Last month Lords Hanson and White
were banging their corporate drum at a lavish presentation to institutional
investors in London. This week, they hosted a similar image-building
exercise in New York (at the Pierre Hotel, where else?).
It must have been important since Britain's eighth biggest company felt
moved to issue a self-serving statement on the London Stock Exchange's Topic
news service.
Hanson's post-seminar survey found that 63 per cent of the 125 analysts
attending rated its management as 'superior'. Not content with finding a
couple of analysts from Salomon Brothers and Goldman Sachs prepared to say a
few nice words about the company, Hanson also repeats the congratulatory
words of the chairman of the American Stock Exchange who gave the keynote
address at the presentation.
But isn't Hanson's main share listing on the rival New York Stock Exchange?
Hanson vice-chairman Martin Taylor admits this is true but notes that at
least the warrants issued at the time of its Beazer bid are quoted on Amex.
It will need more than this sort of PR-hype to remove Wall Street's memories
of Hanson's flotation of its Smith Corona typewriter subsidiary. Two and a
half years after the float Smith Corona's shares are still languishing
nearly 60 per cent below the flotation price.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3513</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Observer: Panoramic view
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Glenwyn Benson, just named as the first woman editor of Panorama, the BBC's
battered flagship of current affairs, got the job for a somewhat surprising
reason, Observer hears.
Like many rising BBC current affairs stars, Benson did a spell at London
Weekend Television, and is therefore indelibly tagged a 'boring Birt-
ist' by those who resist the views of John Birt, BBC director general
designate, and himself a founding father of the analytical LWT South Bank
school of TV journalism.
This was her second shot at Panorama, and many thought BBC1 Controller
Jonathan Powell, a member of the selection panel on both occasions, would
veto her because of that pre-BBC background.
But Benson, 44 and currently editor of BBC's On the Record political
programme, amazed the panel by saying that one gap in Panorama's recent
repertoire was its failure to cover the date rape issue, at the time of the
Mike Tyson trial.
When at LWT, Benson's speciality was vivid scenes from the life of the
underclass. Observer doubts, however, that she would have taken this week's
cancellation of Peter Jay's film on the Tory economic mess-up without a
fierce show of resistance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3514</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Observer: Inside knowledge
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The home secretary's decision to make the prison service in England and
Wales an executive agency creates a really exciting management opportunity.
An open competition is to be held to find a chief executive to shake up the
service which Sir Raymond Lygo, former chief executive of British Aerospace,
described in a recent report as dogged by 'ineffective management'.
Although Joe Pilling, the present director of the prison service, has only
been in the driving seat since August, and will presumably be a strong
candidate, a top businessmen with appropriate experience of detention at Her
Majesty's pleasure might be a much better bet.
Attracting a good candidate should be easier now that the home secretary has
rejected one of Lygo's screwier recommendations. Ex-Admiral Lygo wanted the
wearing of uniform to be extended throughout the prison service in the
interests of discipline.
But Kenneth Baker, despite being a former gunnery instructor to the
Libyan army, has been reading Lord Justice Woolf's report on the 1990 prison
disturbances and is keen to 'demilitarise' the service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3515</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Arts: Ernani - New Theatre, Cardiff
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD FAIRMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The point is not lost when one happens to catch Ernani on the day that a
general election is called. Like some other Verdi operas, this one involves
itself with a period when absolute rulers were in power and the populace
waited upon the whim of one individual to see whether that power would be
dispensed for good or ill.
In the case of Ernani the outcome hangs in the balance and it is only
towards the end that Don Carlo, having secured his position in what one
imagines to have been a fairly ruthless fashion, turns to magnanimity and
forgives his enemies. No doubt some parallel with contemporary politics
could be found. The strength of Elijah Moshinsky's production is that it
generally leaves making perceptions of that nature to the audience's
imagination.
It was as long ago as 1979 that this Ernani was originally put on by Welsh
National Opera. At the time the company was riding high on a tide of
adventurous programming, of which this early Verdi opera played a part, and
it seems entirely appropriate that it should be coming back into the
repertoire now alongside the highly-acclaimed new Pelleas et Melisande.
It was a handsome production to look at then, and still is now. The dark
vision of a 16th-century Spain, dominated by grim men of the sword and
strict household formalities, has aged extremely well. The chorus, always a
strong element in WNO performances, is used to forceful effect and Richard
Armstrong conducted with the sturdy feeling for Verdi's dramatic pulse that
always marked his work for the company. One regrets only the decision to
trim the score by omitting second verses of some arias and cabalettas.
If the opera still did not wield a sharp enough cutting edge in this
performance, there are a couple of main reasons. One is that the Italian
text was rarely delivered with any clarity. All the singers were offenders
in that respect and Suzanne Murphy's Elvira in particular, no matter how
easily her beautiful soprano sails out in this music, even in the most
awkward passages of coloratura.
The other is that the characters were never quite projected with the sort of
elemental force that these early Verdi dramatic prototypes require. The most
successful at generating sparks of electricity off each other were Malcolm
Donnelly as Don Carlo and Alastair Miles as Silva. Both had the measure of
their roles in a theatre of this size although Donnelly ideally lacks vocal
grace as a singer of early Verdi.
In the role of Ernani himself Paolo Kudriavchenko equally preferred
generalised force of vocal delivery to niceties of phrasing. One suspects
that it is with this character, the outsider and potential revolutionary who
turns to the populace for his support, that Verdi instinctively felt his own
sympathies to lie and so the role is an important one. Unfortunately
Kudriavchenko's lacklustre showing in it would not easily win my vote.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3516</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Arts: The Barber of Seville - Palace Theatre, Watford
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALASTAIR MACAULAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I would like one day to see a Figaro Festival. It should include not only
the three Beaumarchais plays that launched this character upon the world and
the Mozart and Rossini operas that made him yet more famous, but also
Horvath's modernist masterpiece Figaro Gets Divorced (staged in 1990 at the
Gate), Renoir's classic film Les regles du jeu (inspired by Beaumarchais),
the very cut Tito Gobbi film of Rossini's opera (seen last Sunday on Channel
4) and more.
Here on the British stage is the father of all Figaros, Beaumarchais's
Barber of Seville, seldom seen today. Figaro is a character who faces
backwards and forwards in history. He is derived from the Harlequin of
commedia dell' arte and from the comedies of Terence and Plautus; but he is
also a symbol of the social forces that brought down the ancien regime.
Unfortunately, this account is not greatly to be recommended. This play is
much harder to bring off than its sequel, The Marriage of Figaro (or
Figaro's Wedding, call it what you will). Beaumarchais's text is a thin
fabric that seems once to have been embroidered with commedia vitality and
incendiary nuance. Lou Stein's production fast-forwards over delicious
crises that surely need to be prolonged to the point of delirium, and creaks
through witty manoeuvres that should pass like quicksilver.
Every role is undercast, but Figaro most so. Lee Cornes, a bland barber who
blunders with the text, makes it impossible to understand why his is the
title role. Helena Bonham Carter is a spoilt deb of a Rosine. Her pertness
is appropriate, but she has not the warmth to make this role loveable, the
elegance to make it distinguished or the vulnerability to make it touching.
Oliver Parker is a yuppie Almaviva. Barry Jackson does nothing wrong as
Bartolo, but not enough right. (Imagine the comic inventiveness that a Paul
Eddington might bring to the role and you have a clue to how intoxicating
Barber could again become.)
The dancing of Gemma de la Cruz before and after each scene lends a welcome
dash of Spain to proceedings, which is then vitiated by the cast's coarse
pronunciation of 'Rosine' and 'Jose'.
The translation is by Ranjit Bolt and follows his Marriage of Figaro, given
last year by this theatre. Bolt is an irrenot resist turning bits of
Beaumarchais's prose into verse. And his few outbreaks of rhyme here are
better timed than the big one in Figaro.
Bolt is the virtuoso of yuppiespeak, and greatly talented. But prose does
him good; it sometimes stops him advertising his own cleverness. Even so,
more than half the jokes here aren't by Beaumarchais; and some of
Beaumarchais's best lines have been pruned away. Too often Bolt sounds like
a loutish loudmouth, trying to make sure that his voice will always be heard
over that of the original playwright.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3517</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Management: Down at heel in Mayfair - Lucy Kellaway finds
Lord Weinstock sharing the limelight with paintings of his prize-winning
racehorses in an otherwise gloomy room
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCY KELLAWAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Lord Weinstock sits slumped behind his desk. He does not get up when you
come in. The office is dark, even though it is the middle of the afternoon.
The dingy hanging blinds are drawn, spotlights pick out his desk and his
prized paintings of racehorses on the walls. In between are pools of
obscurity.
The room is sweltering. The chief of the General Electric Company looks
perfectly at ease in shirt-sleeves, but visiting businessman are expected to
sweat into their jackets, perched on uncomfortable chairs.
The headquarters of one of Britain's biggest industrial companies is so run
down that it would put much smaller organisations to shame.
Its ugly, modern box shape and dirty mixture of concrete, steel and glass -
fashionable in the 1950s - are a blot on its Mayfair surroundings.
The rounded lettering displaying the company's name and the dreary inside of
the building do not seem to have been changed since GEC moved there in 1963.
Upstairs on the chairman's floor, some of the flourescent corridor lights do
not work, and the ceiling tiles are uneven.
A ring of grease and dirt surrounds the button that calls the lift. Lord
Weinstock cannot remember the last time his all-brown office was decorated.
Even he agrees that enough is enough, and finally the building is to be
redone. 'The place must be sufficiently bright not to depress people,' he
says.
A hint to the future is given by the ground floor waiting room which has
recently had a face-lift with a cheap pink carpet and pink squashy sofas,
which sit bleakly around the unadorned walls.
Weinstock appears quite unbothered by the image that the building gets
across. 'I'm not interested in image. We are what we are.'
That is certainly true of Weinstock, an original, a manipulator, a
chauvinist and a charmer.
He does not abide by the conventions that bind the bosses of other
companies. He gets into work at 9.30 or 10am and stays until late at night,
locking the papers into his safe before going back to his London flat.
'Most of my life revolves around my job. It is what I am doing most of the
time, wherever I am.' Even when he should be asleep, he lies awake thinking
about work.
He likes to be in command of his day, and only once a year - at budget time
 -does he allow himself to tied down by formal meetings.
'I am not normally aware long in advance of what is in my diary,' he says.
Inside the black volume, all the pages seem to be completely empty. 'This
does not run my life', he says slamming it firmly shut.
By contrast, both doors at either end of his office are wide open. Through
one of them, Sarah Morrison, GEC's blue-stocking director of communications
emerges, puts some papers on Weinstock's desk, and tells him something that
she thinks is funnier than he does.
His room makes few concessions to modernity. The old brown corduroy sofa and
chairs are something to fill the space; Weinstock never leaves his 'nest' in
the corner. There is no computer screen on his desk.
'If I want to know our share price, I can see it on this, a device which we
invented.' He snatches up the remote control of his television and has some
trouble getting it tuned to Teletext, and starts to shout.
Eventually he manages it and calm returns. A more heavily used gadget is the
telephone, on which he spends about a third of each day.
He is quick to get on the phone himself, sometimes launching into a harangue
before he has said who he is. Indeed, he has no fewer than 232 numbers on a
short dial code, which are just the people who he speaks to often.
Weinstock rejects the usual hierarchy within companies, and has no qualms
about ringing up the manager of a small depot, getting him to explain
himself if any complaints have made their way to head office.
He has no personal staff, apart from a secretary and on his own admission,
he is not much of a one for delegating. 'I don't delegate the jobs I am
doing,' he says.
'If I can't do a part of a job, I delegate the thing to someone else.'
Although Weinstock is a big family man, there are no pictures of his family
around, indeed, no pictures of human beings at all.
Instead he rattles off all the prizes won by his horses around the room, as
well as the races they ought to have won.
'You have to have something on the walls and they are more beautiful than
people,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3518</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / High street sales continue their recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A MODEST recovery in high-street sales continued for the seventh consecutive
month in February, bringing sales to their best level for this period since
late 1990, the Confederation of British Industry said yesterday.
Mr Nigel Whittaker, chairman of the CBI's distributive trades panel, said:
'There has clearly been an underlying increase in retail trade since the
summer of last year.'
Although the figures looked promising, heavy snow this time last year
distorted the year-on-year comparison upwards. Retailers also reported that
in spite of improved sales they still considered stocks too high and were
continuing to place fewer orders with suppliers.
The sales volume of wholesalers showed less marked improvement and remained
poor for the time of year.
The results of the CBI's latest quarterly distributive trades survey, which
covers more than 15,000 retail and wholesale outlets, found that sales among
motor traders were below levels in February last year although there was an
upward trend in sales of parts and accessories.
Sales were most buoyant in clothing and shoe shops. Sales of durable
household goods were down on a year ago but furniture, carpet, hardware and
DIY stores said last month's trade was up on the previous year.
While wholesalers and motor traders reported a reduction in import
penetration over the year to February, retailers said the proportion of
deliveries accounted for by imports continued to increase.
Overall, retailers, wholesalers and motor traders expected the business
situation to improve in the next three months.
Investment intentions were less positive, with cuts in capital spending
throughout most retailing sectors. Shoe shops, booksellers and specialist
food retailers expect the sharpest falls in investment while chemists expect
to invest most.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3519</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Rise in sales of new homes reported
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL CASSELL, Business Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MINISTERS anxious for evidence of the long-awaited upturn in the economy
will today take comfort from a report suggesting sales activity in the
housing market is beginning to show a marked improvement.
The House Builders' Federation said a recovery in sales experienced in
London and the south-east in January had started to spread to the rest of
the country.
East Anglia experienced the biggest increase, the report found.
Mr David Holliday, the federation president, said that there was positive
evidence that purchaser interest in new homes was being converted into
sales. He went on to predict that the housing market would now begin to move
forward strongly throughout the remainder of 1992.
'Other surveys have shown increased purchaser interest. This is the first
positive interest that has been converted into sales,' he said.
The federation report is based on responses from 41 of Britain's biggest
building companies, which together account for about half of new house
sales.
In January 80 per cent of builders reported improved sales compared with
January last year. The figure rose to 84 per cent in February.
Nearly half of the respondents said February sales had jumped by more than
25 per cent.
The report concludes that there has been a 'considerable improvement' in
confidence among home buyers in the first two months of 1992, which has
gained momentum in February.
Earlier this month Halifax, the UK's largest building society, said it saw
some signs of a revival in the housing market. It said that it expected a
small increase in house prices by the second half of this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3520</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Car output increase breaks the trend
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UK CAR production last month was 4.9 per cent higher than in February last
year - the first year-on-year increase in output for seven months.
Commercial vehicle production rose by 13.2 per cent, reinforcing the
stronger trend of recent months.
Output of commercial vehicles has been higher than a year ago in three of
the past four months, helped by rising small van production by Ford, which
added its Courier high-roof Fiesta van range at its Dagenham plant late last
year.
Car production last month rose to 114,492 from 109,160 in the same month a
year ago, when Ford's Halewood plant on Merseyside was operating a shortened
working week.
The production increase resulted from a surprising 23.5 per cent jump in
output for the still depressed domestic market to 66,485, which more than
compensated for the 15.7 per cent fall in output for export markets to
48,007.
In the wake of the heavy 16.1 per cent fall in car output in January, car
production in the first two months of the year at 209,737 was still 5.8 per
cent lower than in the same period a year ago.
According to figures released yesterday by the Society of Motor
Manufacturers and Traders and the Central Statistical Office, car output in
the past six months on a seasonally adjusted basis was 10 per cent lower
than in the previous six months and 15 per cent lower than in the same six
months a year ago.
By contrast commercial vehicle output in the six months to the end of
February on a seasonally adjusted basis was 23 per cent higher than in the
previous six months and 2 per cent higher than in the same six months a year
ago.
Commercial vehicle output alone last month, at 21,315, was 13.2 per cent
higher than a year ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3521</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Retailers hope a breathing space will save them: John
Thornhill finds a cautious high-street response to Budget changes in the
uniform business rate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Budget gave 470,000 business ratepayers a welcome 'breathing space' by
freezing the increase in the uniform business rate in real terms for a year.
The benefits could be significant. Mr Richard Dixon, spokesman for
Storehouse, the retailing group embracing BhS, Richards, Blazer, Mothercare
and Habitat, estimated the change would add more than Pounds 2m to the
company's profits. He said: 'What the government has done is undoubtedly
very helpful.'
But more fragile retailing companies, particularly in south-east England
where the UBR burden has been heaviest, fear the breathing space may be
followed by the last gasp.
Several expressed disappointment that the government had still not tackled
the valuation difficulties that have bedevilled the rating system since its
introduction in 1990.
Mr Michael Horwitz, a commercial estate agent who represents many retailers
in London's West End, said: 'One hates to be a sourpuss and say 'thanks but
it's not enough' but the rateable values are still too high. They were
assessed at the peak of the market and are now out of line with commercial
reality.'
The pressures are most acute in the south-east, where property prices were
highest in 1988 and subsequent falls steepest. The rental value of Zone A
retailing space in South Molton Street in London was Pounds 235 a sq ft two
years ago but is now about Pounds 116.
The Department of the Environment accepts that problems with the UBR stem
from the revaluation exercise that accompanied its introduction.
Assessments of the rateable value of business properties were based on their
notional rental value - those valuations were made at April 1 1988, right at
the peak of the retail property market.
Companies complain that the appeals process against revaluations is slow and
cumbersome. In the meantime, they have had to pay bills in full.
Last October Mr Michael Portillo, junior environment minister, told MPs that
on September 30 there were 673,237 outstanding appeals concerning
non-domestic rates in England and Wales.
When the government introduced the UBR it made transitional arrangements to
allow businesses in the south-east to adjust to the rates increases by
phasing in the rise. However, these arrangements end when a new business
moves in.
In the Budget, new businesses were given the right to inherit transitional
relief. Mr James May, head of the British Retail Consortium, welcomed the
attachment of the rate to the property rather than the tenant. However, he
warned: 'If someone has taken on a new shop and already lost transitional
relief he may be faced with a rates bill twice as high as his neighbour.'
One example of that anomaly is the two Oxford Street shops of Jane Norman,
the fashion retailer. Its shop at number 153 opened before UBR, has a
rateable value of Pounds 237,500 and faces a nominal rates bill of Pounds
91,675. With transitional relief it will pay Pounds 44,173 this year. Its
property at 524 Oxford Street opened after the introduction of UBR with a
rateable value of Pounds 247,500 and did not inherit the phasing-in relief.
It has to pay the full rates bill of Pounds 95,535.
The DoE accepts there is a discrepancy but says retailers opened stores
knowing the size of bill they would face.
THE British Chambers of Commerce National Council yesterday welcomed Budget
measures to ease the burden of the uniform business rate.
It said it was 'delighted' with the decision to limit the increase in the
UBR to the rate of inflation and to improve arrangements on transitional
relief. However, some members felt it did not do enough to aid recovery.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3522</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Job gains likely from tax changes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLMAN, Public Policy Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INCOME TAX changes in this year's Budget are likely to create almost 1,000
jobs in the Inland Revenue, which only last week announced plans to lose up
to 10,000 jobs over the next decade by reorganising its office network to
increase efficiency and improve service.
Most of the additional jobs will be required because of the introduction of
a reduced 20 per cent rate of tax for the first Pounds 2,000 of taxable
income.
Some staff will be needed to deal with inquiries expected to arise from a
more complicated tax structure. There will also be an increased number of
claims for repayment of tax from people who have had tax deducted from
interest and dividends at the basic rate of 25 per cent and are liable for
tax at only 20 per cent.
When the reduced rate of tax introduced by the last Labour government was
abolished by Sir Geoffrey Howe in 1980 he estimated that it had taken 1,300
tax staff to administer it. Fewer staff will be needed this time because of
the computerisation of tax assessment, which makes processing easier.
Revenue managers estimate that 200 extra staff will be needed for each
million repayment claims. With up to 4m taxpayers liable for tax at only the
20 per cent rate, 800 extra staff will be needed to administer this aspect
of the Budget by the 1993-94 tax year, when most claims for next year are
likely to be lodged.
About 200 further jobs will be created by the proposal to allow the married
couple's allowance to be transferred between husband and wife.
With staff savings from some Budget measures - for example the scrapping of
the business expansion scheme - the Inland Revenue payroll is estimated to
increase by 490 posts in 1992-93 and 940 in 1993-94.
Editorial Comment, Page 16
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3523</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK News (Employment): Strikes of under a week seen to
benefit workers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FIRST comprehensive analysis of whether strike action over pay benefited
workers during the 1980s has tentatively concluded that it did if the strike
lasted one week or less, but did not for the 'average' pay strike of 11
days.
An analysis of 9,000 wage settlements by Professor David Metcalf and Mr
Jonathon Wadsworth, of the Centre for Economic Performance at the London
School of Economics, found that one in 40 involved a strike.
In seven out of the 10 years from 1979 to 1989 real wage settlements
involving a strike were higher than those without a strike. For the decade
as a whole settlements with a dispute were 0.7 per cent higher than those
without a dispute.
Strikes in coal products (not coal mining, which is not included in the
survey) and metal manufacturing were relatively long, and those in metal
manufacturing produced settlements on average 4.2 per cent higher than those
without strikes. Strikes in electrical engineering and timber yielded, on
average, lower real wage increases.
The statistical analysis found that striking boosted the annual pay rise by
an average of Pounds 45 a year. Assuming that the benefits of a pay rise can
be enjoyed for 30 years, and real interest rates remain positive, a
three-week strike would be worthwhile even given a daily cost of striking of
Pounds 57.
The analysis concludes that in the 56 per cent of cases where strikes last a
week or less and win gains lasting seven years or more, the benefits will
outweigh the costs. However, the 'average' strike in the sample lasted 11
days and that required a wage gain to last 30 years for benefits to equal
the cost.
The government is unlikely to welcome the finding that strike action can
often pay.
The authors emphasise, however, that the findings are very tentative and
could substantially underestimate or overestimate the costs of strike
action. Strikes may, for example, yield higher settlements in subsequent
years from a management fearful of a repetition.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3524</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Scheme to recycle cardboard planned
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOUR packaging associations yesterday launched a scheme to recycle more of
the 5bn cardboard boxes used in the UK every year.
A company, Repak, has been formed to run the UK Fibreboard Transit Packaging
Recycling System.
Repak will issue a recycling symbol to companies registering with the
scheme, which will signify that products are made of recyclable material and
can be collected for reprocessing through existing recycling facilities.
Mr Bernard Stonestreet, Repak chief executive, said: 'The packaging sector
will pay on a tonnage basis for the licensing of the logo. We are looking at
a cost of about 10p per tonne.'
The money raised will cover the administration of the scheme and pay for
further research and development. Almost half the 2m tonnes of fibreboard
packaging used in the UK is already recycled.
The scheme aims to encourage an even greater proportion of recycling through
the closer co-operation of manufacturers, retailers and waste collection
companies.
Many retailers welcomed the scheme, but some feared it might cut across
profitable recycling agreements that they had established individually.
The development of the Repak system mirrors environmental initiatives in
many other European Community countries and its backers believe that
exported products marked with the triangular symbol will be accepted for
recycling in other countries at no extra cost.
The Repak scheme will initially cover only transport packaging, but the aim
is to extend it to sales packaging.
The four associations setting up the scheme are the British Fibreboard
Packaging Association, the British Paper and Board Industry Federation, the
British Waste Paper Association and the Independent Waste Paper Processors'
Association.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3525</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Motor executives to meet government ministers on car
recycling
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GRIFFITHS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Driving a bargain: motor industry executives are to meet government
ministers next week to examine ways of recycling more effectively the 2m
cars scrapped annually in the UK, John Griffiths writes.
The meeting reflects increasing concern throughout the European Community on
the issue of car recycling. About 75 per cent of materials in scrapped cars
are currently reclaimed. German manufacturers such as Volkswagen already
have pilot plants in operation seeking to achieve a level of 90 per cent,
however. VW's advertising campaign for the new Golf - illustrated above -
stresses this potential.
At their meeting with Mr Peter Lilley, the trade and industry secretary, and
Mr Michael Heseltine, the environment secretary, the executives will
consider methods of increasing the percentage of materials recoverable from
cars, reducing waste which has to be incinerated or dumped, and ensuring
scrap materials are not contaminated by hazardous oil and brake fluid.
The government is looking to the industry to come up with practical
processing solutions but ministers are ready to legislate to ensure that
scrapped cars are committed to approved recycling points.
Mr Lilley said yesterday that the DTI would provide a Pounds 300,000 grant
to help a four-company consortium establish ways of reusing plastic waste
from the car production process and scrapped cars. The consortium comprises
ICI Chemicals and Polymers, ICI Europe, Enimont, the Italian plastics group
and Fiat, the car manufacturer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3526</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK News (Employment): TUC men lose suffrage in silence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MALE delegates to the TUC Women's Conference were yesterday crying into
their bitter after being excluded for the first time in the gathering's
62-year history.
Mr Ernie Dudley, a sad-looking delegate from the UCW communications union,
denied that he was hurt, but admitted that he was disappointed. 'It just
seems a bit that people think men are the enemy - and I am not. I have been
coming here for four years. I might still be a bit of a chauvinist, but I am
less of a chauvinist than I was.'
The Women's TUC is a far more flexible and friendly affair than the
male-dominated annual congress of the whole union movement, but this year
the spirit of radicalism past seems to have crept beyond the T-shirt stalls
at Blackpool's Winter Gardens.
The delegates, who recognise that the conference has been marginalised by
the start of the election campaign, voted 142 to 120 to exclude male
delegates - there are 13 this year - to make room for more of the sisters.
They may still attend as voiceless, voteless visitors.
The motion was proposed by Ms Yasmin Ishaq, from Napo, the probation
officers' union, who was delighted with her unexpected success. 'While we
believe we should work together with men to implement policies to the
betterment of women's lives, it should be women who decide what needs to be
changed and improved,' she said.
Mr Norman Willis, TUC general secretary, presiding over the debate on Europe
with paternal understanding, explained that the oversubscribed conference
was not losing sons, but gaining daughters.
As the debate turned to training, and delegates began to think of lunch, Mr
Mike Pendred, of the Norwich Trades Council, was obviously upset. 'This is
my third time down here,' he said. 'I use my own time to come down to find
out all about the world of women. I come down because I care. They should
not exclude men from contributing. They need men to come down to go back and
tell other men.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3527</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / DTI may ease small company auditing rules
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DEPARTMENT of Trade and Industry is considering removing the legal
requirement that smaller companies be subject to annual audit, in a radical
overhaul of company reporting.
An estimated 250,000 companies below the threshold for paying value added
tax - about one quarter of all registered companies - could be freed from
mandatory annual external audits by accountancy firms.
Mr John Redwood, minister for corporate affairs, said in an interview with
the Financial Times yesterday that consultation on the policy had started.
No firm decision had been made, but he supported the idea of reducing the
coverage of audits and general thinking was moving in that direction.
He said it might remain a condition that smaller companies would be required
to retain the services of a professional accountant.
All limited companies have been required to have an audit since 1908. The
requirement was reaffirmed in the early 1980s after the introduction of the
fourth European Community directive on small and medium-sized enterprises.
Audit fees charged by accountants to the smallest companies often run into
hundreds of pounds and the change in regulations could threaten income from
many smaller practitioners.
The plans under discussion would exclude from annual audits companies with
turnovers below Pounds 35,000 - the level at which they currently become
liable for VAT. It would increase in line with this limit, raised to Pounds
36,600 in the Budget on Tuesday.
Mr Redwood said there might be a distinction drawn on the rules, with
requirements relaxed for independent companies but not for those which are
subsidiaries of other companies.
The Treasury and the Inland Revenue are believed to oppose the idea saying
it could jeopardise the efficacy of tax collection. It might also raise
problems for regulators and those trying to detect fraud.
Mr Joe Ryan, partner in charge of growing businesses at Coopers &amp; Lybrand
Deloitte, the accountancy firm, said most financial institutions would
probably still require a regular independent check on a company's accounts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3528</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Japanese hold job losses in check: Cuts shallower than among
other manufacturers in Britain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JAPANESE-OWNED manufacturing companies in Britain have largely avoided
making staff redundant, in spite of taking a battering in the worst
recession since Japanese inward investment started more than 20 years ago.
More than half the Japanese-owned manufacturing companies in the UK have
reduced staffing or the number of hours worked in the past year, according
to an FT survey of 40 of the biggest companies.
They have made far fewer redundancies than British manufacturing as a whole,
and some - notably motor vehicle manufacturers and their suppliers - are
still recruiting.
Companies in engineering, construction equipment and business machines have
been most affected by the recession.
Even here, compulsory redundancies are a last resort. Most companies have
sought other ways to trim output.
Some have laid off temporary workers. NEC's business-equipment-making
operation in Telford, Shropshire, has shed about 130 temps. The company
said: 'It will be at least six months before we recruit in any quantity.'
Others have eliminated overtime or frozen recruitment. One photocopier maker
has lost almost 10 per cent of its 700 staff in a year through natural
wastage.
More unusual solutions have included closing on alternate Fridays, as at
electronics group Hitachi at Aberdare, Mid Glamorgan, or extending Christmas
holidays, as at bearings maker NSK in Peterlee, County Durham.
Several companies negotiated with unions to skew hours worked towards the
second half of the year. Matsushita Electric, which makes microwave ovens
and television sets in Cardiff, has reduced the hours worked in a week by 15
per cent for the first four months of the year and increased them by the
same amount to meet seasonal demand in the last four months.
In a few cases, where business is especially tough, there have been
compulsory job losses. Komatsu, which makes earth-moving equipment at
Birtley, Tyne and Wear, cut its permanent staff by 80 last year. In an
effort to reduce the number of outright redundancies it seconded some staff
to the local college of technology.
Compulsory redundancies are a delicate matter for Japanese companies.
Brother, a maker of office equipment and microwave ovens in Wrexham, north
Wales, made staff redundant last year but refuses to discuss the matter in
public. Others spoke only on condition that neither they nor their products
were identified. Most of the companies were small and, typically, fewer than
10 people lost their jobs.
The news is not all gloomy. Carmaker Nissan is recruiting 1,600 extra staff
in Washington, Tyne and Wear. The company said: 'We're working a lot of
overtime to satisfy orders mainly for export.' Honda UK is recruiting to
make en-gines for the new Honda Con-certo in Swindon, Wiltshire.
Booming car production has helped parts suppliers. Ikeda Hoover Trim of
Sunderland makes vehicle seats for Nissan. It added more than 100 staff last
year, taking the total employed above 500. Yuasa Batteries of Ebbw Vale,
south Wales, which makes industrial batteries, said that although its rate
of growth had slowed, staffing had risen from 470 to 516 in six months.
Sony was one of the first Japanese companies to start manufacturing in the
UK, in June 1974. It said last year it was spending Pounds 147m to build a
second television plant and research and development centre in Bridgend,
south Wales, employing 1,400.
SP Tyres of Birmingham and Washington, Tyne and Wear, which is owned by
Sumitomo Industries, has held staffing levels. SP's Mr Bob Harwood said: 'We
concentrate on quality, employee involvement and reducing the numbers of
layers of management. There's nothing magical about it.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3529</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK News (Employment): Maternity rules threatened
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EMPLOYERS could find themselves having to provide maternity leave for
workers who have completed less than two years' service following the
decision of Sheffield industrial tribunal yesterday.
Only women who have worked for two years or more for the same employer are
entitled by law to have their jobs back after maternity leave. The tribunal
ruled, however, that a woman who fell four weeks short of the qualifying
period had, under a different law, been the victim of sex discrimination
when her employer refused to allow her to return.
The tribunal decision is in line with a European Court ruling on the issue.
According to the Equal Opportunities Commission the tribunal itself does not
set a legal precedent and the law on maternity leave remains confused.
Ms Christine Tindale had worked as a securities clerk at Barnsley Building
Society for just less than two years when she became pregnant. She requested
16 weeks' unpaid leave and her job back after having her baby. The society
refused, saying she had to work for two years before being entitled to
return.
The tribunal accepted that if Ms Tindale had applied for time off for any
other reason her employers would probably have agreed.
This would have been in line with her contract, which allowed unpaid leave.
The tribunal therefore ruled that Ms Tindale was treated unfairly because of
her pregnancy, amounting to sex discrimination under the Sex Discrimination
Act.
The tribunal had no power to order Ms Tindale's reinstatement but it awarded
her more than Pounds 6,000 in compensation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3530</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK News (Employment): Shipyard faces ballot on staff cuts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MANUAL workers at Vosper Thornycroft, the Southampton-based shipbuilder, are
to ballot on strike action over compulsory redundancies.
The company, which is suffering from a lack of defence orders, aims to cut
its 1,800-strong workforce by about 200 before June. Unions said the company
had breached redundancy agreements, and balloting would begin in the next
two weeks.
The company said most of the redundancies had so far been voluntary but some
compulsory ones were necessary to meet targets. It denied that agreements
had been broken.
Mr John Simmons, local chairman of the Confederation of Shipbuilding and
Engineering Unions, said the unions had argued for workers to be laid off
under an agreement which allowed for them to continue receiving 75 per cent
of normal pay.
Mr Chris Girling, the company's finance director, said the difficulties it
faced were 'too deep and too long' to be dealt with by lay-offs. Many
employees were already engaged in unproductive work, such as maintenance,
and others without work were being kept on so core skills were retained.
In a similar dispute, workers at a plant owned by GEC-Alsthom, the
switchgear company, last month ended a six-week strike over compulsory
redundancies. Unions failed to persuade management to reinstate 12 workers.
GEC Ferranti, the electronics company, has told its 5,000 employees that it
will freeze pay this year because of the depressed defence market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3531</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Thomas Cook slims corporate card service
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THOMAS COOK, the travel services arm of the Midland Bank, has staged a
partial withdrawal from the corporate credit-card market which it entered
less than two years ago.
Small business customers of Thomas Cook have received a letter from its
corporate card division telling them that their card facilities are being
withdrawn at less than 48 hours notice.
About 400 companies are affected with a total of 600 corporate cards. Thomas
Cook believes this is around 13 per cent of the market. The cards carry the
MasterCard branding.
Thomas Cook said yesterday the decision had been made because of the growing
cost of operating the corporate card service for small business customers.
Small business customers have been told that they can only continue to use
the corporate card if they also make regular use of Cook's direct travel
services.
Ms Stephanie Booth Maple, chief executive of Maple Leaf Holdings, a
Manchester retailer which was told that it could no longer use the card,
described the company's letter to its customers as very high-handed.
'Everyone is entitled to make commercial decisions, but I was surprised at
the tone of the letter we got,' she said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3532</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / MPs call for Maxwells to face Commons
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR KEVIN MAXWELL and Mr Ian Maxwell should be brought before the House of
Commons to account for their refusal to answer MPs' questions about their
father's theft of more than Pounds 400m from his companies' pension funds, a
cross-party Commons committee said last night.
The social security committee said that Mr Michael Stoney, treasurer of the
Mirror Group pension fund, had also refused to answer the questionnaire sent
by the committee to trustees of the Maxwell pension funds.
Since Mr Robert Maxwell's death in November it has emerged that he stole
hundreds of millions of pounds from the funds.
An inquiry that ignored the Maxwell brothers would have been like ignoring
the Prince in Hamlet, the committee said in a supplement to its
recommendations on pension reform published on Monday. 'The refusal of the
Maxwell brothers to give evidence has been most harmful to the committee's
activities.'
The MPs had asked the trustees about the ultimate ownership of the pension
funds - obscured by secretive offshore trusts - and about day-to-day control
of the funds.
They had also wanted to question the Maxwell brothers about 'the role of
those US investment banks which were involved in the alleged illegal
operation to support Maxwell Communication Corporation shares by routeing
share purchases through offshore trusts'.
In a letter to the com-mittee on February 20, Mr Stoney's solicitors argued
he had a common law right to remain silent to avoid self-incrimination. This
is the argument used by the brothers' solicitors.
Mr Frank Field MP, the committee's chairman, said that the committee formed
after the general election should pursue the issue of the brothers' 'prima
facie contempt of the House of Commons'.
The committee had noted the comments of Mr Kevin Maxwell's lawyer that
criminal charges were likely soon, and it had 'no intention of fouling up a
fair trial'.
The Conduct of Mr Ian Maxwell and Mr Kevin Maxwell, Social Security
Committee. House of Commons.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3533</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Volvo site sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE WEST Cumbria Development Agency is this week launching a worldwide
marketing campaign for Volvo's bus factory at Workington which closes this
year with the loss of 370 jobs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3534</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Airport aims for charter lead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MANCHESTER airport yesterday said it expected to overhaul London's Gatwick
this year as market leader in holiday charter traffic.
The airport said that expanded summer programmes by more than 270 tour
operators would push Manchester's share of the inclusive tour booking market
to nearly 30 per cent, while Gatwick had an estimated 28 per cent.
BAA, the airports operator, said its eight airports handled 4.8m passengers
last month - a 33 per cent rise on February last year, when numbers were
badly affected by the Gulf War, and 3.4 per cent above the February 1990
total.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3535</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Choice in regional radio may be widened
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Radio Authority is considering launching regional commercial radio
stations to offer specialist services such as jazz or 'easy listening'
formats.
London has 11 commercial radio services, including Jazz FM and Melody Radio,
but the authority, the regulator for commercial radio, believes other cities
are too small to sustain such a choice in addition to conventional radio
stations.
Its solution, to be outlined in a consultative document next month, is that
the new thematic stations could serve regions rather than individual cities.
The document will also set out the proposed ground rules for re-franchising
the existing commercial radio stations. Later this year the authority will
begin re-licensing nearly 130 radio services. It is expected to split AM and
FM channels to allow more groups into commercial radio.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3536</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Agencies win victory on credit information
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CREDIT-REFERENCE agen-cies, which store information about personal
creditworthiness, yesterday won a significant victory in a long battle
against the Data Protection Registrar for the right to use information about
several individuals living at the same address when assessing credit risk.
The registrar wants to ban the use of information about any person at an
address other than the one applying for credit. Retailers and credit
organisations say this would increase the risks of lending and push up the
costs of credit to borrowers.
The Data Protection Tribunal, the industry adjudicator, in a ruling to
Infolink, one of the four main credit-reference agencies, said it could use
information about people at the same address, provided they could be assumed
to be from the same household.
The system will take effect from July next year, although the battle between
the credit-reference agencies and the registrar is likely to continue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3537</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / School results poor in maths and science
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ENGLAND and Wales lag far behind Asian and other European states in the
maths and science attainment of their schoolchildren, according to an
international league table published yesterday. Scotland's performance was
significantly better.
The table, published in Britain by the National Foundation for Educational
research, follows research on the relative performance of pupils aged
between nine and 13 in up to 20 countries in Europe, the US, Asia, Africa
and the Middle East.
It places South Korea's nine-year-olds as the clear winners in maths - with
a score of 75 per cent on comparable tests. Out of 14 countries, Scotland
came fourth (with 66 per cent) and England 11th (with 59 per cent). Behind
England were the US (58 per cent), Slovenia (56 per cent) and Portugal (55
per cent).
Among 13-year-olds China came top, with Scotland and England achieving a
middle ranking.
England showed a marked weakness in basic arithmatic, with barely half of
nine-year-olds capable of multiplying seven and nine - compared with 96 per
cent in South Korea and 69 per cent in the US.
In science, English and Scottish pupils secured roughly average scores.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3538</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Writ issued against BCCI auditors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD DONKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LAWYERS acting for the liquidators of the collapsed Bank of Credit and
Commerce and International issued a writ in the High Court yesterday
claiming damages against Price Waterhouse and Ernst &amp; Young, the bank's
former joint auditors.
The writ - in the name of the BCCI holding company and its two banking
subsidiaries, BCCI SA, registered in Luxembourg and BCCI (Overseas) based in
Grand Cayman - claims damages and compensation, alleging negligence, breach
of duty and breach of contract relating to BCCI audits for 1985 and 1986.
It names 36 defendants in Britain and overseas, including the Grand Cayman,
the Bahamas, Luxembourg and Belgium. Mr Christopher Cowan, the former Price
Waterhouse partner who at one time headed the team which carried out the
full BCCI audit, is named. Mr Ian Brindle, senior partner of Price
Waterhouse, and Mr Elwyn Eilledge, senior partner at Ernst &amp; Young, are sued
in their personal capacity and on behalf of others working in their
businesses.
The two firms jointly audited the accounts of the BCCI group until 1987,
when Price Waterhouse became sole auditor.
The writ refers to a letter from the Luxembourg Monetary Institute to the
directors of BCCI SA dated October 21 1985 in its statement of claims.
Both firms said they were not surprised by the legal action, adding that it
was a protective measure used when the time allowed under the statute of
limitations was running out.
The audit for 1985 marked a crucial stage in the BCCI fraud because it
covered a period when losses in the BCCI treasury operations accumulated to
some Dollars 633m.
The government will wait for the results of the official BCCI inquiry under
Lord Justice Bingham before commenting on a Commons' committee's report on
the affair, Mr John Maples, economic secretary to the Treasury, said
yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3539</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election 92: Kinnock confident on launch of campaign
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Self-confident: a happy Neil Kinnock at the press launch of Labour's It's
Time for Change campaign yesterday
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3540</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election 92: Slim finance bill faithful to Budget
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FINANCE bill which will be published this morning and rushed through the
Commons today will be a mere shadow of the Budget statement, but with much
the same outline.
The 11-clause bill will contain these provisions:
Alcohol: extra 28p on a bottle of spirits, just under 5p on a bottle of
wine, and just over one penny on a pint of beer.
Tobacco: extra 13p on a packet of cigarettes, 10 per cent rise on cigars and
other tobacco products, except pipe tobacco where the increase is only in
line with inflation.
Petrol: duty on unleaded petrol and diesel raised in line with inflation,
but a 7 1/2 per cent increase in leaded petrol.
Vehicle excise duty: extra Pounds 10 on vehicle excise duty on cars, taxis
and light vans.
General betting duty: cut in general betting duty from 8 per cent to 7.75
per cent.
VAT: the change setting up a system of monthly payments on account for large
businesses, though they can still submit VAT returns quarterly.
There will be a separate clause bringing in changes to the serious
misdeclaration provisions - removing penalties on underdeclarations of tax
up to Pounds 2,000, and cutting the penalty rate from 20 per cent to 15 per
cent and the maximum default surcharge from 30 per cent to 20 per cent.
Car tax: halving of special car tax from 10 per cent to 5 per cent.
Income tax: introduction of the lower rate 20 per cent band for the first
Pounds 2,000 of taxable income.
There will be a separate clause freezing the married couple's allowance.
All the other Budget measures, even those which are uncontentious, will not
be enacted before the election.
Apart from the changes to inheritance tax, the most notable omission is the
change to the transitional arrangements for the uniform business rate -
enabling some businesses gaining to realise their gains more quickly, and
ensuring that no business faces an increase above inflation.
This is delayed because it requires a local government finance bill which
could not be prepared and passed in time.
The extra help for pensioners on income support are not due to take effect
until October, while other tax changes, such as those to help the film
industry, will apply in arrears.
Changes in personal equity plans allowing Pounds 6,000 to be invested in
unit and investment trusts over a tax year, may not need to be in the bill.
The Unit Trust Association said the government had statutory powers to alter
Pep rules.
Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, made a slip in his Budget speech when he
gave the wrong figure for the new annual turnover above which companies will
pay VAT, the Treasury confirmed yesterday.
The new threshold is Pounds 36,600, not Pounds 38,000 as Mr Lamont stated on
Tuesday. 'It was a slip of the tongue,' said the Treasury. 'This isn't the
first time this has happened to a chancellor on Budget day.'
Job gains likely, Page 9
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3541</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election 92: Editors try to fend off party pressure
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CALL to Mr Michael Brunson, the political editor of Independent
Television News, from a Labour spokesman was very precise. Mr Brunson said a
representative of Mr Roy Hattersley, the Labour deputy leader, told him: 'We
didn't like that shot.'
As broadcasters prepare for a bitterly-fought election campaign, editors are
setting out guidelines to help combat pressure from political parties.
The Labour complaint, said Mr Brunson, was about a shot used in a news
bulletin from a Labour pre-election press conference. The camera had started
focusing on Mr Neil Kinnock, the party leader, but moved rapidly to dwell on
Mr Hattersley apparently interrupting Mr Kinnock.
After a press conference had been filmed, Mr Brunson insisted, ITN was 'not
going to doctor the shots' in response to pressure.
Another call to ITN was from Mr Shaun Woodward, Conservative party
communications chief. He called on February 22 to express surprise that Mr
John Major's speech in Glasgow in defence of the union had been pushed into
second place on ITN's running order behind the latest developments in
Stephanie Slater kidnapping case.
Mr Brunson recognised there were 'pressure merchants' and lobbyists and they
were only doing their jobs. He added: 'While we listen to them, we are
perfectly robust in our dealings with them.'
In recent weeks there were signs of a rising number of telephone calls to
broadcasters, some of which were merely informal moans.
Mr Stewart Purvis, ITN editor-in-chief, has ruled that any substantive
complaints should be submitted to him. He would investigate and respond only
if they were made in writing.
BBC journalists were last night warned to steer clear of controversy during
the campaign by Mr John Birt, the deputy director-general.
He urged them to report opinion polls 'calmly and unsensationally' and
pledged to support staff who may be subject to 'undue or improper pressure'.
Mr Tony Hall, the BBC's director of news and current affairs at the BBC, has
instructed his editors to keep a daily log of calls received from political
parties.
Programme editors prefer to deal with the calls themselves, but Mr Hall said
he would take action if attempted interference hindered editors doing their
jobs.
Observer, Page 16
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3542</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election 92: Tories fight off assault over tax
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVOR OWEN, Parliamentary Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE government secured a majority of 145 in the Commons last night to defeat
an attempt by Labour and Liberal Democrat MPs to block the introduction of a
20p lower rate income tax band for the first Pounds 2,000 of taxable income.
Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, closed the two-day debate on the Budget
with a confident assurance that a Conservative election victory would not
result in any reversal of policy.
To cheers from the government benches he insisted: 'Our tax cuts are
sustainable - they are going to last and they are the ones which can be
afforded.'
The challenge to the 20p lower rate income tax band was defeated by 351
votes to 206. Mrs Margaret Thatcher, the former prime minister, was among
the chancellor's former cabinet colleagues who cheered the outcome.
In an earlier vote on a key Budget resolution the government secured a
majority of 143 (351-209).
Mr Lamont underlined the welcome given to the Budget by the CBI and other
business organisations.
He described it as a Budget for 'sustained recovery and prosperity' which
would enable the British people to do as well in the 1990s as they did in
the 1980s.
Mr Tony Blair, shadow employment secretary, won sustained cheers from the
Labour benches when he attacked the chancellor's failure to take any action
to curb the growth in unemployment.
He said: 'If there is no stop to rising unemployment there is no start to
economic confidence, and if there is no beginning to economic confidence
there is no end to recession.'
Mr Michael Howard, employment secretary, claimed the Budget would set the
Conservatives on course for a fourth successive election victory as well as
speeding the end of the recession.
'It's a Budget that will increase incentives, encourage enterprise and help
employment to grow,' he said.
Mr Gordon Brown, the shadow trade and industry secretary, branded the
measures a 'last ditch Budget' from a beleaguered government incapable of
ensuring recovery for the British economy.
Mr Brown clashed repeatedly with Mr Lamont and Mr Howard during aggressive
electioneering speeches.
Mr Howard angered the opposition benches by citing the views of Mr Eric
Hammond, former leader of the electricians' union, in support of the
government's condemnation of Labour's proposal for a statutory minimum wage.
The minister said Mr Hammond had told Mr Neil Kinnock, the Labour leader,
that a statutory minimum wage 'simply won't work'.
Mr Bob Cryer (Lab Bradford South) shouted: 'Hammond is a Tory'.
Mr Howard contended that if a statutory minimum wage led to the restoration
of existing pay differentials 'up to 2m jobs would be destroyed'.
Challenged by Mr Jim Wallace for the Liberal Democrats to explain how the
Budget would enable the unemployed to secure work, the minister forecast
that 'over a period of time' job creation in the 1990s would be on a similar
scale to that achieved in the 1980s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3543</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election 92: Kinnock to stress need for devolution
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY, Political Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Neil Kinnock will use his opening campaign rally in Edinburgh today to
stress Labour's commitment to devolution but also to highlight Scotland's
contribution to a united Britain.
His finely balanced speech will draw on Labour's pledge for closer ties with
the European Community as evidence of its determination to follow a
Continental model of social democracy 'allowing all to contribute and
ensuring all benefit'.
The aim is to consolidate support for a Scottish parliament in preference to
the full independence being offered by the Scottish National Party.
In passages aimed at the national election campaign he will emphasise how
different the UK's economic outlook would be if Labour's policies to address
unemployment, lack of investment and poverty had been implemented a year
ago.
At a news conference yesterday, Mr Kinnock was asked whether a Labour
government might agree to introduce proportional representation for the
Commons within a first parliament. He said it was 'very highly unlikely.'
The Labour leader kept the door ajar, however, by adding that the working
party on electoral systems would continue its studies, enhanced with the
authority of reporting to a government in office.
His words will be closely perused by the Liberal Democrats who have stated
that they will not enter any electoral pact with another party without a
firm undertaking to make the change.
Mr Kinnock left morale high among his parliamentary troops after a
widely-praised valedictory performance at the last prime minister's question
time before the election.
Targeting Mr John Major's refusal to take part in a three-way party leaders'
television debate, he accused the prime minister of being 'ashamed' and
'frit' - Mrs Thatcher's word for frightened - to defend his economic record.
The final sparring followed a 40-minute meeting of the parliamentary Labour
party at which Mr Kinnock was given a standing ovation.
Reminding his MPs that in 1987 they began their campaign some 10 points
behind the Tories, he said they were entering the new contest with an
opinion poll lead and would end it with the leadership of the country.
Mr Kinnock invoked Aneurin Bevan's political treatise, In Place of Fear, as
depicting the kind of society they were pledged to build.
Even sceptical leftwingers said it was a sterling performance. One not
always uncritical shadow cabinet member said: 'There is a strong feeling
that Neil is now ready for anything. He has been tested in the fire over the
past few years and he has come through.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3544</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election 92: Labour keeps its distance but is tied to
dependence - David Goodhart on the difficult relationship between the
party's new public image and financial needs for an election
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EVEN as he announced the election date from the steps of 10 Downing Street,
Mr John Major had warned electors that a vote for Labour was a vote for a
party in hock to the trade unions.
With Labour stressing a greater distance from its union founders and union
power at an all-time low, it is not a theme which seems to have benefited
the government much in the phoney war.
But the conduct of the election campaign itself serves to underline Labour's
continuing financial and logistical dependence on the trade union movement.
In spite of the desperate financial condition of many Labour-affiliated
unions they will provide about Pounds 6.3m of Labour's Pounds 7m election
fund. Just as important, especially in a close battle, is the non-cash aid -
people, offices and cars.
The union leaders will be almost invisible in Labour's campaign. They have
rarely played a leading role on the hustings, even less so since the late
1970s when their popularity plummeted.
Many leaders say they will be behind their desks working quite normally
during the campaign, though they will be doing their best to get the voters
out in their own union.
Others, such as Mr John Edmonds of the GMB general union and Mr Bill Morris
of the TGWU general union, have an official role on Mr Neil Kinnock's
'leader's committee'.
It is those two unions that have traditionally provided the lion's share of
election assistance. They represent nearly 2m of the 5m union members
affiliated to the party, a total that has fallen by 25 per cent in the past
five years because of shrinking membership.
They give nearly half of the Pounds 6.3m election pot from the unions.
Fortunately for Labour the TGWU's political fund has been undamaged by last
year's Pounds 12m deficit on its general fund. Both have also placed dozens
of full-time officials at the Labour party's disposal for the campaign -
indeed the GMB has had 10 officials working for Labour for nearly a year. In
areas where Labour's regional organisation is weak this has been a vital
asset.
Unions such as the AEU engineers, the MSF general technical union, Nupe the
public services union, RMT the transport union and UCW the postal union,
will provide similar logistical support in the regions and pack Walworth
Road, Labour's London HQ, with press officers and other staff.
One insider at Walworth Road said: 'Labour won the campaign in the media in
1987, reflecting a new professionalism at the centre, but our organisation
around much of the country left a lot to be desired. This time our
organisation and our finances are in a much better state.'
In 1987 Labour spent about Pounds 4m from the centre - of which only Pounds
200,000 came from non-union sources - compared with more than Pounds 10m
spent by the Conservatives.
This time Labour will spend at least Pounds 7m (the Conservatives will again
more than double that) thanks largely to a more efficient and fairer system
of raising election cash from the unions plus more effe-ctive fund-raising
from non-union sources, mainly through direct mail appeals.
Since 1989 the unions have been paying an average of one third of their
annual affiliation fee (Pounds 1.50 per affiliated member) into the special
election fund. That is worth Pounds 6.3m in spite of the fact that about
Pounds 1m has been spent in the past year.
Before 1989 the unions paid their annual affiliation fee in one lump and
come election time the party handed the begging bowl round, with mixed
results. The new system has allowed Labour to earn some interest and to plan
ahead. It has also distributed the election burden between unions more
fairly.
With a larger proportion of union cash going to the special election fund,
Walworth Road has had to cover about 50 per cent of the party's annual
Pounds 9m annual running costs from non-union sources. According to Mr Tony
Manwaring, head of the general secretary's office at Walworth Road, this has
been achieved mainly through raising Labour's standing-order base to Pounds
2m a year.
The non-union element of the election fund has also increased from a mere 5
per cent in 1987 to 10 per cent this time after appeals and high-profile
events.
In 1987 Mr Kinnock was ferried around the country in cars belonging to the
GMB general union. This time every key marginal has had a temporary
organiser and a computerised electoral roll, with many of the people and
machines provided by the unions.
That non-cash support, especially fax machines, telephones and offices, is
hard to quantify but might well substantially swell the Pounds 7m figure
that Labour is expected to spend in the next four weeks. Unions, however,
have to remain careful that their political support for Labour comes out of
the union's political fund.
In spite of the new efficiency of Labour's election funding, the unions, and
therefore the party, could ill afford two elections in one year. Yet many
union leaders privately believe that a hung parliament and a quick second
election is probable.
In that event Labour's better-off individual supporters would be called on
to provide more cash than ever before.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3545</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election 92: Farm survey blow for Tories
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Conservatives are losing support among recession-hit farmers in key
areas, according to a poll published yesterday.
A survey for the magazine Big Farm Weekly found most farmers in the sample -
63 per cent - intended to vote Tory next month, but that farmers' support
for the party had dropped by 25 per cent since the 1987 election.
One in four now said they intended voting Liberal Democrat, twice as many as
in 1987. Six per cent said they would vote Labour, compared with 1 per cent
five years ago.
One in 20 would vote for other parties, including the Scottish National
Party, according to the poll of 502 farmers by Mass Observation UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3546</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election 92: Attack over VAT plans
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
LABOUR yesterday renewed accusations that the government would have to raise
value added tax and other charges to pay for their tax cuts, against firm
Conservative denials.
Treasury minister Mrs Gillian Shephard clashed with shadow treasury
secretary Mrs Margaret Beckett on the issue during heated electioneering
exchanges over the economy at Commons question time.
Mrs Beckett said: 'Aren't people eminently justified in fearing the
Conservatives' long-term plan is to pay for the cuts in tax that you boast
of so proudly, not only by widening the scope of VAT but by increasing other
charges and taxes that people have to pay?'
Mrs Shephard insisted: 'We have given categorical pledges that there will be
no rise in the standard rate of VAT either before or after the election.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3547</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election 92: Lib Dems pledge to raise tax to 26%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LIBERAL DEMOCRATS have decided to enter the election pledged to increase the
basic rate of income tax to 26 per cent and to abolish the lower 20p rate
announced in the Budget, Ralph Atkins writes.
Mr Alan Beith, Treasury spokesman, agreed the increases with parliamentary
colleagues in order to balance the party's commitment to a Pounds 6bn
programme of public investment.
They mean that the Liberal Democrats have opened up a flank to Labour and
the Tories by becoming the only party pledged to raise the basic rate of
income tax if elected.
However, the Liberal Democrats believe their commitment to use the 1p on the
basic rate for an extra Pounds 2bn on education spending will prove
electorally popular by demonstrating a strong commitment to improving
Britain's workforce. Previously the party has said it would only increase
the basic rate 'if necessary'.
Mr Beith said in a televised broadcast last night: 'What the Budget has
revealed is that the cupboard is bare - the chancellor hasn't left us the
money to do the job, but it must be done.
'We're going to need that penny to build up the education system to the
point where it can really make a difference to our children's chances and
our nation's chances to pay our way.'
Mr Beith envisages the public sector borrowing requirement rising to Pounds
30bn in the 1992-93 financial year, compared with the Pounds 28bn forecast
by the Treasury. Full costings will be published with the manifesto early
next week.
Other Liberal Democrat spending pledges include Pounds 1 a week extra on
child benefit for each child and Pounds 8 a week more in state pension for a
couple.
Mr Beith said the cost of introducing the 20p income tax rate would have
been used more effectively if spent on housing, transport infrastructure,
energy conservation and job creation.
The Budget 'certainly isn't going to get the country out of the recession',
he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3548</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election 92: Major rejects calls for television debate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN and RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRIME MINISTER John Major yesterday rejected repeated opposition calls for
him to participate in a televised election debate with leaders of the other
principal parties.
However Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, agreed last night to a televised
debate with Mr John Smith, his Labour shadow.
In his last scheduled Commons exchange with Mr Neil Kinnock before polling
day Mr Major branded Labour's challenge a loser's gambit.
'Every party politician that expects to lose tries that trick, the party
that expects to win says no,' he said. The gauntlet was initially thrown
down in a question from Mr Ken Livingstone, the leftwing Labour MP for Brent
East.
Egged on by raucous calls of 'chicken' from the opposition benches, the
Labour leader took up the baton, calling Mr Major's maxim a 'pathetic
excuse.'
'Since he has been prime minister, 50,000 companies have gone out of
business, 75,000 families have lost their homes and 800,000 people have lost
their jobs - why won't he debate that record?' he asked.
Last night, Mr Michael Heseltine, environment secretary, said on Channel 4
news that a televised debate would become 'a sort of lottery' because a
subject was bound to come up on which 'the prime minister is not an expert'.
He said it would be susceptible to US techniques whereby a one-line joke
later turns into a headline.
The two leaders' increasingly heated comments represented a small public
relations victory for the Liberal Democrats - the party has long supported
the idea of a televised debate - who had pre-empted Labour's challenge at a
morning press conference.
The party said it would be prepared to consider a compromise consisting of
three separate head-to-head debates between the party leaders, provided it
was not automatically assumed that the Major-Kinnock confrontation would be
the last of the three.
Mr Des Wilson, Liberal Democrat campaign director, said it was clear the
prime minister was 'not an effective platform speaker' and did not 'respond
well to sharp questioning'.
In the Commons Mr Major hit back at Mr Kinnock by suggesting the Labour
leader's prolixity would make it difficult for him and Mr Paddy Ashdown, the
Liberal Democrat leader, to 'get a word in edgeways'.
'We have set in place the foundations for recovery, the Budget builds on
them and after the election we will carry them through,' Mr Major said.
At this, Mr Kinnock promised to give the prime minister 'plenty of time' to
express his views. 'Why don't you join with me and the Liberal Democrat
leader and say to the broadcasting organisations: we have nothing to fear
from the British people. Let's have a debate, let's fix the date, let's get
on with it,' he said.
Mr Major retorted by saying 'We have better than a debate: we have a general
election.' He quoted Shakespeare to accuse Mr Kinnock of drawing out 'the
thread of your verbosity finer than the staple of your argument.'
He said the quotation came appropriately from 'Love's Labours Lost' - 'and
Labour will lose'.
The prime minister proposed a motion of thanks to the speaker, Mr Bernard
Weatherill, who is standing down at the election.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3549</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Senators attack US stance on aid for CIS
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUREK MARTIN, US Editor
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TWO leading Senators, one Democrat and one Republican, have lent their
considerable weight to the contention that the US Administration is not
doing enough to assist the republics of the former Soviet Union.
Reporting on a recent visit to Russia and Ukraine, Senators Sam Nunn, the
Georgia Democrat, and Richard Lugar, the Republican from Indiana, said: 'We
came away convinced our government is not yet adequately organised and
energised' to meet what they described as 'an urgent need for assistance
from the US and other democratic countries.'
At a more partisan level, Senator Claiborne Pell, Democratic chairman of the
Senate foreign relations committee, took President Bush to task for 'a
stunning lack of vision' in formulating policies towards the former Soviet
Union. 'So far,' Mr Pell said, 'our much publicised humanitarian airlift has
provided enough to feed Moscow for a day.'
This subject has been the topic of the week in Washington, competing for
attention with the latest primary results. Former President Richard Nixon
had earlier weighed in with criticism of the 'pathetically inadequate' US
response, warning that if Mr Boris Yeltsin, the Russian leader, were toppled
a nasty despotism could result in Moscow.
On Capitol Hill, Mr Robert Strauss, the US ambassador to Russia, berated
American politicans from both parties for completely ignoring in the
campaign what was happening in the former Soviet Union.
'I find it amazing,' he told a Senate hearing on Wednesday afternoon in
typically blunt fashion, 'to come back in the middle of a presidential
campaign and find that a subject as important was what we ought to be doing
 .hasn't been the subject of any appreciable discussion at all.
Mr Strauss said the issue of assistance should not become a partisan
political issue in the US and that 'there is nothing more important we can
do' than provide full US backing and funding for the IMF's new focus on the
republics.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3550</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Retail sales recovery gives boost to Bush
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT George Bush's re-election campaign received a boost yesterday from
figures showing a surprisingly robust recovery of retail sales since
Christmas.
Analysts saw the figures as further evidence that the US economy is
beginning to stir after one of the longest downturns in recent history.
The Commerce Department said retail sales rose 1.3 per cent last month and
by 4.6 per cent since February last year, when spending was depressed by the
Gulf war. Figures for January were revised substantially to show a monthly
gain of 2.1 per cent rather than 0.6 per cent as initially estimated.
Sales were far stronger than indicated by gloomy consumer confidence surveys
or the cautious forecasts of most leading economists. They follow a raft of
other mildly encouraging statistics, including a jump in employment last
month, higher home sales, a surge in the Purchasing Managers' index and an
acceleration of monetary growth.
On Wall Street, lingering hopes of another cut in interest rates were
dashed, putting pressure on bond prices. Many analysts now fear the Federal
Reserve may have to tighten monetary policy later this year if it is to keep
inflation low.
Mr Stephen Roach, senior economist at Morgan Stanley, the New York
investment house, said consumer spending was developing an 'unmistakable
momentum.' The Bush administration would benefit from a 'significant
improvement in the economy as the campaign progressed.'
Mr Wayne Gantt, chief economist at Interstate/Johnson Lane, an Atlanta-based
investment bank, said last year's monetary stimulus pointed to a 'fair
amount of economic vigour.' The economy might grow at an annual rate of as
much as 2 per cent this quarter and 3.5 per cent between April and June, he
said.
Many analysts, however, stress that the signs of recovery are still
tentative and caution that any upturn could prove short-lived, as occurred
last year. US economic statistics are notoriously volatile.
Some fear growth of jobs and incomes will not be fast enough to support a
sustained recovery of consumer spending.
Separate figures yesterday showed a fresh rise in weekly claims for
unemployment insurance to above 450,000, a level that normally points to
recessionary conditions.
Some of the bounce in retail sales reflects the partial recovery of the
housing market, following cuts in interest rates. Sales of building
materials rose 5.7 per cent in February, the third sharp monthly increase.
Furniture sales were up substantially.
Yesterday's report, however, also pointed to a broadly-based improvement in
department store sales.
Bond prices fall, Page 27
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3551</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Mozambique parties moveto end 16-year civil war
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Mozambique government and right-wing Renamo rebels took a big step
towards ending their 16-year civil war by signing an agreement on electoral
procedures yesterday, Reuter reports from Rome.
'It is a big issue in the peace process,' Mr Jaime Goncalves, the Archbishop
of Beira, told reporters as the two sides clinked champagne glasses in
celebration.
The war in Mozambique has claimed over 1m lives since the country gained
independence from Portugal in 1975.
Yesterday's protocol was the third to be signed since the latest round of
direct negotiations began in Rome nearly two years ago, with Italy and the
Roman Catholic church mediating.
But while mediators were cautiously hopeful an overall peace settlement
could be reached by the end of the year, they stressed the two sides were
still far apart on the remaining issues of drawing up a constitution and
arranging a ceasefire.
Negotiators plan to return to Mozambique this week and resume their talks in
Rome next month.
The agreement provides for elections to be called one year after any overall
ceasefire pact is agreed. It guarantees freedom of the press and provides
for the safe return of the 1.5m war refugees.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3552</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Iraq gives ground over oil-for-food
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   The United Nations, New York
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IRAQ AGREED yesterday to resume talks with the United Nations on the sale of
limited quantities of its oil in order to buy food and medicines.
It also promised to resume contacts with UN agencies charged with
eliminating Iraq's weapons of mass destruction.
Mr Tariq Aziz, the Iraqi deputy prime minister, said he believed his visit
to the UN at the head of an Iraqi mission had produced a 'better
understanding between us and the (Security) Council'.
In a stern statement at the end of two days of meetings called to hear Mr
Aziz, the Council made it clear that Iraq must take immediate 'appropriate
actions' to comply fully and unconditionally with its obligations under the
Gulf ceasefire.
But the Council stopped short of spelling out the consequences of
non-compliance. Asked about possible military action against Iraq, a western
diplomat said: 'This is enough for the time being.'
Mr Rolf Ekeus, chairman of the special UN weapons mission to Iraq, said
inspectors would return to Baghdad next week to continue their efforts to
destroy Iraqi missiles. He suggested that if Iraq co-operated, it might be
possible within two months to report sufficient compliance to enable the
Council to consider easing the embargo on Iraqi oil sales.
Mr Hans Blix, head of the International Atomic Energy Agency, emphasised
that this must depend also on the elimination of Iraq's nuclear capability,
about which Baghdad continued to be secretive. Security Council diplomats
noted some shifts in the Iraqi position during Mr Aziz's visit. In
particular, Mr Aziz dropped objections to talks with the UN about terms for
the sale of oil. The UN wants to ensure that proceeds are used to buy food
and medicines.
Talks on this issue were broken off last month, but Mr Aziz agreed they
could resume even though he revived Baghdad's argument that UN conditions
infringed Iraqi sovereignty.
A UN resolution authorising the sale of Dollars 1.6bn (Pounds 900m) worth of
Iraqi oil expires next week. The US and Britain are ready to renew it, but
Mr Aziz said a better course would be for Iraq to try to reach a settlement
with the UN secretariat.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3553</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Trade News: Japan raises cartel fine
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN's ruling Liberal Democratic Party and the Fair Trade Commission (FTC)
have agreed that the maximum fine for violators of anti-monopoly laws should
be raised from Y5m (Pounds 22,000) to Y100m, far below the Y300m earlier
proposed by the FTC, writes Robert Thomson.
Japanese companies had complained that the FTC's original proposal was
excessive. However, the US had demanded that Japan revise the schedule of
fines for violators and increase the staff at the commission.
It is expected that the legislation will be presented to parliament later
this month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3554</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Trade News: Japanese defend chip agreement against
attacks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SENIOR Japanese trade official yesterday condemned suggestions by US
semiconductor companies that a bilateral agreement on foreign access to
Japan's chip market is close to collapse.
Mr Noboru Hatakeyama, vice-minister of international trade and industry,
said the comments by members of the US Semiconductor Industry Association
(SIA) were 'unhelpful' and did not reflect the chip pact's 'spirit of
co-operation'.
'Japanese companies are trying hard to fulfil their obligations. US
companies also have obligations,' Mr Hatakeyama said.
He was referring to the ongoing argument between the two industries over
whether US producers are trying hard enough to penetrate the Japanese
market.
Mr Hatakeyama said the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (Miti)
would be holding a regular meeting with Japanese chip consumers, beginning
soon, and would urge them to increase their purchases of foreign products.
Miti insists that a target of a 20 per cent foreign share by the end of this
year is just a target, and that it is too early to tell if the five-year
chip pact, concluded last June, is a failure.
The foreign share stands at around 14 per cent, compared with 13 per cent at
the end of 1990, and 8.6 per cent in 1986 - when the first five-year pact
was completed.
Ministry officials are angered at the interpretation by the US industry of
the 20 per cent share as a specific promise.
They point to the wording of the bilateral agreement, which states that the
20 per cent is recognised by Japan as a US industry expectation, but is
'neither a guarantee, a ceiling, nor a floor on the foreign market share'.
The US semiconductor industry has raised the prospect of sanctions against
Japanese products, if market access fails to improve.
Miti believes that the US industry, which sent a delegation to Washington
this week, will be unable to convince the US government to impose sanctions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3555</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Trade News: Gatt warns on US retreat from
multilateralism - Frances Williams reports on the latest review of US trade
policy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FUTURE of the stalled Uruguay Round of global trade talks and
Washington's new-found enthusiasm for regional trade agreements dominate the
worry-list of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade in its latest
review of US trade policy published yesterday.
While high hopes are pinned on a successful outcome of the five-year-old
Round to strengthen Gatt and underpin economic reform in eastern Europe and
developing countries, the report notes growing concern about erosion of
basic Gatt principles by the three 'isms' - regionalism, bilateralism and
unilateralism - as well as various forms of 'managed' trade. All are
prominent features of US trade relations.
Discussion of the report in Gatt's governing council this week reflected the
fears of many countries that Washington's commitment to an open world
trading system is weakening. Frustrating squabbles with trading partners,
especially Japan and the European Community, and a weak domestic economy
have multiplied the voices in the US, in the run-up to the presidential
election in November, calling for protection.
In fact, as the Gatt report makes clear, it is the tone rather than the
substance of US trade policy that has changed - at least for now. But as the
world's largest economy and biggest trader, the US 'has a major
responsibility for maintaining and reinforcing the faith of the
international business community in the open, liberal multilateral trading
system', Gatt says.
In particular, Gatt is worried by the potentially adverse effects of
preferential regional trading arrangements, such as the proposed North
American Free Trade Arrangement (Nafta) and the various deals with central
and south American countries envisaged under the 'Enterprise for the
Americas Initiative'.
The impact on world trade could be far-reaching. The three Nafta countries -
Canada, Mexico and the US - have a combined population of 360m and a total
output of Dollars 6,000bn; Canada and Mexico are already America's biggest
individual trading partners. Given the size of the economies involved, third
countries could be harmed by trade diversion, the report says, though it
acknowledges that the US has pledged to follow Gatt rules in drafting free
trade accords.
'The possible emergence of a complex network of preferential programmes
covering the American continent could further undermine the most-favoured
nation principle.'
Gatt also notes that since its last report on the US in 1989, Washington has
taken a 'measured approach' to use of its unilateral powers under the
controversial 'Section 301' of the 1988 Trade Act and similar procedures. No
retaliatory action against 'unfair' traders has been taken in the past two
years.
Nevertheless, Washington is still using threats of unilateral action,
notably against countries with allegedly inadequate standards of
intellectual property protection. One major source of friction in the
Uruguay Round has been the US refusal to abandon its right to take
unilateral measures as part of an accord on a speedier and more effective
multilateral disputes settlement procedure, though Washington has agreed not
to use Section 301 before the new Gatt procedures are exhausted.
The US also comes under fire for its frequent use of anti-dumping and
countervailing duty actions, with more than 200 orders in force in mid-1991,
some dating back to the 1960s and 1970s.
Though the share of total US imports directly affected by such duties is
minuscule (less than 0.5 per cent), Gatt says the uncertainty generated may
have led trading partners voluntarily to restrain exports or to price their
goods 'defensively' or to conclude bilateral deals with the same effect. The
report quotes research suggesting that nearly half of all anti-dumping and
countervailing duty investigations have been terminated by bilateral pacts,
especially in the steel and semiconductor sectors.
Most of the sectoral voluntary restraint arrangements noted by Gatt in 1989
remain in force, the report says, including those for steel (though these
are due to be terminated), machine tools, and textiles and clothing. In
addition, the new pact with Japan on semiconductors, aiming at a 20 per cent
foreign market share, 'has raised the question of whether US trade policies
have moved further towards 'managed' trade'.
For all the moans, as Mr Rufus Yerxa, US ambassador to Gatt, stressed in his
opening remarks to the Gatt debate, the US has one of the world's most open
economies with generally low tariffs (averaging about 5 per cent on a
trade-weighted basis), relatively few import restrictions, and relatively
low farm subsidies. The Bush administration remained committed to a
strengthened multilateral trading system.
US and Canada: A free trade disagreement, Page 17
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3556</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Trade News: France lifts curb on S Africa coal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE French government has lifted its embargo on imports of South African
coal, as a gesture of support for the reforms being undertaken by President
F W de Klerk, writes Our Foreign Staff.
The coal import restriction, imposed in 1985, is the last French curb on
trade with South Africa apart from the UN embargoes on arms and oil. Before
1985, South Africa was supplying about 6.4m tonnes of coal, or about 30 per
cent of total consumption, to France.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3557</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Trade News: Brussels critical of UStrade barriers
record
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STRASBOURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US has failed to improve its record on trade barriers over the last
year, the Brussels Commission told members of the European parliament
yesterday, adding fuel to the EC-US row over discrimination in the public
procurement sector, writes Andrew Hill from Strasbourg.
The Commission is to publish its annual report on US trade barriers within a
month. 'The list of discriminatory provisions in the US is just as long as
last year,' said Mr Antonio Cardoso e Cunha, the energy commissioner.
The US recently attacked alleged discriminatory clauses in the Community's
public contracts directive. Mr Cardoso e Cunha repeated yesterday the EC
would not negotiate on public procurement under Gatt on the basis of
unilateral threats of sanctions by the US.
In their turn, MEPs criticised the US for discriminating against non-EC
suppliers at state and national level. Mr Tom Spencer, a British
Conservative MEP, said putting heavy pressure on US citizens to buy American
was 'not the position of a mature member of the international trading
community'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3558</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Trade News: L'Air Liquideto invest in east Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
L'AIR LIQUIDE, the French industrial gases group, has announced that it is
to invest more than FFr1bn (Pounds 100m) in eastern Germany over the next
three years, strengthening France's position as the region's leading foreign
investor, writes William Dawkins from Paris.
The group has acquired a site at Bohlen, near Leipzig, from the Treuhand
privatisation agency, where it plans to open a plant next year. It also
intends to expand three other east German acquisitions: Chemiehandel, an
industrial gas distributor; and producers Tega Berlin and Tega Leipzig.
L'Air Liquide forecasts 10 per cent to 20 per cent annual growth in the
German market for industrial gases, of which it has 12 per cent. It has
recently signed large contracts to supply nitrogen to Flachglas, the German
subsidiary of Saint Gobain, the French glass maker and to Sow, a chemicals
group near Bohlen.
French companies had invested FFr7.7bn in eastern German privatisations by
the end of January, far less than German investors - at FFr365bn, or just
over 90 per cent of the total - but ahead of the US with FFr5.2bn and
Britain with FFr4.45bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3559</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Computing services seek EC influence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN CANE and PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPE'S leading computing services companies have joined forces in an
attempt to influence the way the European Commission distributes research
contracts for information technology projects. They have formed an informal
association, known as the Group of Six, with the aim of counterbalancing the
influence of the main hardware manufacturers whose views and advice have
traditionally weighed heavily with the Commission.
The hardware manufacturers, including Groupe Bull of France, Siemens of
Germany and Olivetti of Italy, are known as the Group of Twelve. Their
advice is automatically sought by the Commission on important community
research projects including Esprit and Race.
Members of the six are Sema Group of the UK/France, Logica of the UK, CGS of
France, Finsiel of Italy, Eritel of Spain, Debis of Germany and Volmac of
Holland. CGS and Debis are part of the same group.
The computing services industry covers a range of activities including
software development, processing and facilities management. It has always
taken second place to hardware manufacture in revenue terms, but has assumed
a new importance as profit margins have declined.
Mr Phillipe Dreyfus of Cap Gemini Sogeti, Europe's largest computing
services company, is chairman of the year-old group, which, he insists, is
not a consortium formed to fight for contracts but an advisory body to give
the computing services industry a European voice. The problem had been, he
said, that the industry comprised several thousand small companies with no
clear focus. The answer had been to limit membership of the Group of Six to
one company per country.
Others argue, however, that the intention of the group is to secure a larger
share of community funds for its members.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3560</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Bush joins Turkey in urging end to clash over enclave
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT George Bush yesterday joined in calls for an end to the fighting
between Armenians and Azerbaijanis over the disputed enclave of
Nagorno-Karabakh.
The White House in Washington said he discussed the trouble spot in a
telephone call with Turkey's Prime Minister Suleyman Demirel, as
international efforts continued to try to prevent the dispute getting out of
hand.
The violence 'threatens to scar this region for generations to come,' the US
administration said. Both sides should show restraint.
Mr Demirel said in Istanbul he phoned Mr Bush to warn that the fighting
could make the whole region unstable. He said Azerbaijani leaders believed
only the US could settle the dispute over Nagorno-Karabakh, a largely
Armenian populated enclave within Azerbaijan.
Pressure is growing on the former Soviet army, meanwhile, to pull all its
forces out of the troubled Caucasian republics of Armenia, Azerbaijan and
Georgia. The mood for withdrawal was evident at a meeting yesterday of the
Co-ordinating Council of officers of the Commonwealth of Independent States
 -the successor to the Soviet Union.
Latest demands for a pull-out follow the capture, and subsequent release on
Wednesday night, of 10 army hostages by Armenian militants at a base at
Artik, near the Turkish border. The Armenians demanded rocket launchers and
other military hardware, but the army would not say yesterday if the demands
were met.
Georgian police reported they had shot dead two former soldiers, both
Azerbaijanis, said to be running guns and ammunition to Azerbaijan.
The Armenians yesterday reported rocket attacks on Stepanakert, the
Nagorno-Karabakh capital, and a tank assault on the Armenian-held town of
Askeran, close to the Karabakh border with Azerbaijan. Mr Hasan Hasanov, the
Azerbaijani prime minister, said in Baku the chances of peace or full-blown
war were about equal.
Mr Jiri Dienstbier, the Czechoslovak foreign minister, who has been charged
by the Nato co-operation council with leading a mediating mission to
Stepanakert, said that an observer mission, by member countries of the
Conference on Security and Co-operation in Europe (CSCE), could go to
Karabakh only when a ceasefire was declared.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3561</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / A cheerful Armenian tries to survive in a hostile sea: John
Lloyd reports on the threats of violence being faced by a dwindling minority
in Baku
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RAIR is not his real name, and he will not allow himself to be photographed.
No surprise: he is one of the tiny number of Armenians still living in the
Azerbaijani capital of Baku.
He is not leaving, and he is prepared to talk on condition of anonymity, but
he does not want to take too many chances.
Rair lived through the anti-Armenian pogroms in Baku 15 months ago: he must
now live, under his own Armenian name, under the shadow of the atrocities at
Khodjaly, in Nagorno-Karabakh, where an unknown number of Azeris were
massacred by Armenian guerrillas.
A craftsman in a military plant repairing trucks in the suburbs of Baku, he
is a cheerful man in his 40s. But the account of his life shows what
accommodations he must make to remain relatively secure in a hostile sea -
chief among these being an acceptance, in public at least and perhaps
privately too, of the Azerbaijani version of current events.
'I haven't suffered any trouble after Khodjaly. No-one said anything to me.
But I'm a bit more fearful.' He pauses, then adds: 'Anyway, that's all
wrong, what the Russian and western press writes. There were thousands
killed there, massacred by these people (the Armenians). My son's friends
told him about it.' His son works for the Azerbaijani OMON, the special
militia used for riot control and paramilitary tasks - some of whom are now
deployed on the borders of Nagorno-Karabakh. 'He's an Azerbaijani now,' says
Rair. Clearly, his son's profession - which he mentions several times -
serves as a shield.
He knows of only a few Armenian families left in the city, most of those, he
thinks, of mixed Azerbaijani-Armenian marriages (his own wife is Russian).
'I've been here 14 years, and we Armenians were hundreds of thousands in the
city. Now they've left: my brother left two years ago, I have another son in
Armenia. But I tell you, if things were peaceful here, all of them would be
back in a flash.'
In his own plant, with some 500 workmen, the Armenians had made up 60-70 per
cent of the workforce. Colonel Ernest Altman (who is Jewish), the director
of the plant, says that 'all left in the last three years. Now there is a
terrible problem to replace them because they made up such a large
proportion of skilled labour and professional people.'
Asked about earlier Azerbaijani outrages, when mobs attacked and killed many
Armenian residents in Baku, and before that in Sumgait, Rair takes the
standard Azerbaijani line. 'It was all exaggerated. In Sumgait, for example,
a lot of the fighting was between the Armenians themselves. Yes, the
Armenians did it themselves, much of it anyway. The press don't write about
that.'
His constant references to the deficiencies of the western press echo a
standard, and aggressively repeated, complaint which Azerbaijanis direct at
western journalists. Few can have read a word of western coverage: it is
more a reflection of an assumption of pro-Armenian (Christian) bias, which
is endlessly repeated.
'Still, I'm sorry that (former President Ayaz) Mutalibov is gone. He was a
good man (a common opinion in Azerbaijan). Now, I fear the new people in
power, I don't know what they will do. I've been here a long time, and I
think I will end here. But not soon, I hope.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3562</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Support for Irish protocol
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEPs yesterday sought to safeguard Irish women's rights as EC citizens, and
backed Irish government attempts to renegotiate the anti-abortion protocol
to the Maastricht treaty, writes Andrew Hill. This follows last month's
abortion controversy over a 14-year-old rape victim.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3563</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Tapie fined for Le Pen insult
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MARSEILLE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Bernard Tapie, the French businessman, was fined yesterday for calling
the far-right leader, Mr Jean-Marie Le Pen, and his supporters 'bastards' at
an election rally, Reuter reports from Marseille.
Mr Tapie, running against Mr Le Pen with the backing of the ruling
Socialists in regional elections in southern France, was fined FFr1,500
(Pounds 153) by a court on a public insult charge.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3564</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Strasbourg move on data protection
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STRASBOURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European parliament has voted to water down European Commission
proposals for stricter protection of personal computer data in the European
Community, writes Andrew Hill in Strasbourg.
The parliament's vote is the first shot in what is likely to be a battle
between member states, some of which back stricter data protection, the
Commission and MEPs.
The measure now goes to community member states for discussion.
Agencies win victory, Page 7
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3565</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Anger at Mercedes jobs threat
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EMPLOYEE representatives of Daimler-Benz, the German vehicle, aerospace, and
electronics group, reacted angrily yesterday to a statement by Mr Edzard
Reuter, the chief executive, that it had 20,000 workers too many on the car
and truck side.
Mr Reuter told journalists in Hamburg that the company's Mercedes-Benz
vehicle subsidiary needed to slim down. 'We have roughly 20,000 employees
too many on board and must lose some more fat.' Mercedes has said that it
intends to reduce its workforce in coming years, but has never specified by
how much.
Mr Karl Feuerstein, the head of Daimler's works council, said yesterday that
the board of Mercedes had declined to set out its reasoning behind the need
for such a massive reduction of the workforce. Mercedes employs 237,000
people, of which 185,000 are in Germany. Car output, carried out solely in
Germany, accounts for 99,000 of the total.
Mr Feuerstein called on Mercedes to state exactly when and where it planned
to implement job cuts. The works council also demanded that Mercedes start
negotiations on early retirements.
Like other car companies in Germany, Mercedes is trying to attack its high
domestic cost base. BMW recently said it intended to reduce its workforce of
74,000 people by around 3,000 this year through non-replacement of those
leaving and early retirement. Volume producers Volkswagen, Opel and Ford are
also striving to curb production costs in the face of tougher foreign
competition.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3566</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Russians struggle to control budget deficit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RUSSIA'S budget deficit will be around 10 per cent of gross national product
in the first quarter of this year, against a government target of 1 per
cent, officials have told the cabinet, according to the daily newspaper
Izvestia.
Efforts by Mr Yegor Gaidar, the deputy prime minister and finance minister,
to reduce the deficit have been hampered by demands in parliament for higher
welfare spending and lower taxes.
However, Mr Gaidar now seems ready to resist pressure from parliament, said
Izvestia. The cabinet is said to be about to reinstate full value added tax
of 28 per cent on food. Rates had been cut, or abolished, by the Russian
parliamentary praesidium.
The cabinet is expected to cut defence and capital spending further.
It has already been heavily cut from last year's levels. The planned defence
spending is expected to be reduced to 6 per cent of GNP - a fall of more
than half of the estimated defence spending during Soviet days.
A dramatic fall in exports and the loss of export tax revenues was the main
reason for the worsening deficit, according to the report of Mr Vassily
Barchuk, deputy finance minister, to the cabinet.
The forecasts showed no bright spot in any part of the economy, with further
rapid falls in all areas of production. Oil output is expected to fall this
year by 14 per cent from last year's depleted levels; iron and steel
production by 15 per cent; chemicals by 16 per cent and food products by 18
per cent.
Mr Ruslan Khasbulatov, a bitter opponent of Mr Gaidar, yesterday again
called for a new prime minister and a change of government. He mocked the
economic reformers, saying they were using the word 'macroeconomy' as a kind
of talisman, and were indifferent to the large falls in output.
Restructuring of industry to make it more competitive - often the only
silver lining in a recession - had failed to materialise, the Izvestia
report said.
Another official has forecast that Russia will be unable to pay off its
external debt, of between Dollars 70bn and Dollars 80bn - because it had
been loaded with the debt of former Soviet republics who could not or would
not pay their share.
Mr Yuri Gromushkin, adviser to the minister of foreign economic relations,
added, however, that 'we cannot fully pay off all the external debt even as
far as Russia is concerned'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3567</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / China wants Moscow's scientists
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BEIJING
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA WANTS to recruit scientists from the former Soviet Union for the first
time since the 1950s when Moscow sent technical experts to help the
fledgling communist nation, Reuter reports from Beijing.
A Russian embassy official confirmed yesterday that China and Russia were
negotiating transfers to China of such experts, and of technology. He had no
details on what areas of expertise China, which is a nuclear power, was
interested in.
'It's only the beginning of negotiations about this,' he said. 'We had such
exchanges in the 1950s. Even now some personnel, mainly educational, are
doing language studies in China.'
The Soviet Union withdrew technical experts and development aid from China
in the 1960s when the two communist giants split over ideology.
Washington has expressed its eagerness to enlist the services of scientists
from the Commonwealth of Independent States, amid warnings that Third World
nations might try to recruit some for their nuclear weapons programmes.
China would make arrangements to recruit scientists from Russia, Ukraine,
Belarus, Uzbekistan and Kazakhstan, the official China Daily newspaper said,
quoting a report from a current conference of the State Science and
Technology Commission.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3568</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: England cricket victory
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
England, chasing a reduced target of 225 off 41 overs because of rain, beat
South Africa with just one ball to spare in their World Cup match in
Melbourne. South Africa 236-4. England 226-7.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3569</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Cool winner
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Cool Ground was the surprise 25-1 winner of the Cheltenham Gold Cup,
National Hunt racing's blue riband. Cool Ground formed part of a five-horse
bet which netted a Hampshire man Pounds 567,066 for an Pounds 8 stake.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3570</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Offer for Gorbachev
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
France's most prestigious research and teaching body, the College de France,
has proposed giving former Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev a professorship.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3571</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Detectives charged
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Three detectives involved in questioning the Guildford Four were sent for
trial at the Old Bailey charged with conspiring to pervert the course of
justice with notes said to be contemporaneously made.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3572</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Labour hangs onto narrow lead in opinion poll: Major rejects
Kinnock call for TV debate Tory manifesto agreed by cabinet
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FIRST opinion poll since the start of this week's campaign for an April
9 election last night gave the Labour party a narrow 3-point lead.
It came as pre-election nerves in London's financial markets brought further
falls in share prices and in the value of sterling.
The Mori survey for The Times, taken after the Budget, put Labour support at
41 per cent, the Conservatives at 38 per cent and the Liberal Democrats at
16 per cent. That compared with ratings of 40 per cent, 39 per cent and 18
per cent respectively in a similar poll two weeks ago.
Senior ministers emphasised that the result was within the traditional
3-point margin of error on such surveys, suggesting that the two main
parties were still level. But as Mr John Major promised to combine a
'visionary' manifesto with a continuous onslaught on Labour's tax policies,
Tory MPs voiced disappointment that the Budget had apparently failed to lift
their support.
On the first full day of campaigning, Mr Neil Kinnock emphasised his party's
determination to grab the initiative from the outset by challenging the
prime minister to take part in televised debates. In a last angry clash in
the Commons, the Labour leader accused Mr Major of being 'frit' after the
prime minister rejected the demand. Mr Major faced a similar call from Mr
Paddy Ashdown, the Liberal Democrat leader, but said such set-piece events
were for 'losers'.
Earlier Mr Kinnock, surrounded by celebrities at a London press conference,
foreshadowed the themes of his campaign by promising 'new people, new ideas
and new achievement for our country'. He repeated his claim that Labour
would win an overall majority of 20 seats on April 9.
The exchange between the two main party leaders at Westminster was the
sharpest and most personal so far of their encounters over the past few
months, emphasising the presidential-style of the election contest.
Labour voted last night against the overall Budget package and prepared to
oppose again today the detailed legislation to implement the introduction of
a 20p income tax band. Mr Major charged that Mr Kinnock had once pledged 'to
tax the rich to help the poor'. Now he proposed 'to tax the rich and tax the
poor'.
The Liberal Democrats pledged themselves to raise the basic rate of income
tax to 26p, to fund an extra Pounds 2bn spending on education, and to
abolish the new 20p rate.
MPs will vote today on a truncated Finance Bill of just 11 clauses. It will
also include the measures to push through the increases in excise duties,
halve car tax and change the arrangements for VAT payments by small
businesses.
Senior ministers acknowledged that hopes of an early cut in interest rates
had all but evaporated. But they insisted that Mr Major was confident that
the jitters in financial markets would subside once his campaign was in full
swing.
The last cabinet meeting before the election yesterday morning endorsed the
manifesto with which the party will launch its official campaign next week.
Mr Chris Patten, the party chairman, said the manifesto was designed to help
'people to have a stake in Britain for themselves and their families'. He
said: 'Above all it is a manifesto for enriching people's lives by using the
government to help increase choice and opportunity for everyone.'
Senior ministers said a much-trailed emphasis in the manifesto on promoting
ownership and opportunity would be achieved through tax incentives for
savings and schemes to extend home-ownership and by accelerating health and
education reforms. These would be accompanied by a number of 'eye-catching'
ideas.
Mr Major's consensual style is to be emphasised by a positive approach to
more open government although there will be no commitment to freedom of
information legislation. The manifesto will also promise to give more help
to the BBC World Service and to the British Council to underline the
Conservatives' commitment to maintaining Britain's cultural as well as
political influence on the world stage.
The manifesto will include a pledge on the privatisation of British Rail and
will propose sweeping changes to public sector housing.
A programme drawn up by Mr Michael Heseltine to regenerate inner cities
would break the local authorities' grip on rented housing. Housing
management would be subject to compulsory competitive tendering, councils
would be encouraged to transfer properties to housing associations and the
rent-into-mortgages scheme would be extended nationwide.
Among other proposals in the 60-page document will be plans to reduce
inheritance tax, to further constrain the powers of trade unions and to
privatise British Coal. Mr Heseltine also won approval for his ambitious
scheme to develop the Thames corridor east of London's Docklands.
Kinnock to stress need for devolution
Tories fight off assault over tax
Slim finance bill faithful to Budget, Page 6
13 years of Tory rule:
Legacy of curate's egg
Campaign themes:
The devil you know. . ., Page 16
Poll tax capping delayed until after election, Page 18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3573</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Election fears push markets down again
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STERLING and shares came under renewed pressure yesterday, as uncertainty
about the Conservatives' prospects in the election continued to cast a
shadow over financial markets.
The pound weakened by 1 pfennig against the D-Mark, closing in London at
DM2.86, while the FT-SE 100 index of leading UK shares fell 29.1 to 2,493.3,
after shedding more than 50 points on Wednesday.
Investors are worried that the subdued outlook for the economy, and the fact
that this makes an interest rate cut over the next month unlikely, form a
poor backcloth for the government as it fights the election campaign.
The financial markets' second successive day of jitters followed a Budget on
Tuesday by Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, that many in the City judged as
unlikely to help the Tories' chances.
However, ministers anxious to prove to voters that the economy is on the
mend will be cheered by a report today from the House Builders' Federation.
This suggests that sales may be slowly picking up in the housing market, a
crucial sector for the economy.
Government supporters are also likely to take comfort from the latest
distributive trades survey from the Confederation of British Industry, which
pointed to a modest improvement in retail sales last month.
The fall in the FT-SE 100 index to its lowest close for two months came
after investors virtually gave up hope of a cut in base rates, now at 10.5
per cent, before the general election. Reflecting this, the three-month
interbank rate, which shadows base rates, firmed by  1/16 percentage point
to close at about 10 5/8 per cent.
On currency markets, investors switched funds out of sterling. The pound
lost ground against the dollar, closing in London more than 1 1/2 cents down
at Dollars 1.7085. Its trade weighted index shed 0.6 percentage points to
89.7. In New York, sterling closed at DM2.8607 and Dollars 1.713.
Retail sales recovering, Page 9
Editorial Comment, Page 16
Lex, Page 18
Currencies, Page 31
London stocks, Page 40
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3574</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 --------------------------
STERLING
 --------------------------
New York:
dollars 1.713 (1.728)
London:
dollars 1.7085 (1.725)
DM 2.86 (2.87)
FFr 9.705 (9.7475)
SFr 2.5875 (2.6025)
Y 229.25 (230.25
pounds index 89.7 (90.3)
 --------------------------
GOLD
 --------------------------
New York Comex Apr
dollars 348.0 (351.4)
London:
dollars 347.7 (349.0)
 --------------------------
N SEA OIL (Argus)
 --------------------------
Brent 15-day  Apr
dollars 17.475 (17.4)
 --------------------------
DOLLAR
 --------------------------
New York:
DM 1.6695 (1.6622)
FFr 5.6695 (5.6435)
SFr 1.5095 (1.5065)
Y 134.22 (133.45)
London:
DM 1.6735 (1.664)
FFr 5.68 (5.65)
SFr 1.5145 (1.509)
Y 134.2 (133.55)
dollars index 65.7 (65.3)
Tokyo open: Y134.56
 --------------------------
US CLOSING RATES
 --------------------------
Fed Funds: 3 15/16% (3)
3-mo Treasury Bills:
4.107% (4.097)
Long Bond:
99 5/8 (100 15/32)
yield:8.026% (7.952)
 --------------------------
STOCK INDICES
 --------------------------
FT-SE 100: Yield 4.95
2,493.3 (-29.1)
FT-A All-Share:
1,199.62 (-1.2%)
FT-SE Eurotrack 100:
1,149.99 (-11.89)
FT-A World Index:
138.29 (-0.7%)
New York:
DJ Ind. Av.
3,208.63 (same)
S&amp;P Comp
403.9 (-0.13)
Tokyo: Nikkei
20,561.88 (-30.26)
 --------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 --------------------------
3-month interbank:
10% (10 5/8%)
Liffe long gilt future:
Jun 94 31/32 (Jun 99 7/16)
 --------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3575</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 15: Grim facts speak for themselves -
Sweden / Concern is growing that the crisis will have an adverse knock-on
effect over the rest of the economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER the booming real estate values of the late 1980s, the Swedish property
market has plunged into a severe depression with little prospect of any
early improvement.
In a recent bleak forecast, Svenska Handelsbanken, one of the country's
leading commercial banks, suggested it could be the mid-1990s before a
recovery takes place in the property market. Moreover, there will be no
return to the inflated prices of only 2 1/2 years ago.
Many observers are concerned that the crisis in Swedish property will have
an adverse knock-on effect over the rest of the stagnating economy, pushing
it even deeper into recession.
The construction industry is already suffering from the consequences of
falling demand, with a sharp drop in investment over the past 12 months. The
contraction in building orders has contributed significantly to the recent
sharp decline in Sweden's gross domestic product.
'The consequences of what is happening in the property market go much wider
than its effect on the construction industry', says Mr Ulf Jakobsson, chief
economist at the Federation of Swedish Industries.
The soaring credit losses suffered by most of the country's leading
financial institutions at the moment also stem primarily from the collapse
in property market prices in Sweden and elsewhere in Europe. Finance and
real estate companies who took out loans for speculative development in the
boom years are finding it increasingly hard to meet their obligations.
The speed of deterioration in the Swedish property market from virtually
boom to bust has been dramatic, but the grim facts speak for themselves.
The total valuation of the 34 listed property and construction companies on
the Stockholm bourse halved to Skr34.6bn from SKr70.7bn between February 15
1991 and February 14 this year, , according to a survey carried out by
Svenska Dagbladet, one of the country's leading national newspapers.
The construction and property share index has plummeted by about 75 per cent
since mid-summer 1989.
Swedish property prices have fallen on average by 40 per cent over the past
two years. The number of large office deals has halved over the same period
to 44 from 84. Estimated total property values in Stockholm, the Swedish
capital, have plummeted by SKr100bn to between SKr250bn-SKr300bn.
A growing number of Swedish real estate and construction property companies
have filed for bankruptcy in recent weeks. Observers believe it is only the
strongest of Sweden's property companies, notably Skanska, Lundbergs and
Hufvudstaden, who will emerge unscathed from the present turmoil - helped by
the development of large infrastructure projects in Sweden.
It is no exaggeration to suggest the Swedish property market has been
traumatised by the turbulent events that have hit property since the onset
of the strains on finance companies first became evident in the autumn of
1990.
The property slump has come as an unexpected shock because it has followed a
period of prolonged speculative expansion during the 1980s. The market value
of Swedish commercial real estate climbed by an annual average of 20 per
cent between 1984 and 1988, a trend which was fueled by favourable interest
rates, high liquidity and strong demand - particularly from insurance
companies in search of investments in a supposedly secure asset such as
property.
The abolition of Sweden's panoply of financial regulations from the
mid-1980s onwards also stimulated property boom conditions as speculators
found it easy to acquire loans. From late 1987, when real estate companies
were first permitted to invest abroad, Swedish investors began to move
overseas in the frantic search for property investment opportunities where
the direct return on real estate was higher than at home.
NCC Real Estate, for example, decided as a matter of policy to place a third
of its property portfolios abroad with a particular focus on office
developments in London, Brussels and Dusseldorf.
It has been estimated by the Swedish Association of Real Estate Owners that
between 200 and 250 Swedish companies and investors have acquired foreign
property over the past four years with a total value of SKr104bn. This is
twice the figure invested in foreign shares over the same period and more
than the amount of money invested in all new stock issues on the Stockholm
stock market during the 1980s.
The demise of property prices elsewhere in Europe has hit the Swedish
companies particularly hard. Affarsvarlden, Sweden's leading business
magazine, estimated last month that losses from company foreign property
acquisitions totalled between SKr10bn and SKr20bn. The biggest failures for
Swedish property companies - and also the insurance groups with large
investment portfolios such as SPP and Skandia - have been in London as the
market peaked in 1990 and prices plummeted.
It is now seen as only a matter of time before the nosedive in Swedish
commercial property is followed by a similar development in homes.
Despite the recession, residential property prices have held up over the
past two years but now they look set to drop, partly because Sweden is no
longer suffering from high inflation.
The country's current slump is also increasing unemployment and constricting
household budgets although most observers of the Swedish property scene do
not foresee the kind of free-fall in house prices suffered over the past
year in neighbouring Norway.
What is clear is that the Swedish government is not going to do anything to
improve property market prospects in the immediate future.
As a result of the 1991 tax reforms, the imposition of 25 per cent value
added tax on property transactions, coupled with higher interest rates and
cuts in housing subsidies, will add to the cost burdens on housing.
The non-socialist coalition, although committed to reducing Sweden's heavy
overall tax burden in stages, seems intent on increasing taxes on property
from next January with the self-evident observation that at least people
cannot carry property out of the country.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords costs in letting  Agents fees: 10 per cent of first
of a building               year's rent + 25 per cent VAT
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants costs in leasing    Fees variable: each deal is arranged
of a building               individually
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Fees variable: each deal is arranged
or owner/occupier           individually
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Purchase costs by investor  Land registry: 3 per cent (payable by
or owner/occupier           corporations acquiring property)
                            Property tax: 2.5 per cent on annual
                            basis (payable by corporations
                            acquiring property)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Healey &amp; Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3576</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 14: Big potential despite difficulties -
Poland / Western companies and individuals are seeking to establish a
presence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANNE STEADMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE recent Polish elections led to an even more divided parliament and a new
government - further underlining the country's already considerable
political uncertainties.
The programme of privatisation of state corporations seems to have stalled,
at least temporarily. And there is confusion over the progress of the draft
legislation relating to the restitution of land to its former owners.
In addition, there is no similar concept to that of freehold although
foreigners are able to acquire the right to the long-term use of land.
Yet despite all this, Poland, with its population of some 36m, is
undoubtedly a potentially large market. And it is a Polish development that
the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) has chosen as
its first real estate financing project.
EBRD - with a loan of Dollars 65.6m together with a 12 per cent equity
investment of Dollars 3m, part of which will be syndicated to other banks -
will help finance a 40-storey, 75,000 sq m office building in the centre of
Warsaw.
The National Bank of Poland will occupy one third of the space.
The developer is Emilii Plater Partners, a joint venture between the
National Bank and the Golub Epstein Partnership - which is a US joint
venture between two Chicago-based companies.
The remaining space, says the EBRD, will be let to both foreign and Polish
organisations. However it seems likely that the overwhelming majority of
demand will come from foreign companies.
Warsaw, unlike Prague and Budapest, is not a beautiful city. It was almost
completely destroyed in the Second World War and rebuilt under communism.
Built on a grid system, with no identifiable central area, much of it is
still dismal and depressing.
There is an acute shortage of good quality office space and considerable
demand resulting in 'artificially high' rents, according to Mr Angus
McIntosh of Healey &amp; Baker. For example, a rent of DM85 a sq m a month has
just been achieved in the LIM Centre, one of Warsaw's few modern
developments. Taking its name from its three joint venture development
partners - LOT, the Polish airline, Ilbau the Austrian contractor and
Marriott the hotel chain - it consists of a 520-room hotel, 13,400 sq m of
offices (of which LOT occupies about 7,000 sq m) and 4, 200 sq m of retail
space.
The offices are full and the hotel occupancy high. Rents and hotel bills are
paid from western accounts in hard currency.
Funding came from the Austrian Girozentrale Vienna and, encouraged by LIM's
success, the bank is involved with two further real estate projects in
Poland.
The first is a speculative office building of 16,700 sq m in Warsaw, not far
from the LIM Centre, which is just about to get underway. Again, Ilbau is a
partner.
The second, in Szczecin, is far more ambitious. In this town close to the
German border and an 1 1/2 hours drive from Berlin, work is proceeding on a
402-room five-star hotel to be operated by the US Radisson group, 25,000 sq
m of offices, 3,000 sq m of shops and a casino.
The main office tenant and development partner will be the Polish Steamship
Company. The remainder will be let to western companies at rents anticipated
to be in the region of DM40 a sq m a month.
Girozentrale is putting up a syndicated loan of DM170m, part of which is
guaranteed by the Austrian State Export Promotion Bank. And in addition it
is providing equity of DM85m.
Dr Alexander Auboech of Girozentrale admits that it is a 'huge' complex for
a town with a population of just 400,000. But it will, he considers, create
a new town centre, just as LIM did in Warsaw.
Much of Poland's infrastructure is not up to western standards, but its
public transport system is generally good, says Mr McIntosh. Healey &amp; Baker
is marketing the US Business Centre, a 25,000 sq m office development on
behalf of a US consortium. A five-minute taxi ride south of the LIM Centre,
the development adjoins the new Polytechnika metro station.
The agent reports 'serious interest' with heads of terms agreed with some 10
companies ahead of a construction start.
Western trading, manufacturing, and technology companies and a whole range
of consultants and professionals have either set up or are seeking to
establish a presence in Poland.
Although the UK organisations are there with the rest, their involvement in
property development is fairly limited. Even contractor Higgs &amp; Hill, which
is undertaking refurbishment at the British Embassy and should be
well-placed to take advantage of local opportunities, has apparently yet to
do so.
It also seems that UK banks and institutions have politely turned down
invitations to subscribe to funds seeking to invest in Poland.
However, interest from the UK with its large number of expatriates is
evident. Mr Jan Chudzynski, who heads the newly-launched property
consultancy Dauntons Gerald Eve, considers that increasing numbers of UK
business and property people are taking a look.
He cites the regular meetings of the 'Pink Club' at the British Embassy in
Warsaw. In 1989, he says, only six to 10 people used to turn up. Nowadays it
is 50 to 60.
And Mr Phil Hudson, senior partner of specialist eastern European property
consultancy East 8, which has compiled a series of detailed reports on real
estate development in former eastern European countries, notes that more
copies of the Polish report have been sold than any of the others.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords costs in letting  Agents fees: 10 per cent of first
of a building               year's rent + 25 per cent VAT
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants costs in leasing    Fees variable: each deal is arranged
of a building               individually
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Fees variable: each deal is arranged
or owner/occupier           individually
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Purchase costs by investor  Land registry: 3 per cent (payable by
or owner/occupier           corporations acquiring property)
                            Property tax: 2.5 per cent on annual basis
                            (payable by corporations acquiring property)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Healey &amp; Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3577</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 13: EC appetite ensures low vacancy rate -
Belgium / Enlargement of the Community and closer political union will fuel
demand for office space in Brussels
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OVER the past 18 months, those few doubters who played down the influence of
the European Community institutions on the Brussels property market have had
their doubts swept away.
Brussels dominates the Belgian office market - 7.5m sq m account for 75 per
cent of the country's office space - and the European Commission, Parliament
and Council dominate Brussels.
Last year, the Commission - the biggest EC employer in the Belgian capital -
decided it would have to move out of its headquarters, the starfish-shaped
and asbestos-filled Berlaymont building in Brussels' Quartier Leopold. The
Brussels authorities were asked to lease an extra 125,000 sq m on behalf of
the Commission, boosting Brussels' annual take-up of office space by nearly
40 per cent to 380,000 sq m. The Berlaymont itself is to be stripped of
asbestos and refurbished.
In 1992, the most dramatic development has been the European Parliament's
decision to lease the 380,000 sq m Espace Leopold, a massive three-phase
development of offices and 'conference space', including a 1,000-seat
auditorium. The signing of the lease contract - at an unspecified rent - may
be the first stage in wrestling the monthly full sessions of the European
Parliament away from Strasbourg, which desperately wants to hang on to its
place on the EC band-wagon.
But apart from the political ramifications, the EC's appetite for offices
has also left Brussels with an extraordinarily low vacancy rate. In the
Quartier Leopold, available office space is said to be less than 1 per cent
of the total and the city average is 2.6 per cent compared with 5 to 10 per
cent elsewhere, and perhaps 20 per cent in the City of London. Over the next
decade, a combination of enlargement of the EC and closer political union
will continue to fuel the demand for office space in Brussels, from
institutions and companies directly or indirectly involved with Community
affairs.
Some 180,000 sqare metres of office space is under construction near
Brussels' north station, including a 110,000 sqare metres twin-tower
development which is Brussels' largest speculative project.
But sites for the offices of the future - at least within the coveted area
covered by the 19 municipalities of Brussels - are few and far between.
That should be good news for rental values, which are historically lower
than elsewhere in Europe.
Annually, Brussels' top office rents stand at BFr9,000 per square metre,
just under a quarter of the peak rental values in London.
'One of the problems in London and Paris was that we saw boom years where 20
per cent or more was put on rental values and the whole market got
overheated,' says Mr Neil Jones, an investment surveyor with Healey &amp;
Baker's Brussels office.
'That's not likely to happen here because the Belgian economy remains
healthy and interest rates are manageable - relative to the rest of Europe
it hasn't been badly hit.' Office rents in Brussels are continuing to rise,
making it the only city in Europe experiencing continued growth, apart from
Berlin.
In Brussels, rents increased by 12 per cent last year and have risen at an
average of about 10 per cent over the past decade.
The influences on the Belgian retail market are quite different. Indeed, the
Belgian public authorities seem to have hampered rather than encouraged
investment in retail property, by applying rigid rules on planning
permission and construction of large-scale city-centre redevelopment and new
out-of-town shopping centres.
That has meant that most towns have retained a prime central retail area,
with the limited available space greatly in demand.
That said, Brussels' retail rents - now running at about BFr72,000 per sq m
per year - are still lower than those in Madrid, Rome, London and Paris.
One symptom of the squeeze on retail space has been the steady rise over the
past 18 months in the share price of Belgium's three largest supermarket
chains.
This has been partly attributed to competitors' inability to establish a
strong foothold in the retail property market.
The situation is beginning to change. Belgium's largest shopping centre,
36,000 sq m next to an existing 16,000 sq m hypermarket, is to open near
Antwerp in a year's time, and there are other limited schemes under
consideration.
Despite its attractions, however, foreign property investors are not
flocking to the Belgian market. In all sectors, Belgium is affected by the
same malaise which has struck across Europe. German, Dutch, British, French
and Swedish investors are waiting for economic problems at home to clear up
before they take the plunge abroad.
But with Belgium's and Brussels' characteristic qualities likely to be
enhanced rather than diminished over the coming years, property analysts are
confident that the institutions will return to the market in due course.
'There are a lot of foreign investors waiting on the sidelines at the
moment,' says Mr Jones.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords cost in           Agents fees: 15% + 17% VAT
letting of a building
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants cost in             Real estate tax: 10% of rent
leasing of a building       Registration cost of lease: minimal sum
                            Legal fees
                            Agent fees: if agent is acting for the
                            tenant
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Registration tax: 12.5% (60% of which is
or owner/occupier           recoverable if property is sold again
                            within five years). For new buildings,
                            registration tax is paid on the land
                            element and VAT of 17% on the building
                            element.
                            Notary fees: minimal for large buyers
                            Agents fees: if agent is acting for the
                            purchaser
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
SOURCE: Healey and Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3578</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 12: First glimpses of a property market -
Hungary / Developers and agents are getting more practised at buying
property from the state
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HUNGARY'S property market is slowly and awkwardly taking shape out of the
confusion left after 40 years of communist state control of commercial real
estate. But talk of a market in the western meaning still has a premature
ring to it, even if Hungary is the farthest down the road of all the east
European countries.
The price of office space in Budapest, the capital, has finally levelled off
at west European levels after three years during which it headed frantically
and, seemingly, inexorably upwards. Central modern office space now rents at
about DM50-55 a square metre, about the same level as last summer.
More particularly, the distribution of rents in Budapest conforms more
closely to the norm for a western city. Rents still vary wildly for similar
properties for no apparent reason and fail to fall as one would expect as
distance from the city centre increases. Nevertheless, there is more of a
pattern than before, and rents on the fringes of the business district have
dropped from their peaks of last summer.
The gradual advent of conditions that a westerner can recognise has come
with the easing of the extreme shortage of modern office space that had
characterised the market.
The East-West Trade Centre, a development led by Skanska, the Swedish
construction firm, was completed last year and is fully let. But it took
Skanska four years to put together the project. 'The secret is persistence,
and not what you know but who you know,' says Mr Anthony Sutcliffe, of the
chartered surveyors Richard Ellis. Nevertheless, another 10 or so projects
are under construction or likely to go ahead in the near future, according
to analysts.
For example, European Serviced Offices, a part of Mel Simon &amp; Associates,
the US developer, is refurbishing a 19th century building, on the edge of
the central business district, to make 3,400 sq m of serviced office space.
That could be a niche suitable for eastern Europe, with its transient
business visitors.
NCC Fastigheter, the Swedish developer, has begun a project on the Buda side
of the river Danube for 6,750 sq m of offices, banking and retail premises.
That promises to appeal to professionals, who generally live in residential
Buda districts and want to avoid commuting across the city's increasingly
clogged bridges.
At the same time, demand has been weaker than expected, moving towards
equilibrium with supply. It is more that western firms require less space
than forecast, rather than that there are fewer of them, according to Mr
Sutcliffe.
In particular, the end of general scarcity has encouraged tenants to insist
on discounts on mediocre property. People can afford to be a bit more choosy
than nine months ago when tenants would almost cut one another's throat to
try to get any old property, says Mr Stuart Durrant, property adviser at DTZ
Hungary.
So the country has been treated to its first glimpses of the workings of a
market in property. It is certainly an improvement on the wild early days of
property development in Hungary. 'There were people sitting there selling
things they did not own to people who could not afford to buy them,' says Mr
Neil Gillon, European property director at Mel Simon &amp; Associates. But it is
taking time to fill the gaps. It is difficult to spot a market in the hotel
or industrial sector. Transactions for retail space have taken place in a
shadow market. About half of Vaci Street, the prime shopping strip, is now
occupied by foreign retailers - but usually after they have taken over the
company, not the property.
Even the office market, the most advanced, remains flawed at every point in
its operation - from the basic supply of sites, the establishment of
ownership, the behaviour of sellers and agents, to the shape of the
investment market.
'The market is still very immature and very imperfect,' says Mr Christopher
Bennett, adviser at the Budapest office of Price Waterhouse, the
accountants.
First, privatisation of real estate needs to be speeded up before prime
office space, which is almost entirely lacking, can be developed. The key is
the release of sites in the Fifth district, the central business district,
which has seen little recent construction. 'There is still a quest for the
Holy Grail, which is an empty site in the Fifth district,' says Mr Durrant.
As time passes, developers and agents are getting more practised at buying
property from the state - or rather from the hydra of the state-owned
company which rents the site, the local authority which in effect has the
handling rights to it, and the State Property Agency which has the title. It
is this that is the problem rather than claims by former owners, which many
investors worry about.
Transactions are also gradually becoming smoother as Hungarians become more
accustomed to the workings of a market. Deals have often faltered in the
past because of sellers' rigid ideas of the value of their property. So
rigid in an extreme case that a seller put up the asking price for a
property to make up for list rent after it failed to sell and stood empty.
The matching of supply and demand is also improving as the community of
agents and property advisers becomes more coherent. Property experts
recently began monthly meetings to reduce mutual suspicions of poaching
which had hampered co-operation.
But many transactions still stay out of sight of the open market, done
principal to principal and relying on personal connections. Or they just do
not get done.
The development of financing and an investment market are also essential if
the market is to take off. Even when a developer has cleared the way to
start work, financing can present insuperable obstacles. Most is short-term
if it is available and an investment market to provide developers with an
easy exit option is in its infancy.
With all these pitfalls, it is not surprising that many deals fall through.
Beacon Companies, the US property developer, found a site with clear title,
put together a Dollars 150m office and hotel project, but appears to have
withdrawn. And analysts are sceptical about the future of Olympia &amp; York's
large office project on a prime site next to the Hungarian central bank.
'Out of 100 projects you hear about, only about five ever start and fewer
get completed,' says Mr Sutcliffe of Richard Ellis. Unfortunately, in
Budapest seeing is believing. That gives particular resonance in Hungary to
jokes about the value of property developers' promises.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords costs in letting  Agents fees: 15 per cent-20 per cent of
of a building               first year's rent legal fees: variable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants costs in leasing    Agents fees: 15 per cent-20 per cent of
of a building               first year's rent. Legal fees: variable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Agents fees: 2.6 per cent-6 per cent
or owner/occupier           Legal fees: variable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Purchase costs by investor  Agents fees: 2 per cent-6 per cent
or owner/occupier           Legal fees: variable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Healey &amp; Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3579</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 11: The market has hit rock bottom -
Britain / One estimate suggests there is enough office space in central
London for 10 years
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LAWSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE longest economic recession in almost 50 years has taken its toll on the
UK property industry. The sector's shares fell 18 per cent last year
compared with a 15 per cent uplift in the overall market. Half a dozen
companies have collapsed and a score of leading names are suffering the
indignity of a rating among the 'penny share' brigade.
It is all a long way from the late 1980s boom, when rents soared and the
construction industry went into overdrive. And therein lies the biggest
problem: leading markets are weighed down with huge space surpluses. One
estimate suggests there is enough office space in central London to last a
decade. Even a recovery would take years to make an impact on rents.
The one straw keeping most investors afloat is the fact that the market has
hit bottom. Total returns have recovered strongly, finally going positive
again in the last six months of 1991 to reach 2 per cent, says the benchmark
index produced by Investment Property Databank (IPD). The market is very
patchy, however. Central London offices sank to minus 19 per cent,
reflecting a 22 per cent drop in rent levels. Industrial premises in the
north and Scotland were the star performers for the second year in
succession, recording a 12.4 per cent positive total return.
Fund managers are even beginning to believe in the future again.
'Institutions are planning to step up their net investment in property over
the next 12 months,' says IPD. But that confidence has not spread to London,
once the honeypot for every European investor. With the possible exception
of the West End they will be looking to unload offices.
The City of London's standing has taken such a knock that annual rents of
Pounds 37.50 per sq ft are now comparable with Madrid, Frankfurt and even
the newly-revived Berlin, says property consultant Richard Ellis. Hefty
property taxes and service charges takes the overall cost to Pounds 66
(Pounds 78 in the West End), however, well above levels in other European
centres. Landlords are crunched between a rock and a hard place.
Returns have been cut to the bone - and then trimmed even more with long
payment holidays and generous break clauses. But still the tenants will not
bite. Some cannot afford extra occupation costs when profits are being
squeezed; others cannot re-let their old space. Investors may salivate over
the UK's unique system of 25-year leases but occupiers feel the downside
when competing against acres of brand new space at bargain rents.
Mr Jeremy Trice of Debenham Tewson &amp; Chinnocks believes that the amount of
central London space has fallen marginally, but that still leaves more than
32.5m sq ft available compared with a take-up which fell 40 per cent last
year to 9m sq ft. The end of recession may be nigh, however. Starts have
more than halved, to 3m sq ft.
Future performance may depend on how the industry handles stored-up plans
for further building. Mr Geoff Marsh of Applied Property Research has noted
more than 50m sq ft of existing planning permissions and another 29m sq ft
of applications. 'In other words, the overall development pipeline stands at
over 100m sq ft - sufficient to increase the existing stock by 50 per cent,'
he says. While little of this is likely to be built in the foreseeable
future, the threat alone could depress yields for the rest of the decade.
Meanwhile, immediate weaknesses make any prospects of short-term rental
growth unlikely, says Siobhan Pandya, head of commercial research at
Savills. But there may be a light at the end of the tunnel. Occupiers are
paralysed as much by uncertainty as poverty, and the forthcoming general
election should at least clear their vision about the future. If the
Conservative Party retained power, it would put lenders' minds at rest; a
recent survey by Chesterton revealed that most finance groups feared a
Labour Party victory would hit the property market.
But the future may not be that simple. Richard Ellis predicts that office
rents would rise 2.8 per cent more per year if power changed hands (although
other property might suffer). Siobhan Pandya also suggests that a Labour
Party government would not necessarily be detrimental in the long term. For
the moment, however, UK property appears to be raising its head above the
tide which swept it from favour. Although average yields remain at an
historic high of more than 9 per cent, Savills predicts 5 per cent total
returns this year - still well below the performance of gilts and equities
but at least back in the black.
'This improvement will come about through a general stabilisation of yields
and even a marginal improvement in certain sectors, including retail
warehouse and industrials,' it says.
Investors will need all their wits about them to take advantage of low
prices - and a great deal of courage to brave prospects of meagre returns.
But if they choose well and look long-term - as all good property investors
are meant to do - the prospects are there for some exciting deals in 1992.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords costs in letting  Agents fees: 10 per cent of first year's
of a building               rent + 17.5 per cent VAT
                            Legal fees: variable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants costs in leasing    Agents fees: up to 10 per cent of first
of a building               year's rent.
                            Legal fees: variable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Surveyors fees: 1 per cent + 17.5 per cent
or owner/occupier           VAT
                            Legal fees: 1 per cent + 15.5 per cent
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Purchase costs by investor  Stamp duty: 1 per cent
or owner/occupier           Legal fees: 0.5 per cent + 17.5 per cent VAT
                            Surveyors fees: 1 per cent + 17.5 per cent
                            Building surveyors fees: variable up to
                            1/4 of of 1 per cent
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Healey &amp; Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3580</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 10: Building-site boom is deceptive -
Portugal / The main sources of concern are high interest rates and the
maintenance of antiquated rental laws
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK BLUM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LISBON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SHORT walk around Lisbon and Oporto would convince almost anyone that
Portugal is in the midst of a construction and property boom.
Streets are cluttered with building materials and it is often difficult, not
to say dangerous, to make one's way around countless obstructions caused by
building sites and excavations as new buildings spring up, old ones are
renovated and new water and gas mains, sewers and telephone lines are
installed.
All this activity is deceiving. After four years of rapid growth and
escalating prices, the property market is facing more uncertain prospects.
Signs that all is not well come from property developers, builders and
owners who have been calling on the government to take urgent action to
revive the property sector.
The main concerns are high interest rates, and the maintenance of antiquated
rental laws.
They say high interest rates are discouraging investment, increasing
financial pressures on companies with large debts or exposures on
developments that have yet to be completed, and deterring buyers in the
residential market.
Outdated legislation covering tenancy rights and rents has had a negative
impact mainly on the commercial and housing markets.
The law is generally favourable to tenants who can renew their leases
indefinitely with rents indexed at or below inflation. Over the years this
has meant that the bulk of rents have lost all connection with the market,
apart from a small section represented by up-market homes where rents have
rocketed to levels comparable to those in London or Paris.
A law was passed a year ago authorising new contracts in the housing sector
to be drawn up for a minimum period of five years and allowing repossession
when the agreement expires. But the bulk of properties was left unaffected
by the change and the sad spectacle of often potentially handsome houses in
the main cities deteriorating to the point where they collapse because
owners cannot, or will not, afford to renovate and maintain them, is
unlikely to end in the foreseeable future.
The law also tightened up on tenancy rights, reducing the scope for tenants
to pass on their rented home to friends and distant relatives. But overall
it failed short of expectations in the industry which had pressed for a
broader and deeper liberalisation of the market.
Last year's slow-down in the rate of growth of the Portuguese economy also
had a negative impact, especially in the north of the country where the bulk
of Portugal's traditional industries are located. Recession elsewhere has
slowed foreign demand and leisure developments in the Algarve, along
Portugal's southern coast, have suffered as a result.
Up-market mini-resorts such as Vilamoura and Quinta do Lago continue to find
buyers, but over-building in other parts of the coast has taken its toll.
There are some bright spots. The market for offices is still strong,
although not uniformly. Demand for industrial property in the Lisbon and
Setubal areas remains strong especially for high quality premises. 'Because
of the limited supply, capital values for both completed (modern) property
and industrial land have seen increases of some 100 per cent since 1987,'
says Mr Eric Van Leuven of agents Healey &amp; Baker.
There are also several new large developments for shopping centres and
office parks, but the overall picture for the sector is very different from
what it was two years ago when money was flowing into the market and
construction companies' order books were full - helped by a wave of public
sector projects backed by funds from the European Community.
Most activity is concentrated in central Lisbon, greater Lisbon and outlying
areas including around Setubal - an important industrial centre - and
Oporto.
The Lisbon office market is relatively small with a total stock of 2m square
metres, at least two thirds of which does not meet international standards.
Rental and capital values have risen rapidly since Portugal's accession to
the EC in 1986 although prices are levelling off as supply is gradually
matching demand.
Some 800,000 square metres of office space are currently under construction
and the market could suffer from over-supply by 1994, according to research
by Healey &amp; Baker.
Central Lisbon has seen the greatest slow-down with the exception of a
handful of high quality developments. 'The biggest buyers have been the
Spaniards. They have been willing to pay high prices for prestige
locations,' says Mr David Sampson, publisher of Portugal Property Review.
But demand has slowed as companies move out of the centre into new and
cheaper developments.
Buying prices in the centre of Lisbon for prime locations are close to
Es700,000 per square metre. Demand for rented premises has remained strong
due to the shortage of supply of good quality offices, which keeps prices
high at about Es6,750 per square metre per month for top locations.
Demand for retail outlets in or near the city centre remains high, boosted
by current demand from international retail chains moving into the
Portuguese market. Because of the shortage of supply, rents have escalated -
rising by 17 per cent in the last six months of 1991.
Activity is strongest in the greater Lisbon area and outlying districts with
large office and commercial developments about to start. The recently-opened
Cascais shopping centre with more than 150 shops, including four
international department stores, is already almost fully let.
In Oporto, Portugal's second largest city, there has been intense activity
in the past three years with prices rising rapidly. Planning restrictions
have stifled developments in the centre and Boavista, to the west, is
emerging as the new prime location. Prime office space now sells for about
Es425,000 per square metre. Agents Mathew &amp; Goodman say that provided the
economy remains strong, demand should average 25,000 to 30,000 square metres
a year, but it could fall sharply if the economy slows down.
With a few exceptions, foreign demand in all sectors of the market remains
depressed. 'Foreign companies coming to Portugal tend to buy existing
companies with their own premises or make joint ventures. Either way, this
has limited effect on the market for new property, while institutional
investors and developers are put off by the rent legislation, and until that
changes they are likely to stay away,' says Mr Van Leuven.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords costs in letting  Letting fees: 8.3 per cent-10 per cent
of a building               of annual rent
                            Yearly property tax of up to 1.3 per cent
                            of the property value
                            Insurance of approx 0.025 per cent of
                            the property value
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants costs in leasing    Letting fees: 8.3 per cent-10 per cent
of a building               of annual rent
                            Service charge: variable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Agents fees: 2.5 per cent-5 per cent
or owner/occupier
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Purchase costs by investor  Acquisition cost: 10 per cent of
or owner/occupier           purchase price for all propeties in excess
                            of Es21m
                            Notary fees: 0.5 per cent
                            Legal fees: 0.5
                            Registration charge: 0.5
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Healey &amp; Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3581</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 9: Problematic issue of land restitution -
Czechoslovakia / Confusion over land ownership is putting off western
developers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANNE STEADMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE the majority of the former eastern bloc countries have decided to pay
cash compensation to owners of land nationalised under communism,
Czechoslovakia has taken the bold decision to attempt to restore land to its
pre-1948 owners wherever possible.
The last deadline set for submission of claims from former owners came and
went late last year and some properties have now been restored.
However, few of the new owners have yet carried out all the necessary
formalities to enable them to prove title, according to surveyors Jones Lang
Wootton. Indeed, the whole area of restitution of land is still
'problematic', says Mr Mark Heighton of solicitors Mcffenna &amp; Co.
One of the possible problems is that in many cases there are likely to have
been several claims to the same piece of land. Resulting squabbles could
take years to resolve.
In addition, says Mr Stephen McGairl of solicitors Freshfields' Paris
office, restitution rights are limited to Czech residents - leading to not a
little understandable ill feeling from some expatriate Czechs. And, although
there is an official state property register, it has been poorly maintained
over the years and is not reliable.
This confused situation regarding land ownership is proving discouraging to
potential western investors and developers. Another discouraging factor is
the country's capital city itself. Prague offers few opportunities for new
development. It is an exceptionally beautiful city, planning is tightly
controlled - and demolition of existing buildings is highly unlikely.
However, in common with the other former eastern bloc capitals, Prague
suffers from an acute shortage of office space of the standard required by
western companies.
Rents of up to DM80 a sq m a month are being asked and in some cases being
achieved. But it is doubtful if this level is sustainable in the longer
term, says Jones Lang Wootton.
More realistically, top rents in refurbished buildings are about DM60 a sq m
a month, although a prime modern building - if such a thing existed - could
command more.
There is considerable interest in proposals to develop the city's main
railway station next to the parliament building and Wenceslas Square. The
state railway arranged for a development competition which again was keenly
contested. The name of the selected developer should be announced shortly.
French contractor CBC has acquired a large site known as Karline behind the
new Atrium Hotel and a French and Dutch consortium has taken an option on a
large urban renewal site, Smikov, adjoining the river. This latter deal has,
however, raised eyebrows because no development competition or competitive
tender was held. The citizens of Prague do not wish to be seen selling off
the family silver too cheaply.
Given the problems of the city centre, a few developers are now looking to
peripheral locations. A new office development on the main access route from
Prague's airport is due to start in April. To be known as Furopean Plaza, it
will consist of a total of 18,000 sq m and will be built in three phases.
The first phase of 6,000 sq m is due for completion in the late summer or
autumn of next year. Finance for the development is being provided by a
consortium of Austrian and Swiss banks and private individuals. UK architect
YRM is also making an equity contribution.
Joint letting agents Healey &amp; Baker and Ryden &amp; Partners consider that the
new buildings - complete with obligatory central atrium - will prove
attractive to international companies because they will offer a similar
quality and type of environment to that from which they operate in other
countries.
Prague has seen an enormous growth in the number of visitors over the past
two years - tourists as well as those looking to do business or to assess
the business possibilities. And hotel development has been a feature in
Prague as it has been in Budapest, Warsaw and Moscow. Leading international
hotel operators have been to spot the potential of a market where room rates
are high, as are occupancy levels, while labour costs are low - and hotel
bills are payable in hard currency.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords costs in letting  Agents fees: 15 per cent-20 per cent
of a building               of first years's rent Legal fees: variable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants costs in leasing    Agents fees: 15-20 per cent of first year's
of a building               rent Legal fees: variable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Agents fees: 2 per cent-6 per cent
or owner/occupier           Legal fees: variables
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Purchase costs by investor  Agents fees: 2 per cent-6 per cent
or owner/occupier           Legal fees: variable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Healey &amp; Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3582</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 8: Market remains remarkably robust -
Germany / Broadly-spread economic growth and investment ensure less
vulnerability and more resilience
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONCE AGAIN, Germany's property market has bucked the trend. While the other
large property markets in the world have turned from boom to bust, it has
remained remarkably robust.
Prudent bank lending and tight planning controls have resulted in very low
vacancy rates. At an average of less than 2 per cent, they are well below
the level in other markets.
Admittedly, the market does not have the buoyancy it had a year ago. Then,
promoters of German property cited the promising economic outlook for the
1990s, the additional economic benefits from reunification and the increased
interest from foreign investors.
The force of these arguments has weakened as the German economy lost steam,
the costs of reunification mounted and foreign investors were forced to
retreat by problems in their own territory.
Some agents are concerned about the amount of development over the past two
years, particularly in suburban areas. This is likely to result in an
oversupply in some areas, says Zadelhoff Deutschland, a property
consultancy.
Mr Robert Orr of Jones Lang Wootton is cautious about a few locations such
as the outskirts of Dusseldorf or land close to Munich Airport. In general,
however, he believes that the oversupply will be modest by comparison with
the English-speaking markets.
The deterioration in rental growth prospects, along with higher interest
rates and bond yields, has caused yields on commercial property to lengthen
over the past 18 months. So too has the downturn in foreign markets which
has caused overseas investors to reign in their activities (although French
players are still active and there may yet be investment by Japanese life
companies).
But the market still inspires considerable confidence. Domestic investors
have stepped up their investments in the past nine months, partly because of
reduced competition from overseas investors.
So far, the lengthening of yields has been a modest affair. In 1991, yields
weakened by about 0.25 per cent to 0.5 per cent for city centre properties
and 0.5 per cent to 1 per cent for secondary and suburban properties,
according to Zadelhoff Deutschland. The fragmented nature of the German
property market leads to investment decisions being made on a city-by-city
basis. The reunification of Germany, which has shifted the relative
importance of cities, has made it even more pertinent.
Hamburg, Hanover and Frankfurt are generally considered the greatest winners
on the western side of the country from reunification. Hamburg is now firmly
established as the leading northern German city. Hanover has also recovered
much of its hinterland and is no longer on the eastern fringe of the
country.
Frankfurt's position as the financial heart of Germany has been enhanced by
reunification. Jones Lang Wootton expects rental growth of between 7 per
cent and 12 per cent a year.
On the eastern side of the country, the dearth of modern commercial property
has created opportunities for investors and developers, particularly in
Dresden and Leipzig. But despite tax incentives, investors are deterred by
legal, planning and contamination issues and the difficulties of estimating
future supply and demand.
Most of the running has been made by domestic investors. According to Mr
Nigel Fletcher of Hillier Parker, foreign investors are being too cautious.
'I am not sure they are fully aware of the opportunities,' he says.
Berlin stands out as the city which promises the greatest opportunities from
reunification. That is assured by the decision to restore it as the seat of
government and also by its position as a gateway between east and west
Europe, which makes it a magnet for businesses. 'There is no doubt that
Berlin will, in future, be one of the most important property markets, if
not the most important, property market, in Europe', says Zadelhoff
Deutschland.
But the extreme shortage of office space in the city has bid up rents to
more than DM 90 per square metre per month in Berlin, sparking worries that
there may be a speculative bubble. The concern is heightened by high land
prices and the large number of developments on the drawing board.  However
these worries are shrugged off by those who point to the long lead times of
the developments and the strong long-term prospects of the city.
The renewed strength of Berlin conjures up the possibility that it could
dominate the country in the way that London dominates the UK and Paris
dominates France. But commentators are virtually unanimous that Germany will
not lose the decentralised character it adopted after the fall of the Third
Reich.
The federal nature of Germany is one of the strengths of its property
market. With its broadly-spread economic growth, the amount of investment
attracted by any single city is limited, making German property markets less
vulnerable to overheating than their rivals. Although this does not make it
immune from a downturn - as investors discovered in 1973 - it gives it added
resilience.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords costs in letting  Agents fees: 17-30 per cent of annual rent,
of a building               very often paid by the tennant
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants costs in leasing    Agents fees: 17-30 per cent of annual rent,
of a building               sometimes paid by the landlord
                            Service charge: 10-15 per cent of rent
                            VAT: 14 per cent
                            Internal repair costs
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Legal fees
or owner/occupier           Agents fees: 3 per cent-5 per cent,
                            paid by the buyer in many cases
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Purchase costs by investor  Transfer tax: 2 per cent
or owner/occupier           Legal fees: 1 per cent
                            Agents fees: 3-5 per cent
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Healey &amp; Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3583</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 7: Beset by a string of handicaps - Italy
/ Italian property is difficult for the outsider
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LIKE much in Italy, the property market promises immense potential but
offers foreign investors limited results, at least in the short term. That
is the lesson learned by the handful of UK property consultants which have
established local offices in the past two years.
The market should be appealing. Italy's is the world's fifth-biggest economy
and the northern half of the country is one of Europe's industrial and
commercial powerhouses. In terms of income per capita, northern Italy - and
particularly the Lombardy region surrounding Milan - ranks among Europe's
richest. With only 15 per cent of Italy's population, Lombardy accounts for
about a third of the country's gross national product and exports.
According to a survey of 504 European companies conducted last year by
Healey &amp; Baker, the UK property group, 62 per cent already had some presence
in Milan, whether through commercial offices, manufacturing facilities or
warehousing and distribution. The city ranked third in Europe behind London
and Paris in terms of existing representation.
The strength of Milan's international reputation and the shortage of office
space have ensured considerable interest on the part of UK property
consultants. Jones Lang Wootton (JLW), St Quentin and Healey &amp; Baker all
have local offices. Last year, Healey &amp; Baker expanded its presence in
northern Italy by buying Trend, a Bologna-based firm, while Hillier Parker
has an arrangement with Gabetti, Italy's biggest property consultancy group.
Despite its potential, Italian property is beset by a string of handicaps
making it difficult, and sometimes even forbidding, for the outsider. As a
result, much of the foreign consultants' time has been spent explaining the
vagaries of the system to the uninitiated. Meanwhile, growing valuation work
has helped them pay the rent.
The foreigners' 'missionary' role has been reinforced by the fact that Italy
has little tradition of specialist property consultants and few firms geared
to international needs. Only a third of commercial property transactions are
believed to be handled by professionals.
Hence there has been no pressure to produce the sort of reliable information
on which most international investors depend for their property decisions.
Even basics such as the measurement of buildings are far from standardised.
'The lack of uniformity makes the assessment of a building's worth more
erratic', says a JLW spokesman. 'Decisions tend to become very subjective
and it puts a much bigger burden on the agent'.
New developments face particularly tough problems. Firm conservation
policies severely limit the scope within city centres.
Even refurbishment behind a preserved facade is restricted by tight rules on
retaining the original use of floorspace. And the frequent need to provide
some residential accommodation within a redevelopment can make the figures
even less attractive to the investor. Add to that the bureaucracy of most
big-city councils, where planning applications can languish for years, and a
persistent reports of corruption, and Italy's problems come into
perspective.
Structural factors have made the commercial market particularly sluggish.
Italian insurance companies - the predominant institutional owners of
property - tend to be less active in managing their portfolios than
counterparts elsewhere in Europe.
Buildings are kept in structural order. However, owners tend to sit back and
focus on rental yields and, until last year's sharp halt, rocketing
city-centre capital values, rather than feeling compelled to trade their
portfolios.
Prime rents in the core of Milan shot up by about 80 per cent between 1986
and 1990, according to JLW. But subsequent stagnancy, or even falls, in
rents has done nothing to stimulate the sale market, and agents complain of
a continuing 'reality gap' among owners.
The lack of liquidity in the office market has been exacerbated by the very
high level of private ownership and owner occupancy. For many families,
ownership of a city-centre palazzo is an asset only to be touched in the
most dire of emergencies.
Such factors have limited foreign investment in Italian property. London &amp;
Edinburgh Trust is one of a handful of non-Italian groups which have been
active in the market, along with a sprinkling of Swedish, French and German
names. Foreign consultants such as Healey &amp; Baker's Mr Paul Bacon, believe
matters will change with over time. Limitations on city centre developments
have spurred new office projects outside city centres on old industrial
sites or in greenfield locations in neighbouring districts. But even then,
quality tends to be mixed. Surprisingly few of the more recent developments
have good air conditioning, raised floors or large column-free spaces.
Limited possibilities in the office market have spurred interest in retail
developments but obstacles still prevail. Mr Richard Branson, head of the
UK's Virgin group, expressed surprise that it had taken 18 months to open
the new Milan Megastore, compared with much shorter periods for similar
projects in France and Germany. By contrast, local observers were astonished
at the speed with which the venture progressed.
With city-centre sites limited and immense premiums required for the best
locations, out-of-town shopping centres have become a growth area.
Opposition from small shopkeepers, who can exert a strong influence on local
authorities, has traditionally restricted such developments. However, Mr
Bacon thinks matters are now changing and that such developments offer the
best prospects for international investors to enter the market.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords costs in letting  Agents fees: 10 per cent-15 per cent
of a building               of one year's rent
                            Legal fees: up to 5 per cent of one
                            year's rent
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants costs in leasing    Agents fees: 10 per cent-15 per cent
of a building               of one years rent
                            Registration: nominal fee
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Agents fees: 2 per cent of sale price
or owner/occupier           Stamp tax: 0.14 per cent of purchase price
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Purchase costs by investor  Agents fees: 2 per cent of purchase price
or owner/occupier           Notary fee: 0.5 per cent of purchase price
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Healey &amp; Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3584</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 6: Sluggish outlook is taking its toll -
France / France's property analysts believe that the slowdown is set to
continue well into the mid-1990s
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IF you glance around the streets of Paris you might be forgiven for thinking
that the city's property market is as frenzied as ever.
A fleet of bulldozers prowls around the Musee du Louvre. The tiny streets on
the other side of the Rue de Rivoli are being ploughed up for the
redevelopment of the old finance ministry. To the east, the Bercy area, home
of the new ministry, is a sea of cranes - as is La Defense to the west.
There are very few streets in the city without at least one building
shrouded by developers' hoardings and clouded by the dust of building work.
But beneath the bustle of bulldozers and building sites, the Paris property
market is in trouble. So far, the developers in France's capital have
managed to avoid a repetition of the severe problems facing their
counterparts in New York and London. They also have the consolation that
demand for property in other French cities - notably Nice and Lille - is
still resilient. But the property market in Paris, and to a lesser extent,
that of Lyon, is undoubtedly slowing down.
The consensus among France's property analysts is that the slowdown is set
to continue well into the mid-1990s. A study by Finance Evolution predicted
a 'crisis along the lines of those in the Anglo-Saxon market' for the
Parisian market which would last for three to seven years.
The fortunes of France's property industry are closely linked to those of
the French economy. When the economy flourished in the late 1980s, so did
France's property companies. The big cities bustled with building activity
thanks to the government's grandiose Grands Projetsand the sea of private
sector projects.
As the economy has slowed down, so has the property market. France still
boasts one of the lowest inflation rates in Europe, but the rigid economic
policy pursued by Mr Pierre Beregovoy, the long-serving finance minister,
coupled with the need to protect the franc by pinning French interest rates
to those of Germany, has impeded growth in the past year or so.
As unemployment rises and Mrs Edith Cresson's government struggles for
credibility in the approach to next year's national elections, the economic
outlook for 1992 looks even more sluggish than in 1991. This lacklustre
backdrop, combined with the flood of new property developments flowing onto
the market, has already taken a toll on demand. The latest report from Jones
Lang Wootton, the London-based commercial property consultancy, suggests
that 'although over-supply is not of dramatic proportions' the French market
has 'entered a period of indigestion' characterised by a 'wait-and-see
attitudes by tenants and investors alike'.
Predictably, the situation is worse in the very same areas that benefited
most from the property boom of the late 1980s. In the 'Golden Triangle' area
of central Paris, for example, average annual rents for office space fell
from FFr4,500 a square metre in the first quarter of 1991 to FFr4,200 in the
final quarter of the year, according to Jones Lang Wootton, which also noted
that prospective tenants were demanding more and more concessions from
landlords. Similarly rents at La Defense softened from between FFr3,000 and
FFr3,200 in the first quarter to FFr2,800 by the end of the year.
By contrast, rentals have held steady in the less prestigious areas on the
outskirts of the city. The price of property in the Bercy area, where
relatively few developments are actually ready for occupation, increased in
the course of last year, rising from FFr2,800 in the first quarter to
FFr3,000 in the fourth.
The same pattern is apparent in Lyons. Jones Lang Wootton suspects that in
the long term the Lyons market will be stabler than that of Paris but in the
short term it, too, is suffering from depressed demand and the threat of
over-supply. Office rents have stopped rising everywhere in the city apart
from the Presqu'ile area in the centre where supply of space is still
limited. But, in contrast to Paris, the city fringes seem to be suffering
more than the centre.
Other cities have yet to show the same signs of strain. The property markets
in Lille and Nice are still buoyant as are those in other provincial
centres. Moreover, Jones Lang Wootton is confident that neither Paris nor
Lyons is likely to experience a collapse along the lines of those in London
and New York.
Nonetheless, the French property sector is bracing itself for a tough time
over the next few years. The economic environment ought to improve from the
middle of this year onwards. German interest rates are expected to come down
by late spring or early summer, thereby allowing France to reduce its rates
too. By 1993, election year, even with the rigid Mr Beregovoy still at the
helm of the finance ministry, the French economy should be ready to return
to growth. But this will not be enough to alleviate the property market's
problems. The crux of the issue is the threat of over-supply. The Finance
Evolution study suggested that even after the economy recovers, the Paris
property sector will still be plagued by its own structural problems. It
expects the supply of new property to outstrip demand for the next few
years.
Finance Evolution also sees no sign of an end to the trend for investors to
leave Paris for other areas, or to concentrate on other sectors. It cited
the example of Assurances Generales de France (AGF), one of France's largest
insurance companies, which invested FFr3bn in property in the Ile-de-France,
the Paris region, during 1990 and virtually nothing last year.
The spectre of over-supply and a shortage of investment bodes ill for
France's property companies over the next few years. Finance Evolution does
not expect to see any real sign of recovery in the market until 1995 at the
earliest.
In the meantime, the Parisian building sites are still shrouded with dust
and dirt as the builders labour on. What will happen when their work is
finished remains to be seen.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords costs in letting  Agents fees: 15 per cent-20 per cent
of a building               of annual rent often payable on new
                            products + 18.6 per cent VAT, which is
                            recoverable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants costs in leasing    Agents fees: up to 30 per cent of first
of a building               year's rent + 18.6 VAT, which is recoverable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Agents fees: 1 per cent-3 per cent +
or owner/occupier           18.6 per cent VAT, which is recoverable
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Purchase costs by investor  Registration duty: 18.5 (approx).
or owner/occupier           If the building is less than five years
                            old and the sale is the first transaction
                            following physical completion, VAT of
                            18.6 per cent is payable on the purchase
                            price instead of registration duty, but is
                            recoverable. Agents fees: 1 per cent-3 per
                            cent + 18.6 per cent VAT, which is
                            recoverable.
                            Stamp duty:0.6 per cent (approx)
                            Notary fees: 0.9 per cent (approx)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Healey &amp; Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3585</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 5: Silver lining amid the storm clouds -
Spain / Domestic retailers are opening up for trading at a giddy pace
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TOM BURNS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Spanish economy has slowed down and could slow further before it
accelerates again. Business which boomed in the late 1980s is feeling the
pinch and where once there were record profits figures there are now
indicators of increasing bad debts.
It is not surprising, given such an environment, that the Spanish property
market should be facing a pressure that is altogether novel to it.
There was a rush to build office space when the economic take-off, three to
four years ago, revealed a woeful lack of available facilities and the
result is that now, when annual GDP growth of under 2.5 per cent is less
than half what it was a short while back, the supply curve has easily
outstripped the curve for demand.
If there is a silver lining among the Spanish storm clouds it is to be found
in the commercial property niche. There is a lag between real growth and
consumption growth, especially in a traditionally non-saving society such as
Spain's, and large retail centres which are tuned to the domestic big
spenders continue to attract investors.
In Madrid the demand for office space in 1988, according to Richard Ellis,
stood at 240.000 sq m while the supply was 195,000 sq m. The imbalance was
rectified the following year: in 1989, demand had grown to 375.000 sq m but
supply was, at 385.000 sq m, marginally above that figure.
The picture was one of a sustained business bullishness and of constructers
rushing to meet the demand. This became clear in 1990 when demand for office
space grew once more to stand at 475.000 sq m and again outstripped the
supply which had grown to 416,000 sq m. Last year the picture altered.
Richard Ellis estimated that in 1991 demand in Madrid had dropped to 400,000
sq m. This was the first annual drop in the demand for office space in the
Spanish capital since 1985. Supply, however, egged on by the previous year's
imbalance, had surged ahead and represented the truly big figure of 550,000
sq m.
The gap between supply and demand therefore stood last year at 150,000 sq m
which was nearly double the 1985 gap - the previous largest overshoot of
supply over demand - when demand stood at 117,000 sq m and supply stood at
194,000 sq m. The situation, looked at sympathetically, was neither more nor
less than what can be expected when an economy changes suddenly down from
high to second gear.
Richard Ellis notes how real estate companies, in view of the increased
available space, are turning increasingly to joint ventures and to swaps.
Asking rents remain stable and leases for larger amounts of space are
subject to lengthy negotiations.
Margins are shorter and the difficulties greater on the outskirts of the
Spanish capital where the completion of one ring road and the onset of a
second have prompted a rush to build suburban business parks.
Healey and Baker opened its first Spain office in Madrid in the boom times
of 1988 and has since added a second in Barcelona. It continues to back
Spain because it perceived a high level of activity over the past six months
both from pace-setting domestic retailers and from international retailers
anxious either to establish themselves or to expand their existing outlets.
Non-Spaniards view Spain as the largest underdeveloped market for the retail
trade. Spanish multiple retailers, who have shown great expertise in tapping
the teenage and youth market - 35 per cent of the Spanish population is
under the age of 25 - have known this for some time.
The domestic retailers are accordingly opening up for trading at a giddy
pace on the high streets of the main Spanish towns. The larger provincial
cities have been the focus of many retailer expansion plans and Healey and
Baker sees in them the best prospect for rental growth. Until the
spendthrift Spaniards catch up with the realities of the economic slowdown,
this particular niche of the property market will continue to be buoyant.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
ADDITIONAL PROPERTY COSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Landlords costs in letting  Agents fees: 10 per cent of first
of a building               year's rent
                            Legal fees: 0.5 per cent
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tenants costs in leasing    Agents fees: 10 per cent of average annual
of a building               rent
                            Legal fees: 0.5 per cemt
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Sale costs by investor      Agents fees: 2 per cent-3 per cent
or owner/occupier           Legal fees: 2 per cent of total sale cost
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Purchase costs by investor  Agents fees: 2 per cent-3 per cent
or owner/occupier           Legal fees 1 per cent
                            Transfer tax + stamp duty: 6 per cent of
                            sale price + 12 per cent
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Healey &amp; Baker
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3586</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 4: Strong incentives for diversification -
Equity Investment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINE MOIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ACROSS Europe today, property investment capital is mainly on hold. Whereas
the late 1980s were characterised by opportunistic cross-border raids, now
there is the busy clatter of domestic rebuilding. From a few corners comes
the glum note of wounds being licked.
The last takeover of note was the Pounds 500m agreed bid by the Swedish
insurance group SPP for London &amp; Edinburgh Trust in early April 1990. Five
months later, in August, another Swedish company (the property group,
Njordstjernan) held earnest bid talks with Speyhawk before aborting the deal
and leaving the British group's shares to fall by a third.
International commentators were not surprised by the abrupt withdrawal of
the Swedes. They had only just been freed to invest abroad and had seized
the opportunity perhaps over-enthusiastically.
But the problems of Swedish companies as they faced up to over-gearing at a
time of falling valuations, was to have echoes elsewhere, even among those
seasoned internationalists, the Dutch.
In 1988, fired with enthusiasm for the equity route into the UK property
market where it had snapped up the niche operator, Haslemere, the Dutch
property fund Rodamco made a Pounds 1.3bn bid for Hammerson, Britain's
third-largest property group. It failed. Buttressed by Standard Life, its
loyal 29 per cent shareholder, Hammerson saw the Dutch off with a sparkling
earnings forecast and a tailor-made set of valuations nearly Pounds 2.50 a
share higher than the offer price.
That was in January 89. Before long, unfortunately, both parties were to
wilt under the changed climate. Last year, Hammerson's performance visibly
sagged, but 1991 was no happier for Rodamco. The decline in international
property values, especially when translated into guilders, has forced Dutch
property funds to abandon their buy-back guarantees to investors. Rodamco
has also thought it prudent to find a protector in ABP, the Dutch government
workers' pension fund, which has agreed to take a 12.5 per cent stake, and
to discuss 'co-operation' - up to and including a merger - with PGGM, the
joint local authorities fund. Under this overtly defensive strategy,
however, most observers sense the Dutch fund repositioning itself for its
next surge forward. The ABP deal would bulk out Rodamco's war chest by as
much as Pounds 800m.
A possible deal with PGGM would lead to it managing a further Pounds 1.5bn
property portfolio in addition to more than Pounds 3bn of ABP's.
Some think that Mr Cornelis van Rijn, Rodamco's chairman, might come again
for Hammerson, this time having squared matters with Standard Life. Others
think that the psychological barriers against revisiting defeat will lead
him to look elsewhere in Europe.
Rodamco's is not the only restructuring underway on the Dutch property
scene. In January this year, another property fund, VastNed, absorbed its
own international management arm - Compagnie Financiere du Benelux  - which
provides property expertise for a number of groups, including the
Luxembourg-based property fund, Immocorp.
But the most interesting alternative to the Rodamco arrangements is the
negotiation currently underway between Wereldhave, the property company
which owns one of the middle-ranking British groups, Peachey, and VIB, a
prominent Dutch insurer. Those who feel Rodamco's cuddling up to ABP
excludes the ordinary investor hope the Wereldhave/VIB talks will lead to a
full merger and a continuing stock market quotation.
A meeting of minds between Wereldhave's entrepreneurs and the prudent
insurers and actuaries of VIB is expected to take some time, however.
Meanwhile the honour of reopening cross-border property takeovers may fall
elsewhere. Mr Ray Jones, property analyst for Paribas Capital Markets,
thinks the Spanish could be the first to make a move.
At least two leading Spanish property groups have recently carried out
capital raising exercises which would give them respectable fighting funds
if they felt inclined to go on the offensive. Moreover Vallehermoso, the
group which dominates the domestic markets, is thought to have been sniffing
out potential targets in recent months.
In France, which has also been conspicuously absent from cross-border
takeovers, the boot seems to be on the other foot. There, property companies
which had hitherto shunned the spotlight are now actively seeking
international institutional investors. The ending of the near tax-free
status of French property companies is the reason for the change of heart.
If they must pay tax like other industries there is little attraction in
keeping the shares within a tight family circle any more. A collection of
passive shareholders from different countries could allow the founders to
defend themselves against predators through a divide-and-rule policy.
British institutions are the most likely takers. Although most have large
direct property portfolios - both at home and abroad - they have learned
from long experience of international property investment that it is rash to
step off an aircraft in a foreign country with bundles of money to spend on
buying buildings. The indirect route, through equity investment in local
developers, remains an attractive alternative.
Unfortunately, until it is clear that the worldwide property recession has
bottomed out, would-be cross-border shareholders may continue to sit on
their hands. A number of unit trusts specialising in pooled international
property investment are thought to be on the launch pads. But they, too, are
waiting - until the smaller pension funds are ready to open their cheque
books once again.
It will happen; the incentives for international diversification are strong
and the need for alternatives to direct property holdings also pressing.
According to the analysts the depression will not take long to vanish once
it has begun to lift.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3587</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 3: Cross-border pooled funds arrive -
Investment flows
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINE MOIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CROSS-BORDER property investment in Europe has undoubtedly been slowed by
the simultaneous economic recession and property slump. From Spain to
Austria, European property groups are still busy with schemes and deals
outside their own regional origins, but most would have been planned more
than 12 months ago.
Swedish groups, whose 1990 European property investments topped even those
of the Japanese, are widely known to have been forced back home by the
economic squeeze. But past deals have still to be worked through. SPP, for
example, having acquired London &amp; Edinburgh Trust in April 90, is busy
moving LET's management to Brussels, completing a retail development in
Vienna and continuing with the redevelopment in London's East India Dock.
Another Swedish property group, Hufvustaden, is completing a city centre
redevelopment in Zaragoza in Spain with backing from Banco de Bilbao.
Whether they, or many of the other still-active developers, could obtain
investment backing today for new schemes is another matter. The latest
formal figures for cross-border investment flows - produced by Hillier
Parker - only take us to the end of 1990, the peak year in this trend so
far.
The figures for 1991, when they are available in the summer, will show a
marked downturn, according to Mr Alan Patterson, the Hillier Parker
researcher. And the early part of this year will show a further weakening.
Hillier Parker's figures are supported by market information from Weatherall
Green &amp; Smith's continental Europe-watcher in Amsterdam, Mr Dick Grillo. He
sums up investors' attitudes in one word: caution.
That said, there are pockets of attraction and investors with cheque-books
at the ready. The UK, for example, despite entering the recession earlier
than its European competitors, and with a much sharper decline in property
values on the back of historically high voids and falling rents, continues
to attract German, French and Dutch funds.
Mr Peter Evans, head of research at Debenham Tewson &amp; Chinnocks, identifies
three factors in London's current attractiveness to continental European
investors: London property is cheap; it is a continuously large and deep
market; and Britain's membership of the ERM provides comfort in terms of
reduced currency risk.
The Brussels office market, usually solid but unexciting, is showing rental
growth of 10 per cent pa as the European Commission's evacuation of its
Berlaymont headquarters has put pressure on space throughout the city.
Mr Grillo singles out Brussels and a clutch of German cities (Berlin,
Dusseldorf, Hamburg, Stuttgart and Frankfurt) as those showing solid
investor demand in an otherwise patchy to weak pan-European market.
Most investors, therefore, in most areas, are holding fire but could be
tempted out either by a bargain or the sight of other investors possibly
stealing a march on them. And this may prove the real short-term fillip to
the market. For a new breed of investor is making an appearance in the
pan-European property arena: the cross-border pooled fund.
Deregulation has been later in coming to continental Europe than to Britain.
But it has now arrived. Almost everywhere local investment vehicles are now
free to invest abroad. The approach of 1993 will free the remainder at least
within the boundaries of Europe. And some of these funds, mainly open-ended
investment companies (OICs), are very large indeed.
Most internationally-minded of the German OICs - the Dresdner Bank offshoot,
DEGI - is a DM5.2bn fund of which property accounts for two-thirds. Even the
modest DM350m which is earmarked for property investment outside Germany
would create a significant platform and DEGI has already begun to build it.
Last year, for instance, DEGI acquired Lloyd's Bank Chambers in London's EC3
banking district, and MEPC's new development at 122/6 Chancery Lane.
The French are also enthusiastically creating pooled funds. Banque Pallas,
together with various French institutions, GAM, Cassis du Depot and Swiss
Life, wants to see its Pallas European Investment Fund reach Ff1bn. Credit
Nationale, at the head of 14 institutions, has the same figure in mind for
its Europolis Invest.
Not to be outdone, UK fund managers are also launching new European-focused
institutional unit trusts; most recently Mercury European Real Estate Fund -
from the House of Warburg, but registered in the Dutch Antilles and listed
in Dublin.
Although these funds, by themselves, do not amount to the mythical 'wall of
money' which would immediately turn slump into boom, they may be enough to
put a floor under the European market this year, until the longer-term
attraction - even necessity - of pan-European property investment reasserts
itself.
There can be no residual doubt that pan-Europeanism is on its way and that
1992 represents only the taste of the unification still to come.
In a recent paper, Hillier Parker's international partner, Mr David Gore,
spelled out the role of the property industry within this trend.
'The true cost of locating in one country versus another will be easier to
assess and carry less risk' once monetary union is reached, he said.
Meanwhile, in the lead up to it 'corporate activity - mergers and takeovers,
relocations and rationalisations to establish market share - will be funded
by real estate.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3588</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 2: Pace of change will accelerate - Trade
barriers / It will be years before uniformity is possible in the European
property network
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINE MOIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OPERATING in Europe is so old hat to the property professionals that they
will barely lift their heads at the passing of '1992'. Surveyors Weatherall
Green &amp; Smith, for example, opened their first office in continental Europe
 -in Paris - in 1964.
Throughout the 1970s and 1980s a string of branches and subsidiaries was
laid down across Europe, and the process has not stopped. Last year saw
Amsterdam added to the network. Last month, the company moved into Unter den
Linden in East Berlin, the sixth Weatherall branch in Germany since the firm
opened its first in Frankfurt in 1973.
All the leading firms of surveyors have similar networks, developed over the
past 25 years or so and constantly evolving. Some - such as Jones Lang
Wootton and Richard Ellis - have followed the same path as Weatherall,
establishing their own operations.
Mr Dick Grillo, head of Weatherall's Amsterdam office, says: 'We hire
nationals wherever we go, but the senior partner is usually British. Where
we find we are excluded as foreigners from some part of the business or we
need a local licence, we hire someone with the qualification or sub
contract. It's not a problem.'
Others, however, have gone a different route, building up correspondent
relationships with existing local agencies in each location. Debenham Tewson
&amp; Chinnocks, for example, are internationally known for their links with
Zadelhof in Germany and Jean Thouard in France.
Hillier Parker has one of the most extensive and formal of these
correspondent networks: its International Commercial Property Associates'
Network (begun in 1980) is now a virtual mini EC, with 12 members, 40
offices across Europe and 1,400 staff.
Mr David Gore, Hillier Parker's international partner, concedes that each
route has its advantages and disadvantages. In the 1960s, Hillier Parker had
its own operations in France and Holland but during the 1970s it began to
believe it could make the best of local expertise through an exclusive link
with one local agent per country. 'That way we have both local knowledge and
an international overview.'
The first correspondent relationship - with Jean Claude Bourdais in France -
has given Hillier Parker access to 400 staff in a dozen provincial French
locations as well as central Paris and La Defense. In Germany, the
correspondent is Dr Aengevelt who has offices in Frankfurt, Dusseldorf,
Berlin, Stuttgart and Hamburg.
Where the local correspondent agency does not pursue certain types of
business - such as in Switzerland where the local partner excludes shopping
centres from his range - Hillier Parker may intervene directly on behalf of
the client. But the general principle is that the local agent carries out
all the work for clients introduced by the British firm to the client's
formula. And vice versa in Britain.
The advantage to the client is that it can tap local knowledge while
retaining consistency. 'And for multi-nationals,' says Mr Gore, 'consistency
is everything. Markets, however, are about 'feel' which you only get in the
market.'
Established firms are, therefore, perfectly comfortable with their networks
and their ability to cope with different regional ways of operating. But
newcomers and clients remain sensitive to just how wide the differences are.
Mr Grillo is unperturbed by Dutch regulations which insist that only a
makelaar-taxateur can carry out a valuation for bank lending; his firm has
members of the Dutch association of makelaars on its staff. A multinational
wanting to set up in the Netherlands would be stumped.
This is the issue currently being addressed by the second EC directive on
the recognition of qualifications. A first attempt to persuade EC countries
to recognise qualifications obtained elsewhere in the Community foundered on
French hostility to the lowest common denominator principle which produced a
standard they regarded as unacceptably below the French Loi Hoguet
conditions for obtaining a carte professionelle.
Even this second directive is running into regional professional jealousies,
however, and only a handful of countries have so far implemented it. As we
went to press the Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors (the designated
authority for recognising most property-related qualifications) was awaiting
proposals, based on that directive, to enable continental European
professionals to operate in the UK without having to take the whole RICS
qualification course.
So far only the UK, Ireland, Denmark and Spain have implemented the
qualifications directive, even in these broad terms. Harmonisation of
fundamental practices in the property field is even less advanced. In fact,
property per se is specifically exempted from the 1992 Single Market
programme, so wide are the discrepancies between the Napoleonic Code, Roman
Law and British Law on which local practices are based.
One particularly thorny issue is the question of valuing properties in
Germany where there is no central body responsible for setting valuation
standards. As a result, Germany remains out of line with the other main
markets such as the UK, France and Italy.
Under German government guidelines from the mid-1970s, market value is
determined to lie between so-called intrinsic and investment value.
Investment value splits the income between the site (in perpetuity) and the
building (over its economic life). Intrinsic value is a combination of the
value of the site and the depreciated replacement cost of the building. This
tends to overvalue buildings in secondary and tertiary locations at the
expense of those in prime spots. It also prevents agents valuing reversions
in a country which combines rents indexed to low inflation with a rising
real property market.
Over the past 25 years, cross-border demand for property in Europe has
effected only minor changes in different local practices such as this. The
pace of change will undoubtedly increase with the expansion of demand
generated by the Single Market but it will be many years before uniformity
is possible in the European real estate infrastructure. Until then,
entrepreneurs and executives will need their hands held by professional
advisers who combine deep local experience with an international breadth of
view.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3589</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / European Property 1: Unified market a long way off -
Recession has blunted the impact of changes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPE'S property market, like the businesses it serves, may be at a turning
point. The lifting of trade barriers, European Monetary Union and the
dismantling of the iron curtain will have far-reaching implications.
But the impact of these momentous changes is blunted by the recession that
has swept through much of the market. The debate about property in the new
Europe is dominated by planners, lobbyists and conference organisers, rather
than investors, developers or tenants.
Bold questions are being asked. Which cities and regions will be the gainers
and losers from the vision of a united Europe and the opening of the former
communists countries in the east? How far will the highly diverse practices
of the European property markets converge? How can advantage be taken of
these changes?
The conclusions being advanced in research documents and reports should be
treated with caution: many of the claims made by cities and regions amount
to little more than posturing. Europe is not a blank page on which a logical
plan of a united Europe can be superimposed. The diverse attitudes,
traditions and regulations of its property markets will not dissolve with
the lifting of trade barriers.
One of the striking features of the Single European Act is the apparent
absence of significant implications for the property industry. Not one of
the directives which come into force at the end of this year makes a direct
reference to property.
For all that, there seems little doubt that the new Europe will see a more
integrated property market and more direct competition between leading
centres.
Rather like the rivalry between cities in 15th century Italy, the cities of
Europe are striving to outdo each other in their efforts to attract the
headquarters of pan-European businesses. The prizes are provided by
companies such as Pilkington, the UK glass maker, which has moved the
headquarters of its flat and safety glass to Brussels away from St Helen's
in the north of England. UK.
The competition will produce losers as well as winners. 'In the context of
Greater Europe, the credibility of the notion of the continuing viability of
12 or more national capitals becomes strained,' comments Jones Lang Wootton,
property consultants.
Individual cities will fulfil different roles; capitals of finance, politics
and manufacturing are emerging from the leading cities of northern Europe.
The battle is being fought on accessibility to markets and clients, and the
quality of telecommunications and transport systems.
A survey of 500 European executives last year by Harris Research Centre
found that London was the leading financial capital, ahead of Frankfurt and
Brussels. Brussels was expected to be the most important political centre
over the next five years ahead of Berlin and Paris. Frankfurt was the most
important city for the headquarters of manufacturing industry.
London's role as Europe's pre-eminent financial centre could be under
threat, not least as a result of the UK's ambivalence about a unified
Europe. 'Its position of dominance is not unassailable, particularly as the
competitive climate is changing rapidly,' comments Debenham Tewson Research,
property adviser.
Its chief rival is Frankfurt, which has been strengthened by the
reunification of Germany. Frankfurt, like London and Amsterdam, is making a
strong bid to host the European central bank.
As well as the rivalry between cities, there is increasingly a tendency to
promote trans-national regions within Europe. EC policy makers have drawn up
a map of Europe's favoured cities which describes a banana-shaped zone that
sweeps through London, Paris and Amsterdam, extends from southern Germany
through Milan into northern Italy then spreads westwards into southern
France and to Barcelona and Valencia.
This zone, dubbed the 'hot banana', is likely to attract head offices and
research facilities as a result of its superior transport and
telecommunications links. The trend is not uniform, however. Many powerful
cities within Germany, such as Hamburg, Bremen and Berlin, fall outside the
zone. And the opening of eastern Europe and the agreement between the
European Free Trade Assocation and the EC to create a large trade area may
pull companies away from the centre.
Another region that should increase in importance is the sunbelt, a strip of
land running from Barcelona to Trieste by the Cote d'Azur. Its supporters
expect it to outstrip the economies of the three countries it spans as a
result of the modernity of its industry, its high level of training and the
quality of its infrastructure.
Investors should not be carried away, however. Most of the towns within the
belt have illiquid property markets. And even its most fervent promoters do
not expect it to challenge the triangle encompassing London, Frankfurt,
Paris and Brussels as the continent's administrative, financial and business
centre.
Ultimately, the forces reshaping Europe will affect the costs of renting
offices in its competing centres. 'Convergence may lead to a reshuffling of
the first division' says Mr Stephen Mallen, head of research at Knight Frank
&amp; Rutley, chartered surveyors. But for the moment, its is recession rather
than the prospect of the single European market that is redrawing the
contours of Europe's rental market. Rents in the City of London, long the
highest in Europe, are now matched by Paris, Madrid, Frankfurt - and even
Berlin and Prague where demand and shortages of office space have sent rents
soaring.
Even leaving aside the shifts in prosperity of Europe's cities, property
investors will be affected by the move towards the single European market.
Perhaps the greatest impact of the unified market will come from monetary
union, which will enforce a low inflation regime on EC members. This could
enhance property's investment prospects: investment allocation in 20 years
of low inflation in Germany has moved money away from equities to bonds and
property.
There will also be more cross-border investment. In some cases, institutions
are being released from regulations that tied them to their domestic
markets. Reduced currency risks have made them bolder about mismatches
between their assets and liabilities.
Traditionally there has been little pan-European investment, except in the
case of UK and Dutch investors. The sum of all cross-border flows between
France, Germany, Italy, Benelux and Iberia was just Pounds 600m in 1989,
according to Hillier Parker, chartered surveyors. Although investment
slumped in 1991, it is likely that cross-border activity will increase, with
some large investment vehicles being created, particularly in France and
Germany. Attention is focused on the countries in the former eastern bloc,
although legal and planning problems are hindering investment.
As investors roam across boundaries it is possible that property yields will
partially converge. But the creation of a single European market will not
iron out the differences between individual markets. Indeed, if regions
specialise in different industries, local variations should be enhanced.
'Harmonisation of economic policies should not lead to convergence of
cyclical behaviour in the case of real estate,' comments Ms Dika Alogoskoufi
of Jones Lang Wootton.
The diversity of different regions creates difficulties as well as
opportunities for investors. There is a long history of overseas buyers
overpaying in markets they do not truly understand. Even in markets that do
not suffer from corruption, illiquidity or excessive bureaucracy, outsiders
should be wary of the differences in lease structures, valuation methods,
conduct of transactions and legal and tax regimes. The arrival of a unified
property market is a long way off.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3590</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Appointments: Running London from Oslo
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Den norske Bank, the struggling Norwegian bank, has made Anne Oian the new
chairman of its London subsidiary Den norske Bank PLC.
Oian, who has been at the bank since 1974, and, at one level below the main
board, ranks as its most senior woman, will remain in Oslo, where she is in
charge of group shipping activities - one profitable area of the bank.
She replaces Tom Grondahl, chairman since 1990, who had been head of the
international department, but, since the latter was merged with the large
corporates division at the beginning of this year, he is looking after
international financial institutions.
The Norwegians are also bringing John Simpson (below) back from Hong Kong to
become chief executive of Den norske's London operations, which comprises a
branch as well as the subsidiary. Simpson returns in May after his
secondment as chief executive of Unibank in Hong Kong.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3591</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Appointments: Hunter leaves his footprint
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
'One of the principal features of our headquarters at present is a lot of
empty offices,' boasts HunterPrint chief executive Tony Caplin, who is
trying to turn round the specialist magazine and catalogue printer.
Another office has just been vacated, notably that of deputy chairman and
founder Michael Hunter, who has resigned 15 months after Sir Ian MacGregor,
80 next September, replaced Hunter as chairman in a refinancing operation.
Hunter, 55, once a leading entrepreneur and innovative force in the printing
industry, incorporated his company in 1965; but three years ago he slipped
up with the timing of his decision to amalgamate operations, previously
spread around the country, into a single site at Corby. Probably the most
modern web offset plant in the UK under one roof, Corby, however, went up as
interest rates soared, the company had great difficulties relocating staff,
and HunterPrint teetered on the edge of bankruptcy. Enter Sir Ian and a team
including Tony Caplin, previously with First City of Great Britain, the
Canadian Belzberg brothers' then UK investment vehicle.
Although the shares are languishing, Caplin, 41, is proud of his record of
increased productivity and of a swelling order book - believed by industry
insiders to have been boosted recently by a big contract for one of the
Sunday supplements.
The new management at HunterPrint had not expected Hunter to want to stay on
the board following the rescue in December 1990 and hence were not surprised
by his decision to go now.
It is not known whether Hunter has other plans. He retains a 1.4 per cent
stake in the company - diluted heavily by the rescue package.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3592</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Appointments: Finance moves
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Jonathan Portal, formerly financial controller of Henderson Administration,
is appointed finance director of GROSVENOR VENTURE MANAGERS.
*****
Katsuari Rembutsu has been appointed chief executive of DAIWA EUROPE BANK;
he replaces Toshio Karigane who has returned to Tokyo. Alex Monnas has been
promoted to md of DAIWA EUROPE.
*****
Jose Ochoa, formerly with Citibank, has been appointed vice-president of
UNION BANK OF SWITZERLAND's private banking division in London.
*****
BH Kim, currently general manager of CHO HUNG BANK's Chicago office, is
appointed general manager of the bank's London office; he replaces Byung Joo
Byun, who will head the bank's international division in Seoul.
*****
Philip Bonney has been appointed a director of LLOYDS MERCHANT BANK's
corporate finance division; he moves from Hill Samuel.
*****
Howard Durey has been appointed personnel director, and Mian Zaheen a
director, of LAZARD BROTHERS.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3593</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Appointments: Departures
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Stacey Ellis is to take early retirement from INCHCAPE from June 5.
*****
Richard Wade has resigned from JERSEY ELECTRICITY.
*****
David Peters is retiring from FISONS with effect from June 30.
*****
Terry Nash has resigned as the chief executive of the CHARTERED INSTITUTE OF
MARKETING.
*****
David Malcolm is retiring after 36 years with ROYAL INSURANCE.
*****
Garnet Harrison, Ryan Cove and Peter Ramsay have resigned from the FIRST
PHILIPPINE INVESTMENT TRUST.
*****
Murray Stuart, previously chief executive of Berisford International, has
resigned from HUNTER SAPHIR since he was Berisford's appointee on that
board. Ken Dubery, whose responsibilities at Hunter Saphir include food
companies which are being sold, is retiring.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3594</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG gave up early gains as traders turned their attention to the
world cup cricket match between England and South Africa. The all-gold index
fell 1 to 1,208. Industrials fell 15 to 4,392 and the all-share lost 8 to
3,571.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3595</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets: Battle of wits sways Indian equities -
State-owned institutions are trying to control the market's bulls, says RC
Murthy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RC MURTHY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
This week has seen a battle of wits in the Bombay equity market, between
bullish traders on one side, and state-owned mutual funds and other
institutional investors on the other.
After hitting a peak on Monday, as the bull market accelerated following the
budget on February 29, the BSE index took successive plunges on Tuesday and
Wednesday as institutions sold heavily to cool the overheated bourse; but
the bull players could not be denied yesterday, when the index recovered
78.29, or 2.5 per cent, to 3,241.97.
This week's concerted action by institutional investors interrupted a
four-month bull run. Acting on a warning from the governor of the Reserve
Bank of India, the country's central bank, the institutions focused on key
shares such as Tata Iron and Steel, and Reliance Industries, to have the
maximum psychological effect.
Equities fell 10.8 per cent over Tuesday and Wednesday; Mr Hemendra Kothari,
BSE president, had said that a 15 per cent correction would be healthy.
However, while state-owned investment houses continued their selling
yesterday, this was quickly mopped up by big bulls who renewed their buying
on end-account considerations, aiming to push up prices and reduce the
margin money they have to pay on long positions.
The February 29 budget exempted investment in shares from wealth tax, and
brought a flood of money into equities from commodities and other markets.
On top of that, a win for the minority PV Narasimha Rao administration in
parliament on Monday was seen as a vote of confidence for market-friendly
policies.
Share prices nearly trebled in local currency terms between early July, when
the BSE index stood at 1,293.67, to last Monday's 3,547.60 peak. The
proposed opening up of the stock market to overseas pension funds, which is
part of the budgetary package, will tighten equity market liquidity even
further, unless the overseas funds decide to wait till the market settles to
what they see as realistic levels.
They may have currency reservations. The rupee has now been devalued twice
over the past eight months, by a total of nearly 28 per cent - first in July
by 18.8 per cent and again last week by 9.1 per cent. A dollar fetches
Rs29.32, against Rs21.14 in early July.
However, this has still left Indian share values nearly doubling in dollar
terms over the past eight months against a trebling in local currency terms;
and the 9.1 per cent rupee depreciation last week was part of a budget
package which made the rupee partly convertible, by allowing exporters to
sell on the market 60 per cent of their foreign currency earnings.
Under a dual rate system, the free market price is hovering around Rs29.50,
against the official rate of Rs25.92 to the dollar applicable to 40 per cent
of export earnings.
Foreign exchange dealers expect the rupee to depreciate by another 5 to 10
per cent later this month, as importers enter the market to cover their
foreign currency needs for overseas debt servicing. But this has actually
helped export-oriented and other foreign currency-earning companies, and
they are expected to get a further boost if the rupee depreciates further.
The Birla-owned Century Textile and Industries has appreciated by Rs2,850 to
Rs9,800 over the past two months; Essar Shipping has nearly doubled to
Rs112.50; and Great Eastern Shipping has risen 40 per cent to Rs157.50.
Meanwhile, four Indian companies - Tata Steel, Reliance Industries, Essat
Gujarat and the Birla-owned Grasim Industries - plan to hit the Euro-equity
market to raise Dollars 400m to Dollars 500m over the next six months.
Their price-earnings ratios, which range from 15.8 for Essar Gujarat to 47.4
per cent for Tata Steel, are lower than many others. Hoechst India is on a
p/e ratio of 108, Indo-Gulf Fertilisers on 65 and Colgate-Palmolive India on
59.
All four companies have major expansion projects, which should enhance
earnings after they become operational. Traders predict that share prices of
the four will rise further. They reckon that Tata Steel, which has retreated
to Rs450 after hitting Rs502 last week, will touch Rs600 later this year.
Mr Kothari says a major correction should come in May or earlier when the
corporate results season may not match up to expectations. 'But in the long
run,' he adds, 'we are all bullish.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3596</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Dealers try to justify the
continent's gloomy mood
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DEALERS looked for reasons to explain the feeling of gloom on the Continent
yesterday, writes Our Markets Staff.
PARIS revived sheep-like characteristics not seen for several months, and
followed London and Wall Street lower. Dealers were surprised that the
CAC-40 index found no support at 1,950 and blamed it on profit-taking in a
thin market. The CAC-40 index closed 26.27 or 1.3 per cent lower at 1,941.75
in turnover of FFr2.4bn.
Elf fell to FFr358, below the FFr360 issue price for the government's sale
of 2.3 per cent of the company before closing 10 centimes down at FFr360.20.
LVMH lost another FFr106 to FFr4,564. Lyonnaise-Dumez dropped FFr19 or 3.7
per cent to FFr492 on rumours that a big US contract to build an offshore
platform had been cancelled. Chargeurs dropped FFr34 to FFr1,196 on
disappointment with its 1991 results.
Hachette fell FFr9.50 to FFr175 after the Italian media magnate, Mr Silvio
Berlusconi,said that his bid to take over Hachette's bankrupt TV affiliate,
La Cinq, had met tough resistance in Paris.
FRANKFURT kept a low profile, with turnover remaining flat at DM5.3bn. The
FAZ index fell by 4.40 to 707.83 at midsession, and the DAX by 15.92 to
1,727.50 at the close.
Declines in the big three chemicals reflected their results this week, BASF
(the worst) falling DM3.50 to DM245.10, Hoechst by DM3.10 to DM252.40 and
Bayer, the only one to hold its dividend, by just DM1.30 to DM292.70.
Engineers and steels showed above-average declines after outperforming the
market in January and February. Mr Adrian Hopkinson of County NatWest said
that sellers might be looking for fundamental reasons to back a more general
feeling of gloom. For what it was worth, Thyssen may have been affected by a
14 per cent drop in German steel orders, in volume terms, in January; and
Mannesmann, apart from that, by cellular telephone projections, published on
Wednesday, which disappointed some observers.
MADRID concluded that hopes of an interest rate cut had to be shelved after
year-on-year inflation rose from 5.9 per cent in January to 6.8 per cent in
February. The general index closed 3.47 lower at 239.76.
Banesto, Bilbao Viscaya and Santander, which had recovered well in January
and February, fell by Pta145 to Pta2,955, Pta70 to Pta2,850 and Pta90 to
Pta4,780 respectively. But defensive stocks like utilities held up well.
Construction stocks were supported by news that the government planned to
spend more on roadbuilding.
MILAN fell on uncertainty ahead of the April general election and signs that
the San Paolo share offering was going badly. Around 95 per cent of monthly
call options were abandoned yesterday. Some dealers said that,
paradoxically, this was a good sign, since operators with whom the call
options had been taken out had not wanted to sell the underlying stock at
current low levels. The Comit index fell 3.35 to 511.35 in turnover
estimated at near Wednesday's L90.5bn.
Fiat fell L45 to L4,850 but recovered to L4,890 after hours. Mediobanca,
which has said it is ready to support San Paolo shares in London, fell L195
to L14,190. Trading in San Paolo shares is due to start in mid- The cement
company Calcestruzzi initially fell L900 or 5.5 per cent to L15,550 as the
market decided it had paid too much for a majority stake in the Greek cement
group Heracles. But it then recovered to L16,400 thanks to a large buy order
of 800,000 shares.
ZURICH remained depressed by high interest rates, as benchmark three-month
Eurofranc rates rose by  5/16 to 8 5/16 per cent. The SPI index fell 9.2 to
1,118.6.
BRUSSELS saw a few blue chips buck the market's easier trend. The Bel-20
Index fell 2.21 to 1,204.85, but Solvay rebounded after recent falls to end
BFr75 higher at BFr12,400 francs. There was heavy trading in Gechem which
fell BFr24 to BFr387.
AMSTERDAM ended lower as a late rebound failed. The CBS Tendency index fell
1.4 to 125.5. The market was disappointed by 1991 results from ABN Amro and
KNP. ABN Amro fell to Fl 46.20 before closing Fl 1.30 down at Fl 46.50. KNP
lost Fl 2.00 to Fl 45.60 after the company forecast lower first half net and
voiced concern about the overcapacity in the paper industry.
STOCKHOLM was unmoved by a 2.5 per cent year-on-year inflation for February,
the lowest in 23 years, or by Procordia's 21 per cent rise in 1991 profits.
The food and pharmaceuticals group saw its B shares close down SKr4 at
SKr203 as the Affarsvarlden General index fell 8.5 to 977.5 in turnover of
SKr377m.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                    FT-SE EUROTRACK 100 - MAR 12
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                           Hourly changes
  Open     10 am    11 am    12 pm    1 pm     2 pm     3 pm     close
 1152.30  1150.47  1150.62  1150.92  1148.82  1150.03  1151.34  1149.99
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
          Day's High  1152.30           Day's Low  1148.59
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
       Mar 11       Mar 10       Mar 9       Mar 6       Mar 5
      1161.88      1169.22      1165.45     1162.10     1169.56
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3597</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Tokyo and Hong Kong
continue to diverge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARE prices edged down on continued selling by corporate investors and
investment trusts, and closed a volatile day's trading at another new low
since October 1990, writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The Nikkei average lost 30.26 to 20,561.88 after a low of 20,331.60 in the
morning and a high of 20,713.90 in the afternoon. The index fluctuated late
in the day on index-linked trading, related to the exercise of options
contracts and arbitrage ahead of today's settlement of March futures
contracts.
Volume increased to 280m shares from 250m. Declines led advances by 557 to
401, with 161 issues unchanged. The Topix index of all first section stocks
slipped 6.27 to 1,427.21, as a total of 258 issues set new lows since the
start of last year, but in London the ISE/Nikkei 50 index picked up 6.30 to
1,123.48.
Traders said today's special quotation, or settlement for futures and
options contracts, was creating less concern than usual among market
participants due to the smaller arbitrage cash positions against the March
futures.
However, some dealers noted the possibility of large arbitrage unwinding,
since the price difference between the futures and cash indices has been
narrower than on previous occasions, providing less incentive for
arbitrageurs to roll over positions.
Companies and investment trusts were seen liquidating holdings of
large-capital stocks and high-technology issues in the morning. However,
bargain hunting by foreign investors lifted blue chips, which have been
heavily sold during the past week. Nippon Steel improved Y5 to Y310 and
Hitachi also Y5 to Y761.
Short-term traders targeted drug and Aids-related issues. Okamoto, the most
active issue of the day, advanced Y70 to Y1,370 and Nippon Zeon climbed Y25
to Y705.
Nippon Mining forged ahead Y43 to Y500. The stock had been suspended by the
stock exchange ahead of the announcement of its merger with Kyodo Oil.
On the negative side, brokers continued to lose ground on concern over a
growing scandal involving securities houses trying to window-dress client's
accounts, by selling loss-making investments to other clients.
Daiwa Securities, which will incur losses of up to Y73.5bn due to irregular
trading practices, fell Y29 to Y746. Investors were alarmed by the size of
Daiwa's loss, and were concerned about further revelations within the
industry. Nomura Securities lost Y30 to Y1,130 and Nikko Securities fell Y40
to Y602.
Other financials were also weak, with Tokio Marine and Fire down Y34 to Y986
and Yasuda Fire and Marine losing Y35 to Y653. Nippon Telegraph and
Telephone fell Y2,000 to a new all-time low of Y664,000.
In Osaka, the OSE average eased 3.53 to 22,051.07 in volume of 157.6m
shares.
Roundup
HONG KONG continued to stand out strongly in a mixed Pacific Rim yesterday.
Early profit-taking was overwhelmed by follow-through buying in HONG KONG,
which extended its rally in heavy trading. The Hang Seng index added 36.85
at 5,042.81, its second consecutive record high, in turnover of HKDollars
2.87bn, after HKDollars 3.21bn.
Bank and property shares, once again, turned in the day's best gains. HSBC
Holdings continued to advance in response to the results, putting on 50
cents to HKDollars 44.50. Among conglomerates, Hutchison Whampoa moved up 10
cents to HKDollars 16.00 and Jardine Matheson rose 50 cents to HKDollars
48.00.
AUSTRALIA retreated 1.1 per cent after weak performances in London and on
Wall Street overnight. The All Ordinaries index fell 17.7 to 1,591.4 in low
turnover of ADollars 155.2m.
Coles Myer dropped 36 cents to ADollars 11.02 on news that first-half net
profits rose by only ADollars 200,000 to ADollars 227.4m.
SINGAPORE finished higher, although Keppel Corp receded 25 cents to SDollars
7.45 in heavy volume of 3.6m shares after its convertible and warrants
rights issue was greeted with little enthusiasm.
The Straits Times Industrial index rose 13.34 to 1,461.01.
KUALA LUMPUR ended stronger in light trading as the pressure of the past two
weeks from liquidation by domestic investors ahead of the Tenaga Nasional
share offering started to ease. The composite index ended 4.06 up at 592.42.
TAIWAN ran up gently but failed to break through the important 5,000 level.
The weighted index climbed 19.38 to 4,984.86 in turnover of TDollars 31.2bn,
after Wednesday's light TDollars 19.45bn.
MANILA's composite index eased 1.82 to 1,118.21 in combined turnover of
231.4m pesos, after 102.1m. Meanwhile, BANGKOK's SET index rose 4.46 to
808.40, with some investors sidelined by the impending March 22 general
election.
NEW ZEALAND fell back on weak overseas markets. The NZSE-40 index lost 9.86
to 1,456.80 in thin turnover of NZDollars 13.2m. Telecom Corp was steady at
NZDollars 2.36 and Carter Holt Harvey dipped 2 cents to NZDollars 2.24, but
Brierley Investments went against the trend with a 1-cent gain to 99 cents.
SEOUL ended slightly up in choppy trading. Sunkyong rose on rumours that the
company was the most likely winner in the bids to be the second mobile
telecommunications maker. The composite index firmed 0.6 to 619.11 in
turnover of Won192.98bn (Won217.9bn).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3598</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Money Markets: Gloom grips traders
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GLOOM spread over the UK money market yesterday, with rates firming across
the board and the prospect of great uncertainty ahead.
A bigger-than-expected rise in Spanish inflation (0.7 per cent against 0.3
per cent) left the Spanish authorities without room to make another interest
rate cut. That, together with a fall in sterling, dealt a final blow to
hopes of a cut in the UK.
'The market is fighting scared. It's scared of a change of government or of
a hung parliament, the PSBR is a horror story, and there seems to be no end
in sight to the recession,' said one dealer.
'There seems to be nothing to relieve the gloom, and the feeling is if the
base rate is going in any direction, it might be up.'
Sterling interbank rates reflected this by going above a normal 10 1/2 per
cent gearing, with the whole spectrum from the one week to one year at
between 10 5/8 and 10 3/4 per cent.
The key three-month interbank rate firmed  1/16 to 10-10 9/16 .
Heavy selling caused the June sterling contract to tumble from 89.56 to a
low of 89.31, defying expectations of strong support at 89.42, recovering
only to 89.34.
Day-to-day funding was easier, although overnight rates drifted up from 10
7/8 -10 5/8 per cent to 11 1/4 -11 before late lending by the Bank of
England brought them down to 11-10 3/4 per cent.
The Bank forecast a shortage of around Pounds 700m, but did not operate on
the early round. At midday, it revised the forecast down to Pounds 650m, and
purchased Pounds 207m band 1 bank bills and Pounds 54m band 2 bank bills,
both at 10 3/8 per cent.
The forecast was later revised back to Pounds 700m, and the Bank purchased a
further Pounds 125m band 1 bank bills, and Pounds 16m band 2 bank bills,
both at 10 3/8 per cent. It provided late assistance of Pounds 170m.
German call money rates remained locked at 9.55/65 per cent, with no sign of
easing, although high reserve levels and a DM3.1bn injection by the
Bundesbank on Wednesday were preventing a rise.
The Federal Reserve added reserves to the US banking system through four-day
system repurchase agreements, to cover a shortage caused by the maintenance
period ending on March 18. Federal funds were trading at 3 15/16 per cent,
below the Fed's presumed 4 per cent target.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3599</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
London's robusta COFFEE futures closed on or just below the day's highs and
New York arabicas were showing gains at midday as the markets continued to
derive support from sentiment that Brazil may be coming round to the idea of
an economic coffee pact with export quotas, dealers said. 'The will is there
for the market to turn and anything coming out from Brazil will bolster
prices,' said one. Brazil's foreign minister said on Wednesday night that
the Brazilian government was prepared to discuss export quotas. On the LME
ZINC And ALUMINIUM staged strong rallies to close higher, while COPPER
bounced off support to end with trimmed losses. Dealers said technical
factors mostly underpinned zinc and aluminium, with activity quickening
after a dull morning. Copper cut its losses in the afternoon with expected
support between Dollars 2,220-Dollars 2,225 a tonne for three-month metal
lifting prices back to Dollars 2,230, still down Dollars 8. LME warehouse
stocks are forecast to fall today. dealers said. Three-month TIN moved away
from Dollars 5,600 a tonne, with premiums continuing to prevail for quality
metal, despite talk of Brazilian shipments. Three-month NICKEL was unable to
hold above Dollars 7,600 a tonne.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3600</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: US wins and loses copper
smelter projects
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE BIG copper smelter project in the US was cancelled yesterday almost
exactly at the same time as another was given the go-ahead.
RTZ Corporation, the world's biggest mining company, said it would apply for
permits to build a Dollars 880m smelter at its Bingham Canyon complex near
Salt Lake City, with capacity to produce 272,000 tonnes of copper a year.
But Mitsubishi Material Corporation of Japan said it could no longer afford
to wait for permits for the smelter it planned at Texas City, Texas. It has
been battling US authorities and environmentalists over the smelter,
designed to produce 182,000 tonnes of copper a year, since 1989.
'We cannot afford to continue the project for cost and time reasons,' said
Mr Takeshi Nagano, MMC's chairman. Cancellation of the project, which would
have been a showpiece for Mitsubishi's own smelting technology, had been
expected in the industry. Many employees had been switched from Texas to
work on another copper smelter Mitsubishi plans for Thailand.
Mr Bob Wilson, RTZ's chief executive, said he had no doubt that his group's
project would also cause environmental controversy. But, whereas Texas City
was a greenfield project, RTZ's would replace an existing smelter with one
that was environmentally vastly superior. 'Also the Bingham Canyon complex
is already a major part of the local economy,' he pointed out. The mine and
smelter employ 2,400.
The new RTZ smelter will use 'flash smelting' technology developed by
Outokumpu, the state-owned Finnish group, followed by 'flash converting,' a
process developed by Outokumpu and Kennecott, the RTZ subsidiary which
operates Bingham Canyon. RTZ said this would enable more than 99 per cent of
the sulphur contained in the copper concentrate being processed to be
captured and sulphur dioxide emissions would be reduced to one twentieth of
the allowable level in Utah.
In addition, although the new smelter would have double the capacity of the
existing plant, it would use two-thirds less water and require only one half
as much energy per tonne of copper produced, said RTZ.
In the past few years Kennecott has spent more than Dollars 625m to
modernise and expand Bingham Canyon. A Dollars 219m fourth mill line started
up in January and this will boost annual production of copper concentrates
(an intermediate material) by 25 per cent to 1m tonnes. Bingham already
exports 40 per cent of its concentrates (mainly to Japan) and without the
new smelter it would have to send half its concentrates elsewhere for
smelting.
Mr Wilson said RTZ would save 7 cents a lb of copper produced (Dollars 154 a
tonne) on transport costs alone. The new smelter's operating costs would be
half those of the existing plant. For commercial reasons he refused to give
details of present costs.
RTZ was still keeping the industry guessing yesterday about its Lihir Island
gold project in Papua New Guinea, one of the biggest known gold deposits
outside South Africa. Mr Wilson said a feasibility study for the Dollars
770m project was being prepared for submission to the PNG government by the
end of this month but refused to be drawn about whether this indicated RTZ
would go ahead if the government agreed to the conditions contained in the
study.
The study looks for 2.8m tonnes of ore to be treated to produce 600,000 troy
ounces of gold annually for the first five years of operation.
The PNG government has been putting pressure of RTZ to make up its mind and
in July extended the UK group's prospecting licence for only nine months
instead of the usual two years. Mr Wilson said RTZ had applied for another
renewal of the licence. RTZ owns 80 per cent of Lihir, via Kennecott, with
Niugini Mining, a subsidiary of Battle Mountain Gold of the US, having the
other 20 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3601</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Fruit &amp; Vegetables
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Pineapples from the Ivory Coast are plentiful this week. Prices range from
60p-Pounds 1.50 a lb (Pounds 1.60-2.25). Other good buys include Cape Dan
Ben Hannah grapes 90p-Pounds 1.00 a lb (90p-Pounds 1.00), and bananas 48-60p
a lb (48-60p). Homegrown and Spania carrots are 15-20p a lb (15-20p). Other
good vegetable buys include broccoli 75-85p a lb (75-85p), spring cabbage
25-35p a lb (25-35p), and onions 18-30p a lb (18-30p). New crop British
Spring onions are now available 30-35p a bunch (35-45p). Other good salad
buys include celery 50-75p a head (50-80p), and British round 20-30p
(30-35p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3602</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Gold price under pressure
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GOLD WAS again under pressure yesterday. The price was 'fixed' in London at
its lowest for six months and below the psychologically-important level of
Dollars 348 a troy ounce. On the New York Commodity Exchange at one stage
the most-active April contract dropped to a new nadir of Dollars 347 an
ounce.
One dealer suggested: 'Gold's going down to the low 340s and it will be hard
work holding it up'.
However, Ms Rhona O'Connell, analyst at Williams de Broe, stockbroker, said
that, although the next few weeks would see gold at its weakest, 'we hold to
our expectation that a sustainable bull market will start around the middle
of the year, expect a 1992 average price of Dollars 370 to Dollars 375 an
ounce and a test of Dollars 400 before year-end.' In a special report on the
gold market, Ms O'Connell points out that it was unsettled in February by
steady sales from a German bank. The most likely source of the metal was the
Commonwealth of Independent States.
The Islamic fasting month of Ramadan started on March 6 and runs until April
6 and is contributing to nervousness as Middle Eastern speculative activity
is reduced. 'However, in recent weeks the Middle East has been a two-way
trader rather than a net buyer so no pillar of support has actually been
pulled away,' says Ms O'Connell. She adds that demand from China has
re-emerged after its New Year holiday 'and is roaring ahead'.
Yesterday's downward pressure was triggered by selling in New York by a
computer-managed fund, dealers suggested. In London gold closed last night
at Dollars 347.70 an ounce, down Dollars 1.30.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3603</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Problems piling up for
Caribbean sugar sector - A wave of labour unrest is adding to the woes of a
struggling industry, writes Canute James
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CANUTE JAMES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A WAVE of industrial unrest in the Caribbean sugar industry has compounded
earlier problems caused by falling production and changes in important
markets.
Exporters are having difficulty in retaining traditional markets and no new
ones are available; some export quotas have been reduced while some export
commitments are not being fulfilled.
The pain is most evident in Barbados, for which the sugar industry is a
relatively small but important pillar of the troubled economy. An eight-week
strike that delayed the start of this year's harvest has reduced production
at a time when the financially strapped industry has been trying to catch
its breath.
The industry was shut down late last year because it ran out of money. The
privately-owned Barbados Sugar Industry Ltd, which operates the island's
mills, owes a state-owned bank about USDollars 87m. New money has not been
available because the government is under pressure to reduce state spending.
It took a loan of Pounds 5m from Barclays Bank of the UK to get the industry
up on its feet again, but preparations by millers to start processing cane
in January were frustrated by a strike. Unions demanded an increase in wages
but the millers said they were unable to pay because of their weak finances.
It took the intervention of the country's prime minister to break the
impasse.
The industry is forecasting production of 50,000 tonnes for this year, which
will not be enough to meet its quotas to the European Community and the US
while satisfying domestic demand, for which about 73,000 tonnes would be
needed.
Failure to fill export quotas has also been a major worry for the Guyanese
sugar industry. In each of the past three years the country has pleaded
force majeure on scheduled shipments to the European Community as production
has faltered because of strikes and poor weather.
The industry expects to meet its EC quota of 167,000 tonnes this year
although production was only 155,000 tonnes last year, 25,000 tonnes more
than in 1990. Like other countries that fear a loss of their quotas if they
do not meet the supply schedules, Guyana and Barbados may be forced to
import sugar for the domestic market.
'The logic here is quite simple,' explains a Jamaican trade official. 'The
preferential markets such as the EC pay more than the exporters would get on
the world market. So they ensure they meet their quotas and then buy cheaply
on the world market for domestic consumption. The EC and the US do not like
this practice, but it is done fairly often.'
In Guyana and Barbados efforts are being made to improve the management of
the sugar industry and raise productivity. Booker Tate, a subsidiary of
Booker of the UK, is managing the state-owned industry in Guyana, and will
begin running the Barbados industry later this year.
The marginal improvement in output by the Jamaican industry over the past
two years was halted by a two-week strike at the island's nine mills that
ended this week. This year's target of 230,000 tonnes, if it is achieved,
will allow the island to meet its quota commitments.
The administrators of the industry in the Caribbean complain that region's
marketing and production plans are being adversely affected by changing
conditions in important markets, such as the US, where adjustments to import
quotas are frequent. In the current crop year, for example, most of the
Caribbean producers have had their US quota cut by 35 per cent, and others
by 10 per cent.
These changes, which are influenced mainly by the level of domestic US
production, are expected to reduce the Caribbean region's earnings by about
USDollars 70m. The reduction is hitting hardest in the Dominican Republic,
where industry has been in decline for the past decade. The cut of 35 per
cent in its US quota to 232,500 tonnes this year might have been less
painful had it not been for uncertainty over another valuable market. The
Dominicans had been supplying between 50,000 tonnes and 225,000 tonnes a
year to the Soviet Union. But with the break-up of the union Dominican
industry officials and bankers say there is uncertainty about future of
sales to the Commonwealth of Independent States, as it is now called.
Like most of the other Caribbean producers, production costs in the
Dominican Republic, which produced 628,000 tonnes last year, exceed world
market prices.
Strikes and production costs are not likely to be among the problems facing
the sugar sector in Cuba, the region's largest producer. Since the break-up
of the Soviet Union, which was the island's major market, short term
contracts with members of the CIS have brought some relief. But a
significant reduction in output is likely this year because of a late start
to harvesting and a shortage of fuel which has overtaken the embattled
economy. There are indications that output this year will be about 1m tonnes
less than last year's 7.6m tonnes.
The US industry, however, is already weighing the consequences of the
changes in Cuba's markets, with suggestions that this could leave the island
with millions of tonnes to dispose of on the world market. Depression of
prices would be compounded by a likely loss of market for some of Cuba's
neighbours, particularly if there were political changes on the island.
'In a post-Castro Cuba, the US would try to assist a new government if it is
democratic,' suggests Mr Julio Herrera, president of the Caribbean Basin
Sugar Producers Group. 'Cuba will inevitably turn to the US as a market for
its sugar. The US will be told that it has a moral obligation to buy Cuban
sugar.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3604</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Russia in disarray over
Sakhalin oil
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON and CHRYSTIA FREELAND
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW, KIEV
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RUSSIAN DEPUTIES are still in disarray over whether to block the award to a
US-Japanese consortium of a feasibility study for the development of oil and
gas reserves off the far eastern Sakhalin Island.
But despite this latest illustration of the chaos involved in trying to do
business in Russia, the consortium is optimistic that it will conclude a
feasibility study agreement by an end-March deadline agreed with the Russian
government.
Negotiators from the various parties, including Sakhalinmorneftegas, the
local oil and gas enterprise, are already in Moscow to finalise the terms
and conditions of the contract - even though it is understood that the
Russian government has yet to appoint its negotiating team.
The government chose the consortium - made up of McDermott, the US
engineering company, Marathon Oil Company, and Japan's Mitsui - as the
winners of a much dragged out tender process at the end of January. The
contract, which has yet to be signed, is to conduct a study into developing
two oil and gas fields with estimated reserves of 90m tonnes of oil and
condensate and 350bn cubic metres of gas.
But after a protest from the island's governor, Mr Valentin Fyodorov, a
special parliamentary commission was set up to investigate his claims that
the deal would harm local interests and that the tender was badly
structured.
Following the passing of a Monday deadline for a parliamentary decision on
the issue, Mr Vladimir Shumeiko, the deputy speaker who also heads the
commission, said in a newspaper interview that a decision would be reached
'in a few days' time'. He suggested that the commission would clear the deal
on condition that the government introduce anti-monopoly measures for the
exploitation of reserves. But a colleague on the commission, Mr Sergei
Mikhailov, said yesterday that some members, including himself, wanted to
scrap the deal and start the tender all over again.
To further confuse matters, it is not yet clear is what the two deputies
mean when they talk of the need to divide up 'the territory' among rival
consortia. If they mean sharing out the two fields - the gas-rich Lunskoye
and the oil-rich Piltun-Astokhskoye, which are the subjects of the study -
one executive from the consortium said the deal would probably lose its
attraction. If they mean dividing up the whole 17,000 sq km off Sakhalin,
thought to contain mineral wealth, of which the two fields represent a mere
5-10 per cent, the consortium would have no objections, even though a
feasibility study into one part could not avoid looking at the long-term
prospects for developing the whole area.
Ukraine has found a partial solution to its energy crisis by signing a deal
directly with the oil-producing Tiumen region in western Siberia, the
Ukrainian prime minister's office announced yesterday, writes Chrystia
Freeland in Kiev.
Under the agreement, concluded in Tiumen on March 5 by Mr Vitold Fokin, the
Ukrainian prime minister, and Mr Yuri Shafranik, the Tiumen region chief
administrator, Tiumen will supply Ukraine with an emergency 3.9m tonnes of
oil within the next two months. This is crucial for Ukraine because a cut in
traditional supplies from Russia has jeopardised the spring sowing of crops.
Tiumen has also agreed to provide an additional 2m tonnes of oil above and
beyond the 40m tonnes Russia as a whole had contracted to supply to Ukraine
in an earlier agreement.
Inter-governmental economic deals within the former Soviet Union have been
honoured most often in the breach and to prevent this Ukraine and the Tiumen
region have agreed to create co-ordinating centres in the Ukrainian capital
of Kiev and the city of Tiumen.
In exchange for the oil Ukraine has agreed to provide Tiumen with food,
consumer goods and manufactured goods at 1990 levels. Ukraine has also
promised to provide social guarantees for the 600,000 Ukrainians currently
employed in the Tiumen oil fields. Tiumen officials have worried they might
lose their workforce when the roubles they pay their Ukrainian workers are
replaced by a different currency in Ukraine.
Since becoming independent late last year Ukraine has sought to decrease its
dependence on the Russian central government for costly oil. One avenue has
been an agreement to purchase 5m tonnes from Iran.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3605</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Brazilian orange growers faced
with harvest delay
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   RIO DE JANEIRO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE HARVESTING of Brazil's 1992-93 orange crop will be delayed until July or
August, instead of the usual late May or June, because of lack of rain in
the flowering period, industry officials said, reports Reuter from Rio de
Janeiro.
Mr Roberto D'Andrea, director of external relations at Citrosuco Paulista,
one of Brazil's biggest producers of frozen concentrated orange juice, said
the delay would cause the industry's carryover to fall substantially.
By the end of March the industry should have a better idea of the length of
the delay in the harvest, one trader said. 'A two- to six-week delay is
possible,' he added.
'If the harvest is delayed it could cause stocks to be drawn down.'
Last month the AB Citrus industry association said that the Brazilian FCOJ
industry's carryover world-wide would fall to 157,000 tonnes by June 30,
1992, from 331,000 tonnes a year earlier.
Mr D'Andrea, who is also head of the National Association of Citrus
Industries, called those figures 'reliable'.
In recent weeks weather in the citrus region has been favourable to the crop
and rainfall has been sufficient, industry officials said.
Brazil's biggest producers of FCOJ made a preliminary estimate for the
1992-93 crop of 262m boxes (40.8 kg each), up from 240m boxes in 1991-92.
The Brazilian Association of Citrus Juice Industries (Abrassucos), which
represents small and medium size processors, made a preliminary estimate of
225m boxes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3606</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / The Property Market: One acquisition too many
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The appointment this week of administrative receivers to Randsworth
Acquisition, the West End property company, marks a sorry end to the first
excursion by US pension funds into the UK property market.
The US pension funds which joined JMB Realty, a Chicago-based investment
group, in making a Pounds 258m bid for Randsworth at the peak of the market
in 1989, have made heavy losses. JMB also made large losses on its stakes in
Rosehaugh and Priest Marians, two high-flying property companies that were
brought to their knees by the decline in the market.
The Randsworth deal suffered from a combination of poor timing and the
highly-geared nature of the acquisition vehicle. Randsworth was bought at
the peak of the market, at a 2 per cent premium to net asset value. Citibank
injected Pounds 180m of debt, while the investors put in Pounds 95m of
equity and Pounds 95m of loan notes. A relatively small decline in the value
of the underlying company, Randsworth Trust, which had borrowings of its
own, could wipe out the value of the equity in Randsworth itself.
The administrative receivers, KPMG Peat Marwick, have not yet gone through
Randsworth's books. But in April 1991, Credit Suisse First Boston calculated
that the portfolio's value was Pounds 327m. The portfolio, which is
concentrated in shops and offices in the West End, has probably fallen in
value since then.
Set against these assets are the claims of creditors, which lent some Pounds
450m to Randsworth, according to CSFB. The most secure are the debenture
holders, which have the first claim against Pounds 135m of the assets of
London &amp; Provincial Shop Centres, Randsworth's chief subsidiary. Then there
is Pounds 209m of bank debt, which is secured by first and second charges on
the property and a floating charge on other assets. Loan note holders and
equity investors are at the end of the queue.
Randsworth has not gone down without a fight. In early 1991, it raised a
further Pounds 58m from its shareholders. But over the past 15 months, its
attempts to raise more equity or persuade its bank to swap debt to equity
have failed.
This debacle has largely deterred other US investors from making excursions
into the UK property market. Even JMB, which expects to make further
property investments in Europe, says there may be 'a short term negative
effect from Randsworth'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3607</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / The Property Market: An ambivalent attitude
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The property industry has an uncomfortably ambivalent attitude to the main
political parties ahead of the UK general election on April 9.
It has reason to distrust the Tories for orchestrating the most damaging
boom and bust for decades; and Labour for its traditional antagonism towards
developers
At the same time, the sector cannot view the prospect of a hung parliament
with equanimity. Such an outcome would give investors and prospective
tenants an excuse to continue dithering. 'The worst result would be no
result,' says Mr Chris Bartram, managing partner of Jones Lang Wootton,
chartered surveyor.
The differences in policies between the two parties pale into insignificance
compared with the need for a decisive result that injects confidence into
the financial markets.
Above all else, the fortunes of the property industry are yoked to gilt
yields and interest rates. Any increase in rates would deter investors,
hinder refinancings, clobber valuations, weaken revenue accounts and
undermine the occupation market.
The industry's main fear is that the next government might be forced to
increase interest rates to bolster its own credibility.
Kleinwort Benson Securities says that long gilt yields would be 200 basis
points higher if the election resulted in a Labour-led hung parliament
compared with an outright Tory victory. That would translate into a decline
in net asset values of between 10 per cent and 15 per cent, Kleinwort adds.
The constraints of the exchange rate mechanism of the European Monetary
System limit both parties' room for manoeuvre on economic policy. The
soaring inflation of the 1970s, which enhanced the appeal of property to
investors, is unlikely to be repeated. The scope for boosting the economy
and investing in infrastructure is limited and the introduction of Labour's
minimum wage policy might further hinder growth, particularly in the retail
sector.
On planning matters, the property industry's attitude to Labour is
ambivalent. In some respects, it remembers past Labour governments with
affection, because the tight controls on planning boosted property values.
For example, the ban imposed on the construction of offices in London by
George Brown, Labour's secretary of state for economic affairs, in November
1964, sent rents and values spiralling upwards.
Labour still takes a tough line on planning matters. It will not, for
instance, brook any development in the green belt. But the differences with
the Conservatives have narrowed: the Tories have shed the laissez-faire
attitude towards development, most commonly associated with former
environment minister Mr Nicholas Ridley. Both parties emphasise the need for
sustainable development and anti-pollution measures.
The industry is sceptical about how far Labour has moved away from its
hostile 'pip-squeaking' attitudes of the early 1970s. Labour has sought to
reverse this image and its 'planning a new agenda' document declares that
'Labour is not anti-development'.
However, the Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors, a professional body,
is not entirely reassured.
Mr Christopher Jonas, senior vice-president of the RICS, says Labour's
proposal to introduce a 'third party right of appeal' against the granting
of planning permission that cuts across an agreed development plan could
make a developer's life 'a nightmare'.
Labour's proposals to end the automatic right of planning appeal and to
re-introduce separate categories of use for light industry and offices have
also come under fire. The idea that development plans should be reviewed
every two years is unrealistic and Labour condemnation of urban development
corporations is too sweeping, says the RICS. It also dislikes the
opposition's proposals to impose time limits on planning permission to
discourage speculators from hoarding land.
The RICS is not entirely negative about Labour's plans, however. Mr Jonas
says that Labour has 'hit the nail of the head' in its emphasis on regional
and local plans and the need to integrate planning and transport policies.
It applauds the idea of regional planning and welcomes the notion of urban
regeneration zones, which will have strong local authority involvement.
Past governments have had a drastic, often unwitting, influence on the
property industry. Today, however, the government's ability to interfere is
limited by the rigours of the ERM and the glut of empty properties. It is
the legacy of the late 1980s, rather than the promises of politicians, that
is likely to shape the property market in the near future.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3608</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: A fragile banking system
takes root - Leyla Boulton examines Russian efforts to strengthen the
domestic credit system in the face of inflation and political and economic
instability
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
For the casual visitor to Moscow, a proliferation of commercial banks would
appear the most tangible sign that a market economy is taking root in
Russia. With names such as 'Credobank' to inspire confidence, they promise
big returns on investment and aspire to respectability with support for
charity and the arts.
But after 74 years of socialism under which, as one central banker put it,
'money was not money and credit was not credit', emerging commercial banks
have a long way to go before they can provide the same sort of service as
their western counterparts.
The domestic credit system is in a mess. 'Our commercial banks are not
capable of extending a loan with a maturity of more than 12 months,' said Mr
Dimitry Tulin, deputy chairman of the Russian central bank. 'Inflationary
expectations are very high and there is political and economic instability.
Without investment credit, the economy cannot really exist.'
Domestic lending to enterprises comes mainly from state-owned commercial
banks. These banks' assets are likely to deteriorate over time, since their
loans were more like state subsidies than commercial advances. Their
problems are compounded by the fact that many of the banks are heavily
exposed to a single borrower, whom they were set up to serve exclusively.
This leaves the state the choice of allowing the enterprises to go bust or
continuing to support the banks.
The other category of commercial banks in Russia - the emerging private
institutions - prefer to lend their money to other banks, lucrative joint
ventures with foreign capital, or new-style commodity exchanges, rather than
make long-term commitments to future industrial production. To get round
this problem, Mr Alexander Titkin, the industry minister, said the
government would soon offer tax incentives for commercial institutions to
invest in industry.
Russian officials would also like to see the direct involvement of foreign
banks in the Russian banking market. Although most banks have long had
representative offices in Moscow, only one so far, France's Credit Lyonnais,
which had branches in Moscow and St Petersburg before the 1917 Revolution,
has established a banking subsidiary in Russia. Another bank, International
Moscow Bank, is a joint venture with 40 per cent foreign capital,
established a year ago.
Generally, foreign banks are staying well clear, scared off in part by the
recent crash of Vnesheconombank, the state bank responsible for servicing
the former USSR's foreign debt of more than Dollars 60bn. But they do not
appear to have written the country off altogether.
The efforts to build a banking system, though, are being hindered in part by
a lack of adequate banking supervision. Mr Tulin said: 'We don't even
believe in our ability to supervise properly. We are pretty sure we wouldn't
be ready to read a balance sheet even in our headquarters.
'We desperately need qualified people,' he added.
sia with some of the right qualifications is Mr Nikolai Domanov, the
32-year-old chief of the Russian central bank's supervisory department, who
spent half of last year being trained at central banks abroad. He wants to
present to parliament a special law on banking supervision, giving the
central bank the unquestioned authority to lay down the rules.
Mr Domanov has begun talks with the International Monetary Fund and the
World Bank on help in drafting new rules for the Russian banking system,
including measures to protect depositors. He also plans to introduce western
accounting standards so that the accounts of Russian banks are closer to
reflecting the true value of assets.
One focus for many of the efforts to strengthen the Russian commercial
banking system is the planned Development and Project Finance Bank (DPFB) in
Moscow, to be financed jointly by Russian commercial banks and international
organisations such as the World Bank. Organisers of the project, based at
the headquarters of the now-defunct Soviet central bank, are also hoping to
attract shareholders among western banks.
The aim of the DPFB, expected to start up in the first quarter of next year,
is to spread skills on risk-assessment, collateral and market analysis, and
to act as a catalyst for the provision of domestic project-finance funds.
The Development and Project Finance Bank could provide a half-way house for
western banks cautious about investing in Russia, but which would like a
safe foothold in the market just in case it takes off.
Another role will be to act as a conduit for the distribution of development
funds from the World Bank and other shareholders which are expected to
include the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development and the
European Commission.
Mr Sergei Konychev, the Russian banker who thought up the idea for the DPFB
and is helping to organise it, said the bank would require an initial
capital of Dollars 100m and a few billion roubles (the exact figure is
difficult to predict because of uncertainties about what the rouble will be
worth next year). Ten Russian commercial banks have agreed to provide the
rouble funds for the bank and may be persuaded to become shareholders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3609</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: CBOT to acquire broker
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA DURR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CHICAGO Board of Trade (CBOT), the world's largest futures exchange,
said its Ceres Trading Limited Partnership had signed a letter of intent to
acquire EJV Brokerage, an electronic interdealer broker of US government
securities, writes Barbara Durr.
The acquisition would give CBOT members direct access to the cash market for
US government securities for the first time.
EJV Brokerage is a wholly owned subsidiary of EJV Partners, a joint venture
among affiliates of the leading primary dealers - Citibank, First Boston,
Goldman Sachs, Lehman Brothers, Morgan Stanley and Salomon Brothers. The
CBOT, which lists the US Treasury bond futures, is general partner of Ceres
Trading.
The EJV Brokerage, operational since last May, will permit CBOT members and
member-firms to make bids and offers as well as accept bids and offers of
primary dealers on the electronic system.
It has 170 terminals in place on 35 primary dealer trading desks in New
York, Chicago and San Francisco. The network would be augmented with
stations at locations selected by CBOT members.
Any profits would accrue to the Ceres Trading Partnership and thus to CBOT
members, said Mr William O'Conner, CBOT chairman.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3610</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Profits rise at Saudi bank
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SAUDI International Bank (SIB), the London-based bank which is half-owned by
the Saudi Arabian Monetary Authority, has announced a 24 per cent rise in
pre-tax profits to Pounds 3.1m (Dollars 5.27m) for 1991 and net profits,
after a Pounds 3m tax credit, to Pounds 6.1m.
Operating profits rose 87 per cent to Pounds 22.3m after record income of
Pounds 48.1m, notably from strong Treasury earnings and increased fee income
from fund management and advisory work, against a 3.8 per cent rise in
expenses to Pounds 25.7m.
After agreement with the Inland Revenue over the bank's tax computations for
the preceding five years, SIB was able for 1991 to release Pounds 3m of
provisions against possible tax liabilities into the profit column.
The bank made a loan provision charge of Pounds 19.25m against loans in the
US and Britain, reflecting the continued recession. This takes total
provisions to Pounds 24.7m.
Mr Peter de Roos, chief executive, said SIB would see further profit growth
in 1992 in its core fund management, corporate finance, trade and Treasury
activities.
The bank's assets grew by over 8 per cent to Pounds 2.4bn, 78 per cent of
which was in bank deposits and marketable securities, leaving SIB in excess
of Bank for International Settlements risk asset ratios.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3611</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Japanese bank launches Y100bn
convertible deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MITSUI TAIYO Kobe Bank, the Japanese bank, has launched an unusual offering
of exchangeable preferred stock which will boost the bank's tier one capital
above the 4 per cent level recommended under Basle guidelines. The deal is
believed to have been looked on favourably by the Japanese Ministry of
Finance.
The Y100bn deal, arranged by Goldman Sachs, is one of only a handful of
yen-denominated convertible deals for Japanese borrowers to be offered in
the Euromarket, and the first such deal to be arranged by a US bank. Nomura
is acting as joint lead manager.
The structure of the deal was designed to attract managers of convertible
funds in Europe, by offering a higher coupon in conjunction with a higher
premium. The paper pays a fixed dividend of 6 3/4 per cent semi-annually,
and the exchange price will be set on March 19 at a premium of 15 per cent
above the closing share price. For stock which has not already been
exchanged, there is mandatory redemption in exchange for shares on June 30,
1995. If the share price has fallen, the number of shares will increase
correspondingly, although there is a limit on the number of new shares.
Traditionally, Japanese banks have issued yen-denominated convertible bonds
in the Japanese domestic market and dollar or Swiss-franc denominated bonds
in the Eurobond market, all with fairly low coupons and priced at a low
premium.
However, the poor performance of the Japanese stock market has caused these
sources of funds to dry up in recent years. Japanese banks have found it
increasingly hard to raise equity-linked debt, after being spoilt for cheap
funding in the early and mid-1980s.
The deal met firm demand from fund managers, particularly funds which stress
income and traded well above its par issue price to close at 103 bid.
Despite the success of the transaction, it may not prompt heavy supply of
such paper. The structure was specially designed to allow the bank to use
the proceeds as tier one capital and although it might be applicable in
other cases, there would not be automatic clearance of the necessary
regulatory hurdles.
The paper was issued through a vehicle company called Sakura Holdings, a
wholly owned subsidiary of Mitsui Taiyo Kobe. The bank will shortly change
its name to Sakura Bank, or Cherry Blossom Bank.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3612</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Talks on EC share trading
rules delayed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
PLANS for top-level talks next week over the European Community's
long-delayed Investment Services Directive have been called off, agencies
report.
Portugal, the current European Community president, said it was postponing
the talks because: 'We are not in a position to form a compromise proposal
that could be accepted by everybody.'
Portugal's finance minister, Mr Jorge Braga de Macedo, had hoped closed-door
discussions earlier this week with Britain, France and Germany would break
months of deadlock. But diplomats said there had been no shift in positions.
As a result, ministerial debate on common EC share trading rules is likely
to be delayed until after UK elections which may oust the ruling
Conservative government, a protagonist in the feuding on the proposed rules.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3613</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Lonrho debt rating below
investment grade
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LONG-TERM debt of Lonrho, the international trading group, was yesterday
accorded a rating three notches below investment grade by Moody's, the US
rating agency, writes Richard Waters.
The unsolicited rating of Ba3, which Lonrho said had been produced without
its co-operation,applies to approximately Dollars 360m of Eurobonds issued
by Lonrho Finance and Lonrho International Finance.
Moody's explained its rating by pointing to the group's 'heavy use of debt,
its relatively low cash-flow generating capabilities and the likely
increased volatility of its future operating cash-flow and earnings.'
Mr Paul Spicer, a Lonrho director, said Moody's rating betrayed a lack of
understanding of the group's business, adding: 'We have already set
ourselves the task of reducing our gearing, if that is what they are getting
at.' Lonrho recently surprised the market with poor results for 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3614</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Bonds: Poor conditions drive away investors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SENTIMENT in the Eurobond market worsened yesterday as investors were driven
away by poor conditions in most government bond markets, writes Tracy
Corrigan.
Most of the new issues launched were either aimed at groups of investors or
were added to outstanding issues.
In the first category, The European Coal and Steel Community launched a
L500bn five-year deal which was placed with Italian investors, for whom the
agency's paper is exempt from withholding tax.
Among several fungible deals, the financial arm of General Electric of the
US added CDollars 150m of five-year bonds to an existing CDollars 150m deal,
via Wood Gundy. The deal was priced to yield 30 basis points above the
comparable Canadian government bond, which was not considered particularly
generous, even though it offered a 16 basis point yield pick-up over the
outstanding deal.
Credit Foncier, the French agency, added FFr500m of 10-year bonds to an
outstanding FFr3bn deal, via a block-trade by Credit Commercial de France.
East Japan Railway Company (JR East) is expected to tap the Euroyen market
in April with a Y20bn deal, via Yamaichi International.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3615</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Daiwa lifts loss forecast
over disputes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL and AP-DJ
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DAIWA SECURITIES, the Japanese securities company involved in a growing
scandal over the manipulation by brokers of clients' investment accounts,
has increased its estimate of its likely losses from the practice.
Daiwa said it would lose around Y73.5bn, instead of Y72bn as originally
thought, from the settlement of five disputes with clients. The group
expects to lose about Y13bn from two further disputes which are still
unsettled.
Daiwa has left unchanged its forecast net loss for the year to the end of
March which will total Y43bn.
The disputes involve the practice of tobashi in which loss-making securities
are transferred from one client account to another to help clients avoid
reporting losses at book-closing dates.
While other brokers have also disclosed losses, Daiwa's are the largest so
far revealed. Mr Masahiro Dozen, the president of Daiwa, has resigned and
two other senior officials intend to quit at the end of this month. They are
Mr Yuzuru Ishida, the vice-president, and Mr Motohiro Iyo, a director. Mr
Dozen has been succeeded by Mr Motoo Esaka, a former vice-president.
Daiwa's biggest dispute was with Tokyu Department Store, a leading retail
chain, which will receive Y49.5bn in compensation. Two senior Tokyu
officials are also resigning. Tobashi is not illegal but it is discouraged
by the authorities.
Japan Bond Research Institute (JBRI) is reviewing its ratings for possible
downgradings of the long-term debt of 12 Japanese securities firms and its
commercial paper ratings of 13 Japanese securities firms, AP-DJ reports from
Tokyo.
JBRI is reviewing its long-term ratings of: Daiwa Securities, Yamaichi
Securities, Nikko Securities, Nomura Securities, Sanyo Securities, New Japan
Securities, Kankaku Securities, Wako Securities, Okasan Securities, Cosmo
Securities, Dai-Ichi Securities, and Kokusai Securities. Except for Kankaku,
JBRI is reviewing its commercial paper ratings of all the above plus
Universal Securities and Mito Securities.
'Because the environment of the securities markets hasn't improved since
last fall it is expected that these firms will be unable to avoid a
worsening of their earnings. Moreover, it is our judgment that problems that
have resulted from questionable trading practices in the management of funds
from corporate customers could possibly have a big influence on the
management of securities firms in the mid-term.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3616</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Singapore bank invests in
Hong Kong
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON HOLBERTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DEVELOPMENT Bank of Singapore said yesterday it had paid HKDollars 380.7m
(USDollars 49.4m) for a 10 per cent interest in Wing Lung Bank, a
conservatively managed, family controlled local bank in Hong Kong.
The price Development Bank paid, HKDollars 51 a share, was HKDollars 3 lower
than the bank's closing price of HKDollars 54 yesterday.
A joint statement said Development Bank had bought its interest from members
of the Wu family. This family has controlled the bank since the 1930s and,
prior to the transaction, was estimated to control 75 per cent of the
company's shares in issue.
Development Bank is listed on the Singapore Stock Exchange, although it is
controlled by the Singapore government.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3617</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Bulgaria plans
rationalisation of bank system
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BULGARIA is to form a bank consolidation company to privatise banking and
merge scores of small banks into a core of a dozen or fewer large
establishments, Reuter reports.
Officials of the new Bulgarian Bank Consolidation Company (BCC) said
rationalising the system was essential for economic reforms to succeed.
'Currently, shares of state-owned firms are part of the holdings of 78 small
banks dispersed throughout the country. They have to be merged into eight to
12 banks,' BCC said, adding all these banks, with small authorised capital
and no experience in free market economics, were trying to struggle on with
outdated socialist methods. The privatisation is expected to take three
years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3618</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Italian bank launches Dollars
750m of new paper
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BANCA Commerciale Italiana (BCI), one of Italy's leading commercial banks,
is launching its first Euro-depositary receipt programme, worth up to
Dollars 750m, organised by Goldman Sachs International, writes Haig
Simonian.
Under the highly flexible deal, BCI's new paper can be issued in a variety
of leading currencies and with maturities ranging from three months to 30
years. Moreover, the paper to be issued can be in either fixed or
floating-rate form.
The bank said the funds would be used to provide a consistent source of
finance for its branch network, especially over medium to long-term
maturities. BCI has issued certificates of deposit out of London and
commercial paper from New York, but the deal marks its debut in borrowing of
this type.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3619</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Flat interim profit leads to
shake-up at Coles Myer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COLES Myer, Australia's biggest retailing group, yesterday said recession
had restricted net profits to ADollars 227m (USDollars 171.9m) in the six
months to the end of January, an increase of less than 1 per cent on the
comparable period of the previous year. Turnover was up 2.1 per cent to
ADollars 8bn.
However, Mr Solomon Lew, chairman, said sales had improved 'slightly' in
February, prompting hopes that 'tentative' signs of recovery were beginning
to emerge.
Coles also announced the retirement of Mr Brian Quinn, chief executive, as
part of a shake-up of senior management intended to improve profitability in
under-performing areas of the company.
No replacement for Mr Quinn was announced. The job is widely expected to go
to Mr Peter Bartels, the former managing director of Foster's Brewing Group,
who resigned earlier this week.
Coles said it was considering an issue of convertible preference shares to
raise ADollars 300m to strengthen its balance sheet and finance expansion.
The announcement follows confirmation earlier this month that Coles plans to
float at least 60 per cent of Progressive Enterprises, a New Zealand
subsidiary, to provide further funds for expansion.
Mr Lew said no big acquisitions had yet been considered, but the company was
in 'a comfortable position to have a strong cash flow and a strong balance
sheet in a buyers' market'.
Coles said the recession had affected its businesses throughout Australia
and New Zealand, particularly the downmarket K mart and Coles Fossey chains.
However, the company said several of its chains had traded 'very
satisfactorily'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3620</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Battle at Foster's comes to a
head - Kevin Brown and Bernard Simon examine the issues dividing the
brewer's boardroom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN and BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A backstage battle for control of Foster's Brewing Group, the world's
fourth-largest brewer, burst into the open this week with the resignation of
Mr Peter Bartels, the group's managing director.
At first sight, Mr Bartels' departure appeared to be a victory for Mr John
Elliott, the former chairman and chief executive of Foster's, who has been
trying to regain control of the company.
It also raised again the possibility that the board might bend to pressure
from Mr Elliott to sell Courage, Foster's UK brewing subsidiary, or its 50
per cent holding in Molson Breweries in Canada.
However, such a sell-off is unlikely. While the balance of power on the
Foster's board appears to have shifted marginally in Mr Elliott's favour,
the real winner would seem to be Asahi Breweries of Japan, which owns 19.9
per cent of Foster's.
Asahi has emerged as the key to control of the boardroom, along with Mr Ted
Kunkel, the chairman of Molson Breweries, who is to replace Mr Bartels as
Foster's managing director.
Foster's has been in turmoil since losing a record ADollars 1.3bn (USDollars
984m) in 1989-90, largely as a result of write-offs connected with
non-brewing activities acquired during Mr Elliott's period as chairman.
The disastrous result forced Mr Elliott to hand over management to Mr
Bartels and become non-executive deputy chairman. But he retained a 58 per
cent shareholder in Foster's - then called Elders IXL - through his private
company International Brewing Holdings (IBH) - then called Harlin Holdings.
Complicating the issue further, IBH had incurred heavy debt to acquire its
shares, and was technically insolvent because of the weakness of Foster's
stock, its sole asset.
Mr Elliott bought some time by selling a 17 per cent stake to Asahi, leaving
IBH with debt of about ADollars 2.5bn backed by 38 per cent of Foster's
stock. The shares are worth about ADollars 1.6bn at last night's closing
price of ADollars 1.90.
Mr Elliott has until May to develop a strategy for repaying the debt which
will satisfy his main creditors - Hongkong Bank, Citicorp, and BHP, the
Australian resources group.
His preferred solution is to spin off the group's non-core assets - mainly
in property, aviation and finance - into a separate company, which could be
floated to provide a capital return of some ADollars 1bn to IBH.
However, that option was rejected by the 10-strong board in October after Mr
Elliott and the two other IBH directors failed to persuade the two Asahi
representatives and five independent directors to agree.
Mr Elliott's response was an attempt to depose some of the independent
directors at the annual meeting. He backed down only at the last minute
after the board agreed to set up a committee - from which Mr Bartels was
excluded - to study the IBH plan.
Significantly, the compromise was brokered by Asahi, which at that stage
appeared unwilling to side with either the Elliott camp or Foster's
management, led by Mr Bartels and Mr Nobby Clark, the group's chairman.
The deteriorating relations between Mr Elliott and Mr Bartels appear to have
come to a head during boardroom discussions on the group's net profit of
ADollars 77m for the six months to the end of December.
Mr Bartels, backed by Mr Clark and some of the independent directors, argued
that Foster's need to strengthen its balance sheet was so great that it
should pass the dividend, as it had in the second half of the previous year.
However, Mr Elliott's demand for a return to dividend payments was supported
by the two Asahi directors, who backed a payout of three cents a share -
equivalent to 87 per cent of profits.
Asahi's action appears to have convinced Mr Bartels that his position was
untenable. However, analysts say the Japanese brewer supported a resumption
of dividends because of its own financial problems, rather than in support
of Mr Elliott.
Ms Eleanor Marsh, brewing analyst at SG Warburg in Tokyo, says Asahi is
committed to capital expenditure of Y37bn (USDollars 276.5m) this year, but
forecasts cash flow of only Y24.2bn. In addition, the group faces repayment
of warrants totalling Y185bn in March and August next year.
'They are having a bit of a problem on the financial front, and they may
just want some kind of return on the Foster's investment to help relieve
some of the pressure,' says Ms Marsh.
Given the balance of forces on the board, Mr Kunkel's role will be crucial.
His position is strengthened by unanimous boardroom support, indicating that
he is not a stooge for the IBH faction. Executives say he is a strong
manager who is unlikely to be intimidated.
Mr Kunkel, 48, is a veteran Foster's manager who was sent to Toronto in 1987
after the group bought Carling O'Keefe, then the smallest of Canada's three
main beer companies. He directed Carling's merger with Molson in 1989.
Described by a colleague as 'a man who doesn't mince his words', Mr Kunkel
has spearheaded a shake-up in which seven of 16 breweries have been closed
and the workforce has shrunk by 20 per cent.
'He's done a very, very good job,' says Mr Michael Palmer, analyst at Sanwa
McCarthy Securities in Toronto. 'The merger was difficult to handle, but
Molson got through it extraordinarily well.'
Mr Justin Hilford, brewing analyst at Potter Warburg, in Sydney, says a
break-up of the company remains 'extremely unlikely'. It would make sense
only as a way of providing a capital return to IBH, which has already been
ruled out by the board.
Several other options remain open, including a revaluation and partial
flotation of the Carlton and United Breweries subsidiary, and the sale of
Foster's share options owned by IBH, which would raise up to ADollars 1.2bn
for a 20 per cent holding.
Mr Kunkel's appointment will revive speculation that Molson Companies,
Foster's joint venture partner in Molson Breweries, may seek to increase its
links with Australia by acquiring the options.
The most likely outcome of the Foster's tangle is a deal which would
refinance IBH's debt burden and remove some of the uncertainty surrounding
the group. That would allow the share price to rise to a point where IBH
could clear its debts by selling its remaining shareholding.
'I think what is going to happen is a mutual working-out of the situation,
probably involving some kind of debt for equity swap between IBH, the banks
and BHP,' says Mr Hilford.
'There may be some speeding-up in the sale of Foster's non-core assets, but
I would be extremely surprised if there was any attempt to sell Courage or
any other brewing business. That would destroy their whole strategy for
recovery.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3621</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Hungarian airline reveals 57%
profits gain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MALEV, the Hungarian national airline, reported a 57 per cent increase in
pre-tax profits for 1991 to Ft2.09bn (Dollars 26.5m). Revenue, fuelled by
high inflation, rose 29 per cent to Ft22.6bn.
Malev's hotel business, tours and innovatory flight packages helped it
mitigate the effect of the 25 per cent drop in passenger miles which
accompanied the collapse in eastern European travel.
The group's defiance of the worldwide downturn in airline earnings is likely
to heighten western carriers' interest in the minority shareholding which is
up for sale as part of Hungary's privatisation drive.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3622</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: American Express admits problems
at card division
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR JIM ROBINSON, chairman of American Express, the travel and financial
services group that has been stung by Wall Street criticism and heavy losses
in its Optima credit card division, yesterday made a rare public admission
of the problems the core card division is facing.
In a surprisingly contrite letter to shareholders, Mr Robinson noted that
while the American Express brand name was one of the most recognised in the
world, 'competitive pressures have arisen in every arena in which we
operate'.
The embattled chairman told shareholders: 'For years we were able to remain
above the fray of credit card competition. But bank card issuers have turned
their sights on our primary markets - the affluent households and travel and
entertainment spenders.'
Last year, earnings from the group's core travel related services division
slumped by 59 per cent, to Dollars 396m, after a Dollars 697m pre-tax leap
in credit loss provisions. Worse, in terms of image, American Express has
had some well-publicised rows with retail merchants such as Laura Ashley of
the UK.
Mr Robinson acknowledged the dissatisfaction of many retail merchants with
American Express fees that were higher than those of competitors such as
Visa or MasterCard.
'We want to ensure the card is welcomed - not just accepted - in service
establishments that provide the travel, entertainment and lifestyle services
our card members want,' said Mr Robinson.
'That is not always the case today, as some of you may have experienced,' he
added.
Mr Robinson said these problems were 'unacceptable to us' and stressed that
American Express was working on the matter.
He promised that retailers who signed a contract with American Express and
then suppressed the card's use would have their contracts cancelled.
The need to strengthen the group's capital structure, as evidenced by the
recently announced plan to float up to 45 per cent of the credit card
processing subsidiary, was defined by Mr Robinson as a strategic priority.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3623</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Liberty Life improves 26%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LIBERTY LIFE, South Africa's largest listed insurance company, overcame a
difficult operating environment to record a 26 per cent increase in earnings
in the year to December.
Total income rose by 15.4 per cent to R4bn (Dollars 1.4bn). This consisted
of R2.27bn net premium income, up by 17.9 per cent from 1990, and R1.73bn
investment income, up by 12.2 per cent from 1990. Net taxed surplus
attributable to shareholders was 26.1 per cent higher at R275m.
Mr Donald Gordon, chairman, said 1991 was probably the most significant in
Liberty's 34-year history. Domestically, Liberty strengthened its position
in the local financial services industry by lifting its holding in Standard
Bank Investment Corporation, one of the country's premier banking groups, to
40 per cent.
The most significant events took place on the international front where a
series of deals did much to enhance the stature of Liberty and Mr Gordon.
Liberty became the first South African company in many years to complete
successfully an equity issue abroad when it raised Dollars 143m through a
share placement. There was also the tie-up between Transatlantic Holdings,
the main holding company for the Liberty Group's offshore interests, and
UAP, France's largest insurer.
The two pooled their interests in Sun Life, the UK assurer, in a new
company, Rockleigh, which is on the point of gaining control of 100 per cent
of Sun Life's equity.
The strategic alliance with UAP should reap considerable benefits for the
Liberty group, with Sun Life an obvious first focus for their joint
attention.
Total new business of Liberty Life for 1991 increased by 18 per cent to
R1.1bn. Highlights of this performance included an 18 per cent increase to
R482m in new annualised recurring premiums, and the successful launch of the
new Medical Lifestyle policies.
Total earnings per share rose by 24.4 per cent to 127 cents, with the
dividend being lifted by 25.6 per cent to 108 cents. The amount allocated to
policyholders by way of bonus distributions for 1991 rose to R2.87bn, 2.6
times the level of 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3624</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Revco plan approved by
bankruptcy court
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE end to another big US retail bankruptcy came into sight, when a US
bankruptcy court approved the reorganisation plan put forward by Revco. The
plan is likely to take effect within a few weeks.
Revco, based in Ohio, operates about 1,150 drug stores in 10 states and is
one of the nation's largest drug store chains.
The retailer's prospective 'rebirth' echoes the successful re-emergence from
bankruptcy of the Allied and Federated Department Stores chains - previously
part of Campeau Corporation - earlier this year.
However, some US stores groups have fared less happily; R. H. Macy, the New
York-based department store chain, filed for protection under Chapter 11 of
the bankruptcy code shortly after Christmas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3625</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Eaton 'in talks with Iacocca'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ROBERT Eaton, president of General Motors' European operations, has
discussed with Mr Lee Iacocca, Chrysler chief executive, joining Chrysler,
according to a New York Times article, Reuter reports.
It speculated that Mr Eaton, 52, could succeed Mr Iacocca as Chrysler chief
executive officer. Mr Eaton has not received an offer from Chrysler. The
report said Mr Eaton was willing to consider moving to Chrysler if the offer
were good enough.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3626</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Top telecom groups to form world
network
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN CANE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOME of the world's largest telecommunications companies are collaborating
to offer specialised communications services to the global financial
services industry. The group includes MCI of the US, France Telecom, and
Mercury Communications of the UK.
The companies have formed a joint venture called FNA - Financial Network
Association - which will provide communications services between the world's
financial capitals.
The provision of specialised business communications services is a growing
area of commercial interest for telecommunications suppliers. BT of the UK,
for example, offers such services through its Synchordia initiative.
Computing services companies, including General Electric Information
Services, have also offered business services over their global networks.
FNA will, however, be one of the first of its kind to specialise in a single
vertical market sector involving global telecommunications carriers.
Other members are: AOTC of Australia; RTT-Belgacom of Belgium; Stentor of
Canada; Deutsche Bundespost Telekom of Germany; Hong Kong Telecom; Italcable
of Italy; KDD of Japan; Singapore Telecom; and Telefonica of Spain.
FNA will be incorporated in Brussels. Its first chairperson is AOTC's Mr
Allan Badrick.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3627</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Grolsch to lift payout by 10%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GROLSCH, the Dutch beer group which recently acquired Ruddles, the UK
brewer, is to increase its 1991 dividend by slightly more than 10 per cent,
after raising full-year profits by a similar rate.
The company, which has more than doubled in size since 1990 with the
takeovers of Ruddles and Wickuler of Germany, said it was 'well satisfied'
with its performance in 1991, in light of challenges presented by economic
recession and the Gulf war.
Net profit for the full year rose 10.6 per cent to Fl 41.9m (Dollars 22.6m),
on sales up 67.5 per cent at Fl 791.5m. The sharp rise in sales mainly
reflected the first-time consolidation of Wickuler, a regional brewer in
Germany's Ruhr area. Ruddles will be included in Grolsch's accounts from
February 21, 1992.
Grolsch's 1991 dividend will be raised to Fl 5.20 from Fl 4.70. The company
is forecasting a further profit improvement in 1992.
Unlike Ruddles, which needs no restructuring, Wickuler is being revamped to
boost efficiency and focus on its three main brands.
Grolsch expects the German unit, which posted an unspecified 'satisfactory'
after-tax profit in 1991, to start making a substantial contribution to
profit per share from 1994.
Hunter Douglas, the Dutch-based manufacturer of window coverings and
architectural products, posted a 41.7 per cent decline in net profit in
1991, extending the trend of the first half.
Despite the downturn, it said it would hold its dividend at Fl 2, citing a
sound balance sheet and confidence about the future. The company is
forecasting an improvement in results for 1992.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3628</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Philips, Motorola in R&amp;D venture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PHILIPS, the Dutch electronics group, is forming a joint venture
semiconductor design facility with Motorola, the US semiconductor and
communications group. The deal is aimed at supporting the manufacture of
chips for CDI, its interactive multi-media consumer electronics product.
Philips said it was investing tens of millions of guilders in the facility,
which will become operational in about three weeks.
The decision to invest so much in a semiconductor facility at a time when it
has huge financial costs due to a heavy debt burden signifies a commitment
by Philips to its semiconductor activities.
The group has always said it needed semiconductor capability to support its
consumer electronics activities. Nevertheless, there has been concern about
its ability to support its loss-making semiconductor operations.
Doubts about the group's commitment to semiconductors followed its
withdrawal from costly research and development projects under Jessi, the
joint European semi-conductor R&amp;D initiative.
Philips's semiconductor division, which made a loss in the financial year to
December, 1990, was also thought at one point to be a candidate for
divestment in the group's plan, under president Mr Jan Timmer, to
concentrate on returning to profitability.
CDI, however, is positioned as an important consumer product which, Philips
hopes, will be one of the next hits it needs to reverse its stagnating
fortunes. It has been pumping huge sums into CDI development, particularly
in software.
Mr Gaston Bastiaens, director of interactive media systems, said the group
expected the price of CDI to fall substantially over the next few years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3629</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Commission head to stand down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN FOSSLI
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE HEAD of Norway's Banking, Insurance and Securities Commission (BISC) is
to step down one year before his contract comes up for renewal, the finance
ministry said yesterday, writes Karen Fossli.
Mr Svein Aasmundstad has been sharply criticised for speaking out publicly
on sensitive information.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3630</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Go-ahead for Heracles sale
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE GREEK government has approved the sale of Heracles General Cement, the
largest company on Greece's privatisation list, to an Italian-Greek joint
venture led by Calcestruzzi, the construction arm of the Ferruzzi group.
Calcestruzzi and the state-owned National Bank of Greece will pay Dr124bn
(Dollars 647.1m) in cash for a 69.8 per cent stake held by the Industrial
Reconstruction Organisation, the state umbrella for companies being
privatised.
This is equivalent to Dr3,500 for each share in Heracles, the second largest
company listed on the Athens stock exchange. Heracles' shares rose by 10 per
cent in active trading yesterday, closing at Dr3,128.
Calcestruzzi and National Bank originally offered Dr107bn for IRO's
shareholding, but raised their bid after Italcementi, Italy's biggest cement
producer, indicated it was willing to put up Dr120bn.
IRO said yesterday Calcestruzzi would be the majority shareholder in Calnat,
the Italian-Greek joint venture through which the deal is being undertaken,
with 'about 51 per cent'. It will also take over management of Heracles.
National Bank's participation in the deal is considered crucial because of a
dispute over a compulsory share increase imposed when Heracles was taken
over by the state in 1983, which allegedly violated European Community
company law.
If the issue is eventually reversed, making IRO's shares invalid, National
Bank would become the largest single shareholder in Heracles.
Heracles is the biggest of Greece's four cement makers, producing 6.2m
tonnes annually at two plants in central Greece. More than half of
production is exported, using ships owned by the company.
It said net profits for 1991 showed a 33 per cent rise over the previous
year, at Dr6.39bn on turnover of Dr56bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3631</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Leu Holding up strongly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LEU HOLDING, parent of Bank Leu and other Swiss banks and property
companies, has reported a 69 per cent surge in consolidated net income for
1991, to SFr91m (Dollars 61m), writes Ian Rodger.
The increase was due largely to recovery from 1990, when Bank Leu's earnings
were virtually eliminated by a huge internal fraud.
The directors are recommending a rise in dividends, from SFr60 to SFr65 per
SFr500 registered and bearer shares, and from SFr12 to SFr13 for SFr100
shares and participation certificates. They also proposed a restructuring of
share capital, converting all other classes of shares and participation
certificates into SFr100 bearer shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3632</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Profits at ABN Amro surge 15.9%
to Fl 1.5bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ABN AMRO, the Netherlands' biggest bank, posted a 15.9 per cent rise in net
profit in 1991, reflecting buoyant profits in its domestic operations and
improved interest margins.
Net profit increased to Fl 1.54bn (Dollars 830m) last year from Fl 1.33bn in
1990.
Gross profits showed an even stronger rise, of 18.6 per cent to Fl 3.66bn,
thanks largely to a 34 per cent increase in the Netherlands, which generated
slightly more than 70 per cent of the bank's results last year.
The bank, which declined to make a profit forecast for 1992, said it would
pay an unchanged 1991 dividend of Fl 2.90.
A 16 per cent increase in interest income helped lift ABN Amro's total
revenue by 13.1 per cent, to Fl 11.32bn, outstripping a 10.6 per cent
increase in total costs to Fl 7.67bn.
In the Netherlands, costs rose by just 2.9 per cent, while revenues rose by
12.1 per cent. Commenting on the limited rise in costs, which was due mainly
to a 2 per cent decline in the bank's Dutch workforce, Mr Roelof Nelissen,
chairman, said: 'It is too early to see this as the benefits of the merger.'
ABN Amro, which was formed through a merger in 1990, did not merge its
domestic operations into one bank until September 1991.
Abroad, gross results fell by 7.5 per cent to Fl 1.1bn. Results rose in
North America, the Middle East, eastern Asia, and Africa, but fell sharply
in Central and South America.
In Europe, ABN Amro saw 'satisfactory' profits except in France, where
results were held back by the restructuring of its stockbroking subsidiaries
and the lack of book profits on property sales which boosted 1990 results.
Overall, gross results in Europe declined to Fl 416m from Fl 505m in 1990.
Freight-forwarder Koninklijke Frans Maas has agreed to co-operate with
Yellow Freight System of the US. They will combine European and North
American networks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3633</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: Procordia stages strong recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PROCORDIA, the Swedish pharmaceutical and food group, has doubled profits in
1991 after financial items to SKr4.2bn (Dollars 698.8m) and is increasing
the dividend to SKr3.15 from SKr2.85.
The recovery in profits reflects the completion of a SKr1.4bn restructuring
programme which followed Procordia's merger with the Pharmarcia drug group
and Provendor, the food company. The merger depressed earnings in 1990.
Excluding restructuring costs, the 1991 operating result grew 24 per cent to
SKr4bn from SKr3.2bn a year earlier.
Procordia said yesterday talks were continuing between the Swedish
government and Volvo about the possible merger of Procordia with the Swedish
motor and energy group. Volvo and the government each owns 43 per cent of
Procordia. The government blocked the merger in January, but is now
discussing alternative solutions.
Procordia's healthcare group, which consists of Kabi Pharmacia and Pharmacia
Biosystems, last year achieved a 70 per cent jump in operating profits to
SKr2.38bn. Kabi Pharmacia, the pharmaceutical unit, increased earnings by 41
per cent to SKr2.1bn due to higher sales of such products as Nicorette
anti-smoking gum.
Pharmacia Biosystems, which produces medical equipment, swung into a profit
of SKr272m after a loss of SKr95m in 1990. The improvement followed the sale
of unprofitable businesses and other rationalisation measures.
The food group, however, suffered a 3 per cent fall in profits to SKr1.98bn
despite an 11 per cent growth in earnings to SKr1.05bn for United Brands,
the confectionery and tobacco unit which is Procordia's biggest division.
The seafood business suffered a SKr14m loss due to restructuring costs,
while the Weibulls nursery plant unit, which will be sold, posted a loss of
SKr22m.
The service group had a 96 per cent drop in earnings to SKr4m, reflecting a
SKr110m loss for its Sara Hotel operations. Kymmene, the Finnish forestry
company, yesterday reported a loss after financial items of FM1.3bn (Dollars
286.3m) for 1991 after posting a profit of FM394m in 1990. Group sales fell
1 per cent to FM13.4bn.
The company is cutting its dividend to FM0.90 a share from FM1.74.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3634</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / International Company News: RVI struggles out of red despite
decline in turnover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RENAULT Vehicules Industriels (RVI), the French truck and bus maker, crawled
back into profit last year, burdened by continuing losses at its US
subsidiary.
The group, which with its Swedish partner, Volvo Truck, forms the world's
largest heavy truck maker, reported a FFr23m (Dollars 4.12m) net profit for
1991, against a FFr102m loss in the previous year.
Mack Trucks, the troubled US arm, contributed a FFr621m loss last year, a
sharp decline from the FFr1bn loss in 1990. This reflected the gains from
rigorous cost-cutting and a decision to stop resorting to unprofitable
contracts to defend market share.
Group turnover slipped by 7.7 per cent, from FFr29.65bn to FFr27.38bn, a
sign of the continuing downturn in the US and European transport industries.
'The economic recession was widespread, sparing only Germany and countries
in south-east Asia,' said Mr Shemaya Levy, general manager.
Mr Jean-Pierre Capron, RVI chairman, said the outcome 'was nothing to be
ashamed about' against competitors' likely results. He predicted that 1992
would be difficult.
European sales fell by 3.7 per cent to FFr21bn, with profits from the region
down by 33 per cent to FFr644m. RVI's market share there held level at 11.8
per cent, in a market where overall demand fell by more than 10 per cent.
The US market, meanwhile, fell by between 21 per cent and 24.5 per cent  -
depending on the size of truck - to its lowest for eight years. Mack's sales
fell by 23 per cent to Dollars 1.2bn and it lost market share as it held its
prices. It 'virtually left the big fleet market', said Mr Capron.
RVI took full control of its former minority-owned US arm 18 months ago, in
an attempt to resolve its problems, a mixture of over-manning, poor quality
and marketing.
Mr Capron said the Mack restructuring plan was already paying off, with a 15
per cent fall in overheads over the past 15 months, and a reduction in the
workforce, to 5,424 from 9,400 three years ago. He was convinced RVI needed
to keep its North American presence and had no misgivings. Overall, RVI has
reduced its workforce by 7 per cent to 28,100 over the past year.
The partnership with Volvo Truck was proceeding well, and savings were
already coming from pooled purchasing of components, said Mr Capron. More
significant gains from the alliance, in which Volvo owns 45 per cent of RVI,
should be evident from 1994-1995, he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3635</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Recession in UK and US forces Evered down
39%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR, Construction Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TAXABLE PROFITS of Evered Bardon, which has grown dramatically to become one
of the UK's biggest aggregates groups, fell by 39 per cent from Pounds 43.9m
to Pounds 26.9m on turnover up from Pounds 253.1m to Pounds 334m in 1991.
The fall was even greater if one allows for the distortion to profits and
sales caused by the merger last year between Evered and Bardon. On a pro
forma basis, pre-tax profits fell by 44 per cent from Pounds 47.7m while
sales dipped by 10 per cent from Pounds 371.4m.
The group's main markets - the UK and the US - have been hit badly by sharp
falls in construction activity. As a result earnings per share fell from
12.7p to 5.1p.
The directors, however, are proposing to pay a maintained final dividend of
3.66p, making an unchanged total of 5.595p. Mr Peter Tom, chief executive,
said that the decision to maintain the dividend reflected the company's
confidence in its future as well as the improvement in its balance sheet.
Interest charges rose to Pounds 22.1m (Pounds 13.6m). Net debt however has
been reduced since the autumn from a peak of Pounds 300m to Pounds 261.4m,
equivalent to 71 per cent of shareholders' funds.
achieved as a result of UK disposals, which by the end of this month are
expected to have raised Pounds 36m. Currently up for sale are the group's
Indiana, North Carolina and Arkansas businesses which are expected to fetch
about Dollars 70m in the current year.
Mr Tom said that the group's aim was to reduce gearing to at least 50 per
cent.
The group's remaining US businesses - in Maryland and Massachusetts - are
facing mixed fortunes in the current year. The Massachusetts market is
recovering after the ending of a moratorium on capital spending while a
similar moratorium in Maryland is still in place.
On a pro forma basis, US profits fell by a fifth last year to Pounds 20.9m.
Crushed rock sales in Maryland fell by 36 per cent.
Like-for-like UK profits fell by 23 per cent to Pounds 24.7m. This,
according to Mr Tom, was despite an increase in market share.
COMMENT
Evered's acquisition trail has lost the company a lot of friends on the way.
The failure of earnings per share to match the growth in market share and a
sharp rise in debt have disenchanted investors. More recently, there have
been signs that Mr Tom may have recovered a little ground as disposals have
cut borrowings and an axe has been taken to US overheads. However, sentiment
remains weak, as illustrated by a prospective p/e of more than 18, even on
unchanged profits. The jury is still out but the shares are worth a buy at
this price on asset value alone.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3636</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Move to asset finance as EFT advances 40%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EFT GROUP, the Scottish financial services company, has pulled out of
corporate finance activities and is to concentrate on its asset finance
operations. It reported pre-tax profit up 40 per cent at Pounds 1.07m for
the year to December 31. Revenue rose almost 10 per cent at Pounds 7.55m.
Mr Peter Stevenson is stepping down as chairman to become a non-executive
director. Mr Hamish Grossart, group managing director, is to become chairman
with part-time executive responsibilities.
The moves are a further scaling-down of the ambitions of EFT, which only two
years ago still hoped to become a mini-financial conglomerate and spoke of
adding a London office to its ones in Edinburgh and Glasgow.
EFT was created in 1987 by Mr Grossart and Mr Hugh Barry, who had earlier
worked for Noble Grossart, the Edinburgh merchant bank chaired by Mr Angus
Grossart, Mr Hamish Grossart's uncle. They took control of Edinburgh
Financial Trust, a quoted investment trust which gave up its trust status,
and acquired teams of asset finance specialists and fund managers to
complement their own skills in corporate finance.
In early 1989 Mr Barry left and was replaced as chairman by Mr Stevenson, a
former Noble Grossart director.
However the corporate finance operations suffered from lack of business with
the downturn in the economy, and last January Glasgow Fund Managers, the
fund management operation, was sold. The corporate finance operation made a
profit of only Pounds 72,000 in 1991 and was closed in January.
Net outstanding receivables for the asset finance operation, which
concentrates on leasing and hire purchase involving vehicles, were up 22 per
cent at Pounds 47.9m while borrowings were Pounds 34.7m. After write-offs,
provisions amounted to 1.61 per cent of outstanding receivables (1.15 per
cent in 1991).
The group recorded an extraordinary item of Pounds 150,000 consisting mainly
of provisions for the fall in value of investments offset by gains on the
sale of investments.
Earnings per share were 2.22p (1.62p) and the proposed final dividend is
0.77p making a total of 1.1p (1p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3637</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Pressure on margins cuts Blagden to Pounds
11m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BLAGDEN, the packaging, chemicals and protective equipment group, yesterday
reported a 17 per cent fall in profits after a year of pressure on operating
margins.
The company joined the swelling ranks of those unhappy with the current UK
rules on advance corporation tax. It had an insufficient mainstream UK
corporation tax liability and was forced to write off double the amount of
ACT this year - Pounds 1.05m - compared with 1990, boosting the tax rate
from 33 per cent to 38 per cent.
Pre-tax profits in the year to December 29 1991 fell from Pounds 13.3m to
Pounds 11.1m on sales almost unchanged at Pounds 218.3m.
The group's interest charge rose from Pounds 2.03m to Pounds 2.81m, despite
a fall in gearing from 38 per cent to 36 per cent, because the group
capitalised less interest associated with the building of a chemicals plant.
It also borrowed European currencies and made deposits in the UK where
interest rates were falling.
Earnings per share fell from 19.6p to 14.8p and the group proposes to pay a
final dividend of 5p, maintaining the total for the year at 9.5p. At this
level the dividend is 1.6 times covered by earnings.
On the packaging side - the group's most important division - Blagden
announced it had bought a 50 per cent stake in a Belgian company that had
developed a patented spray propellant using compressed air rather than CFCs
and inflammable compounds.
Mr Cameron Smith, the chief executive, said the group's pan-European
business would cushion the slower-than-expected recovery in the UK and meant
the outlook for 1992 was 'comparatively encouraging'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3638</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: PFG Hodgson makes Pounds 10.5m cash call
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PFG HODGSON Kenyon Int-ernational, the UK's largest quoted funeral services
company, yesterday announced a 2-for-3 rights issue to raise Pounds 10.5m.
The cash will be used to reduce borrowings.
The company is changing its name to Plantsbrook Group.
The cash call came as the group reported pre-tax profits down 19 per cent
from Pounds 8.08m to Pounds 6.55m on sales of Pounds 53.5m (Pounds 50.8m)
for the year to December 31.
The national death rate remained flat, with market share stabilising at 9.5
per cent. A reduction in staff of 119 to 1,331 cost the group Pounds
900,000, taken above the line.
An extraordinary provision of Pounds 867,000 was made to cover the
anticipated losses of closing the crematorium in Bury St Edmonds and the
withdrawal from the manufacture of monumental masonry.
The new shares are being issued at 40p, against yesterday's closing price of
43p, down 5p on the day. The proceeds will reduce pro-forma borrowings to
Pounds 19.2m, for pro-forma gearing of 108 per cent, against 415 per cent on
December 31.
Omnium de Gestion et de Financement, of which Pompes Funebres Generales, the
French funeral group and PHKI's biggest shareholder is a subsidiary, is to
act as underwriter.
PHKI is also proposing to delay redemption of its unlisted B preference
shares by five years coupled with an amendment to the rate of their
conversion into ordinary shares.
An agreement has been reached with Pompes which holds 99.6 per cent of the B
preference shares to move the proposed redemption date to October 31 1998.
In return the conversion rate is being raised from 0.4 to 1.6 ordinary
shares for each B preference.
Mr Peter Hindley, chief executive of PHKI, said the group did not want to
face a redemption in 1993 which would have cost it Pounds 15.5m.
The Takeover Panel has waived the requirement for Omnium and Pompes to make
a full offer, subject to the agreement of the minority holders. The two
could hold a total stake of almost 70 per cent.
Fully diluted earnings per share fell to 8.05p (9.77p). A recommended final
dividend of 2p, (1.5p) makes a total of 3p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3639</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Hall Eng recovers in second half to Pounds
5.07m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HALL Engineering (Holdings) reported static profits for 1991 of Pounds
5.07m, against Pounds 5.06m despite turnover falling from Pounds 190.4m to
Pounds 147.4m following a much improved second half.
The result was helped by two Singapore associates where profits doubled,
contributing to share of associates of Pounds 5.01m (Pounds 3.44m).
Borrowings fell Pounds 11.5m over the year for a 21 per cent fall in the
interest charge to Pounds 4.34m (Pounds 5.46m). Gearing at the year end was
61 per cent, down from 70 per cent.
At the interim stage the Shrewsbury-based company announced pre-tax profits
down from Pounds 3.56m to Pounds 1.16m.
During the second six months the Stafford factory of British Reinforced
Concrete was sold and the Weldmesh and fencing operations were ended leading
to an extraordinary charge of Pounds 6.9m. However some assets were sold at
above book value for Pounds 6m and the overall cash effect was a Pounds
500,000 gain.
A higher tax charge of Pounds 1.9m (Pounds 1.61m) left earnings per share
lower at 11.34p (12.68p). A proposed maintained final dividend of 5.34p
makes an unchanged total for the year of 8.64p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3640</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: ATP funding and reorganisation
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ATP Communications, the USM-quoted advertising, market research and public
relations group, plans to raise Pounds 1m net through an open offer to
shareholders of 54.8m new ordinary shares at 2p each. In addition there will
be a capital reorganisation and preference conversion.
At the same time the company announced reduced losses of Pounds 29,000
against Pounds 48,000 for the half year to September 30 1991. Turnover
improved from Pounds 3.33m to Pounds 3.57m and there was an operating profit
of Pounds 52,000 (Pounds 3,000). Losses per share were 0.57p (0.72p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3641</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: United Meat Packers in receivership
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM COONE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UNITED Meat Packers (UMP), the Irish Republic's second largest meat
processor, was yesterday placed into receivership.
The collapse of the company, which processes an estimated 30 per cent of
Ireland's annual sheep output and 15 per cent of its beef, follows the
failure of a High Court examiner, appoint-ed last month, to raise IPounds 7m
(Pounds 6.5m) in working capital from the company's creditor banks to keep
it in business.
UMP has debts in excess of IPounds 50m, and ran into a liquidity crisis
following a fire which devastated its most modern abattoir and cold store
last January at Ballaghaderreen, causing damage estimated at IPounds 15m.
The receiver, Mr John Donnelly of the chartered accountants Deloitte and
Touche, said that 'while the future ownership of the company may be in
question, the survival of the business and its operations has to be
achieved'. Ireland's two main banks, AIB and Bank of Ireland, were yesterday
reported to be interested in supporting UMP following the announcement.
The family-run company, headed by Mr Sher Rafique, originally from Pakistan,
has been a classic 'rags-to-riches' success story. Having studied in the UK
in the 1960s, and worked on the London underground and buses, he came to
Ireland in the early 1970s, and established his first sheep abattoir in the
west of Ireland to sell meat slaughtered under Moslem rites for sale to the
Middle East. He now ranks as one of Ireland's wealthiest men.
Things began to go wrong for the company in the late 1980s, first with
cancellation of export credit guarantees and the loss of sales to Iraq, and
then the BSE (bovine spongiform encephalopathy) scare which lost it markets
in Libya and Iran. Mr Rafique, however, successfully built up new
supermarket outlets in France, Italy and Spain and 70 per cent of UMP's
exports now go to continental Europe.
It is expected that there will be considerable interest by Irish and
European meat processors in buying UMP's five main plants in Ireland, as
well as its smaller plants in the UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3642</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: 'Double whammy' knocks Enterprise down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ENTERPRISE OIL, the indep-endent UK oil producer, was squeezed by rising
costs and a weak oil price last year, resulting in a sharp decline in
profits. But the company is maintaining its development programme and plans
to double production in the coming years.
Profits before tax amounted to Pounds 114.4m, down from Pounds 210.3m, a
decline of 45 per cent. After-tax profits were Pounds 110.5m (Pounds
156.5m), equivalent to earnings of 24.5p (34.4p) per share.
Mr Graham Hearne, chairman and chief executive, said that Enterprise had
suffered a 'double whammy'. The sharp fall in the oil price last year had
hit the company at a time when production costs in the North Sea remained
'stubbornly high'.
Other factors in the fall included a decline in interest income and the
absence of asset sales which had boosted the previous year's result.
Nonetheless, Enterprise is increasing its annual dividend by 5 per cent to
15.75p, 'reflecting our underlying confidence in the business', Mr Hearne
maintained. The proposed final is lifted to 9.25p (9p).
'These are testing times for the oil industry but we remain committed to our
strategy,' he said.
'Enterprise has a successful exploration record and is on schedule with its
development projects.'
Production averaged 131,000 barrels of oil equivalent a day, up 11.5 per
cent on 1990's level, at an average realised price of Pounds 11.88 (Pounds
12.91) per barrel. Investment totalled nearly Pounds 500m, and will amount
to approximately the same amount this year as Enterprise pursues its aim of
doubling output over the next few years. Aside from the North Sea, it is
active in continental Europe and the Far East.
Enterprise does not expect to see any marked recovery in the oil price in
the foreseeable future.
COMMENT
The result, particularly size of the dividend rise, caused some
disappointment in the market, where the shares shed 2p to close the day at
367p. The main culprit, it seemed, was the surprise rise in Enterprise's
production costs at a time when many observers see spare capacity beginning
to emerge in the North Sea. This was partly to do with the extra safety
costs imposed by the Cullen report. But Enterprise is also approaching a
high point in its activity cycle as it brings on important new ventures like
the Nelson and Scott fields. The market doubted that the pressures which
squeezed last year's result would go away this year. Analysts cut their
profits forecasts by about a third from approximately Pounds 120m to about
Pounds 77m pre-tax. The market remains confident of a rising dividend. The
shares currently yield 5.7 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3643</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: QED Technology has been sold
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
QED Technology, the Maxwell Communication Corporation offshoot which creates
computer systems for publishers, has been sold to Cromas Trading of the US.
Price Waterhouse, administrator to MCC, gave no details of the price.
QED had sales of Pounds 4.6m in the year to March 31 1991.
MCC sought US bankruptcy protection and entered administration in Britain in
December. It owns Official Airlines Guide and MacMillan, both US publishers.
Price Waterhouse is selling non-core units and attempting a restructuring of
the company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3644</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Abbott Mead dividend lifted 8%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ABBOTT MEAD Vickers, the advertising agency whose biggest clients include
Volvo and Comet, yesterday announced a near 8 per cent annual dividend
increase despite a slight fall in pre-tax profits.
Mr Peter Mead, chief executive, said: 'We're very, very pleased with this
performance in a difficult year.' Existing client spending had fallen about
10 per cent, he said.
AMV reported taxable profits down 4 per cent to Pounds 5.02m for the year to
December 31. The fall was due to tighter margins and start-up costs on new
business inherited from last March's acquisition of BBDO, the London agency
of BBDO Worldwide. Interest income on AMV's Pounds 6.3m cash balances also
fell slightly to Pounds 778,000 (Pounds 901,000).
Turnover increased sharply to Pounds 158.9m (Pounds 129.7m), reflecting
spending brought in with BBDO, whose clients include Pepsi, and Pounds 15.4m
in new business.
Stripping out income from BBDO, underlying income from AMV and sister agency
Leagas Delaney fell by about 9 per cent.
Only 30 of BBDO's 80 staff have been retained and Pounds 3m reorganisation
costs were taken as goodwill. AMV has also frozen salaries throughout the
group and no staff bonuses were paid last year.
The group has won Pounds 9m in new business so far this year, including the
Ciga hotel account transferred from BBDO. It is pitching for a further
Pounds 27m in new billings.
Earnings dipped to 22.09p (24.06p) per share. The directors are recommending
a final dividend of 5.6p to make 8.4p (7.8p) for the year.
The shares added 2p to 395p.
COMMENT
AMV has managed to merge with BBDO without losing clients or staff morale,
no mean feat in the advertising world. The benefits of the takeover should
come through this year, even if the advertising industry remains depressed.
If AMV generates margins of 10 per cent on BBDO's Pounds 30m billings,
compared to its 20 per cent target for existing business, that could mean an
extra Pounds 500,000 profit this year. There should also be gains from BBDO
Worldwide's clients looking to spend in London. The City is already
expecting this, and possibly more. Forecast pre-tax profits of between
Pounds 5.5m and Pounds 6m put the shares on a prospective multiple of more
than 15, which is not cheap. The premium rating is partly due to AMV's
conservative acquisition policy, and partly because of turmoil among other
agencies. Omnicom's 26 per cent stake in AMV also provides speculative
appeal. But after more than doubling in value in the last year, the shares
look ready for some consolidation, especially if political worries prompt
advertisers to delay campaigns until the autumn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3645</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: GAIT plans split to balance share price and
net asset value
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GOVETT Atlantic Investment Trust, the shareholders of which have been
pressing for reforms, is to split into three new funds. The proposals will
be put to shareholders in a circular next month.
Some of GAIT's shareholders had demanded a special meeting to discuss ways
of narrowing the gap between the share price, down 1 1/2 p to 199 1/2 p
yesterday, and the net asset value, currently around 225p. GAIT directors
have been discussing proposals with several shareholders and now the notice
requisitioning the meeting has been withdrawn.
The plan would involve putting about Pounds 145m of the trust's Pounds 183m
assets into a new unit trust tracking the US equity market to be called the
Govett US Index Fund.
A minimum of Pounds 25m of GAIT's assets would form the basis of Govett
American Smaller Companies Trust, a new limited life investment trust
specialising in small- to medium-sized North American companies.
Shareholders would be able to elect to take different proportions of these
two funds.
GAIT's unquoted and illiquid investments, worth Pounds 12.2m, would be
transferred to Realisation Company, a new company which would sell the
assets and then be liquidated. Shares in RC would be distributed pro rata to
GAIT holders.
All three new funds would be managed by John Govett, which manages GAIT,
although it would not charge a basic management fee for the RC, John Govett
would be entitled to more than Pounds 2.1m of compensation for the ending of
its contract to manage GAIT, but has agreed to take Pounds 1m.
GAIT represents about 10 per cent of the funds John Govett has under
management.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3646</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: ABP plans general purpose port on Humber
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BOLGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ASSOCIATED British Ports Holdings will build a general purpose cargo port at
Immingham on the Humber, following its recent cancellation of plans to build
the UK's biggest coal terminal on the site.
ABP last month cancelled a Pounds 150m contract with PowerGen and National
Power, the two privatised electricity generators, after PowerGen sought to
postpone signing of the already delayed contract.
Sir Keith Stuart, chairman of ABP, said: 'There are many other trades in
Immingham which need further capacity. It is bursting at the seams - we
could not delay matters any longer, pending decisions by these
semi-privatised companies.'
Sir Keith said the group would start building at Immingham this year and
develop the riverside site over two to three years, although at less cost
than the Pounds 45m which the port group would have contributed to the coal
terminal.
ABP, the UK's biggest ports group since privatisation in 1983, yesterday
confirmed its January warnings that provisions on its property portfolio
would wipe out profits in the second half of last year.
Pre-tax profits dropped from Pounds 60.2m to Pounds 31m in the year to
December 31 following provisions of Pounds 29.7m against property
development activities. Turnover rose from Pounds 211.3m to Pounds 310.3m,
mainly because of the sale in June of Aldwych House, the group's largest
development, for Pounds 75.2m.
Despite the recession, continuing growth of the group's ports and transport
activities caused divisional profits to rise from Pounds 59.5m to Pounds
76.1m on turnover of Pounds 184.6m (Pounds 176.4). Tonnage handled at the
ports increased from 101m to 106m.
Sir Keith said: 'Our ports business has continued to perform well in the
first months of 1992, although we do not expect any dramatic increase in
activity until the current recession in the UK economy and elsewhere is
reversed.'
Net borrowings decreased by Pounds 63m to Pounds 332m at the year end,
bringing gearing down from 63.8 per cent to to 54.5 per cent. The interest
charge increased to Pounds 36.6m (Pounds 9.2m), as the amount of interest
capitalised in the year was cut from Pounds 35.8m to Pounds 12.8m.
Earnings per share fell from 22.5p to 12.4p. However, ABP said that because
of the underlying strength of the company's position, it would pay a final
dividend of 4.9p (4.5p), giving a total of 8p (7.25p).
COMMENT
Having bought Grosvenor Square Properties in 1987, ABP stood back and
watched that sector go up like a rocket and down like a stick. It promises
to avoid speculative property developments in future, although as these
results show it will be living with the costs of that period for some time
to come. It is, however, genuinely impressive to increase ports turnover in
the depths of a recession. It is even more impressive to convert an Pounds
8.2m increase in turnover into a Pounds 16.6m rise in profits. ABP is still
benefiting in efficiency terms from the abolition of the National Docks
Labour Scheme in 1989. Full-year profits of Pounds 70m would put the shares,
which closed down 11p yesterday at 348p, on a prospective multiple of 12.7.
That does not seem demanding for a group which would benefit very quickly
from any economic upturn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3647</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Trencherwood shares shed 5p to 7 1/2 p
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The share price of Trencher-wood, the USM-quoted housebuilder in talks with
its bankers, fell from 12 1/2 p to 7 1/2 p yesterday after an announcement
about the company's weakened financial position, writes Jane Fuller.
It had already warned that its results for the year to October 31 would be
worse than anticipated when it announced a Pounds 3.5m interim pre-tax loss.
Yesterday it said it would have to make 'a substantial further downward
revaluation' of properties and developments.
The write-downs meant that the group's net assets had fallen to less than
half the called-up share capital. This necessitated an extraordinary general
meeting, which would be held on April 7.
Last April, Trencherwood had Pounds 45.9m on-balance sheet debt compared
with Pounds 19.5m shareholders' funds. Off-balance sheet loans amounted to
Pounds 27.6m. It had breached loan covenants, but by August had renegotiated
a Pounds 50m two-year facility with its bankers.
It said conditions in the housing and commercial markets had shown no signs
of improvement since then, and had deteriorated in some areas, contrary to
expectations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3648</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Grampian back on acquisition trail
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Grampian Holdings, the Scottish mini-conglomerate which recently failed in
its bid for Macarthy, the pharmaceuticals retailer and maker, has returned
to the acquisition trail on the animal health side with a purchase from
Hillsdown Holdings.
It is paying Pounds 7.5m cash for Lancashire-based Peter Hand Animal Health,
which makes and distributes treatments for fish, pigs and poultry. Its
annual turnover is about Pounds 8m and net assets Pounds 6.3m.
Hillsdown said the disposal completed its withdrawal from the European
animal health market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3649</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Acquisitive Lloyds Chemists advances 88% to
Pounds 15.4m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LLOYDS Chemists yesterday followed up its recommended Pounds 96m bid for
Macarthy with interim results showing an 88 per cent increase in pre-tax
profit.
On sales 94 per cent ahead at Pounds 218.4m (Pounds 112.6m), pre-tax profit
went up from Pounds 8.2m to Pounds 15.4m in the six months to December 31.
Mr Allen Lloyd, chairman and chief executive, said the performance proved
that healthcare retailing was 'safe retailing'. He added that 'When times
are tough, people are more susceptible to illness.'
Lloyds' diluted earnings per share grew rather less rapidly to 10.86p
(8.95p). This reflected extra equity from last spring's Pounds 71m rights
issue to fund the Pounds 55m acquisition of Kingswood-GK chemists and
Holland &amp; Barrett health stores.
These additional 350 stores, plus three smaller acquisitions in 1991, helped
drive the figures ahead.
At this time last year (pre-Kingswood), the group had 455 chemists and 174
drugstores. Now (pre-Macarthy) it has nearly 1,080 outlets, including 667
chemists, 211 drugstores and 197 health stores.
First-half operating profit rose by 67 per cent to Pounds 16.7m. Mr Dick
Steele, finance director, said the apparent decline in margin was caused by
inclusion of Holland &amp; Barrett and the new wholesaling division, which had
slimmer margins than chemists and drugstores.
Before the Macarthy bid, net debt was Pounds 21.1m, gearing of 35 per cent.
If the deal went through (UniChem may still re-enter the fray), Mr Steele
said he expected gearing to rise to 60 per cent, on combined net assets of
roughly Pounds 80m.
The interim dividend goes up to 1.55p (1.17p).
COMMENT
Lloyds seems to be making as high a trading margin in its chemists division
as Boots, ie 9 per cent. This is remarkable, especially as half of Boots'
shops are freehold and it enjoys considerable benefits from the type of
electronic information system that Lloyds is only now introducing.
Explanations include its modest sites (where Boots does pay rent it is for
prime locations), its tight control of the payroll and other costs, high
margins on own-label products and highly efficient distribution. Once this
is applied to Macarthy, with a liberal helping of acquisition provisions,
analysts start shoving up 1992-93 pre-tax profit forecasts from Pounds 40m
to more than Pounds 50m. Reasons for caution include the group's propensity
to issue paper, while doing less well than expected on the cashflow and
gearing. If Pounds 35m (Pounds 20.8m) is made this year, the prospective p/e
is about 15 on yesterday's close of 347p. This is just above the market, but
below the stores sector which is more geared to recovery. The shares have
had a good run but remain worth holding for acquisition benefits and
defensive qualities.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3650</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Eagle Star takes 10% of Domestic &amp; General
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EAGLE STAR, the insurance arm of BAT Industries, yesterday acquired a 10 per
cent stake in Domestic &amp; General, the fast growing and highly rated domestic
appliance breakdown insurer at a cost of about Pounds 6.5m.
Eagle Star will not be represented on the D&amp;G board but will be the biggest
outside shareholder.
'There is a strong mutual goodwill to sit down and see how we can work
together,' said Mr Michael Heath, executive director of Eagle Star.
Mr Martin Copley, chairman of D&amp;G, sold 1m shares and Mr Howard James,
managing director, sold 100,000 shares at a price of 960p each.
Hoare Govett, brokers to D&amp;G, placed 677,970 shares - about 10 per cent of
the company's share capital - with Eagle Star, the balance being sold to
other institutions.
The D&amp;G board, together with Mr Copley's family trusts, continue to have a
total holding of 43.2 per cent of the issued share capital.
Since obtaining a quote on the Unlisted Securities Market in 1988, D&amp;G has
been a star performer, its price rising from 165p to 960p at yesterday's
close. Profits have increased from Pounds 1.34m in 1988 to Pounds 2.73m in
1991.
Eagle Star is clearly attracted by this strong performance and is also keen
to learn from the way D&amp;G has deployed direct distribution and claims
servicing techniques in the insurance of domestic appliances like
refrigerators, central heating boilers, ovens and televisions.
Referring to the development of ideas like telephone helplines for
policyholders, service contracts for insured appliances and the direct
payment by the insurer of repair costs, Mr Heath said they 'have taken the
concept of customer care to its full extent'.
He added: 'They also seem to have control of claims costs. It is a very tidy
operation.'
Initial contacts between the two companies were made about nine months ago,
he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3651</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Polly Peck
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The main creditors of Polly Peck International, the collapsed fruit and
electronics concern, yesterday met the group's administrators to discuss
unresolved legal issues about the payment of Dollars 400m (Pounds 227m) in
funds to the creditors of different companies within the group.
A meeting of creditors of Polly Peck Finance is to be held in late April or
May to discuss the issue further.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-3652</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCMBUAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920313
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  13 MAR 92 / United Biscuits boosted by US and European operations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GUY DE JONQUIERES, Consumer Industries Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNITED BISCUITS lifted pre-tax profits by 8 per cent to Pounds 211.3m last
year, thanks to solid performances by its US and continental European
operations which offset weak trading in the UK.
Mr Robert Clarke, chairman, said the results, were 'highly creditable' in
difficult economic conditions. He forecast satisfactory profits and earnings
this year although there was no sign of an upturn in the group's main
markets.
The results, above market expectations, compared with Pounds 195.1m last
time. Sales advanced to Pounds 2.98bn against Pounds 2.72bn.
The fastest growth was in the McVitie's division's continental operations,
where acquisitions contributed to operating profit of Pounds 14.6m, up from
Pounds 5.2m, on sales of Pounds 217.9m (Pounds 103.9m). KP Snacks'
continental business also did well, increasing profit to Pounds 6.6m from
Pounds 5.4m on sales of Pounds 140.4m (Pounds 99.1m).
In the US, where product launches helped Keebler lift its market share,
trading profit rose to Pounds 65.6m from Pounds 54.7m. Sales were Pounds
983m compared with Pounds 900.8m.
A change in Keebler's accounting policy to reflect the cost of US
post-retirement healthcare benefits reduced United Biscuit's pre-tax profits
by Pounds 3.1m. The previous year's figures have been re-stated to reflect
the change.
In the UK, results were depressed by sluggish demand and trading down by
consumers. McVitie's lost volume market share but increased profit to Pounds
92.1m against Pounds 85.6m on sales of Pounds 586m up from Pounds 548.6m,
while KP's profit rose to Pounds 36.9m from Pounds 36.1m on sales of Pounds
363.9m (against Pounds 343.2m).
Terry's was hit by a fall in demand for boxed chocolates, and profit edged
up to Pounds 14.3m from Pounds 14m on sales of Pounds 143.4m against Pounds
138.9m. Profits of Ross Young's frozen foods operation fell to Pounds 27.5m
(against Pounds 30.1m) on lower sales of Pounds 542.9m, down from Pounds
564.4m. United Biscuits said rationalisation had given Ross Young's a
competitive cost base.
Acquisitions overseas and the UK recession meant only 53 per cent of the
group's sales and 64 per cent of profit were generated in Britain last year,
the lowest in its history.
Earnings rose 9 per cent to 29.5p per share on a fully diluted basis
compared with 27.1p a year ago. Undiluted earnings were 30.8p (28.9p). The
interim dividend is raised to 5.5p (5.3p) for a full-year total of 9.8p
(9.1p).
Lex, Page 18; Market, Page 40
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
